 The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ MUNICIPALS  Anchorage, Alaska -- $80.8 million of senior lien refunding electric revenue bonds, Series 1989, due 1990-2002 and 2006, tentatively priced at par by a Goldman, Sachs & Co. group to yield from 5.80% in 1990 to 7% in 2006.  Serial bonds were tentatively priced to yield to 6.85% in 2001 and 2002.  There are $26.9 million of term bonds due 2006.  The bonds are insured and rated triple-A by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and Standard & Poor's Corp.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $400 million of Remic mortgage securities being offered in 12 classes by Bear, Stearns & Co.  The offering, Series 1989-58, is backed by Fannie Mae 9% mortgage-backed securities.  @ EUROBONDS  Agricultural Mortgage Corp. (U.K.) -- #150 million of 11 1/2% bonds due Aug. 30, 1994, priced at 101.95 to yield 11.48% less full fees, via Paribas Capital Markets.  Fees 1 7/8.  Deutsche Bank Finance N.V. (West German parent) -- #100 million of 11% bonds due Jan. 19 1994, fungible with outstanding #125 million issue, via Baring Brothers & Co. Priced at 100.5 plus accrued interest from January.  Guaranteed by Deutsche Bank AG.  Furuno Electric Co. (Japan) -- 100 million Swiss francs of notes due Aug. 30, 1994, with equity-purchase warrants, fixed 2 7/8% coupon at par, via Citicorp Investment Bank Switzerland.  Guarantee by Fuji Bank.  Exercise period of the warrants Sept. 19, 1989, to Aug. 17, 1994.  Definitive terms fixed Aug. 10.  Call at issuer's option from Feb. 28, 1990, at 102 1/4, declining 1/4 semiannually.  Brooks Brothers said it plans to phase out production and close its shirt plant in Paterson, N.J., by mid-October.  The clothing maker, a unit of British clothing and food retailer Marks & Spencer PLC, said about 290 employees would be dismissed, reducing its New Jersey employment to 215.  George Hanley, senior vice president, said, "We have come to the reluctant conclusion that it is simply no longer economical to operate this plant."  He said the company has surplus shirt-making capacity and will consolidate production at a factory in Garland, N.C.  Brooks Brothers, New York, operates 52 stores in the U.S.  It also has retail operations in Japan.  3Com Corp., Santa Clara, Calif., said that it might lose money in its first quarter and that it expected sales to fall below $100 million for the period.  The maker of computer networking products blamed its disappointing sales in June and July upon general business conditions and upon the need to lower prices for some of its products.  The company said that if it has strong sales in August, it should post earnings for the quarter ending Aug. 31; otherwise "the possibility of a loss cannot be ruled out."  The company reported sales of $82 million in its year-earlier period.  A spokesman for the company declined to specify revenue for the current quarter, saying only that the company has a policy of issuing a statement whenever its revenues fall at least 10 percent below the consensus of Wall Street estimates.  For its fourth quarter ended May 31, 3Com posted net of $8.2 million on sales of $11.7 million.  Ames Department Stores Inc. said it signed a definitive agreement to sell its G.C. Murphy Co. variety store operations to E-II Holdings Inc., a unit of Riklis Family Corp., for about $80 million.  G.C. Murphy's 130 variety stores and 25 Bargain World stores had $175 million in sales for the year ended Jan. 28.  The operations being transferred include all store inventories, fixtures, properties, related assets and liabilities.  Ames, based in Rocky Hill, Conn., said it will use the after-tax proceeds of the sale to further reduce the long-term bank debt incurred when the company purchased the Zayre Stores division in 1988.  The sale, subject to federal regulatory approval, is expected to be completed within the next 45 days, Ames said.  Ames said the transaction isn't expected to have a significant impact on its net earnings.  Time Warner Inc. announced new managing editors at three of its magazines, People, Money and Life.  A spokesman said the changes "have absolutely nothing to do with the merger" of Time Inc. and Warner Communications Inc.  The spokesman said the purpose of the reshuffling is "just to inject some new ideas, new energy, new creativity.  It isn't unusual for us to shuffle assignments like this from time to time."  Landon Y. Jones Jr., 45 years old, currently managing editor of Money magazine, was named managing editor of People.  Mr. Jones will succeed James R. Gaines, 41, who will become managing editor of Life magazine.  Mr. Gaines will succeed Patricia Ryan, who is leaving the company.  Ms. Ryan couldn't be reached for comment.  Succeeding Mr. Jones as managing editor of Money will be Frank Lalli, 47, who is currently that publication's executive editor.  Time Warner said all the editorial changes will be effective Sept. 11.  Russell A. Boss, president of A.T. Cross Co., a Lincoln, R.I., maker of writing instruments, was named a trustee of this utility holding company.  He succeeds Robert I. Dexter, who retired.  As part of her duties as Teamster steward in the copper mine here, Mary Hughes used to walk up to the assignment window every day and shove a grievance under her boss's nose.  He developed a twitch above his left eye that would recur whenever he saw her.  "We were always at each other's throats," she recalls.  "It was unbelievably hostile."  Today, the ore-truck driver and her same boss, Jack Dodson, kid around like old buddies, and she is bucking for a promotion.  But then, she is no longer a Teamster.  In May, Ms. Hughes and her fellow Teamster and United Steelworkers members at Cyprus Minerals Co.'s Miami copper mine turned their backs on about 50 years of union history in this dry, narrow valley 90 miles east of Phoenix, rejecting union representation by a convincing 2-to-1 margin.  "You'd think a community that was a union stronghold like this would be union forever," says Charles Sandoval, president of the Steelworkers local at a neighboring mine.  But it isn't, and the nagging question for union organizers is why.  Worker frustration with the declining clout and responsiveness of organized labor had some effect.  The company's new approach to labor relations, however, may have meant more.  "Cyprus pulled a little coup here," Mr. Sandoval concedes.  Cyprus did it without the usual strong-arm tactics.  To win the hearts and minds of the union work force, the company, led by President Kenneth Barr, used a mesmerizing psychological campaign that included seminars -- "charm school" sessions, the workers called them -- to close the decades-wide gulf between managers and workers.  The company also curried favor by more traditional means: raises, changes in work rules, cross-training and a push for a safer workplace.  "Cyprus came along and showed me there is a better way," says a converted Ms. Hughes.  Unsurprisingly, not everyone agrees that things are better.  Old-timers complain about new policies that prize youth and enterprise over seniority.  And some dislike having to learn additional tasks.  Even within families, divisions have developed over the benefits or drawbacks of unions.  But Cyprus's approach has received the attention of the industry, much to the chagrin of union supporters.  "There's no question this is spreading," says Tino Torrez, the Steelworkers' subdistrict director for New Mexico and Arizona.  "We've got to educate our people and prepare them" for what the union considers self-serving company tactics that won't serve the workers' best interests in the long run.  Cyprus's quiet triumph is surprising in a traditionally strife-torn industry.  Mining labor history, after all, encompasses the massacres of workers at Matewan, W.Va., and Ludlow, Colo., early in the century.  The industry also nursed the Wobblies, as the radical International Workers of the World were known.  Arizona mining companies once solved union problems by loading union agitators onto railroad cattle cars at gunpoint and "deporting" them to the deserts of neighboring states.  "Historically, mining companies have been behind the times in making changes" in labor relations, says Thomas Raleigh, a Dallas management consultant.  Even today, Cyprus's experience stands in stark contrast to the combative wildcat strikes and work stoppages tearing apart Eastern mines as the United Mine Workers struggles to reassert itself with its dwindling membership.  For miners in the West, where the UMW has never gained a foothold, that dispute has been a distant clap of thunder.  But the West hasn't been exempt from labor strife.  After a violent, 18-month strike at Phelps Dodge Corp.'s nearby Morenci, Ariz., mine, replacement workers decertified their unions in 1986.  Inexorably, the ties that bind mine workers to their unions have been weakening under the weight of frequent mine closings and wage concessions.  Overall union membership in U.S. mines has dropped from about 256,000, or 35% of the work force in 1977, to only 133,000, or 19% in 1988.  Moreover, pay increases over the years have raised miners' living standards and reduced militancy.  Miners make an average of $758 a week in Arizona today, up from $171 a week 20 years ago and $40 a week in the heyday of the unions in the early 1940s (not accounting for inflation's effect).  Some mining companies have strived to switch to nonunion operations while avoiding the usual bitterness and hostility.  By permitting workers at two mines in Gillette, Wyo., to vote on new shifts, new equipment and new benefit packages, among other things, Amax Coal Industries, a subsidiary of Amax Inc., has had labor peace since the mine unions were decertified in the mid-1970s.  Cyprus, a Denver-based company that was spun off from Amoco Corp. in 1985, when many oil companies were divesting nonoil assets, certainly has benefited from the approach.  It has just three unionized operations among the 51 silver, gold, copper, coal and industrial-minerals mines and mills it operates in 23 states and six foreign countries.  Among mines acquired by Cyprus, only the Miami union even tried to reinstate itself after being dislodged.  Cyprus's success with the approach has contributed to a doubling of revenue and an eightfold increase in earnings the past two years.  Given this record, industry analysts expect the Dr. Goodvibes approach to continue to catch on.  It already has labor on the run at the Magma Copper Co. mine next door.  In a recently signed three-year contract, Magma miners accepted an average raise of $1 an hour in the first year after demanding $3, the amount they gave back in 1986 concessions.  "We sure didn't want to go on strike," says Mr. Sandoval, the Steelworkers leader.  "The old days of throwing rocks are over with."  The story of organized labor's fall from grace here began when Cyprus bought the mine in July 1988 from Inspiration Resources Corp.  Because it was an asset purchase, the new company didn't have to honor the previous management's union contract.  Cyprus fired everyone at Miami, in effect abrogating the labor agreement, then rehired all but 40 of the mine's 1,000 workers -- with raises of $1 or $2 an hour.  Job classifications were slashed from 240 to nine, and workers were offered further raises for learning multiple jobs.  "We were all told that it was going to be different, no more harassment," says Ms. Hughes, the former Teamster steward.  "We didn't believe a word of it."  But the company didn't threaten workers or badmouth the union.  It's easy to drum up hostility for Darth Vader, but how do you confront Mr. Rogers?  "They scared the hell out of people by being nice to them," says Mr. Sandoval.  "People around here weren't used to that."  Workers were also finding that life without unions had benefits.  Without the union contract as an unbending rulebook, bosses started giving extra days off.  Truck drivers could get out and walk around the truck when they got sleepy without fear of being yelled at by a passing foreman.  The new relationship was strengthened through another Cyprus innovation: It sent everyone, from truck drivers to the mine's general manager, to the small-group "charm school" seminars that emphasized transactional analysis, a psychological approach best known for the slogan: "I'm OK, you're OK."  In seeking to end the traditional parent-child relationship between management and labor, the sessions reinforced the notions that problems could be resolved one-to-one and that the best ideas come from the workers on the line, if they are encouraged to pass them on.  The message, says Richard A. Wittmeyer, the organizational behavioralist who led the seminars, was "we're all adults here."  Jake Timmers, the mine's general manager for 11 years, met Ms. Hughes, the former union steward, for the first time at a communication seminar.  Initially, they engaged in some fiery exchanges; gradually, he grew to respect her ambition.  "Her way to progress as a person had been to be a union leader," he says.  With new lines of communication thus opened, emboldened workers started calling the human resources office to suggest that certain retrogressing managers be re-enrolled in charm school.  At regular meetings, managers sought their workers' advice -- and actually implemented what they heard.  At the rod plant, workers got management to toss out the operations manual and let them reconfigure the rollers and guides that pull the molten copper into a continuous copper rod.  Production and quality rose significantly.  "A vast amount of knowledge had been wasted here," says the rod-plant manager, Ken Watkins.  For some workers, the communication and psychological sessions were persuasive, but disquieting.  "They've got a point.  If you don't work together, you lose," says Chuy Canizales, a smelter worker, former union steward and still a staunch union supporter.  "I was buying into it for a while.  Then I thought, my God, they're brainwashing us."  Cyprus wasn't looking to brainwash anyone, insists Mr. Barr, the company's president and chief executive, who was the main architect of the nice-guy philosophy.  The approach, he insists, was simply a survival tactic at a time of a severe industry slump.  "We wanted to get communications going so we could find out ways of running the mine better," he says.  That didn't come from any epiphany or newfangled philosophy, he asserts, "that's something you learn from the time you play in Little League."  Many workers didn't need brainwashing anyway.  They were ready for change.  Increasingly, miners saw their unions as big businesses themselves, more interested in self-preservation than in helping the little guy and impotent to fight off givebacks.  "You just get tired of the union making promises and promises and we never got anything," says smelter worker Jerry Cano, who couldn't get union financial aid to help feed his eight children during five layoffs in 13 years.  Mr. Sandoval, the union official, says declining copper prices and the prospect of more layoffs limited what the union could do.  "We did what we had to to keep people's jobs," he says.  But people here are still surprised that the unions went so quietly.  The first unions were organized here before World War II.  Up on Moonshine Hill, where Inspiration Copper once housed its salaried workers, managers' children learned early that the company and the mines were on the side of good: "God gives all good things to industry," boasts a frieze over the front door of the now-closed elementary school.  Working-class children, however, grew up with unions in their blood.  "From the time they were old enough to know what was going on, it was 'us vs. them, the people vs. the company,'" says Mr. Watkins, the rod-plant supervisor.  Understandably, then, the union issue has been divisive, even within families.  Mike Guadiana, a manager in the human-relations department who believes, of course, that unions aren't necessary, drove his sister-in-law to the hospital the day she delivered her son Ralph, now an adamantly pro-union miner.  And Mike's brother Bob is a district director for the Steelworkers union in Los Angeles.  Although Mike feels strong ties to his godson and his brother, the issue keeps them apart.  "Naw, we don't talk much," Mike says sadly.  He admits he doesn't even know when his brother is in town.  Retired miners have the toughest time accepting the company line.  Bitter memories of management linger for Peter Hernandez, now 80 and retired for 19 years.  He and his wife raised eight children in a two-room shack.  After three years on the job, he was given four hours' vacation.  But because the workers' buses to the mine didn't run in the middle of the day, he had to spend the vacation sleeping in a room at the smelter.  "Better wages, working conditions, hospital plans -- everything you can mention -- came from the union," he says, complaining that today's young workers have no sense of what the union won for them.  "They didn't go through what we did," he says.  "They think because they have it made now, it's always been this way."  Union seniority rules guaranteed Dale Van Meter's job.  As he stares at TV screens and gauges that monitor the flow of molten copper, the 19-year veteran complains about being forced to teach his job to newcomers.  "This used to be the best job in the plant, and now they're giving it away," he says bitterly.  "I'm cutting my own throat."  Mr. Cano, the smelter worker, defends the company.  "Everybody says the union got us this and got us that," he says.  "But times change.  Now we have no union dues, no contract, and the company listens."  His brother-in-law, Mr. Canizales, remains a staunch union backer.  "It's not fair that the senior people are being overlooked," he contends.  The new, younger miners "are only thinking of themselves."  But even he finds it tough to work up a proper froth while surrounded by a color-TV set, a VCR, stereo components and ceiling fans.  Having been promoted to senior technician after learning every job at the smelter, even his work has become more fulfilling.  Life in the mining town is pretty nice now, he concedes.  The only problem at the moment: His air conditioning is on the blink.  The stock of UAL Corp. soared $46.25 a share to $210.75 after the parent of United Airlines confirmed that it has received a takeover proposal from Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis.  UAL described Mr. Davis's overture as merely "an unsolicited, highly conditional proposal . . . indicating interest in pursuing an acquisition."  But the disclosure triggered widespread speculation that the nation's second-largest airline may be sold, and sparked a new round of takeover fever among airline stocks.  "It's the bonfire of the airlines," said Morgan Stanley & Co. airline analyst Kevin Murphy.  "Marvin Davis is doing the same thing with United that he did with Northwest Airlines -- tweaking it into play.  There's a ripple effect throughout the entire industry."  Reflecting that, the Dow Jones Transportation Average rose a record 94.06 points to an all-time high of 1344.06, paced by UAL as well as by American Airlines' parent AMR Corp., which rose $3.50 to $71.50 a share, and by Delta Air Lines Inc., which was up $2.375 to $74.50.  The latest airline takeover flareup, which has seen UAL's stock vault to more than double its $86.50 level within the past year, reflects two major developments.  First, airline profits are at their highest level since the industry was deregulated in 1978.  The low-cost up-starts that slashed fares have retreated, leaving a small group of more-profitable survivors that can impose higher fares.  In this environment, United's 1989 profits are running about 75% higher than last year's.  Second, last month's takeover of Northwest Airlines parent NWA Inc. by Los Angeles investor Alfred Checchi set new benchmarks for airline asset values and the amount of debt airlines can carry at these profit levels.  By those benchmarks, analysts estimate United could be worth more than $250 a share, or $5.4 billion, in a leveraged buy-out.  The announcement by Chicago-based UAL didn't say when Mr. Davis's proposal was received, or what price he suggested.  But people familiar with the airline company say he proposed well over $200 a share.  A price of $200 a share would give the transaction a value of $4.32 billion.  Mr. Davis at one point was reported to own 3.5% of UAL, but his current stake isn't known.  Meanwhile, UAL's chairman and president, Stephen M. Wolf, responded by issuing a statement that seemed to contain a hint of receptivity.  He said the UAL board would consider the proposal at a meeting tomorrow.  Mr. Wolf said, "While the board of directors has not decided whether a sale of the company is in the best interest of the company's shareholders and other constituencies, in keeping with its fiduciary duty, the board will give careful consideration to Mr. Davis's proposal."  Some people familiar with UAL say its board and management are split on the issue.  They say Mr. Wolf and John C. Pope, United's chief financial officer and No. 2 executive, are willing to consider a management-led buy-out, while the board seems opposed.  The board vetoed a 1987 buy-out proposal by former chairman Richard Ferris.  Among the outside board members of UAL are Seafirst Corp.'s Chairman Richard Cooley, Manufacturers Hanover Corp.'s Chairman John McGillicuddy, Commonwealth Edison's Chairman James O'Connor, and Hertz Corp.'s Chairman Frank Olson.  No members of UAL's board or management were available to comment yesterday.  However, one of UAL's largest shareholders, Reliance Group Holdings Inc., may well favor a transaction that would maximize the value of its 7% stake.  Its chairman, Saul Steinberg, has close ties to Mr. Wolf.  Mr. Steinberg declined to comment.  But Reliance stock rose $1 to $8 a share yesterday, reflecting its UAL stake.  Trading in UAL stock was heavy, with 2.1 million shares changing hands, nearly 10% of the company's 21.6 million shares outstanding.  UAL has few defenses against a hostile bid, and is particularly vulnerable because its entire board can be removed by a shareholder vote in a procedure called a consent solicitation.  But traders were more excited about Mr. Davis triggering an auction in which someone else would buy UAL than about the former oil wildcatter buying the company himself.  Although Mr. Davis, with a reported net worth of $1.6 billion, could easily finance the purchase, he has a track record of making bids that are later topped by others.  Helane Becker, an airline analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., believes many of the losing bidders in the NWA auction will pursue United.  They include Pan Am Corp. and the leveraged buy-out firm of Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co.  She said some foreign airlines may also join the chase, as KLM Royal Dutch Airlines did in joining the Checchi group.  People who know Mr. Wolf said he may attempt a buy-out that includes employees as part owners.  UAL pilots contributed to the ouster of Mr. Ferris in 1987 by bidding for the airline, and labor unrest has plagued Mr. Wolf as well.  The pilots are angry over working without a contract for two years and over Mr. Wolf's demand for a two-tier wage scale for pilots.  The pilot union was also irked that United paid Mr. Wolf a $6 million bonus to cover stock options he lost when he left his former employer, Tiger International Inc.  To underscore their dismay with the contract negotiations, the pilots have refused to fly a new Boeing 747-400 aircraft that has been delivered.  It is costing United about $100,000 a day for the aircraft to sit idle.  The pilot union, a chapter of the Air Line Pilots Association, said yesterday it is conferring with advisers about Mr. Davis's proposal.  Previously, the union had said it wouldn't participate in any buy-out that didn't result in majority ownership of the company by its employees.  United's machinists' union, the airline's largest, is also likely to influence any takeover battle.  The machinists' financial adviser, Brian J. Freeman, said there haven't been any talks yet between union and management on a possible buy-out.  Mr. Freeman said the International Association of Machinists union is "exceedingly skeptical" of Mr. Davis and is unlikely to support any bid that doesn't guarantee job protections for employees.  Some industry observers warn that there are many differences between UAL and NWA that could make a bid for UAL more difficult to finance.  New agreements have to be negotiated with all three major UAL employee groups: pilots, machinists and flight attendants.  Unlike UAL, NWA has valuable real estate assets and a large number of airplanes on order worth far more now than what NWA agreed to pay for them.  In the past year, United has fallen behind its arch-rival American Airlines, now the top U.S. airline.  Also, another airline takeover on the heels of NWA could face opposition in the U.S. Department of Transportation and Congress over fears that heavy debt and airlines don't mix.  The agency didn't object to NWA in part because Mr. Checchi didn't use any high-yielding junk bonds.  It may also have helped that a Checchi partner, Frederick V. Malek, has close ties to the Bush administration.  In the past, airline profits have fluctuated wildly, producing hundreds of millions of losses during economic downturns.  Such losses could impair any airline's ability to pay off massive debts.  But some analysts argue that, by avoiding price-cutting, airlines can avoid losses in a recession.  On the plus side, unlike NWA, United is a flagship U.S. airline whose increased profitability also reflects cost-cutting.  Mr. Wolf has ordered nearly $2 billion in new planes and established a plan for United to fly to Europe for the first time.  President Bush praised the Boy Scouts for their efforts to fight drug abuse, but he urged them to "take the final steps" and help steer their friends away from drugs.  In remarks to 30,000 Scouts at their annual jamboree, he cited an article in The Wall Street Journal last week in which staff writer Ronald G. Shafer described the death of his 16-year-old son Ryan last year after an adolescence marked by drug and alcohol abuse.  While noting the Scouts' efforts "in taking the anti-drug message to every community" with pamphlets and other service activities, Mr. Bush told the Scouts to involve themselves more personally in the fight.  "Ask yourself if you know someone like Ryan Shafer," he said.  "And if so, have you done everything you can to help him or her?"  Mr. Bush also used his remarks to make a pitch for further space exploration.  He said the current generation would witness the first large movement of men and women into space -- despite what he called "some timid and chiding voices {that} caution us against the danger, the hardship and the expense."  Mr. Bush traveled to Bowling Green after a ceremony in northern Virginia commemorating the 200th anniversary of the founding of the War Department, forerunner of the Defense Department.  There, he reiterated his defense priorities: nuclear modernization, including development and deployment of MX and Midgetman missiles; the B-2 stealth bomber, and the Star Wars missile-defense system.  The House has voted to curtail these programs sharply; the Senate has voted more modest cuts.  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL ---------------------- %  @COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  @ POSITIVE  @Bolar Pharm $ .40 ... $ .37 (4) 8.11  @Capital Holding $1.68 ... $1.04 (8) 61.54  @Expeditors Intl $ .42 ... $ .38 (4) 10.53  @ NEGATIVE  @Flowers Industries $ .22 $ .30 (3) $ .35 (10) 26.67  @Atlanta Gas Light $ .05 ... $ .14 (3) 64.29  @ Source: Zacks Investment Research  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  Wedding day was Dec. 31, 1955, for the nation's two biggest labor bodies, but it brought little bliss to the House of Labor.  Joining the American Federation of Labor (Mostly skilled workers ) with the Congress of Industrial Organizations (largely unskilled) was expected to end 20 years of warring for members.  Labor's influence on government was also supposed to rise.  But it didn't exactly work out.  Named president of the new AFL-CIO was George Meany, a paunchy 61-year-old who had been president of the AFL only three years.  Although he had been a union official with the plumbers since 1922, when he last held a working wrench, he was still untested in big-time labor.  But he soon proved he could duel with smart, young Walter Reuther.  Reuther, president of the auto workers union and head of the CIO before the merger, had shouting matches with Meany in port-merger sessions on many issues.  Finally, on Julu 1, 1968, the redheaded Reuther, criticizing the AFL-CIO for slowness in winning reform and for its support of the Vietnam war, pulled his auto workers out.  His union didn't return to the fold until 1981, 11 years after Reuther died in a plane crash.  Meany also had to deal with corruption.  In 1957, he led the expulsion of the Teamsters, the largest union, which was headed by Jimmy Hoffa.  The Teamsters rejoined in 1988.  The only winning presidents endorsed by the AFL-CIO were John Kennedy, Lyndon Johnson and Jimmy Carter.  And the organization's membership as a percentage of the labor force has declined to 11% from 18% in 1955.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  HENRY FORD'S AUTOMOTIVE family empire came to the end of an era in 1955 when his grandson, Henry II, decided to offer the family's $2.5 billion company for sale to the public.  The Fords had shielded themselves from rapacious inheritance taxes through the Ford Foundation, the charity that owned 88% of its stock.  None had to be sold, even when Henry died in 1947 and the tax bill ended up to $12 million.  But the foundation's board was uneasy about being tied so closely to a business in which it had no voice.  Henry II had reached the same view and in 1953 he asked help from Sidney Weinberg of Goldman Sachs.  Weinberg's problem was to give the foundation more freedom without diluting its major asset and at the same time to retain family control of the company.  The foundation's stock was non-voting; voting stock belonged to the Fords.  But the New York Stock Exchange wouldn't list shares without votes.  After two years of top-secret negotiating among the Fords, the bankers, the foundation and the exchange, the answer was reached in December 1955.  The foundation announced it was selling seven million shares, and all would be voting stock.  The beauty of the deal was that the Fords would keep 40% of the voting stock, and the remaining 60% would be so widely distributed that no combination of shareholders could be expected to wrest control from the family.  When the sale went off in January 1956, the foundation realized almost $641 million, as the magic of the Ford name brought investors flocking to the 772 underwriters who handled the issue.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  WALL STREET MAVERICK ROBERT R. YOUNG, on June 14, 1954, won a two-month fight for control of the New York Central Railroad and opened an era of corporate proxy contests.  It pitted the canny populist Young against forces led by William White, Central's stuffy president.  Young, who made his first fortune selling short in the 1929 crash, had the support of Alleghany -- the railroad holding company he won in 1942 after a nine-year struggle with New York's Guaranty Trust.  White's camp had four New York banks plus a Wall Street firm still miffed by Young's role in gaining a federal rule that required competitive bidding for rail bonds.  Among the other players in the drama were Thomas J. Deegan, a flamboyant publicist for Young, and James A. Farley, a former F.D.R. cabinet member, for White.  Spending was high for the time: $1.3 million by Young, $550,000 by White.  In the whistle-stop tours, press meetings and ads ("A Hog Can Cross the Country Without Changing Trains -- But You Can't"), Young charged White with ineffective management.  White asserted that Young planned to milk Central's assets.  After Young won a stormy annual meeting attended by 2,200 sharholders, he bragged to a Senate panel that his "cleverest deal" was arranging for Clint W. Murchison and Sid W. Richardson -- two Dallas pals -- to borrow funds so they could buy 800,000 shares of Central from his Chesapeake & Ohio line to vote for his 15-person slate, which included such notables as Lila Wallace, co-owner of the Reader's Digest.  Young scored few gains at the ailing Central.  On Jan. 26, 1958, five days after Central directors omitted a quarterly dividend, he killed himself with a shotgun at his 25-room Palm Beach, Fla., estate.  He had sold most of his Central and Alleghany shares in the prior month.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  STUDEBAKER MERGED WITH PACKARD on Oct. 1, 1954, following the combination of two other small auto makers that year in a struggle to stay alive in the U.S. auto market dominated by the Big Three -- General Motors, Ford and Chrysler.  "We felt our chances for the future were much better if we joined forces rather than try to go it alone," said James J. Nance, the Packard president who had joined that once-elegant auto company in June 1952 in a rescue effort.  Another member of the "Little Three" -- American Motors -- came from the merger of Nash-Kelvinator and Hudson Motor on May 1, 1954.  Kaiser-Frazer merged with Willys-Overland in 1953 from Kaiser Motors, the smallest of the "Little Three."  Independent car makers, which had held up to 18.9% of the 1948 sellers' auto market, saw their share drop to 4% in 1954 as the buyers' market came back with a bang.  The Big Three had the massive funds for frequent model changes and high-pitched promotions by their far larger number of dealers.  The allocation of steel during the Korean War, which ended on July 27, 1953, had just put off the inevitable.  Suddenly, famous old auto names were threatened.  There wasn't anything like it since the 1928-1937 depression with 19 auto companies, including Stutz and Pierce-Arrow, folded.  Parts of the new "Little Three" hung on for a while.  U.S. production of Kaiser and Willys brands halted in 1955; Hudson and Nash big cars, 1957; Packard, 1958; and Studebaker, 1966.  Even Chrysler became sick, as a Japanese nameplate invasion was mounting, until a $1.5 billion federal bailout loan was made on Nov. 1, 1979.  The last of the "Little Three" disappeared on Aug. 5, 1987, when Chrysler bought American Motors.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  A.G. Automotive Warehouses Inc., initial offering of 1,125,000 units, each consisting of four Class A common shares and four redeemable class A warrants, via D.H. Blair & Co.  Bonneville Pacific Corp., offering of $40 million of convertible debentures, via Kidder, Peabody & Co.; Piper, Jaffray & Hopwood Inc., and Hanifen, Imhoff Inc.  Kaneb Pipe Line Partners, L.P., a limited partnership formed to operate the refined petroleum pipeline business of Kaneb Pipe Line Co., offering of 4,650,000 units representing senior preference limited partner interests, via Goldman, Sachs & Co.; Bateman Eichler, Hill Richards Inc.; McDonald & Co. Securities Inc.; Prescott, Ball & Turben Inc., and Rauscher Pierce Refsnes Inc.  Landmark Bancshares Corp., proposed offering of 500,000 common shares, of which, 407,954 shares will be offered by the company and 92,046 shares will sold by a holder, via Prudential-Bache Capital Funding and Stifel, Nicolaus & Co.  MGM Grand Inc., offering of six million common shares, via Merrill Lynch Capital Markets; Bear, Stearns & Co., and Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp.  Price Communications Corp., offering of $50 million of convertible senior debentures, via Dillion, Read & Co.  Australia's Adelaide Steamship Co. confirmed it sold its 55.1 million shares in British insurer Commercial Union Assurance PLC to Sun Alliance Group PLC of Britain for #256 million ($419 million).  Sun said it regards the purchase as a "sound long-term investment" and doesn't intend to make a full bid.  Sun now controls 14.5% of Commercial Union's shares.  Commercial Union said it hasn't been in touch with Sun Alliance but welcomes it as a long-term investor "at the current level."  Adelaide still controls 8.1% of another British insurer, Royal Insurance PLC.  News of the transaction startled the British equity market, which had expected the buyer to be an Italian or French insurer anxious to get into the United Kingdom market.  In late trading Friday on London's stock exchange, Sun Alliance slipped eight pence (13 U.S. cents) to 300 pence ($4.91).  Commercial Union rose 4 1/2 pence to 422 pence.  Nova Corp. of Alberta said it plans a rights offering to holders of common shares, debentures and warrants, from which it expects net proceeds of about 445 million Canadian dollars (US$379.4 million).  The pipeline, petrochemicals and oil and natural gas concern said proceeds would be used to reduce debt, which swelled last year with the company's acquisition of Polysar Energy & Chemical Corp.  Under the proposed offering, which will be made to holders of record Aug. 24, Nova said it would issue one right for each Nova share held.  It said holders could exercise five rights to acquire one additional Nova common share at C$8.75 a share, for a period of 21 days.  Nova said the rights would also be offered to holders of its 6.25% convertible debentures, due Feb. 15, 2008, and to holders of its Series 1996 warrants.  Debenture and warrant holders would be issued rights in keeping with the number of Nova common shares they would hold if they converted their existing securities.  Nova said between 52 million and 53 million common shares would be issued in the offering.  Currently, the company has about 245 million shares outstanding.  Any common shares left unsubscribed under the rights offering will be purchased by a group of Canadian investment banking firms, Nova said.  The proposed offering is subject to regulatory approval.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Nova closed at $8.50, down 37.5 cents.  The New York Stock Exchange recently listed a new issue.  Ogden Projects Inc., a Fairfield, N.J., developer of waste-to-energy facilities, started trading with the symbol OPI.  Five new issues began trading on the National Association of Securities Dealers' National Market System.  Calgene Inc., a Davis, Calif., agribusiness biotechnology concern, started trading convertible exchangeable preferred under CGNEP.  Eagle Food Centers Inc., a Milan, Ill., regional grocery chain, started trading with the symbol EGLE.  Genetic Institute Inc., a Cambridge, Mass., developer of human pharmaceutical products, started trading convertible exchangeable preferred with the symbol GENIP.  Marine Drilling Co., a Corpus Christi, Texas, contract oil and gas driller, started trading with the symbol MDCO.  Newbridge Networks Corp., a Kanata, Ontario, maker of integrated digital communications networks, started trading common under NNCXF.  The Senate Governmental Affairs Committee is investigating evidence that several countries believed to be working on clandestine nuclear-weapons programs have been getting sensitive information from three top Energy Department weapons laboratories.  Investigators found that the countries made 627 requests for information useful in making and testing nuclear weapons and that 484 were granted routinely.  The recipients included Israel, India, Pakistan, Iraq, South Africa and Argentina.  The information falls in what one committee aide calls a "gray area" -- highly technical details that aren't secret but would be very helpful to scientists working in bomb programs.  It is a category of information that Congress ordered the department to protect in 1981, but General Accounting Office investigators say the agency has failed to do so.  A spokesman for the department said it has no immediate comment on the evidence, which was gathered for the committee by the GAO.  "The matter is under review," he said.  The committee also is continuing to probe the activities of two Israeli scientists -- Ehud Ganani and Yehuda Partom -- who were given access to supercomputer systems at the Los Alamos, N.M., laboratory last September.  GAO investigators have alleged that the pair were exploring explosives used to trigger atomic bombs and the characteristics of nuclear explosions in space.  The department denied that the scientists were given access to any secrets.  Sen. John Glenn (D., Ohio), the committee's chairman, said the department "must stop dragging its feet on issuing guidance to the weapons laboratories" on the release of sensitive information.  He said the committee will hold hearings on the matter later this year.  The GAO found that five computer codes developed as part of the U.S. nuclear-weapons program were extremely popular items.  Despite restrictions on their reuse, a Japanese company has resold them, and a library in Italy "routinely" distributes them to other countries, it said.  India's Bhabha Atomic Research Centre, which performed a "peaceful" nuclear explosion in 1974, received a wide variety of information on the chemistry of dealing with plutonium.  The Energy Department also responded to a "routine" request from a Pakistani scientist who wanted an article on how to shape plutonium, but it stopped the release of the article at the last moment, according to the GAO, when a low-level department employee questioned why the agency was letting it out.  Plutonium is an explosive metal that is the primary material used for making nuclear weapons.  Aside from Los Alamos, two other laboratories involved in releasing the information are Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory in California and Sandia National Laboratories in New Mexico.  Other information sought and received by proliferation-prone countries involved precision detonators, machinery for shaping high explosives and exotic cameras and X-ray systems used in nuclear-weapons tests.  According to the GAO, which released a report on the matter last week, protecting this information is difficult because it has industrial applications.  The U.S. also exports hardware related to the information.  GAO investigators found 290 cases in 1987 where the hardware was ordered, cleared for export by the U.S. Commerce Department and sent directly to foreign-government agencies known or suspected to be involved in secret nuclear-bomb programs.  A federal judge ordered Varityper Inc. to stop using an advertisement for its laser-printer that attacks its chief competitor, Linotype Inc.  The judge also ordered Varityper, a unit of Tegra Inc., of Billerica, Mass., to run corrective ads stating that the earlier ad was inaccurate.  Linotype, a Hauppauge, N.Y., unit of the West German company Linotype AG, sued Varityper last month for allegedly making false ad claims.  The ad, which ran in computer magazines, says Varityper's top-of-the-line laser printer is so good that customers are canceling orders for Linotype's competing model.  The ad includes testimony from a customer and shows a Linotype purchase agreement crumpled in the trash.  Judge Mary Johnson Lowe said the ad is false because the customer quoted in the ad never canceled a purchase order with Linotype, never tested the advanced Linotype model, and never performed a direct comparison of the two machines under controlled circumstances.  "There can be no doubt as to the explicit falsity of the advertisement along the lines claimed by Linotype," Judge Lowe said in her opinion.  The attorney for Varityper couldn't be reached for comment.  The judge enjoined Varityper from using the ad in any way, including allowing salepeople to show the ad to potential customers.  The judge said the corrective ads must run as soon as possible in the same publications that carried the original ad, for the same number of consecutive issues and in the same size as the original ad.  The corrective ad is to include a reproduction of the original ad and must correct the three falsities that Judge Lowe cites.  The ad also recommends that customers influenced by the previous ad "speak with representatives of both Linotype and Varityper and accurately evaluate each company's products."  The Senate Ethics Committee revealed that it hired a special outside counsel three weeks ago to investigate possible violations by Sen. David Durenberger (R., Minn.) in connection with a $100,000 book deal similar to former House Speaker James Wright's.  Meanwhile, the House Ethics Committee announced formal, preliminary inquiries into separate instances of alleged sexual misconduct by Reps.  Jim Bates (D., Calif.), Donald "Buz" Lukens (R., Ohio) and Gus Savage (D., Ill.)  The Senate panel's action came more than a year after Sen. Durenberger's then-election opponent, Hubert H. Humphrey III, publicly called for an investigation of the arrangement.  The senator received $100,000 for two books -- "Neither Madmen Nor Messiahs" and "Prescription for Change" -- that were written in part by his staff and published by a political supporter, Gary Diamond.  About 13,000 copies of the two books were sold.  Mr. Humphrey, a Democrat, tried to make the matter an issue in the campaign.  He lost to Sen. Durenberger.  The book was sold in a way that skirted Senate limits on speaking fees.  Mr. Diamond's Minneapolis publishing concern, Piranha Press, paid the senator regular stipends in 1985 and 1986 to promote the book in speeches to trade and lobbying groups, which in turn were asked to pay the usual speaking fee to Piranha rather than to the senator.  Sen. Durenberger says he cleared the arrangement with the Federal Election Commission, but apparently not with the Ethics Committee.  "We are cooperating fully," Sen. Durenberger said Friday after the committee announced it had hired Washington attorney Robert Bennett on July 13 to review his case.  Depending on Mr. Bennett's findings, the committee could decide to proceed to a full-blown hearing to adjudicate the matter.  In Mr. Wright's case, Fort Worth publisher Carlos Moore paid the then-speaker $55,000 for a book, "Reflections of a Public Man," which was sold mostly in bulk to lobbyists and political supporters, often in connection with speaking engagements.  The House Ethics Committee's outside counsel, Richard Phelan, concluded that it was an improper scheme to avoid honoraria limits.  Mr. Wright resigned rather than face a formal disciplinary hearing on that and several other charges.  The Senate panel said it also wants to see if Mr. Durenberger violated Senate rules by exerting improper influence in seeking personal speaking engagements in order to avoid paying travel expenses.  In his statement, Sen. Durenberger acknowledged that he often scheduled business meetings or speeches to coincide with personal business and that, on those occasions, the organizations he met with paid his travel expenses.  Mr. Bates, 48 years old, was depicted last year by the Capitol Hill news weekly Roll Call as often harassing female staff members with suggestive comments and hugs.  He denounced the story as a Republican-inspired pre-election smear, but won re-election after publicly apologizing for having "kidded around and flirted around" improperly.  Rep. Lukens, 58, is appealing a May 30 conviction for having sex with a 16-year-old girl.  An Ohio court sentenced him to 30 days in jail and fined him $500.  He is spurning calls from local Republicans that he resign.  Rep. Savage, 64, was the subject of a July 19 Washington Post story quoting a 28-year-old Peace Corps volunteer accusing him of sexually assaulting her in Zaire during a March visit.  He calls the story "an absolute lie."  Your July 18 article "Stealth Pilot Shows No Signs of Nerves" stated that: "Bruce Hinds . . . flew one of the most high-pressure missions in aviation history yesterday and hardly seemed phased by it."  I was wondering: Has Mr. Hinds always had nerves of steel, or could this just be a faze he is going through?  W.R. Sarver  Decatur, Ill.  Canadian production of newsprint was practically unchanged in June compared with a year earlier as the industry operated at 95% of capacity.  The Canadian Pulp and Paper Association, an industry group, said Canadian mills produced 800,000 metric tons of newsprint in June compared with 799,000 tons a year earlier.  The June 95% operating rate was unchanged from May but down from 97% a year earlier.  Total shipments in June were 821,000 metric tons compared with 851,000 metric tons a year earlier.  Shipments to the U.S., Canada and other markets all declined.  In the first six months of this year, output was down 2.2% to 4,886,000 metric tons from 4,995,000 a year earlier.  The association said U.S. consumer stocks at the end of June were 1,302,000 metric tons, representing a 42-day supply, compared with 1,295,000 metric tons at the end of May, a 40-day supply.  U.S. consumer stocks at the end of June 1988 were 1,554,000 metric tons, a 49-day supply.  Canadian mills' stocks at the end of June were 412,000 metric tons compared with 433,000 tons at the end of May and 311,000 tons at the end of June 1988.  Total U.S. consumption of newsprint declined 0.4% in June to 993,000 metric tons from 997,000 metric tons a year earlier.  There were four Sundays in June this year and last year, making the figures comparable.  Sunday newspapers account for a major part of newsprint consumption.  As the temperature increases in the "HUD scandals," there inevitably arise the cries to throw out the programs and indeed to damn the agency.  One must not lose sight of the successes of HUD over the past 20 years.  The problems being unearthed today arise more from neglect of leadership than failure of programs, from pay scales that encourage youthful and inexperienced people to take jobs that appropriately experienced people cannot afford, and from program cutbacks that put a premium on influence peddling to obtain scarce resources.  An inattentive gardener may allow weeds to surface among the flowers, but one would weed out and reseed, not eliminate the garden.  The vigorous leadership of Secretary Jack Kemp gives promise that our nation's poor and ill-housed will indeed be well served in the future.  Out with the scoundrels but on with the programs]  Stephen D. Moses  Los Angeles  Noranda Inc. said it hasn't ruled out a possible offer for Amax Inc., in response to the Greenwich, Conn., company's friendly 2.85 billion Canadian dollar (US$2.43 billion) takeover bid for Falconbridge Ltd.  But Bruce Bone, Noranda's vice president and treasurer, said the Bronfman-family controlled resource giant, which owns about 23.8% of Falconbridge's common stock outstanding, isn't currently considering a bid for Amax.  "I suppose that's a possibility at some time," Mr. Bone said.  "There are all sorts of things being talked about.  But I don't know how we could make a decision about Amax until we decide what we are going to do with our own {Falconbridge} stock."  Mr. Bone made his comments in response to an article Friday in Toronto's Financial Post newspaper, which quoted Noranda's chairman and chief executive officer, Alfred Powis, as saying that a Noranda bid for Amax is "a possibility," among others, in response to Amax's agreement to acquire Falconbridge.  The story appeared to fuel speculation that Noranda may be planning a bid for Amax, a big aluminum, coal, and gold producer.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Amax's shares closed at $26.50, up $1.625 on volume of about 1.4 million shares, making it one of the Big Board's most active issues.  On the Toronto Stock Exchange, Noranda's shares closed at C$25.375 each, down 50 Canadian cents, while Falconbridge's shares rose 37.5 Canadian cents, closing at C$36.375, slightly above Amax's C$36.125-a-share bid price.  Mr. Powis previously had said that Noranda might also consider a counter-bid for all of Falconbridge's shares, or simply tender its Falconbridge block to Amax's bid, which would result in a C$221 million profit to Noranda.  Amax's bid, which began Friday, is scheduled to expire Sept. 1, at midnight EDT.  Mr. Bone said a telephone conference Friday involving the nine-member executive committee of Noranda's board dealt only partly with Amax's bid, and it isn't clear how long it will be before Noranda decides on its response to the offer.  In response to Patti Hagan's July 24 article, "Flag Flap Takes Root in the Garden," I'd like to add a word of caution to the City Hall gardener and advise him to be very careful when fertilizing.  Overfertilizing could result in "burning" a flower flag, an unfortunate state of affairs that easily could be interpreted as a form of desecration]  Further, we must show caution when using non-native plants such as Siberian iris, Iranian crocus, South African gerbera or Chinese poppies.  Until considerations such as these are addressed, when it comes to flower flags the plants may just say, "Hell no, we won't grow]"  Barbara Earnest  Executive Director  Green Guerillas  New York  ---  Ms. Hagan overlooked several "what ifs" of the problem:  "What if" a careless park attendant burned the living flag with too much fertilizer?  "What if" the living flag were aborted?  "What if" the living flag goes to seed?  Must the seed be preserved?  The Supreme Court must have been unaware of the ramifications of the flag-burning decision.  Pity.  Christopher Newcomb-Allen  Seattle  Peter J. Stamos's July 25 letter to the editor questioned freedom of the press in El Salvador.  Obviously he never has been in the country.  The Diario de Hoy, Prensa Grafica and Mario Rosenthal's New Gazette enjoy complete freedom.  In no country in the world have the government, the military and even the U.S. Embassy been so completely lambasted.  Over the past five years the critics of the above in El Salvador have had a field day.  They pulled no punches.  William E. Dauber  St. Simons Island, Ga.  W.H. Luers's assumptions in his July 7 editorial-page article, "Stop Splitting Moscow From the Bloc," need rectifying.  First, Czechoslovakia, Poland and Hungary are not ethnics, they are nations.  Second, Czechs, Poles and Hungarians are Central Europeans, not East Europeans.  For example, in its thousand-year history, the Czechs were invaded by Eastern barbarians only twice, by the Mongols in the 13th century, and by the Soviets in the 20th century.  Misery was the outcome of both invasions and hatred from the captive Czechs was the response.  Third, reconciliation with the Soviets may be a consideration, provided, as every Central European will tell you, the Soviets evacuate the occupied countries and promise never to return.  Libor Brom  Professor  Director, Russian Area Studies  University of Denver  Denver  Thank you for giving front-page prominence to the isolation and stresses faced by the Rev. Steve Wing of Colby, Kan., and other rural ministers ("Keeping Faith," July 14).  The small-town minister is among the last of the beleaguered generalists.  We who minister in major metropolitan churches battle burnout, too.  The big-city burnout fosters a different kind of isolation -- an isolation devoutly to be wished.  But if we give in to that personal desire to remove ourselves from stress, we cannot fulfill our mission.  Here, except for the wealthy, people live in apartments that are "little boxes" and yearn for space.  And thousands of homeless sleep in church basements and huddle on church steps.  A glance out a window in any neighborhood brings a beggar into view.  Where the press of basic human survival needs is so intense, even ministers feel the very human impulse to draw back and isolate in order to survive.  It's as if the parable of the Good Samaritan was written expressly to hold us on course.  The reason the Rev. Wing and I continue, I'm sure, is that during a congregant's illness or some other intense crisis, the minister has the privilege of being invited into the very holy of holies of that person's life.  All the masks and guises are gone.  At that moment, a minister and his parishioner are two equal human beings, touching on a deep and profound level, at the core of life.  No vocation is more rewarding.  Robert D. Williams  Associate Minister  Marble Collegiate Church  New York  ---  This is to commend you for your concern for the contribution to society being made by pastors in the lonely outposts of rural America.  You pointed out the trials and inner struggles the rural pastors experience as day after day they seek to minister to the people in their parishes.  Our nation is the richer and stronger for their caring and devoted ministry.  It is, I believe, something of a rarity when even our religious journals or papers take time and money to do such an appreciative study.  Rev. Leroy G. Allen  Tucson, Ariz.  The expansion rate of West Germany's gross national product was probably slower in the 1989 second quarter than in the exceptionally strong first quarter, a top Economics Ministry official said.  But Otto Schlecht, state secretary at the Economics Ministry, emphasized at a news briefing that the slowdown doesn't mean there was sluggish economic growth in the period.  Rather, it indicates that an unusually mild winter, which boosted construction activity, and booming demand for investment goods added momentum to the nation's economy in the January-March period, Mr. Schlecht said.  First-quarter GNP rose 3% from the 1988 fourth quarter, after adjustment for inflation, and was up 4.2% from the year-earlier quarter.  The Economics Ministry official said he couldn't yet provide absolute data on the quarter-to-quarter change but "the second-quarter growth is definitely going to be slower" than in the first three months.  Compared with a year earlier, second-quarter GNP rose "more than 4%," Mr. Schlecht said.  The GNP data will be released officially in the first week of September.  For the 1989 first half, the Economics Ministry expects to report that GNP grew more than 4% from a year earlier.  For all of 1989, GNP should expand at a 3.5% rate, Economics Minister Helmut Haussmann predicted earlier this summer.  Mr. Schlecht's estimate of the economic growth slowdown in the second quarter, although more cautious than forecasts by some other German economists, is generally in line with them.  Karin Mueller-Krumholz, an economist at Deutsches Institut fuer Wirtschaftsforschung in Berlin, figures that GNP was flat or declined slightly in the April-June period compared with the first quarter but will rise more than 4% from the 1988 second quarter.  She reckons that construction activity, which contributed so strongly to first-quarter growth, slackened considerably in the second quarter.  June industrial production figures released earlier this week showed the output index of the construction industry falling 10.5% in the May-June period from the previous two months.  The April-May index showed an even sharper fall of 20% against its February-March level.  For the first half, Ms. Mueller-Krumholz expects the economy expanded at 4.1% and she sees GNP growing 3.5% for the full year.  The growth momentum of the West German economy is far from spent, according to Mr. Schlecht.  He sees GNP growing at a 2.5% to 3% rate in 1990, a prediction in line with other economists' forecasts.  The Organization of Economic Cooperation and Development has predicted that West Germany's economy will expand 2.75% next year, following 3% growth in 1989.  And DIW's Ms. Mueller-Krumholz sees GNP rising 3% next year.  Mr. Schlecht's prediction of economic growth is based on expectations that the nation's inflation rate will stabilize at around 3% this year and decline to between 2.5% and 3% next year.  Because interest rates are an important factor in domestic inflationary processes, Mr. Schlecht stressed that Germany's monetary policy should remain non-expansionary and keep its orientation on economic growth.  "A monetary policy, expansive beyond what the economic growth justifies -- and this is what some other countries are calling for -- would be counterproductive," he said.  Such an expansionary policy would again raise the specter of climbing inflation, a development that mustn't be permitted, he said.  "We can't have a 4% inflation."  Regarding George Melloan's July 11 Business World column, "Chipping Away at Good Old-Fashioned Competition": He expresses a wariness over the formation of U.S. Memories because it was initiated by the Semiconductor Industry Association, which he describes as behind "an effort to cartelize the semiconductor industry."  In fact, SIA's efforts have been to increase competition in semiconductors by preserving a viable U.S. merchant industry.  Mr. Melloan notes that after the U.S.-Japan Semiconductor Agreement of 1986 was signed, semiconductor prices doubled, a shortage resulted in the U.S., the Koreans entered the business, and the Europeans formed a chip-producing consortium.  These developments do not indicate that the semiconductor agreement cartelized the market, but instead demonstrate that the agreement is achieving its purpose of encouraging entry into semiconductor memories through the prevention of the Japanese pricing below cost.  Prior to the agreement, Japanese firms were pricing at less than half the cost of production, driving many U.S. firms out of the market and possibly discouraging other foreign entrants.  The agreement ended below-cost pricing, so naturally prices increased.  However, there is some evidence that, counter to the agreement, the government of Japan took advantage of the fact that Japan now controlled the DRAM market and created a shortage that increased prices well above a non-dumping level.  U.S. sanctions forced Japan to end its production controls in 1987.  By calling for the end of dumping in all world markets, the agreement (coupled with anti-dumping cases filed by the European Community) encouraged Texas Instruments and Micron Technology to expand DRAM investments, Motorola to reenter the DRAM market, and the formation of U.S. Memories, in addition to the expanded participation by the Korean and European industries.  Thus, far from cartelizing the market, the agreement is succeeding in encouraging additional investments world-wide to counter a Japanese oligopoly in DRAMs.  Andrew A. Procassini  President  Semiconductor Industry Association Cupertino, Calif.  Perception Technology Corp. said it signed a letter of intent to buy BDR Audiotex Inc., a subsidiary of Tele-Talk Inc. of Toronto, for stock.  Under the agreement, Perception will acquire BDR in exchange for approximately 230,000 shares of its common and an option to purchase 70,000 additional shares for $15 each.  Perception shares closed Friday at $9.75, off 12.5 cents, in national over-the-counter trading.  At that price, 230,000 shares would be valued at $2,243,000.  BDR, which sells telecommunications-related equipment, operated at approximately break-even level on revenue of 1,057,000 Canadian dollars (US$901,000) for the quarter ended March 31, 1989.  As of then it had assets of C$1,153,000 and total liabilities of C$1,430,000, Perception said.  A $325,000 loan from Tele-Talk to BDR will be forgiven as part of the transaction, Perception added.  The acquisition is subject the execution of a definitive agreement, the approval of regulatory agencies, of the boards of both companies and of Tele-Talk holders.  Perception, a maker of interactive voice processing systems, said the acquisition will enhance its presence in the audiotext and talking yellow pages market.  Assorted Speeds  We now can flash a message thousands of miles  In split seconds, so one hears,  But to get an idea through one-fourth inch  Of human skull can take years.  -- George O. Ludcke.  ---  Stressed Address  To those with uneventful lives  I present this tidbit gratis:  We harried ones would envy you  For having a quo that's status.  -- Joshua Adams.  ---  Daffynition  Flight of geese: poultry in motion.  -- Herm Albright.  To compete with New York as a corporate center, the District of Columbia should exploit the perception that life in New York is deteriorating, a new study suggests.  It concludes that Washington D.C. should also try to attract more information service companies and biotechnology concerns that could benefit from being near federal agencies and academic institutions.  The study entitled "Washington D.C., A World Capital?" was prepared by six Harvard Business School students for Julien J. Studley Inc., a New York-based real-estate services firm.  The results are intended for use by local government policy makers and trade groups in Washington, as well as by real-estate and corporate relocation professionals.  In addition to examining Washington's business climate and real-estate development potential, the researchers surveyed the attitudes of 209 of their senior classmates at Harvard Business School.  They also asked 206 undergraduate students of various majors at Washington area colleges where they envision themselves living and working.  The students overwhelmingly agreed that New York is "the most prestigious corporate address" and has the most career opportunities.  The business school students, however, ranked New York's quality of life last among eight large metropolitan areas, and named San Francisco's number one.  Meanwhile, the college students cited Washington first and New York as number two.  Says Julien J. Studley, whose company sponsored the report, "The Harvard Business School students did not look upon Washington D.C., as a place to go upon graduation.  But they did see themselves in Washington ten and twenty years from now."  One implication, he concludes, is that while Washington does not have the financial services companies that attract MBAs today, the students believe more such banking and investment firms will be there in the future.  If so, this would contrast with New York, where the number of financial services jobs is contracting.  The consulting and law professions, currently well-represented in Washington, are likely to expand further, the study found.  One key reason is the capital's growth as an international center.  The report states that Washington, with its concentration of federal agencies and proximity to law- and policymakers, will become a more important business hub by the time European trade barriers are dismantled in 1992.  In particular, there will be more international banking institutions -- particularly foreign government banks -- in Washington, says Stephen B. Goldstein, who heads Mr. Studley's Washington office.  Mr. Studley's report acknowledged Washington's problems with education, drugs, crime and poverty and noted that the District, like every city, must address these issues to improve its economic climate.  It also recommended that the district ease real-estate development restrictions on building height, which it said limit opportunities to attract large corporations.  Advances in communication technology that limit companies' need to cluster in a central business district could also lure companies to the Washington area.  Large information companies may relocate to the region where Gannett Co. and MCI Communications are already based, the study suggests, posing direct competition for New York.  Honda Motor Co. decided to sell some of its U.S.-made cars in Israel, giving Jewish groups a victory in their efforts to defeat the Arab boycott of Israel.  Will Maslow, general counsel of the American Jewish Congress, called the Honda commitment a "breakthrough" in Israeli-Japanese trade, although the cars are supplied by Honda's Marionsville, Ohio, plant rather than by Japanese factories.  He said other Japanese companies are poised to follow Honda's lead.  American Honda Motor Co., the Japanese automaker's U.S. subsidiary, confirmed that it intends to start exporting cars to Israel by next year.  The firm has no specific volume in mind.  "It depends on the market conditions and on our production capacity," said American Honda spokesman Robert Butorac.  Mr. Maslow noted that there are press reports in Israel that another Japanese auto maker, Toyota Motor Co., has agreed "in principle" to ship its British-assembled cars to Israel.  Toyota had no immediate comment on these reports.  Major Japanese firms, fearful of possible Arab retaliation, are still skittish about direct trade with Israel.  But U.S. congressmen urging Japan to defy the Arab boycott are confident that too will come in due time.  Rep. Gary Ackerman (D., N.Y.) said that the growth of trade between Israel and Japan will have to be an "evolutionary" process.  The Export Administration Act prohibits U.S. firms from complying with the Arab boycott.  Complaints from the Jewish community about Japanese attitudes led earlier this year to sharper U.S. government scrutiny of the U.S. subsidiaries of Japanese firms doing business in the Middle East.  Last March, Daiichi Jitsugyu (America) Inc., a U.S. subsidiary of a Tokyo firm, agreed to pay $13,500 in civil penalties to settle charges by the Commerce Department that it had cooperated with the Arab boycott.  Adding to these pressures on Tokyo is a provision in the current foreign aid law, originally sponsored by Rep. Ackerman, instructing the State Department to monitor Japan's trade behavior in the Middle East.  Israel already imports a limited number of minor-brand Japanese cars from European and other sources.  Sales of imported cars, trucks and buses surged 53% in July from a year earlier to 17,339 units, a record for the month, the Japan Automobile Importers' Association announced.  The rise in July means that imported auto sales have risen from the year-earlier levels for 67 months in a row.  "There is no change in the trend," one association official said.  "And it's difficult to find signs pointing to a downturn in the near future," he added.  Association officials attributed the trend to vigorous domestic demand that has been leading the long-lasting economic expansion.  Also, the replacement of the heavy commodity tax on imports with a lower consumption tax last April resulted in price reductions and made it easier to buy foreign-made cars, they said.  In addition, lower interest rates on auto loans for imported cars was cited.  While loans for buying Japanese cars often carry interest rates as high as 14% a year, those for imported cars range usually from 6% to 8%, the association officials noted.  The number of car dealerships selling imports has been increasing recently and this also served to push up sales, they said.  In July, for the first time, cars made by Kia Motor Corp. of South Korea went on sale in Japan, imported by Mazda Motor.  A total of 307 Kia cars were sold in the month.  Sales of imported passenger cars climbed 52.7% from a year earlier to 17,142 units.  Of the total, small cars showed a 38.2% rise, with sales numbering 9,400 units, while those of medium-sized cars totaled 7,742 units, surging 74.9%.  Sales of imported trucks also shot up, by 74.5%, though the number was small at 185 units.  The surge reflected demand for trucks in the midst of strong construction, housing and other domestic economic activities, officials said.  By country, sales of U.S. cars soared 101.2% to 2,422 units, while those from Britain went up 72.5% to 1,425.  Sales of West German cars rose 40.1% to 10,609 units, while those made in Sweden jumped 51.2% to 892 units.  Italy was among the few countries that saw sales of their cars decline in Japan.  Italian cars registered a 7.4% drop to 348 units.  The Senate returned to President Bush the ambassadorial nomination of Frederick Bush, a GOP fund-raiser who has come under scrutiny in the influence-peddling scandal at the Department of Housing and Urban Development.  The action ended Senate consideration of the nomination of Mr. Bush, who isn't related to the president, to be ambassador to Luxembourg.  The president may resubmit it.  A company owned by Mr. Bush, who was President Bush's chief fund-raiser last year, received a $268,000 technical-assistance grant in 1986 over the objections of HUD staff recommendations.  In addition, the firm was paid $215,000 by developers who benefited from a HUD program to rehabilitate housing for the poor.  The Senate action came late Friday night as Congress prepared to leave for a four-week recess.  Although Senate rules require that all nominations pending when lawmakers leave for a recess of more than 30 days must be returned to the White House, lawmakers agreed to retain 106 nominations awaiting action "in keeping with our efforts to process the president's nominations," in the words of Senate Majority Leader George Mitchell of Maine.  In addition to that of Mr. Bush, the Senate returned the nominations of San Francisco lawyer Vaughn Walker to the U.S. district court there and Washington consultant Diane Morales to be assistant energy secretary for environment, safety and health.  Lawmakers led by Sen. Alan Cranston (D., Calif.) oppose Mr. Walker, who was first nominated by President Reagan, because of his membership in an all-male San Francisco club.  Environmental and labor groups have questioned Ms. Morales's qualifications.  White House spokesmen yesterday refused to say whether the president plans to resubmit the three nominations when the Senate returns in September.  Meanwhile, the Senate approved by a voice vote the nominations of Alfred Sikes, Sherrie Marshall and Andrew Barrett to the Federal Communications Commission.  Mr. Sikes, former head of the Commerce Department's National Telecommunications and Information Administration, is to succeed Dennis Patrick as FCC chairman.  Ms. Marshall, a partner in the Washington law firm of Wiley, Rein & Fielding, was the FCC's legislative liaison in 1987 and 1988.  Mr. Barrett has been a member of the Illinois Commerce Commission since 1980.  All three tend to embrace the notion that deregulation helps companies as well as consumers.  The three new members bring the five-member commission to full strength for the first time in more than two years.  The White House also is expected to name a successor to Commissioner Patricia Diaz Dennis, a Democrat who has remained on the commission even though her term expired June 30.  Now that the market for initial public stock offerings has awakened from its long slumber, investors aiming to snare quick profits by "flipping" IPOs are starting to come out of hibernation.  These investors, derisively known as "flippers," buy shares of an IPO and then unload them immediately after the stock begins public trading.  The idea is to reap higher prices from other investors who weren't able to get in on the initial offering.  Although the IPO market is just beginning to show signs of renewed vigor, Richard L. Franyo, managing director at Alex.  Brown & Sons in Baltimore, declares that "flippers are already here in spades."  Securities companies that underwrite IPOs don't like flippers because of the trading havoc they create.  The underwriters strive to maintain calm trading in the new issues they bring to market.  They don't like to see a new stock fall below its offering price.  But flippers can sometimes exert enough pressure to topple the stock and, in the process, unnerve other investors who had planned to hold onto their shares.  "The more activity there is in the IPO market, the more people tend to think they can make money over the short term," says Michael A. Pitt, partner at the Chicago underwriting company, William Blair & Co.  "It turns heads and brings in people who aren't interested in {long term} investing; but there's very little you can do about it."  One reason so many deals fall prey to flippers, underwriters say, is that it's increasingly difficult to figure out which investors are buying for the long term and which plan to sell during the first minutes of trading.  "We try to do detective work," says Mr. Pitt.  But in the end, he says, it's a judgment call.  Adds Mr. Franyo: "Our job is to figure out who only wants to buy and sell the stock, and who really wants to own it.  But it's very fluid.  A guy who's buying to own one week can be a flipper the next time."  Underwriters have had only limited success at thwarting flippers.  But one tactic that did keep flippers at bay was employed by Paulson Investment Co., a Portland, Ore., company that managed the $3.5 million IPO for Benton Oil & Gas in March.  The company didn't allow trading in the shares of the Ventura, Calif., oil and natural gas exploration concern for seven days after the shares were sold to the public.  Subscribers were prohibited from trading until after they received physical delivery of the shares and paid for them.  The tactic allows an underwriter to closely track the movement of shares and penalize brokers who sell stock to flippers.  Thomas McChesney, senior vice president at Paulson Investment, is convinced that the Benton IPO was flipper-free.  When flippers are active in a stock, the volume can surge to 40% or more of the newly issued shares.  He estimates that only about 20% of the new shares changed hands during the first two days of public trading.  Furthermore, the stock's price rose during that period.  On Friday, Benton closed unchanged at 7, up from 5 in the offering.  It also helps to have friends in the brokerage business.  Benton officials say eight brokers sold more than 90% of the new shares, according to John T. Moore, the company's executive vice president.  Benton's corporate officers "have known those brokers for years," says Mr. Moore.  "They put the shares in the hands of people who wouldn't look at the stock quote {with an eye to selling their shares} for several years."  ---  Friday's Market Activity  The Nasdaq Composite Index added 0.49 to 457.42 on volume of 133.7 million shares.  The index, which surpassed its previous record Thursday, was up 1% for the week.  Many technology stocks continued to rebound.  Apple Computer jumped 1 1/2 to 42 3/4, Intel added 3/4 to 31 3/4, Sun Microsystems gained 3/8 to 14 3/4 and Microsoft chalked up 2 to close at 57.  However, as those computer-related stocks advanced, one of the index's largest stocks, MCI Communications, fell 1 3/8 to 37 1/8.  Jefferson Smurfit Corp. surged 22%, or 6 7/8, to 37 7/8 on 985,000 shares.  Jefferson Smurfit Group, which owns about 78% of the paper and packaging products producer, said it is considering a proposal to acquire, together with Morgan Stanley Leveraged Equity Fund II L.P., the remaining shares it doesn't own for $38 a share.  Jefferson Smurfit Group called the transaction part of a larger plan under which it is considering selling a large part of its overall U.S. interests to a new company it would own jointly with a Morgan Stanley affiliate.  Jefferson Smurfit said it would own 50% of the common equity of the new entity, and would also receive in excess of $1 billion in cash for the sale of its U.S. interests.  A new issue, Serv-Tech, soared 25%, or 3 1/4, from its initial offering price in its first trading session.  Shares of the provider of specialized maintenance services to the chemical industries closed at 16 1/4.  The company offered 1.2 million common shares.  A slowdown in the Canadian economy, coupled with a stronger domestic currency, resulted in only a slight increase in second-quarter Canadian corporate profits.  In a Wall Street Journal survey, 169 early reporting companies posted second-quarter earnings from operations of 3.49 billion Canadian dollars (US$2.98 billion), up a slim 3% from a year earlier and up 5% from the first quarter.  For the six months, operating earnings rose 12% to C$6.83 billion.  Economists cite many signs that economic growth is slowing: Housing starts have fallen to a three-year low, retail sales have shown year-to-year declines, the volume of new manufacturing orders has dropped and the year-to-year rate of employment growth has slowed.  Stephen Tanny, chief economist with the management-consulting firm Woods Gordon, said Canada's gross domestic product will grow by about 2.7% this year compared with 5% last year.  He said the lower growth will mean "less increase in new jobs, less growth in retail spending," and a decline in car sales and housing starts.  Mr. Tanny also said lower growth should "permit inflation and interest rates to fall gradually by the end of the year and into 1990."  In the next six months, he predicted there will be "continued slow growth in the economy but no recession."  Declining interest rates would be welcome news for Canada's resource sectors, whose products are priced in U.S. dollars.  Profits in these sectors have been reduced because the Canadian dollar's value ranged between 83 and 84 U.S. cents in the second quarter, compared with 80 to 81 U.S. cents a year earlier.  The Canadian currency closed Friday in Toronto at 84.87 U.S. cents.  Analysts agree that continuing strength in the domestic currency is primarily due to the widening spreads between Canadian and U.S. short-term rates.  The forest products industry was the main victim of the Canadian dollar's recent strength.  In the second quarter, 16 companies saw earnings fall 21% from a year earlier to C$262 million while six-month net was off 20% to C$522.4 million.  Abitibi-Price Inc. said profits dropped by about 50% to C$28.8 million and MacMillan Bloedel Inc.'s net fell 28% to C$68.3 million.  In addition to the industry's currency woes, declining housing starts are hurting demand for wood products, resulting in lower prices.  In Canada's mining sector, the Canadian dollar's strength was partly offset by high prices for most base metals.  Prices for certain base metals have fallen from recent peaks but analysts generally agree that demand and prices will remain relatively high in the next six to nine months.  They note that production in the industry hasn't been increasing rapidly and inventories are low.  Profits for 18 mining companies fell 2% to C$645.1 million in the second quarter, although earnings in the first half rose 35% to C$1.48 billion.  Noranda Inc. said earnings dropped to C$125 million from C$186 million because of higher interest rates and a stronger Canadian dollar.  Base-metal producers had a 25% drop in second-quarter profits to C$585.3 million from the first quarter.  Inco Ltd., the Western world's largest nickel producer, reported second-quarter operating net of $179.3 million, down 31% from the record first-quarter level but about even with the year-earlier quarter.  Precious metals miners saw profits rise 4% to C$59.8 million in the second quarter and gain 13% to C$115.2 million in the six months.  Among 11 oil and gas producers, profits fell 16% in the second quarter to C$297 million and 6% in the six months to C$609.9 million.  Shell Canada Ltd., 78%-owned by the Royal Dutch/Shell Group, saw second-quarter net fall to C$60 million from C$106 million.  It said earnings were affected by lower overall prices and volumes in its chemicals segment.  Imperial Oil Ltd., 70%-owned by Exxon Corp., saw second-quarter net fall 14% to C$144 million, mainly due to costs associated with its C$4.15 billion acquisition of Texaco Canada Inc.  Forty-nine manufacturing companies bucked the downward trend, as earnings climbed 15% in the second quarter to C$934.5 million and 22% to C$1.69 billion in the six months.  Consumer-products makers generally fared better than their industrial counterparts, as profits in the former group rose by about 43%, while profits in the industrial sector were up 7%.  Ford Motor Co. of Canada saw earnings more than double to C$118.1 million.  Among the larger industrial concerns, Alcan Aluminium Ltd.'s second-quarter net of $244 million was up just $1 million from a year earlier while Northern Telecom Ltd.'s net slipped to $75.3 million from $83 million.  The Soviet Union is exploring the possibility of using parts of the banned SS-20 missile system in commercial applications.  Spokesmen for Space Commerce Corp., a Houston company, said they have a marketing agreement with Technobribor, a group of Soviet industries that manufactured SS-20 rockets and rocket launchers.  Art Dula, president of Space Commerce, said he believes it is the first contact between a U.S. company and the Soviet military-industrial complex.  He said the goal is a "derivative space-launch vehicle" that could be used by private companies and universities to launch scientific satellites from a mobile platform.  Under the terms of the company's agreement, the Soviet vehicles can't be sold, but could be used to launch a customer's satellite.  The Soviet government would retain ownership of the rocket and launcher.  The commercial evolution of the SS-20, a missile with a 3,100 mile range, which was banned by the recent Intermediate Range Nuclear Forces treaty, will be closely watched by the U.S.  Under the treaty, Russia has agreed to destroy its entire inventory of 509 SS-20 launchers and all of its SS-20 rockets.  According to State Department experts, the treaty would permit a modified version of the launcher to be used with one of the Soviet Union's rockets that carry commercial satellites into orbit.  Mr. Dula said the rocket launcher and rockets would be "totally new from the ground up" but would use some SS-20 parts, such as its guidance system.  He said the effort is part of a larger move by Soviet officials to find commercial applications for defense plants that would otherwise have to close.  He said he expects tests on the reborn commercial version of the SS-20 to begin in 18 months.  "I would hope to launch a couple of tests from the U.S.," he said, adding that Space Commerce is seeking U.S clients who would be interested in launching satellites with Soviet rockets.  Leveraged buyouts are routinely criticized for being the product of financial engineers with sharp pencils but little appreciation for running and improving enterprises.  There's little doubt that a number of transactions have been completed at exceptionally high purchase prices by investor groups just hoping to divest divisions at even higher prices.  Worse still, some LBOs are so highly leveraged that investment funds for crucially important product, market and manufacturing improvements are simply unavailable; the burden of debt service takes priority.  But not all LBOs fall into these categories, and it is unfair to tar them all with the same brush.  I am a partner in an LBO firm that invests only in friendly, management-involved situations and prefers businesses where we can see significant opportunities to improve performance and enhance value over the long haul.  How have we done this?  By making sure that we have the right blend of operating and financial skills deeply involved in all phases of our LBO activities.  Our financially oriented partners take the lead in structuring, negotiating and financing the deal.  But once the LBO is an entity, our focus shifts and our operating partners move into the lead position.  Emphasizing operating insights in building new ownership ventures can take much of the risk out of leverage.  That was certainly the case with Uniroyal Goodrich Tire Co., an LBO we sponsored that would have seemed discouragingly risky to most financial buyers.  The tire industry is known as a dog-eat-dog business.  Moreover, profits were declining at the time we invested in this company.  Despite the bleak picture, two of our operating partners became convinced that performance could be improved dramatically if management were freed from a 5050 partnership structure that led to endless arguments and inaction.  In late 1987, our firm began arranging the details for an LBO, and I was asked to take over as the CEO.  I had three initial objectives: 1) be sure we have the right team in place, and that it's functioning as a team; 2) make sure we have the right marketing strategy; and, 3) develop a production strategy that supports the marketing strategy.  Since Uniroyal and Goodrich had competing products, some said they could never be sold by the same company.  But I was convinced we could support two brands if we clearly delineated their market positions and developed marketing programs to support their specific needs.  Profit performance turned up the first quarter after the LBO was formed and has continued upward.  More important, a market-driven business strategy has been developed that will ensure continued improvement over the long term.  The Oklahoma Division of Safeway Stores, now Homeland Stores, also improved through a management-led change in ownership structure.  The company operates 106 supermarkets in Oklahoma, the Panhandle region of Texas and southern Kansas.  About two years ago, we acquired Homeland, along with its managers from Safeway.  We also gave our hourly employees an equity interest so they would be a part of ownership.  Pride of partial ownership among labor and management was a crucial factor in the complete transformation of the Homeland culture.  One measure is the pilferage rate, which can be a big cost for grocery-chain operators.  Since the buyout, pilferage has dropped to about half the industry average.  At the same time, Homeland's earnings before interest and tax have more than doubled.  The company has added 1,200 employees, and by year-end will have invested $50 million in new stores, remodelings and other capital projects.  Certainly the sense of proprietorship that management buyouts foster is a powerful motivation for successful restructuring.  Call it self-interest, or American ambition, or magic: The fact is that managers who become owners are often capable of prodigious performances.  And the further down the corporate ladder equity is pushed, the better.  We make sure that the managers buy equity in the company the same way we investors do.  What's important is for all managers to have a personal stake in the company's future.  The biggest risk is that the buyout sponsor snuffs out this spirit of proprietorship by unwittingly getting in the way of managers.  Operating people usually have little patience for investment bankers, particularly young ones with beepers on their belts and lap-top computers in their briefcases.  The six month to 12 month transition period is most successful when the investment firm that organized the buyout provides an entrepreneurial environment for the management team.  Without the total respect of the new owner/managers, the sponsor will have little success penetrating the information fortress to get accurate profit-and-loss forecasts, identify problems early, or persuade the managers to institute changes when they are necessary.  As a former CEO and operational man, I was asked by management at Uniroyal Goodrich to take over as CEO to set the new structure in motion.  But I am stepping into the background now, as operating management takes on a momentum of its own.  What is the role of the buyout sponsor beyond knowledgeable counselor?  First, to nurture a strong profit consciousness.  In some respects this is the easiest part of our job.  In a tightly financed management buyout, managers quickly focus on cash coming in and out of the box.  To overcome some of the restrictive thinking of the past, we encourage managers to think differently about their businesses.  Take the example of the manager who buys an industrial tool business that, as a division of a larger company, historically sold a wide range of commodity-type drills.  After the buyout, should he shift into special-purpose drills for difficult applications or new materials?  Or should he decide to help customers make holes in the most efficient way possible and consequently move into laser or fluid drilling systems?  While he eventually may decide to choose neither option, the point is that they won't even be seen if the manager can't get beyond yesterday's strategy.  The ultimate challenge of the operationally astute LBO sponsor is to help the new owner/managers recognize that there are no benefits in defending past attitudes, habits and practices.  I can't speak for all LBO sponsors, but we encourage the managers of the businesses in which we invest to turn their visions of the company upside down and to trust their intuition.  As a matter of history, style and practice, nothing could be further from the values of most large public corporations today.  ---  Mr. Ames, CEO of Uniroyal Goodrich Tire, is a partner of a private investment firm specializing in management buyouts.  He is co-author of "Market Driven Management" (Dow Jones/Irwin, 1989).  West Germany's trade surplus widened sharply in June to a nearrecord 13.9 billion marks ($7.41 billion), increasing the likelihood the surplus for 1989 will surpass last year's all-time high.  Separately, State Secretary Otto Schlecht said in Bonn the trade performance and new investments by industry boosted the German economy by at least an inflation-adjusted 4% in the 1989 first half from a year earlier.  He said economic growth slowed in the second quarter but continued to show underlying strength.  Mr. Schlecht's estimate followed the announcement that orders to West Germany's manufacturing industry rose 1.8% from May after adjustments for inflation and seasonal factors.  For the two-month period of May-June, West German order books increased 8.8% from a year before, supporting government predictions of at least 3.5% economic growth this year.  West Germany's trade surplus in June widened 40% from 9.9 billion marks in May and was only slightly below the record June 1988 surplus of 14.2 billion marks.  In the first six months, West Germany's trade surplus rose 19% to a record 70.3 billion marks from 59.2 billion marks the year earlier, making it very likely that the 1988 surplus of 128 billion marks will be exceeded by December.  The mark's fall against the dollar has boosted Germany's competitiveness in regions where U.S. currency dominates.  The mark has registered milder declines against currencies of other European Community members, with which West Germany does 60% of its trade.  West Germany's June current account, which includes trade, services and certain transfers, grew 14% to 10 billion marks from 8.8 billion marks in May, and was up from the June 1988 current-account surplus of 8.7 billion marks.  For Britain's most flamboyant publisher, Robert Maxwell, there's apparently no business like show business.  In a surprise move, Mr. Maxwell announced that he had bought a 14.5% stake in composer Andrew Lloyd Webber's musical-production company, Really Useful Group PLC.  The stake, snapped up from a disgruntled former partner of the creator of "Cats" and "Starlight Express," was described as a "friendly" holding with which Mr. Lloyd Webber and his colleagues are "comfortable."  The purchase, for at least #10.1 million ($16.5 million), casts the British publisher in a new role.  Mr. Maxwell has hitherto steered clear of the stage -- although his publicly traded concern, Maxwell Communication Corp., owns minor interests in British cable television.  Mr. Maxwell's main holdings include New York-based publisher MacMillan Inc., U.K. publisher Pergamon Press Ltd., sundry British newspapers, and contract-printing operations.  Snatching a hot investment, rather than becoming a new Ziegfeld, appears to be Mr. Maxwell's ambition.  After a lean 1988, Mr. Lloyd Webber's company in recent months has enjoyed boffo box-office.  His "Phantom of the Opera" is packing in crowds in New York, Los Angeles, London and Vienna.  His older shows, "Cats" and "Starlight Express," live on in such venues as Paris and Blackpool, England.  Tickets for his latest musical, "Aspects of Love," are sold out in London through next May.  It opens next year on Broadway.  For the six months ended Dec. 31, Really Useful posted net income of #1.8 million on revenue of #12.3 million.  In a statement, Mr. Maxwell's Bishopsgate Investment Management Ltd. said the British publisher was drawn by Really Useful's valuable copyrights and the quality of its management.  John Whitney, Really Useful's managing director, said Mr. Maxwell agreed that he wouldn't raise his stake further without Really Useful's consent.  The history of Mr. Maxwell's 1.6 million shares is a drama in itself.  They were owned by Brian Brolly, Mr. Lloyd Webber's partner for more than a decade.  Last November, the two men separated by "mutual agreement" in a boardroom shakeup, and Mr. Brolly walked away with his shares and a reported #800,000 farewell fee.  Last month Mr. Brolly, now planning theatrical productions of his own, hired Swiss Bank Corp. to hawk the shares.  In the subsequent box-office rush, Mr. Maxwell emerged as the winner despite "several offers" from U.S., Japanese and European entertainment concerns, said Peter Corley, a Swiss Bank associate director.  He said a factor in Mr. Maxwell's success was that "he was in sync with what the company {Really Useful} wanted to do."  Nevertheless, many of Mr. Maxwell's fans in London's financial community were bemused by his latest performance.  The publisher and composer clashed last year, when Mr. Maxwell objected to a critical biography of him released by a Really Useful book unit.  One London analyst jested that Mr. Maxwell may be hoping that the composer's next musical will be an "authorized" version of Mr. Maxwell's life.  Said Really Useful's Mr. Whitney: Mr. Lloyd Webber pulls his musical ideas "from his own well of creativity.  I can't comment on how deep that well is."  A U.S. appeals court panel lifted restrictions that a U.S. district judge placed last year on Warner Communications Inc.'s venture into the movie theater business.  A three-judge panel of the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit ruled that Warner's 50% stake in Cinamerica Theaters, which operates about 500 screens nationwide, isn't a threat to competition.  The court said the restrictions that the late Judge Edmund Palmieri put in place were unnecessary.  Cinamerica is a joint venture formed by Warner and Gulf & Western Inc., now Paramount Communications Inc. Warner is merging with Time Inc. to form Time Warner Inc.  The Justice Department joined Warner in asking the appeals court to remove the restrictions.  In 1987, the department told Judge Palmieri that it didn't consider Warner's venture anti-competitive.  The judge said, however, that he was dissatisfied with the Justice Department's investigation.  In clearing the venture last December, the judge prohibited Warner from taking an active role in operating Cinamerica.  He also said that if antitrust concerns arose, Warner would be called into court "to show cause why it shouldn't be required to divest itself of any theater holdings."  The appeals court panel said: "We find Warner's ownership of a one-half share in a motion picture exhibition company won't unreasonably restrain competition. . . .  There can be no question that Cinamerica, even with Warner behind it, won't be able to restrain competition among its competitors in the {movie} exhibition business."  Cinamerica owns 2% of the nation's movie screens.  Warner agreed in February 1987 to buy half of Gulf & Western's theatrical exhibition business in a transaction valued at about $150 million.  The court had to clear the agreement, however, because Warner was one of several studios that in 1951 signed consent decrees barring them from the theater business.  The appeals court said the movie theater market has changed significantly in the past 40 years, making such antitrust concerns no longer necessary.  Stuart Robinowitz, an attorney for Warner, said the case marked the first time that a federal appeals court has reversed a lower court's efforts to enforce the consent decrees.  He said the decision "recognizes that the motion-picture industry has changed and is highly competitive today."  Looking for that special something for your valued customers to remember you by?  How about a crystal ruler etched with your company's name?  A folding address book that fits inside a wallet?  A ballpoint pen that displays six different messages when clicked?  Those are some of the hot new products in specialty advertising, the branch of the ad business that makes all those pencils, key rings and other freebies that companies give away to engender good will and repeat sales.  Though sometimes known as the matchbook medium, specialty advertising is a big business.  All told, it racked up $4.1 billion in sales last year, a 5% gain over 1987, according to the Specialty Advertising Association in Irving, Texas.  Wearables remain the biggest category, with nearly 19% of total sales.  Writing instruments were a close second at 16.4%, followed by desk and other office accessories, at 11.9%.  A recent tour through the association's annual trade show in Chicago gives a glimpse of the latest developments in the medium.  In general, according to participants, the trend in "adcentives" is from trash to class.  But there were plenty of both types of merchandise in evidence.  "We call them the T-shirt for the waist down," says Steve Danzig of Image Boxers, proudly displaying boxer shorts emblazoned with Merrill Lynch, Federal Express and Domino's Pizza logos.  Because they're designed as billboards, and because women wear them as jogging shorts, "we don't even put flies in them anymore," Mr. Danzig adds.  Socks, sweatbands and other practical fitness items are in fashion.  Some buyers ask that their logos be silk-screened or sewn on both sides of headbands and wristbands, so the wearer can't hide them.  But other customers prefer to be more discreet.  A Sportsline sales rep noted that Westinghouse recently ordered several hundred pairs of walking socks with its name printed only on the instep.  Sports bags -- "sausages" to the trade -- are big movers.  So are straps for bags, with company names woven into them.  But restaurants, bars and labor unions prefer suspenders over straps for their customers, one salesman said.  Logo ties remain in style for all sorts of companies.  For those who think putting their name all over a tie is gauche, though, Wolfmark Neckwear's Scott Goldstein has a suggestion.  "How about a nice silk tie with a label on the back that says 'Custom made for Continental Bank'?"  Then there's signature candy.  A New York firm, Chocolate Photos, used to put people's faces on milk-chocolate patties but now concentrates on advertising messages.  One problem with edibles, of course, is that they seem antithetical to specialty advertising's moniker as "the medium that remains to be seen."  Calendars, the perennial way to keep one's name in front of a customer, last year accounted for nearly 10% of all specialty ad sales.  Now one manufacturer thinks it can keep an advertiser's message there in perpetuity.  An executive-desk model calendar from Allen Co. features a ceramic tile date plate that fits in a wood base.  At year end, the advertiser sends the client an updated tile.  The initial set costs about $25, the tiles $4.  Long reliant on grocery stores and gas stations, calendar makers now are aiming at niche-market clients.  "Instead of kittens and puppies and scenery, we're into more specialized art," says a salesman for Advertising Unlimited Inc.  To prepare a calendar for doctors, the Sleepy Eye, Minn., firm photographed antique instruments in a medical museum.  Shapes are another popular way to customize mementos.  For pharmacists, the show had pocket calculators with keys that look like pill capsules; for the U.S. Postal Service, there were mailbox clocks.  Vendors also were busy taking orders for Christmas ornaments decorated with corporate logos.  One salesman notes they make an ideal gift: they look more expensive than they are.  They're also trendy collectibles.  Prudential-Bache Securities dates those it annually sends clients.  But, as with a lot of specialty advertising, the message can seem inappropriate for the item: one ornament was stamped "Morton Salt Safety Program."  Indeed, taste is a concern for many in the industry.  Ken Berlekamp, whose Fremont, Ohio, company makes those nametags that auto dealers put on their cars, urges dealers to be more conscious of aesthetics.  Too often, he says, the signature plate is so tacky that the buyer "can't wait to rip it off."  Mr. Berlekamp recommends that dealers copy the lettering of the car's manufacturer.  "This isn't a junkie business," says Sandy Lewis, a buyer from Milwaukee, who contends that "even companies that sell something for 39 cents are looking for quality."  To make sure they find it, she says buyers "think of ourselves as counselors -- account executives -- not people trying to unload as many cheap key chains as we can."  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   NEW ACCOUNTS: Federal Express Corp., Memphis, Tenn., awarded its estimated $8 million international air-cargo service account to HDM, Los Angeles. . . .  Oldsmobile Dealer TV Communications, a group of New York tri-state car dealers, awarded its $6 million to $8 million account to Partners & Shevack, New York.  Margeotes/Fertitta & Weiss, which was awarded the account in February, resigned it last week, citing creative differences. . . .  Westinghouse Electric Corp., Grand Rapids, Mich., awarded its estimated $2 million account for its furniture systems division to Lord Einstein O'Neill & Partners, New York.  The account was previously handled by Lord, Sullivan & Yoder, Columbus, Ohio.  BOZELL: David Bell, 46, formerly vice chairman, was named president of Bozell, a New York-based agency.  Mr. Bell succeeds Ron DeLuca, 62, who was named vice chairman and will devote his time to the agency's Chrysler business.  OGILVY GROUP: Peter Scarperi, 45, formerly chief financial officer for Ogilvy & Mather U.S., was named general manager of U.S. operations.  Succeeding him as CFO is Edward Harrigan, 45, who was financial director of the U.S. company.  Ogilvy is a unit of London's WPP Group.  I don't have any idea whether a recession is around the corner.  But some economists think that one is impending, or may even have started.  In any case, it is a good bet that there will be a recession sometime.  An economist recently tried to reassure us with the proposition that the only reason we have recessions is that there are mistakes of public or private policy.  I take that to mean that we must expect recessions until we have reason to think that there no longer will be mistakes of either private or public policy, which is surely a long time off.  Prudence requires that we do some thinking now about what federal budget policy should be in the event of a recession and try to reach some agreement about it.  Ten or 15 years ago that would not have been necessary to say.  The management of the budget in a fluctuating economy was the core of what fiscal policy was about, largely as a hangover from the Depression of the 1930s and the Keynesian and Anti-Keynesian Revolutions in economics.  But this whole subject has fallen out of attention since we have become obsessed with the continuing large budget deficits.  Since no one else seems to be writing about budget policy in view of the prospect of a recession sometime, I will provide some thoughts about it.  The Gramm-Rudman-Hollings Act makes a bow in the direction of the problem.  It provides that if real gross national product rises at an annual rate below 1% for two quarters in a row, or is forecast by the Office of Management and Budget to decline for two quarters in a row, the deficit targets of the act are suspended.  This does not, however, say what should be done; it says only what does not have to be done.  A recession could easily increase the federal deficit by $50 billion to $100 billion a year, depending on the depth of the recession, unless counteractive measures are taken.  This increase would result from a loss of revenue as taxable incomes declined and from automatic increases in some expenditures, such as unemployment compensation.  In principle, there are three kinds of policy responses to such a development:  A.  An effort could be made to keep the deficit to the G-R-H target despite the recession.  In a year for which the G-R-H target is a deficit of $100 billion, for example, the recession might raise the actual deficit to, say, $150 billion if no offsetting action were taken.  But the government could try to keep to the $100 billion limit by cutting expenditures or raising taxes.  B.  The increased deficit due to the recession could be accepted.  But no further increase, beyond that automatically created by the recession, would be tolerated.  Essentially, expenditure programs and tax rates would be kept as they would have been in the absence of the recession.  Thus, in the previous example a deficit of $150 billion but no more would be accepted.  C. Active steps could be taken to bring about an increase in the deficit, beyond the increase automatically resulting from the recession itself, in the expectation that such steps would help to shorten the recession.  A few years ago Option A would not have been worth discussing.  People would have identified it as what Herbert Hoover did in 1932 -- raising taxes in the Depression -- and as a foolish policy that would make the economic decline worse.  Even people who did not accept that logic would have regarded it as involving an unnecessary and undesirable deflection of tax and expenditure programs from their long-run course.  There was a policy consensus in favor of Option B in a mild recession and Option C in a severe one, with the main argument about how to draw the line between mild and severe.  But that consensus has disappeared.  I think that when we find ourselves in another recession the argument for Option A, for tightening our belts and battening down the hatches and sticking to the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings targets, will come up again.  Sound financial experts will tell us that if the deficit is allowed to soar into the $200 billion range, investors will lose confidence in dollar assets, interest rates will rise, and economic recovery will be aborted.  Most particularly we will be told that the Japanese, the gnomes of Tokyo, will lose confidence in Treasury securities and will no longer be willing to finance our deficits.  There was some preview of this argument after the stock market crash of 1987, when the remedy of choice was to cut the budget deficit.  This essentially was the argument that influenced Herbert Hoover in 1932.  He knew all the theories, not yet then called Keynesian, about the need for deficits in depressions, but he was most concerned about keeping the confidence of the foreigners who might drain gold from us and of the bankers who then ran the Federal Reserve System.  Like most other economists, I believe that Hoover's policy was wrong.  But the argument was not stupid or implausible.  And it would not be stupid or implausible today.  If a substantial rise of the deficit in a recession should lead to a belief that the cumulative budget deficit of the next five or 10 years would be much larger than had been expected, that could cause a rise of interest rates that would retard recovery.  This factor probably would not be so important as to justify trying to avoid the increase of the deficit, but it would have to be taken into account.  It would be an unnecessary drag on recovery and a source of unnecessary delay and uncertainty in policy making.  Such a change of expectations in a harmful direction would be quite understandable given our record.  Especially in the past seven years, we have shown little determination or ability to control the path of the deficit.  Deficits have consistently and substantially exceeded the government's own goals and predictions.  The actual deficit for the first six years of the G-R-H plan will exceed the target by $310 billion, or 58%, even if the forecasts made by the Bush administration earlier this year come true.  And that is despite the use of devices to conceal the true size of the deficit, a subject on which the government has become quite adept.  So it would not be unreasonable to think that if the budget deficit gets far above the G-R-H target in a recession it will remain above that target for a long time after the recession is over.  And even if that is not true, and we get back on the target path, the cumulative deficit -- and consequently the size of the federal debt -- will be higher because of the recession.  This situation is sometimes described as an inability to increase the deficit in a recession because we run such large deficits in times of prosperity.  But that is not the real point.  The point is not that the deficits are so large but that they are so out of control -- that we show no ability to make the deficit what we would like it to be.  That is what will create the expectation that if the deficit is increased in a recession, it will be permanently increased.  It is not the size of the deficits but the slovenliness and deceitfulness of our policy that create the problem.  We probably should, and almost certainly will, run deficits above the G-R-H targets when we get into a recession.  If we are to get the potential benefits of such a course and avoid its potential costs, there are several things that should be done now:  1.  The government should try to create a condition in which investors and others believe what the government says about its budget policy.  The government will want to say that the increases of the deficit caused by a recession will be temporary.  Its credibility in that respect will be valuable.  The government should try to stop and reverse the destruction of its credibility that has been going on.  It can do that only by beginning to behave in a way that deserves credence.  2.  The administration should announce that if there is a recession, it will accept the increase of the deficit that automatically occurs and will not try to prevent it.  If there is a difference of opinion about this within the administration or between the administration and Congress, that difference should be argued out in advance and not be a source of uncertainty when the recession comes.  3.  The administration should announce that it regards the G-R-H five-year deficit target as a target for the total deficit of the five-year period.  If the actual deficit exceeds the target in one year, because of a recession or for some other reason, there will be an effort to compensate in the remainder of the five-year period by running smaller deficits than the annual G-R-H targets would allow.  I realize that these suggestions call for more candor, discipline and foresight than is usual in Washington (or elsewhere).  Giving such advice is what Samuel Johnson called a second marriage -- a triumph of hope over experience.  But people go on trying, and sometimes succeeding.  ---  A former chairman of the president's Council of Economic Advisers, Mr. Stein is an American Enterprise Institute fellow.  In the wake of a pair of messy corporate battles, Japanese regulators are moving to make takeovers easier.  Finance Ministry officials said Friday they are considering proposals to simplify the procedures for launching and carrying out tender-offer bids for Japanese concerns.  Earlier in the week, the Japan Securities Dealers Association, the stockbroking industry's self-regulatory group, imposed a prohibition on discounted stock issues that some companies have used in the past to ward off unfriendly investors.  Officials here concede that the disclosure of plans to change the rules governing takeovers is conveniently timed, coming just a month before the U.S. and Japan are scheduled to begin wide-ranging talks on structural economic differences.  The U.S. wants to broach the subject of investment barriers in Japan.  That's been a hot topic in financial circles here since the Texas oilman and investor, T. Boone Pickens Jr., this year attracted international attention with an attempt to gain control of a Japanese automotive-lighting company in which he is the largest shareholder.  In June, other shareholders in the company, Koito Manufacturing Co., voted to prevent him from taking board seats.  Mr. Pickens has sought to portray his difficulties gaining influence at Koito as evidence that Japan remains closed to foreign investors.  Days later, another controversial takeover attempt blew up when two medium-size Japanese supermarket chains, Chujitsuya Co. and Inageya Co., tried to thwart a would-be acquirer, property group Shuwa Corp., by swapping cut-rate shares with each other, effectively diluting Shuwa's holdings in both.  A Tokyo court later invalidated the share swap.  On Friday, the president of Shuwa hinted that he may consider trying to fuse together three other supermarket chains, if he can get the cooperation of a major shareholder in the companies.  Shigeru Kobayashi told Japanese reporters that he wants to merge Maruetsu Inc. and Sakae Co. with Life Stores Co., a retailing company controlled by a friend of his.  He said he plans to meet this week with the companies and their biggest shareholder, supermarket giant Daiei Inc.  "Obviously, there are a lot of things going on," a Finance Ministry official said in explaining the government decision to alter the rules governing takeovers.  But he denied that the prospective rule changes, which he said have been under consideration since the beginning of the year, were spurred by recent corporate battles.  Taken together, though, the proposed changes to rules governing takeovers could improve the environment for mergers and acquisitions in Japan.  The Finance Ministry is considering doing away with a rule that requires investors who intend to acquire controlling stakes in Japanese companies to report directly to the Finance Ministry.  Instead, securities firms may be required to make filings of large share purchases made on behalf of clients.  Such a rule change effectively would remove one technicality that could slow a takeover attempt.  In addition, the ministry is expected to lift a rule requiring investors to disclose plans to take over a company at least 10 days before starting a tender offer for shares.  In addition, a 30-day limit on the period of a tender offer may be dropped.  Only a day before the Finance Ministry's plans became known, Japan's Securities Dealers Association had issued an important reform of its own, barring companies from issuing shares at a discount of greater than 10% to their market price of the previous six months.  That rule was aimed at preventing another episode like the attempt by Chujitsuya and Inageya to evade Shuwa by taking deeply discounted cross-shareholdings in each other.  No doubt the changes will please takeover specialists in Japan.  While there are few signs that hostile mergers and acquisitions will become commonplace here, more and more companies are setting up teams to study prospective mergers and acquisitions, albeit friendly ones.  The latest reforms could speed such activity.  When the Bush administration publicly asked the Soviet Union's help last week to resolve the hostage crisis, it was acknowledging a changed reality in the Middle East: Moscow's influence there is expanding greatly, and the U.S. is showing some willingness to accept its playing a major role.  Within the past few months, the Soviet Union has made significant progress in rebuilding relations with moderate, pro-Western Arab states, Israel and Iran.  It also has distanced itself somewhat from the disruptive policies of the radical regimes in Syria and Libya, which it once thought were its best counterbalance to American strength in the region.  Last week, the Soviets agreed to use their new influence with Tehran to help end the hostage crisis.  Although U.S. officials aren't sure what impact the efforts have had, the Soviets' new approach in the long run could help tilt the balance in the region by putting them on the same side as the U.S. -- working for moderation and stability and to isolate the radicals.  Moscow contends that its diplomatic gains in the Mideast needn't come at the expense of the U.S.  To the extent the Bush administration accepts this argument, it may become less inclined than it once was to bar Moscow from playing an active part in the Arab-Israeli peace process.  "The fear of inviting the Soviets into the Middle East is somewhat relaxed," says an administration official.  "There is fairly good evidence that the Soviets desire to be seen as responsible members of the international community."  This changed attitude reflects, in part, a convergence of U.S. and Soviet views concerning regional conflicts.  Ronald Reagan saw the Middle East as one of many arenas for the East-West struggle.  President Bush appears to share Soviet leader Mikhail Gorbachev's view that the Mideast is just a regional tangle with little significance for superpower ties.  Recent experience in southern Africa and Southeast Asia shows that U.S.-Soviet cooperation is the best way to help resolve such problems.  But the changed reality in the Middle East mostly reflects policies initiated by Mr. Gorbachev.  Syrian President Hafez Assad was shocked two years ago when Mr. Gorbachev said in a toast at the Kremlin that it was abnormal for Russia not to have diplomatic relations with Israel.  Mr. Assad also was told there can't be a military solution to the Arab-Israeli struggle.  "I think that the Soviets have clearly decided that peace and stability in the Middle East are in their national interest," says Graham Fuller, a former Central Intelligence Agency analyst who now is with the Rand Corp.  The U.S. still has some complaints about Soviet actions in the Middle East, such as the recent Russian shipment of fighter aircraft to Libya and Syria.  But last February, Moscow removed the biggest barrier against its entry into the region when it ended its war against Moslem guerrillas in Afghanistan.  Within weeks, Eduard Shevardnadze, the Soviet foreign minister, set off on a five-nation Mideast tour.  He paid the first high-level Soviet visit to Jordan and the first in nearly 20 years to Egypt.  The Soviets also are focusing on improving ties with Saudi Arabia and the Persian Gulf States.  And Moscow backs Syria's foe, Yasser Arafat's Palestine Liberation Organization, against more radical factions.  "The Soviets used to work through Syria to prevent a Pax Americana from being established in the area," says Paul Jureidini, a Mideast expert and vice president of Abbott Associates, a consulting firm.  "Now, they see the way to prevent a Pax Americana is by working with the U.S. and others in the region."  Mr. Gorbachev also is moving to redress what he sees as the Soviet error of breaking relations with Israel in 1967, a step that gave the U.S. a monopoly on Mideast diplomacy.  Signs of a warming trend in Soviet-Israeli relations are clearly evident.  The Israeli philharmonic orchestra will tour the Soviet Union this fall.  And Soviet republics now have more authority to deal independently with Israel; for example, a few months ago the University of Tiblisi signed a cultural exchange agreement with Hebrew University.  Meanwhile, the Soviets signed agreements during a Moscow visit last month by Hashemi Rafsanjani, who recently became Iran's president, to help Iran with basic industrial and power-generation construction projects.  Last week, Mr. Shevardnadze visited Tehran, where he and Mr. Rafsanjani publicly declared they deplored the killing of Col. William Higgins, the American hostage.  At the moment, the radicals holding hostages in Lebanon have grabbed the world's attention.  But fundamental changes in the superpower relationship are altering the balance in the Middle East.  "The Soviets are seen by almost all the moderate Arabs as having come down on the side of peace, and the radicals are dismayed," concludes Mr. Fuller.  Over the past nine months, in states as diverse as Connecticut, Alabama and North Carolina, coalitions of Republicans and Democrats have ousted legislative leaders and installed their own, or they have informally agreed to shepherd bills through their chambers.  Many GOP operatives and conservative activists hailed the events as a breakthrough that would enhance their power.  The GOPers, frozen out of the legislative process in many states, are excited at the prospect of playing a role in the drafting and passage of bills.  Conservatives see the coalitions as a way of increasing their impact, too, since their agenda is usually furthered by Republican officeholders, and since coalitions, by their very nature, stress issues rather than merely party.  Some conservatives regard coalitions as a way to bypass those party leaders more interested in maintaining their positions than in leading a cause.  But if coalitions offer the promise of political power and effective government, they don't always deliver.  By blurring party differences, they contradict the national Republican strategy of sharpening differences between the parties.  At the same time, they create an environment in the coalition states that is as likely to produce confusion as good government.  If they are going to become the majority in most states, as well as nationally, the Republicans must convince voters both that the parties are different and that it matters which party controls the levers of government.  By participating in legislative coalitions, the GOP is conceding an important advantage to incumbents.  With the Democrats holding 68 state legislative chambers to the Republicans' 29, that concession benefits the Democrats.  "You need big issues, like crime, taxes and spending, breaking along party lines if you are going to beat entrenched incumbents," says Tom Shields, president of Marketing Resource Group, a Michigan-based GOP consulting firm, "and coalition government makes that more difficult."  In helping Democratic state Rep. Richard Balducci to put together a coalition to become speaker of the Connecticut House, the Republicans ousted a Democrat who almost surely would have tried to get the Legislature to pass a state income tax.  That issue is one of the most divisive in the state, and had deposed speaker Irving Stolberg succeeded in pushing the tax through the Legislature, the state's Democrats could have faced an electoral Dunkirk.  Participating in legislative coalitions also makes it difficult for Republicans to argue that the Democratic legislature is responsible for the state's problems.  They have been co-opted.  As North Carolina political scientist Thad Beyle wrote recently in the Comparative State Politics Newsletter, "The Republicans {in the North Carolina House} can now be held accountable for their words and actions."  Unlike party switches, which suggest that party membership is important (since changing it is a big step) and that each party stands for certain principles and goals, legislative coalitions give the message that parties don't really matter.  "Coalitions seem to make the party elites -- the legislators -- less partisan," says UCLA political scientist John Petrocik, a leading authority on voting behavior.  "And if you domesticate the opposing party, you automatically reduce the amount of partisan tension that the average voter feels."  And less partisanship almost certainly means less party-line voting.  Proponents argue that legislative coalitions make state government more open and accountable, as autocratic leaders are deposed and replaced with more responsive and enlightened ones.  Conservatives and Republicans also claim that the coalitions produce legislation more to their liking, and they point to past legislative coalitions in New Hampshire and New Mexico to make their point.  But the reverse is equally true: Coalitions can also produce legislatures dominated by personal bickering and back-biting, where ideology pales in comparison with personal vendettas and power plays.  And they can give power to people unaccustomed to using it.  In such cases, coalitions don't even produce good government.  Legislative paralysis in Illinois and North Carolina exemplifies this.  State legislative coalitions are likely to continue popping up as larger trends alter the political landscape.  But any expectation that they necessarily will promote better government is based more on hope than on the existing evidence.  ---  Mr. Rothenberg is director of the Free Congress Center for Government and Politics and editor of the Political Report.  Sir James Goldsmith aims to regain the offensive in Europe's biggest takeover battle tomorrow when he unveils detailed terms of his #13.2 billion ($21.6 billion) bid for B.A.T Industries PLC.  Sir James faces mounting skepticism about his highly leveraged, all-paper bid.  Institutional investors have snubbed the offer, complaining it is too low and overloaded with unfamiliar, potentially illiquid junk bonds.  It probably will be several weeks until Sir James reveals his real cards -- which investors say must include a substantial cash alternate offer in order for the bid to have much chance of success.  In the past 10 days, Sir James's bidding group, Hoylake Investments Ltd., has suffered a big loss of credibility as its efforts to secure U.S. regulatory approval have become bogged down in U.S. courts.  Hoylake seeks U.S. clearance to acquire B.A.T's Farmers Group Inc. unit, the big California insurer.  Hoylake plans to sell Farmers, and it has filed nine lawsuits to take the insurance issues in its bid away from U.S. state regulators and put them in federal court.  Hearings won't begin until late this month.  Reflecting growing doubts about the bid, B.A.T stock traded well below the Hoylake offer price during most of last week.  The shares open today at 826 pence ($13.52), 24 pence below Sir James's 850 pence-a-share offer.  B.A.T shares have fallen 8.2% since July 11, the day Sir James, backed by investors Jacob Rothschild and Kerry Packer, launched their unwelcome bid for the London-based tobacco, financial-services, retailing and paper company.  Sir James "has a long way to go and it is all uphill," says Michael Pacitti, an analyst at London stockbrokers UBS Phillips & Drew.  Unless United Kingdom antitrust authorities review the bid, which appears improbable, Sir James has 60 days under British takeover rules in which "to win the court cases in the U.S., allay fears among U.K. institutional shareholders regarding the paper involved in the bid and overcome any regulatory objections in the U.K.," the analyst adds.  To battle the skepticism, Sir James will "come out with guns blazing" tomorrow, says Mr. Pacitti.  At a London news conference, Sir James plans to renew his attack on B.A.T's diversification record, according to people familiar with the bid.  He expects to produce more details of how advisers Bankers Trust Co. and Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. intend to "provide liquidity" in the debt securities issued to finance the offer.  He also plans to provide details on the securities' terms and conditions.  Sir James may disclose some new investors, but no "household" names, unlike France's Banque Paribas, Britain's General Electric Co. PLC, and Italy's Agnelli family, who already have agreed to join the bidding consortium.  But Sir James's group clearly is talking to some bigger players.  Mr. Rothschild had breakfast Friday in London with Henry Kravis, partner of Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co., during which the B.A.T situation apparently was discussed.  People familiar with KKR say the buy-out firm isn't willing to take an unfriendly role in the B.A.T battle because of the lingering political fallout from its $25 billion takeover of RJR Nabisco Inc. Neither side would comment on the meeting.  But tomorrow's announcement isn't necessarily Sir James's best shot.  Unless a variance is granted, the U.K. takeover timetable runs as follows: B.A.T has 39 days to make any significant announcements or propose financial changes, like a dividend increase or recapitalization.  Unless another bidder emerges, Sir James then has seven more days, or until day 46 of the offer period, to revise or raise his offer.  Thus the sixth week of the offer period -- in mid-September -- is when "life gets for real," according to a person involved in the bid.  Sir James has until the 60th day of the offer period to acquire more than 50% of B.A.T's stock.  He then has another 21 days -- or until the end of October -- to remove any remaining conditions.  Between now and then, accusations will fly over who has the better record and strategy.  But until the U.S. regulatory situation becomes clearer, Sir James's group isn't likely to disclose details of any cash alternate offer that it might prepare to win over wary investors.  The U.S. regulatory situation is Sir James's biggest problem.  Hoylake's lawsuit contained a frank admission that the lengthy U.S. state review process would doom its offer, and regulators of some states vowed to oppose it.  The sequence of events has shaken the confidence of stock traders who had assumed Sir James has some strategy up his sleeve for coping with the insurance problem.  B.A.T advisers also hope a tax bill introduced by Senate Finance Committee Chairman Lloyd Bentsen (D., Tex.) might hurt the financing of Sir James's bid.  The Bentsen bill would curb U.S. tax refunds available to companies that incur losses as a result of takeover-related debt.  The U.S. problems also hamper Sir James's tactics in London's stock market.  Under British takeover rules, Sir James must provide a cash alternative to his offer if he or his backers want to acquire more than 10% of B.A.T in the market. (They already own 1.26%.)  Because the underwriting fees for such a huge transaction could run as much as #150 million ($245.5 million), Sir James isn't likely to make a cash offer until he is more convinced the U.S. regulatory obstacles can be overcome.  With a 10% B.A.T stake currently valued at about #1.26 billion -- going over the 10% level would involve spending some serious money.  Shortly after his colleagues had twisted the Bush defense budget beyond recognition the other day, House Armed Services Committee Chairman Les Aspin said: "We got a Dukakis defense bill.  Mike won the election."  But he was only half right.  What we actually got is the product of the new dominant force in U.S. defense spending, the Dove-Pork Military Complex.  At the very moment that Iran and its terrorists were showing that the world remains a dangerous place, this new congressional alliance was turning America's defense strategy into a dove-pork stew.  The usual band of anti-defense Democrats voted against just about every major weapons program.  They were joined by pork-barrel Republicans and Democrats who voted to buy weapons the Pentagon doesn't want.  Of course, these are the same people who complained for eight years that Ronald Reagan and Cap Weinberger never had a defense "strategy."  The Complex flourished in the House, where even the hint of coherence or discipline seems to have vanished.  It was mob rule.  Rep. John Spratt (D., S.C.), ignoring a deal between the leadership and George Bush, sponsored an amendment to gut spending for the MX missile.  This infuriated Republicans, who pounced with an amendment to kill funding for the Democrats' pet missile, the Midgetman.  U.S. security won't turn on this issue of a new land-based missile, but the episode captures the general mayhem.  Nick Mavroules (D., Mass.) regularly votes to gut defense spending, but he was only too happy to require a minority set-aside program for defense contracts.  Under his amendment, the "disadvantaged" can include contractors with a net worth of $750,000 -- nice work if you can get it.  Tom Downey (D., N.Y.) rarely has met any defense bill he's liked, but he was patriotic enough to ram $800 million for the Grumman F-14D fighter down the Pentagon's throat.  Defense Secretary Cheney already had sent up a budget, saying the department could get by without the Grumman plane.  Rep. Downey, who manages to embody the pork-dove in one creature, seems to believe defense policy stops at the water's edge -- the beaches on Long Island.  Pat Schroeder (D., Colo.), another dove, micro-managed the Pentagon into spending some $370 million for child care and "revitalized family housing."  Ms. Schroeder likes defense spending so long as there aren't any serious weapons involved.  She received a boost from Republican David Martin, a pseudo-hawk from New York, who voted to deny funds to transfer a NATO fighter wing in order to fund the Grumman F-14D and other goodies.  In the most hilarious episode, Rep. John Murtha (D., Pa.), operating from his perch in the Appropriations Committee, tried a backdoor maneuver to scuttle the base-closing act, one of the few genuinely laudable achievements of recent congressional history.  That was too much even for fellow Democrats, who forced him to back down.  But they still couldn't deter Reps.  Barbara Boxer and Nancy Pelosi, two of San Francisco's Democrats, who mounted a campaign to save the Presidio, the San Francisco base with gorgeous ocean views but no military mission.  Self-parody aside, the Dove-Pork crowd is mounting an assault on a prudent U.S. defense.  It's plausible to argue that, in the Gorbachev era, the U.S. can afford to spend less on some current weapons because the immediate threat has diminished.  But the House didn't do that.  It voted instead to retain old weapons, robbing from research and technology for the long term, when we don't know who will be running the Soviet Union.  The Members gutted weapons that go to the heart of America's competitive advantage with the Soviets.  They zeroed out the advanced cruise missile and advanced tactical fighter, both of which use radar-evading stealth technology.  Rather than vote up-or-down on the Stealth B-2 bomber, they erected just enough obstacles to guarantee that it will become more expensive, if it's ever allowed to fly.  And of course, the House gutted SDI, though strategic-defense research is yielding tremendous gains in satellites and lasers.  The Soviets always can match us F-14D for F-14D, but they'd have to spend hundreds of billions of rubles to counter stealth.  The Senate, to its credit, seems to understand this, passing a bill much closer to President Bush's priorities.  On Friday the White House promised a veto if the House-Senate conference produces anything close to the House version.  Perhaps Mr. Bush heard what Mr. Aspin said about the Mike Dukakis defense bill.  If the President can't shut down the new Dove-Pork Military Complex now, other power centers on the Hill may start thinking that "Mike won the election."  Trammell Crow Co., the nation's largest commercial builder, said it plans to refinance nearly $5 billion of properties this year so it can reduce debt and lower its debt costs.  Late last week, the company reached an agreement to refinance about 100 of its properties in the Southwest with $600 million from Equitable Real Estate Investment Management Inc., a unit of Equitable Life Assurance Society of the U.S., spokesmen for both firms confirmed.  The package is one of the largest to be refinanced and represents about one-eighth of the refinancing the company is negotiating this year, said Robert Whitman, Trammell Crow's chief financial officer.  Real estate covered by the Equitable mortgage includes industrial properties, retail centers and office buildings in Texas and Oklahoma, Mr. Whitman said.  The original financing on those properties was provided by about 38 lenders, he said.  "It is a very positive sign that a major lender is willing to come into the Southwest," Mr. Whitman said.  The mortgage isn't expected to close before the end of the year, said a spokesman for Equitable in New York.  Trammell Crow is one of several major developers in the region who have refinanced properties in the wake of the continuing problems in the region's real-estate markets.  A cut in the capital-gains tax, says Byron L. Dorgan, a Ways and Means Democrat from North Dakota, would be "the opening of the barn doors to massive loopholes, tax preferences and the resurrection of the tax shelter industry once again."  Indeed, the Democrats, led by House Majority Leader Richard Gephardt, have turned opposition to President Bush's proposal to cut the capital-gains tax into a "rich vs. poor" populist crusade.  That being the case, why did so many of these newly minted populists vote to restore the rehabilitation tax credit recently?  This is the once-popular shelter that allows upper-middle-class investors to earn tax credits by putting money into the restoration of "historic" buildings.  Connecticut Democrat Barbara Kennelly introduced and Dan Rostenkowski's committee passed the rehab tax-credit provision, which would allow a tax write-off of at least $7,000 a year (with a $25,000 maximum) to individuals with adjusted gross incomes of more than $250,000.  This tax shelter was greatly scaled back as part of the 1986 Tax Reform Act.  Current law still lets people with more modest incomes claim rehab tax credits, but by knocking out investments by the people in the shelter -- seeking upper brackets it apparently has thrown a monkey wrench into the nationwide gentrification process.  The Ways and Means hearing on putting the upper-income folk back into the rehab game elicited some pro-forma opposition by the Treasury Department.  Beyond that the speakers were all in harmony.  The president of the National Trust for Historic Preservation, a private group chartered by Congress, complained, "because of the impact of the Tax Reform Act of 1986, approximately 2,000 historic buildings each year are not being rehabilitated."  His concern was seconded by spokesmen from the National Association of Homebuilders, Vulcan Development and Management Corp. and Boston Bay Capital Inc.  Now, we have nothing in particular against restoring America's old buildings.  It is altogether pleasant to page through the National Trust's newspaper, Preservation News, and look at the historic properties up for sale: a 1726 Kennebunkport, Maine, saltbox for $775,000; the old Knightstown Academy in Knightstown, Indiana ("tax credits available on estimated $1.5-$3 million restoration for corporate headquarters . . ."); the small historic hotel on the Monongahela River that is "seeking partner in renovation and operation of hotel, may invest in project."  Nor are we instinctively averse to the sight of old buildings lovingly restored to serve as shops selling handmade soap, jodhpurs and washbasins used by someone's great-grandmother.  It's striking to see old tobacco warehouses transformed into condos.  But as the great debate over the economics of the capital-gains tax proceeds, we'll keep in mind Ways and Means' support of the gentrification tax credit each time one of the Members says something about not wanting to violate the fundamental principles of the Democratic Party.  In fact, it may be that the principle involved here is abandoning tax reform that allows the general economy to allocate capital and a return to a loophole-littered tax code that forces identifiable groups to depend on politicians for income protection.  NIMBY stands for Not in My Back Yard, one of the more intriguing phenomenons of wealthy, late 20th-century America.  It applies to airports, nuclear plants, incinerators, prisons.  It could be, though, that proponents have just been looking in the wrong back yards.  We read recently that towns in upstate New York actually were competing for new prisons -- they provide jobs and it's an industry that's not likely to go out of business.  Now the small and beleaguered town of Central Falls, Rhode Island, has announced that it wants a trash incinerator built.  This comes after the town's residents voted for the incinerator in a referendum.  The town figures that the waste-to-energy plant is not only needed but would provide a steady source of revenue.  It'll be interesting to see how they fare.  Not only will the dioxin-phobes most likely descend on Central Falls, but several neighboring towns are screaming they'll even try to block an incinerator in someone else's back yard.  The considerable growth in new jobs throughout the economy suggests the U.S. is still safe from recession, many economists say.  American businesses outside the farm sector added 169,000 new workers to their payrolls last month, with gains in construction, manufacturing and service industries, the Labor Department reported.  The department also made a huge revision to its calculation of job growth for June.  Employers added 250,000 new employees during the month, it said, many more than the 180,000 originally estimated.  The nation's civilian unemployment rate declined 0.1 percentage point in July, to 5.2%, holding the jobless rate in a range that hasn't been seen since the mid-1970s.  "It clearly allays fears of a recession," said Robert Giordano, co-director of economic research at Goldman, Sachs & Co. in New York.  "There was very little that was bearish in this report," added Norman Robertson, chief economist at Mellon Bank in Pittsburgh.  Nevertheless, the latest employment numbers are another conclusive piece of evidence that the economy is slowing.  The growth in employment, while impressive in a time of slowing production and demand, is still considerably below the monthly average employment gain of last year.  "The slowdown is still intact, but the character of it has changed," Mr. Giordano said.  "It is now less alarming and a more gradual slowdown."  Allen Sinai, chief economist at Boston Co., added, "The economy looks stronger coming into the third quarter than when it ended the second quarter."  But he emphasized: "The economy is not strong, but stronger."  The economy has been weakening as the result of Federal Reserve efforts between March 1988 and March 1989 to head off inflation by pushing up interest rates.  Recently the Fed allowed a key interest rate to decline, but some analysts have worried that it acted too late to keep the economy from tipping into a recession.  Even after the employment numbers were released Friday, Roger Brinner, director of economic forecasting at DRI/McGraw Hill, an economic forecasting firm in Lexington, Mass., said: "I think this is consistent with the notion that we're in a growth recession.  It will seem like a growth economy for people finding a job and a recession for people who can't."  But Michael Boskin, President Bush's chief economic adviser, told reporters at a White House briefing: "We believe the economy is growing on a modest, sustainable path that will lead to continued job creation.  We believe that it's consistent with controlling and eventually reducing inflation; and therefore we believe the Federal Reserve's tough task of making sure the economy continues to grow, while making sure inflation doesn't accelerate, will be achievable."  Inflation remains an issue.  After two months of restrained growth, hourly earnings jumped 0.8% in July, suggesting that tight labor markets are driving up business costs, which could translate into higher prices for goods and services.  On the other hand the result is increased income for American workers, which could add some more spark to the sluggish economy.  This is the third month in a row that the Labor Department has substantially revised upward its estimate of the increase in business payrolls, a figure that is followed intensely by financial markets because it influences Federal Reserve policy.  The initial Labor Department figures are based on reports from about half of the 335,000 employers surveyed by the government; the figures are revised later when more reports are received.  June figures often change substantially because so much summer hiring occurs during that month.  "You get your largest revisions when there's a lot of hiring and firing," said Lois Plunkert, a Labor Department analyst.  The May revision, however, baffles the department's experts.  "It was just a fluke," said Ms. Plunkert.  She attributed the April revision to a change in the seasonal adjustment factors used between the initial and subsequent report.  Here are excerpts from the Labor Department's employment report.  The figures are seasonally adjusted.  @ JULY JUNE  @ 1989 1989  @ (millions of persons)  @ Total labor force ........... 125.6 125.8  @ Total employment .......... 119.1 119.2  @ Civilian labor force ........ 124.0 124.1  @ Civilian employment ....... 117.5 117.5  @ Unemployment .............. 6.5 6.6  @ Payroll employment .......... 108.7 108.6  @ Unemployment: (percent of labor force)  @ All workers ................. 5.2 5.2  @ All civilian workers ........ 5.2 5.3  @ Adult men ................. 4.3 4.3  @ Adult women ............... 5.0 4.9  @ Teen-agers ................ 14.7 15.6  @ White ..................... 4.6 4.5  @ Black ..................... 10.9 11.9  @ Black teen-agers .......... 27.4 36.5  @ Hispanic .................. 9.0 8.1  @ Average weekly hours: (hours of work)  @ Total private nonfarm ....... 34.9 34.6  @ Manufacturing ............. 41.0 41.0  @ Factory overtime .......... 3.9 3.8  Greece in recent years has been an embarrassing sideshow of European politics -- a low entertainment born of corruptive Byzantine and Ottoman influences and the passions unleashed by this century's wars in the Balkans.  Events in Athens read more like Procopius' "The Secret History" or Michael Psellus's "Chronographia" -- complex but forgettable sagas of greed, lust, personal cruelty and ambition in Byzantium -- than anything from Euripides.  These tales have no point, except to indicate a gradual, not-very-interesting decline.  This is why journalists are having such a rough time finding meaning in the recent coalition between right-wingers and Stalinists that resulted from the Greek general elections in June.  There is little really to analyze; it is yet another intrigue within an intrigue.  The Greek Communists have had much stranger alliances.  This, after all, is the same Communist Party that in 1940 tolerated the Italian and German invasions of its own country because, at the time, Stalin had a nonaggression pact with Hitler.  But nothing exemplifies the nothingness of 1980s Greek politics so much as the career of the just-defeated socialist prime minister, Andreas Papandreou, whose government stands accused of selling arms to the Nicaraguan Contras while deifying the Sandinistas, of supplying weaponry to both Iran and Iraq while organizing "peace chains" around the Acropolis; of tapping phones at an unprecedented level, and censoring television to a degree not seen recently in Hungary or Poland while claiming to increase democracy.  Mr. Papandreou is suing Time magazine over a devastating story in March reporting allegations that the socialist government looted more than $200 million from state-managed corporations via a private bank while claiming to improve public services.  It is doubtful that Mr. Papandreou ever believed in anything beyond his own ambition.  Conservatives who accuse him of anti-Americanism give him too much credit.  Mr. Papandreou might still be in the U.S. had a political future, based on his father's prestige, not beckoned in Greece at a time when his career as a university professor in California had reached a plateau.  Anti-Americanism for him was always a tool, to be employed as the situation required.  After being re-elected in 1985, he sought "calmer" relations with the U.S. and pined for an invitation to the White House.  Later, when his government began to unravel because of a banking scandal, he said it was all a "plot" concocted by the Central Intelligence Agency to destabilize him.  There is no pattern or meaning in any of this.  Sympathetic observers have said that Mr. Papandreou's personal corruption has betrayed the ideals on which his party, the Pan-Hellenic Socialist Movement, was founded.  This is sentimentalism.  From its inception, PASOK was a retrograde movement, built around the personality cult of one man, with little free discussion permitted, and frequent purges -- often accompanied by organized, public campaigns of character assassination -- against those who contradicted the Leader.  The archives of the pro-government Greek press provide rich substantiation of this.  Author V.S. Naipaul once characterized the band of foreign-educated, Marxist idealists who ruled Grenada -- until they had a falling out and began killing each other -- as "little" men, whose heads were stuffed with "big" vague ideas that they had but a faulty notion about how to apply.  There was an element of this in PASOK, especially among the "Green Guards," the ideological enforcers dispatched by Mr. Papandreou to watch over Greece's own professional diplomats at embassies abroad.  But the important PASOK cadres were not foreign-educated at all -- Mr. Papandreou preferred the close company of those who were intellectually inferior to himself and who could therefore hero-worship him.  There was barely even the pretense of idealism among these characters.  At the beginning of the decade, they reportedly were helping themselves to Moammar Gadhafi's moneybags in order to help finance PASOK's successful 1981 election campaign, and by the end of the decade they were helping themselves to the Greek state treasury.  Finally, they stole state documents and records too, leaving empty desks for their successors.  PASOK's end was ordained in its beginning: An internally undemocratic movement -- sustained only by a vague, contradictory package of beliefs articulated by one superficial man -- must sooner or later become riddled with chicanery.  The Athenian, an English-language monthly that justly emphasizes the beauty and magic of Greece over its grisly politics, described the PASOK government as "an act which has no reality outside its own invention."  Greek politics have had only one saving grace in recent years -- electoral stability.  At least Greeks have been spared that specific indignity of Israeli and Italian politics; weak, unstable governments with too few seats in Parliament to do much.  Now this underpinning has gone too, which brings me to a story related in an article by Nicholas Gage -- the author of a bestselling book about the Greek Civil Warsoon after Mr. Papandreou's 1981 election.  Mr. Papandreou, then a youth, was dining with his friends at a seafood restaurant in an Athens suburb.  When the fish was served, the young Papandreou, without asking, took the biggest one.  His friends protested.  So Mr. Papandreou gave the fish back, but only after spitting on it.  Mr. Gage then put the question: If Mr. Papandreou ever has to give up Greece, will he do so willingly, or will he spit on it first?  The answer is found in the new electoral law that Mr. Papandreou pushed through Parliament only weeks before the election.  Because of a history of coups and weak parliamentary majorities that culminated in a cruel military junta, Greece had an electoral system weighted in favor of the party that got the most votes.  This kept down the number of parties in Parliament and made sure that, even in the case of a close election, there was usually a clear victor.  Mr. Papandreou liked this system fine as long as the polls showed PASOK as the strongest party.  As soon as the polls showed him running second to the conservative New Democracy Party, Mr. Papandreou decided to move Greece closer to the Israeli and Italian models.  This is why the leader of the center-right New Democracy Party, Constantine Mitsotakis, couldn't even form his own government after defeating Mr. Papandreou by roughly the same point spread with which Mr. Papandreou won a "comfortable victory" four years ago.  The new law makes Greek politics inherently less stable than at any point since before the 1967 military coup.  Mr. Papandreou is still not satisfied.  Hoping to woo the Greek Communists away from their alliance with New Democracy, he may propose a real system of pure proportional representation, which would make third parties -- in this case the Communists -- the permanent kingmakers in Greek elections.  ---  Mr. Kaplan, a writer who lived for seven years in Athens, recently moved to Portugal.  He is the author of a book on Afghanistan, "Soldiers of God," to be published in January by Houghton Mifflin.  GOVERNMENT WINS first round in test case on federal patient-dumping law.  A Victoria, Texas, physician was fined $20,000 by an administrative law judge of the U.S. Health and Human Services Department.  The judge found the obstetrician-gynecologist illegally ordered an ill, pregnant woman transferred to a charity hospital 170 miles away without treating her.  The woman gave birth en route to a healthy child.  This is the first case testing the government's power to punish doctors under a 1986 federal law designed to keep hospitals from turning away charity patients.  The law requires hospitals to treat emergency patients and women in active labor, regardless of their ability to pay.  The American and Texas medical associations are helping finance the Victoria doctor's defense, hoping it will help define limits on the government's authority to second-guess physician decisions.  The administrative law judge upheld almost all of the government's claims, rejecting the physician's arguments that the patient wasn't in active labor and that a transfer to a larger, better-equipped hospital was in her best interests.  The administrative judge concluded, among other things, that the doctor let his fear of a malpractice suit cloud his judgment.  The doctor is expected to appeal.  "The opinion is very disappointing," said Donald P. Wilcox, general counsel of the Texas Medical Association.  "It reads like we didn't even have a hearing."  ---  RUDOLPH GIULIANI figures he should take credit where credit is due.  So the New York City mayoral candidate and former U.S. attorney was quick with a press release last week, after six securities-firm officials were convicted in the case involving unlawful trading by Princeton/Newport L.P.  The jury held that the defendants must forfeit $3.8 million of assets.  "As U.S. attorney, I supervised the case which led to the indictment," Mr. Giuliani said in his statement.  Then, making an election promise, he added, "As mayor, I would work to strengthen the forfeiture laws so that criminals foot the bill for their own arrests and imprisonment."  But with asset forfeiture in the domain of the state and federal governments, not the city, would Mr. Giuliani have any control over the issue?  "He's really referring there to the drug-forfeiture laws," a spokesman said.  "As mayor, he would push for a bill in Albany {the state capital} to make it easier for police departments to seize the assets of drug dealers."  Earlier, Mr. Giuliani irked some of his supporters by saying he wouldn't play a role in abortion-rights battles because abortion is an issue for state, not city, government.  Since then, Mr. Giuliani has clarified his stand, saying that while he personally opposes abortion, he is against efforts to make abortion illegal.  Why would the state's jurisdiction keep Mr. Giuliani from the abortion battle but not the forfeiture-law battle?  "The two are apples and oranges," the spokesman said.  ---  STATE JUDGE OFFERS two opposing opinions for the price of one.  Legal scholars are buzzing about a 5-4 libel decision handed down in May, in which Texas Supreme Court Chief Justice Thomas Phillips penned both the majority opinion and one of four dissents.  The majority concluded that, to defeat pretrial summary judgment, Texas law required libel plaintiffs to present evidence that defendants knew their allegations were false and acted with reckless disregard for the truth.  Because the court imposed a new burden on the plaintiff, Judge Phillips argued in his dissent that the plaintiff in question, Othal Brand, the mayor of McAllen, Texas, deserved a second shot so he could present his proof.  Arguing both sides of an issue is something every law school student learns.  But, as a matter of custom -- and logic -- judges don't write the majority opinion and the dissent in the same case.  The preferred method is to concur in part and to dissent in part.  "Normally, the majority opinion would be written by someone who agreed with the entire opinion," said Mayor Brand's attorney, Donald Allee, a solo practitioner in McAllen.  But Mr. Allee isn't complaining.  The substance of Judge Phillips's dissent provides the attorney with one of three arguments in his motion for rehearing.  ---  COLLECTING MONEY OWED to the defunct national law firm of Finley, Kumble, Wagner, Heine, Underberg, Manley, Myerson & Casey is growing more costly.  According to a recent fee application submitted by the court-appointed trustee, Milbank, Tweed, Hadley & McCloy, the trustee rang up $4 million in legal fees for 34,000 hours of work in the six months through June 30.  Trustee Francis H. Musselman, a partner at Milbank Tweed, said the firm is seeking bankruptcy court approval for about $3 million of fee payments.  Mr. Musselman so far has recovered $34.1 million in assets that Finley Kumble is owed.  This falls far short of Mr. Musselman's goal of collecting $65 million to $70 million of the $110 million owed.  Mr. Musselman said he has been stymied by the need to reconstruct incomplete billing records and by former Finley Kumble partners who took clients to new law firms and now want to write off the old bills as a favor.  "Obviously, I'm not going to spend a dollar to collect $1.10 or 90 cents," Mr. Musselman said.  "But by definition, bankruptcy is expensive."  For lawyers representing the families of passengers on Korean Air Lines Flight 007, their biggest courtroom victory last week wasn't the jury's $50 million award to the families.  The real win for the plaintiffs' attorneys was in persuading federal Judge Aubrey Robinson Jr. to allow the jury to consider punitive damages in the first place -- something that has been denied to victims of international air disasters.  If other courts follow this route, defendants' potential liability in airline disasters could rise significantly.  "I can't imagine how they {the lawyers} got away with it, frankly," said one veteran aviation attorney.  Like other plaintiffs' attorneys last week, this attorney was admiring but wary: The decision is certain to be appealed, and it could be years before the case is accepted as law, if at all.  But until those appeals begin, the victory is a substantial one for the victims' families and their attorneys, led by Milton Sincoff of Kreindler & Kreindler, New York, and Donald W. Madole of Speiser, Krause & Madole, Washington, D.C.  The two lawyers are co-chairmen of a committee representing the families of 137 people killed Sept. 1, 1983, when KAL Flight 007 was shot down as it strayed through Soviet airspace, killing all 269 people on board.  The victims, as passengers on an international flight, were covered by the terms of a treaty known as the Warsaw Convention, under which airlines are required to pay a maximum of only $75,000 in compensatory damages for each passenger killed or injured while traveling on an international ticket.  Compensatory damages are awarded in civil cases to cover actual loss as the result of an injury.  Punitive damages, which can be extensive, are allowed in some cases as a means of punishing a defendant for causing the injury.  Courts around the country have repeatedly ruled that the Warsaw Convention contains no provision for victims or their families to obtain punitive damages.  And only five cases prior to the KAL decision last week have allowed compensatory damages to exceed the $75,000 limit when there has been a finding of willful misconduct.  The jury in the KAL case, sitting in Washington, D.C., decided Tuesday that the crew on Flight 007 had engaged in willful misconduct by failing to correct the plane's erroneous route through Soviet airspace.  That decision cleared the way for the plaintiffs -- in trials to be scheduled separately -- to seek compensatory damages beyond the $75,000 limit.  Then the big surprise: Judge Robinson sent the jurors back to deliberate on the unprecedented punitive damages, and they returned with a verdict of $50 million, to be divided equally among the families of the Flight 007 victims represented in this litigation.  The judge didn't write an opinion setting out the reasons for his decision on punitive damages, but the plaintiffs' lawyers had argued that the language of the Warsaw Convention is broad enough to encompass punitive damages where allowed by local law -- in this case, the laws of the states where the original suits were brought and under U.S. maritime law.  The KAL decision also is significant because it is the first in which a jury found willful misconduct against an airline when an event outside the direct control of the airline played a central role in the disaster.  The decision, if upheld, could have implications for suits against Pan American World Airways Inc. in the bombing of Pan Am Flight 103 over Lockerbie, Scotland, in December.  George Tompkins, the New York attorney representing KAL's insurer, couldn't be reached to comment last week but had indicated in court that he would appeal both the punitive damages award and the finding of willful misconduct.  Those appeals can be lengthy: Pan Am has asked the U.S. Supreme Court to review a decision by an appeals court in which the circuit court in March upheld a finding of willful misconduct by the crew of Pan Am Flight 812 that crashed April 22, 1974, in Bali, Indonesia.  Today's philosophy question: What is organic farming?  The question isn't academic; almost anything bearing the organic stamp can fetch a premium of 20% or more on supermarket shelves from nutrition- and fad-conscious consumers.  But so far, the question retains its metaphysical overtones.  "Everybody has an idea of what an organic farmer is," says John Addy, interim administrator of the United Fresh Fruit and Vegetable Association.  But getting those ideas to agree isn't easy.  "Some think it means you've got a couple of acres and you're growing some cute little vegetables," Mr. Addy says.  To others, organic farming is "a cause, a movement, almost a religion," says Neill Schaller, program director of the low input sustainable agriculture research and education program for the U.S. Department of Agriculture.  "Organic to me is farming without any purchased chemical, fertilizer or pesticide."  There are at least 17 state definitions for what can be called organically grown food.  But the federal Agriculture Department doesn't have an official definition.  Consumers who buy products stamped "organically grown" aren't always sure what they're getting for the premium they're paying.  And organic growers who want to ship their produce interstate have difficulty because the definitions vary so widely.  To bring some order to the confusion, the United Fresh Fruit and Vegetable Associaton, a Washington, D.C., trade group, recently called a meeting of 45 representatives of farm, trade, state, federal, and grower groups, seeking to hammer out a workable definition.  "We have really begun to sort it out," says James C. Wiers, chairman of the task force on defining organic and president of an Ohio farming company.  Until recently, consumers and conventional growers didn't pay much attention to what "organically grown" really means.  But the flap over apples sprayed with the growth regulating chemical Alar, which may break down into a carcinogen, and the scare over cyanide-laced Chilean fruit earlier this year put the issue of chemically treated fruits and vegetables squarely in the forefront of the public consciousness.  It also gave the stamp of "respectability" to organic farming.  Mainstream growers have had to take another look.  While a new six-point definition is a start, it leaves a lot of issues unresolved, and seems to suggest a host of new regulations may be ahead.  For instance, the definition says organic food "is food which has been determined by an independent third party certification program to be produced in accordance with a nationally approved list of materials and practices."  And, it declares, organic food must be "grown, harvested, preserved, processed, stored, transported and marketed in accordance with a nationally approved list of materials and practices."  The group also asserted that organic food production systems are "based on farm management practices that replenish and maintain soil fertility by providing optimal conditions for soil biological activity."  Such generalities, of course, leave plenty of room for dispute.  And the group won't get around to discussing "nationally approved materials and practices" and other undefined questions until another meeting planned this fall.  Mr. Wiers, a conventional grower from Ohio who headed the trade group's task force on defining organic, points out, "there are naturally occurring carcinogens that can be just as dangerous" as chemicals or synthetics used in farming.  "We've got a consuming public that thinks that organic means no chemicals, totally natural," he says.  Bob Scowcroft, executive director of the California Certified Organic Farmers, a trade group whose primary purpose is to certify organic products, says organic growers are "looking for a marriage of 20th century technology and the ways of our grandparents" His group maintains that a proposed definition of organic in a bill pending in Congress doesn't go nearly far enough.  CCOF advocates soil tests, unannounced visits and independent inspections so that the grower can then "make it public to Mrs. Jones, who just wants to know where that carrot came from."  Without uniform standards, "there's a very great opportunity to cheat" on labeling, says David Diver, director of produce for Hannaford Bros.  Co., a Portland, Maine, retailer.  "It's very important that any definition of what's organic enables the consumer to get what they really think they're buying."  But it may not be possible to arrive at a standard everyone can agree on.  Mr. Schaller of the USDA says defining organic is a little like defining common sense farming.  "The reason you can't come up with a definition for organic is that it's as much a way of thinking, a philosophy, as it is a way of farming."  House approval of a nearly $286.5 billion Pentagon bill capped an extraordinary rush of spending legislation committing the government to a broad set of costly initiatives.  Adopted 312-105 Friday, the massive Pentagon budget was the last of 13 annual appropriations bills pushed through the House in little more than a month, totaling more than $639 billion for the year beginning Oct. 1.  From the space station to the superconducting supercollider, the bills make modest down payments on expensive new projects, and resources will be further strained by new demands for housing, air transportation and the environment.  Conferences with the Senate over differing versions of the bills are due in September.  But the emerging picture shows a new wave of costs facing Congress into the next budget cycle.  An estimated $1 billion added in fiscal 1990 to renew low-income housing subsidies is only a fraction of what will be needed in fiscal 1991, and annual payments for the space station and the supercollider will ultimately double and triple.  A 25% increase is slated for facilities and equipment to modernize the nation's air traffic control system, and there is increased pressure for construction of airports.  Among social programs, little room is left in fiscal 1990 for any child care initiative; and an increase of 20%, or $1 billion, in aid for low-income public school children will begin being spent in fiscal 1991.  Environmental priorities -- and costs -- are the most striking.  Even the foreign aid bill includes a modest initiative on the issue of global warming, and fiscal 1990 appropriations related to defense nuclear wastes will exceed the entire $1.4 billion Superfund for toxic-waste cleanups.  Without agreement on new taxes, the Internal Revenue Service budget is pumped up in the name of enforcement, and even the drug war is looked to for dividends.  An estimated $275 million is expected to be realized in fiscal 1989 from seized assets -- enough to cover the salaries of Drug Enforcement Administration agents on board.  The largest of the 13 annual bills, the Pentagon budget reflects a retrenchment of its own.  Total spending is more than $4 billion above the current fiscal year, but in allocating these funds, the House adopted a plan that emphasizes buying up weapons already in production and slowing investments in new and often more costly systems.  More than $1.1 billion for the Air Force's advanced tactical fighter is cut entirely, and total Pentagon research and testing accounts are reduced by $2.1 billion from current levels and $4 billion from the Bush administration's request.  These cuts overlap with proposed terminations in classified programs including the advanced cruise missile and the "Tacit Rainbow" program to develop an unmanned dronelike craft to confuse enemy defenses.  The annual cost of the advanced cruise missile is kept secret, but it appears to be a major part of an estimated $2 billion cut in classified programs.  Tables attached to the bill show a $328.9 million termination in classified Air Force missile programs and $348.6 million in savings from tactical research and development.  Among other classified accounts listed, the third largest cut appears to be one of $195.6 million, a one-third reduction, in a set of unidentified Army tactical programs.  The House bill incorporates previous House cuts this year from such high-profile weapons as the B-2 bomber and Midgetman missile.  But legislators used their authority to boost spending on conventional weapons.  Purchases of F-14 fighters and the Navy's SSN-688 submarine are increased; and in contrast with its frugality elsewhere, the bill doubles the administration's $240.7 million request for developing the Army's light scout, or LHX, helicopter and appears to leave unscathed the Navy's new advanced tactical aircraft.  U.S. troop levels would be reduced more than 16,400 under the bill.  Though still largely symbolic, the cut reverses past policy and is part of an effort to move resources to readiness and operations accounts.  An estimated $350 million is added to ammunition purchases, and total operations and maintenance spending would grow at more than three times the rate of the overall Pentagon budget.  When Congress returns after Labor Day, attention will shift to the Senate, which has yet to act on nine of the annual bills, including the defense measure.  Before leaving Friday, senators quickly approved an estimated $18.4 billion Treasury measure, including funding for the Postal Service and the executive office of the president.  Vice President Dan Quayle stands to benefit from a $200,000 appropriation to make improvements in his official residence and thereby free some privately raised funds to be used for decorating and perhaps a swimming pool.  Amid its attacks on federal largess, the Office of Management and Budget didn't forget to add some funds for itself, as White House Budget Director Richard Darman amended his own office request to add $1 million.  Most of it was to help cover pay increases, something that other departments must absorb with existing funds.  Congress approved a compromise disaster-relief package to provide $897 million to farmers suffering crop losses this year from frost, drought and flooding.  President Bush is expected to sign the measure into law soon.  Last week, Agriculture Secretary Clayton Yeutter informed lawmakers that the White House would accept a package costing less than $900 million.  The legislation, which cleared the House without dissent and the Senate by voice vote, is almost identical to a measure approved Wednesday by the Senate, and then embraced by House conferees in negotiations that stretched into the early morning hours Friday.  The compromise slashed about $450 million from the $1.3 billion bill passed in late June by the House.  Most of the savings were gained by tightening up the eligibility standards for relief and by setting a single payment rate.  The measure will compensate eligible farmers at a rate equal to 65% of anticipated income.  The main beneficiaries will be farmers in parched parts of the Great Plains and western Corn Belt, where last year's devastating drought still lingers, and in parts of the South, where floods have wiped out rice and cotton crops.  Individual farmers will be able to collect as much as $100,000.  The measure also provides assistance to livestock producers who face drought-related feed and water shortages.  "This measure, in a small way, will help rural America better cope with the effects of adverse weather," said House Agriculture Committee Chairman Kika de la Garza (D., Texas).  Added his Senate counterpart, Patrick Leahy (D., Vt.): "We have administration support and a commitment that the relief will be on its way to farmers before the fall planting season."  Under the compromise package, participants in the government's farm-subsidy program who raise corn, wheat, cotton and other so-called program crops must suffer a 40% crop loss to qualify for relief.  The eligibility standard for tobacco, peanuts and sugar producers also will be a 40% crop loss.  It will be 45% for soybean and sunflower growers, and 50% for producers of fruits, vegetables and other nonprogram crops.  Lawmakers renewed their efforts to promote federal crop insurance as an alternative to ad hoc disaster relief in the future.  They rewarded farmers who bought federal crop insurance for program crops this year by setting the eligibility level at 35%.  At the same time, they required recipients of disaster relief, with a few exceptions, to buy federal crop insurance for their 1990 crops.  Although this package is far less costly than last year's $4 billion bailout, it should strengthen the hand of those advocating a sweeping overhaul of the crop insurance program, which has been beset by heavy losses, underwriting errors and other problems.  The difficulty of enacting disaster relief amid budget constraints, said Rep. Edward Madigan (R., Ill.), "highlights the need to pursue federal crop insurance reforms."  Since the publication of "The Great War and Modern Memory," the study of World War I (which in 1976 won both the National Book Award and the National Book Critics Circle Award), Paul Fussell of Rutgers University has been regarded as our leading writer on the cultural history of 20th-century war.  Focusing for the most part on Britain and America, Mr. Fussell has made a specialty of examining the way modern war is written about; the language, myths, behavior, style and moral stratagems it engenders; and the effect that all of these have had on the cultural life of the democratic societies that have been obliged to engage in war.  In his new book, "Wartime: Understanding and Behavior in the Second World War" (Oxford, 330 pages, $19.95), he returns to the subject, only this time concentrating on World War II.  To the analysis of this war, however, Mr. Fussell brings a more personal, not to say visceral, perspective than could be discerned in his earlier book about World War I.  He writes as a former lieutenant in the U.S. Infantry who fought in some of the bloodiest battles of World War II and was severely wounded in France in the last days of the war in Europe.  Understandably, that horrific experience has profoundly affected his new book, which is much angrier and even less forgiving than "The Great War and Modern Memory."  Oddly enough, it is also more superficial both in feeling and in scope.  Like its predecessor, "Wartime" is filled with details of a kind that no one but Mr. Fussell would be likely to ferret out.  Who else would have gone to the trouble to discover that until 1949 you could still purchase a military saber in the cutlery department at Harrod's?  Like "The Great War," "Wartime" is often at its best in dealing with the poetry and fiction written about the war by those who experienced its horrors -- in this case, most notably, Randall Jarrell, Louis Simpson, Lincoln Kirstein and Evelyn Waugh.  An accomplished literary scholar and critic, author of books on Samuel Johnson and 18th-century prosody, Mr. Fussell is generally more reliable in explicating a literary text than in analyzing a complex social phenomenon. (The one outright flop among his books is a folly called "Class: A Guide Through the American Status System," which often reads like a snobbish parody of George Orwell.) We should therefore not be surprised that some of the most deeply engaged pages of "Wartime" are those devoted to Horizon, the highbrow literary monthly that Cyril Connolly published in London during the war.  About more mundane matters - war propaganda, the sex life of soldiers, the officially induced pieties of civilians, the nastiness of military service and the realities of combat experience -- Mr. Fussell is more predictable.  He is unstinting in his criticism of those who wielded power, and reserves not only his sympathy but his understanding for those he considers its victims, especially foot soldiers like himself.  The reader of "Wartime" is treated to a fulsome catalog of grievances, many of them legitimate, but is never given a clue as to what the war was really about.  This is a startling omission in a study of war that asks to be taken seriously.  To understand the tone and substance of "Wartime" it is necessary to turn to an essay called "My War," which Mr. Fussell published seven years ago.  In that essay, which might have served as a useful introduction to the new book, Mr. Fussell described his motives far more clearly than he does in "Wartime."  "My view of the war," he wrote, "is a form of revenge.  Indeed, the careful reader will have discerned . . . a speaker who is really a p-----off infantryman, disguised as a literary and cultural commentator.  He is embittered that the Air Corps had beds to sleep in, that Patton's Third Army got all the credit, that noncombatants of the Medical Administrative and Quartermaster Corps wore the same battle stars as he, that soon after the war the 'enemy' he had labored to destroy had been re-armed by his own government and positioned to oppose one of his old Allies."  Given this perspective, we can easily see why "Wartime" is such a sour book -- and why it is finally such a poor account of the war itself.  There was no doubt a time when debunking the glories of war served some useful purpose.  But does anyone in 1989 still believe in the glories of war?  The real issue to be dealt with by a writer on war today isn't any mistaken conception of its glory but the more vexing question of why, under certain circumstances, it may be necessary to fight a war despite the horrors it is certain to entail.  About that question, Mr. Fussell has absolutely nothing to say.  He shuns even the appearance of understanding anything about the political situation that made World War II all but inevitable, and takes refuge instead in cataloging the gripes he has nursed for more than four decades.  As a soldier he fully earned his right to those gripes, but they have proved to be a poor basis for a full-length book about the war.  Now that he has had his revenge, it is time for the author of "The Great War and Modern Memory" to find another subject worthy of his talents.  ---  Mr. Kramer is editor of The New Criterion, a monthly review.  Against a pulsating geometric background, a cartoon dove perches on a guitar.  Both shapes swirl with psychedelic hues to the snarl of electronic feedback.  The graphic is by Peter Max, the music is by Jimi Hendrix, and the purpose is to introduce a "Woodstock Minute" on MTV. Consisting of clips from the Warner Bros. movie "Woodstock" (airing on both MTV and its sister channel, VH-1, Aug. 6-17) and of micro-interviews with some of the performers, these snippets have been airing since May.  Apparently, their purpose is educational, like the "We the People" snippets CBS aired during the Bicentennial of the U.S. Constitution.  It's too late -- and too painful -- to contemplate what CBS did to the Constitution.  But it's not too late to contemplate the wisdom of entrusting the troubled, complex history of the 1960s to a cable network that sent out a press release saying, "It was the summer of '69.  Lyndon Johnson was in the White House."  When I mentioned this error to an MTV publicist, she explained, with some embarrassment, that the people writing the press releases were "very young."  "Either that or they were at Woodstock," I quipped, offering a variation on the current joke: If you can remember the 1960s, then you weren't really part of what was happening.  Most of us can remember that Richard Nixon was in the White House during the summer of '69 -- the same year that U.S. troops in Vietnam peaked at 550,000, a figure not far off the 500,000 who gathered on that hillside in Bethel, N.Y., for the mid-August Woodstock Music and Art Fair: An Aquarian Exposition.  We can also place Woodstock on a descending curve of countercultural "be-ins," from the blissed-out Monterey Pop Festival in 1967 to the bottomed-out Rolling Stones concert in Altamont in December 1969.  But the joke touches a nerve.  In a way, the 1960s generation deserves to see its own past cut down to film clips and glib quips, because it did practically the same thing to the past it inherited.  Most people at Woodstock were middle class and semi-educated; their poor and working-class counterparts were too busy fighting, supporting or surviving the Vietnam War to dabble in Hermann Hesse and Herbert Marcuse.  Yet the ideas the Woodstockians were "into" were astoundingly superficial.  They were into romanticism.  They abandoned their cars, hiked to the festival, and cheered when the New York State Thruway (that symbol of modern industrial society) was closed down.  When it rained, they stripped naked and let the downpour rinse their grubby bodies.  When it got hot, they skinny-dipped and had sexual intercourse in the water, in the grass, in the mud and in public.  They went back to nature and deposited 600 acres of garbage.  They were into socialism.  They came without tickets, crashed the gate, and cheered when the investors announced that they were "taking a bath" to make it "a free concert."  In fact, they had already gotten their money back from the sale of film and record rights.  The Woodstockians believed that their "nation" was a viable alternative to "the system" -- even though the festival's food, water and medical care had to be donated by the local townspeople and the military.  They were into transcendence.  They tried yoga, they quoted Carlos Castaneda.  When Sly Stone led them in "I Want to Take You Higher," he knew as an ex-gospel singer that he was borrowing the music of the black church.  But the crowd didn't.  It thought its ecstasy came from something generically called "rock 'n' roll," enhanced by smoking a joint or dropping a tab of acid.  And despite all the bad trips and the ugly deaths that followed Woodstock, many went on believing that loud music and drug abuse were the path to Nirvana.  Romanticism, socialism, transcendence -- even at Woodstock, these ideas were deemed "heavy," due to the historical and cultural weight they carried.  But 1960s youths believed they could jettison the weight and still grasp the ideas.  For them, history was like Alice's Restaurant, a place where "you can get anything you want" without really having to pay for it.  This casual appropriation of serious ideas is one reason why it's so hard to talk about the 1960s without being either too serious or too casual.  On the one hand, the pop-cultural scholar who traces the influence of Martin Hiedegger on John Lennon's lyrics ought to lighten up.  On the other hand, the post-modernist MTV film editor who Cuisinarts the 1960s along with the rest of human history ought to read a good book.  Or a slightly nutty book, like "The Rainbow," by D.H. Lawrence.  In connection with Woodstock, let me recommend an excellent film version of this odd but powerful novel.  Beginning Saturday night, this three-hour BBC production continues Aug. 12 and 19 (9-10 p.m. and 1-2 a.m. EDT, on A&E).  Not to be confused with Ken Russell's lurid theatrical film with the same title, this TV version of "The Rainbow" is simply the best screen adaptation of Lawrence I've ever seen.  The connection with Woodstock?  The main character, Ursula Brangwen (Imogen Stubbs) craves both passion and liberation.  The film improves on Lawrence by trimming the rhetoric and more effectively dramatizing key scenes: Ursula stripping naked to commune with nature; Ursula striding through a grim coal mine to denounce "the system"; Ursula running across a moonlit hillside to free her imprisoned spirit.  Clearly this is a girl who would not have been out of place at Woodstock.  Or would she have been?  The trouble with Lawrence's ideas is that he never made them jibe with the ordinary demands of social life.  He never had to, because he never imagined the sound of 500,000 voices yelling the F-word in unison with Country Joe and the Fish.  For us, however, there's a lesson in Woodstock.  The next time we feel seduced by some fevered rhetoric about the need to exalt blind instinct over oppressive reason, consider the difference between one naked girl on a moonlit hillside and several thousand naked girls on a moonlit hillside.  You say that stock you bought for $40 a share suddenly slid to $33.50, even though the company reported higher earnings?  Maybe it is because earnings rose only to 70 cents a share when analysts were expecting 90 cents.  If so, you've been slammed by an "earnings surprise."  Fortunately, surprises can also be positive when better-than-expected earnings give a stock a boost.  Taking advantage of earnings surprises -- buying stocks that offer pleasant surprises and dumping those that surprise on the downside -- can raise an investor's gross return by anywhere from 2.5% to 16% a year, several studies show.  But while professional investors have been making money on surprises for years, many individual investors haven't been so lucky.  That is because individuals have lacked the pros' easy access to analysts' earnings estimates.  Starting today, The Wall Street Journal is introducing a new feature designed to help even the odds.  The feature is a listing of selected companies that report quarterly earnings substantially different from what stock market analysts have been estimating during the past 30 days and 300 days.  The listing will be published frequently, as warranted by the number of significant surprises.  It will accompany the Digest of Earnings, (See accompanying illustration -- WSJ Aug. 7, 1989). (Companies in the surprise listing won't necessarily appear in that edition's Digest of Earnings.)  Earnings surprises are perhaps "the most important type of new information" that can quickly change investor expectations about a stock, says Leonard Zacks, president of Zacks Investment Research Inc.  The Chicago-based stock-market research firm, which provides the data for the new feature, follows earnings estimates by some 2,500 analysts at 145 brokerage houses.  Several studies show that earnings surprises tend to push the price of a stock up or down, not only on the day of the announcement, but for days and even weeks afterward.  Furthermore, a company with an earnings surprise in one quarter has a better-than-random chance of offering a similar surprise in the next quarter.  Richard J. Rendleman Jr., professor of finance at University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, was one of the pioneering researchers in the field of earnings surprises.  During the 1970s, he says, stocks of companies showing the most extreme surprises outperformed {or underperformed} the market by 3 to 4 percentage points over the 90 days following the earnings announcement.  Interestingly, the same stocks also outperformed {or underperformed} the market by another three to four percentage points during the 20-day period ending with the announcement day.  The pre-announcement moves, Mr. Rendleman figures, partly reflect investors' making shrewd guesses about what earnings will be.  And in part, he and others say, it probably reflects leakage of information before the earnings announcement.  Even without guessing surprises in advance, however, a person who captures the after-effect could theoretically make an extra 12% to 16% a year, judging by Mr. Rendleman's figures.  Add that to the average 9% return for stocks over the decades, and it looks like an easy way to make 21% to 25% a year.  Unfortunately, Mr. Rendleman hastens to say, it isn't that simple.  He suspects that the magnitude of the effect has diminished a bit, now that so many investors follow earnings news so closely.  And, he cautions, "there are significant transactions costs with a strategy that follows earnings surprises."  Indeed, using earnings surprises as a stock-picking tool raises portfolio turnover "about 2.5 to 3 times," says Jon T. Ender, chief investment officer at Chicago Corp. Turnover in portfolios using the technique averages 100%-125% a year, he says.  For Mr. Ender, whose firm manages $1.2 billion, the additional brokerage commissions generated by all that trading are a nuisance but not a big burden -- especially since the trading seems clearly worthwhile.  Mr. Ender estimates that buying on positive surprises and selling on negative ones adds about five percentage points a year to the firm's returns.  Frequent trading is more costly for individual investors.  Many small investors pay commissions ranging from 1% to 3% of the value of their trades.  For them, trading enough to turn the portfolio over once a year could cost 2% to 6% of assets each year.  Nevertheless, even small investors might benefit from paying attention to earnings surprises, professionals say.  Besides the short-term performance effect, there is also the chance that one good surprise will lead to another.  On Wall Street, it's called the "cockroach effect" -- you rarely see just one.  The odds of a repeat surprise were calculated by Melissa Brown, chief quantitative analyst for Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.  Over a recent four-year period, she found, 36% of the companies whose earnings were most above analysts' expectations in a given quarter repeated the feat in the subsequent quarter.  Companies with earnings that are a lot worse than expected also tend to give encore performances.  After a negative surprise, says Chicago Corp.'s Mr. Ender, "both the company and many of those following the company think these problems are temporary.  But often they reflect competitive disadvantages or problems that take many years to fix."  Not everyone is convinced that the surprise effect is long-lasting.  That may have once been the case, but it isn't any more, says Pamela Peterson, associate professor of finance at Florida State University.  She says that recent research by her and two graduate students, John Alexander and Delbert Goff, found that stocks move significantly only in a short period surrounding an earnings announcement.  Moreover, some successful investors don't care about earnings surprises because they use strategies that aren't earnings-driven.  "We're trying to get a dollar's worth of assets for 50 cents," says S. Edward Moore, a principal with the New York money-management firm Moore, Grossman & DeRose Inc. Accordingly, he pays little attention to earnings surprises -- and sometimes views a negative surprise as a buying opportunity.  "We're happy to pick up the stock if the street is going to throw it away," he says.  Still, most Wall Streeters believe the weight of the evidence says there is money to be made from following surprises.  Jack Rivkin, director of research for Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., says earnings surprises were one of the best predictors of stock gains in 1988, and in most other recent years.  "When we see surprises on earnings, that is very significant," Mr. Rivkin says.  "That means something is going on with the company that we didn't understand, or the world didn't understand."  When Amtrak launched its new Atlantic City Express last May, it expected gamblers to flock to the shiny trains speeding over newly rebuilt track.  But that's not the way it's working out for the nation's first new high-frequency intercity rail passenger corridor in decades.  More than just a faster, more convenient way to separate gamblers from their money, the new route was designed to show how the nation can use old rail beds to meet its transportation needs without building new highways and airports.  But about 1,000 people a day are riding the trains to and from Atlantic City, less than 30% of what the service needs to break even.  A few weeks ago Amtrak cut the number of cars on some Atlantic City trains to four from six.  Even so, some trains are carrying fewer passengers than would fill a 48-seat motor coach.  "This thing will wither on the vine if Amtrak doesn't do better than that," says William Finley, a bus greeter at Bally's Park Place Casino Hotel here.  The start-up was marred by initial delays that repelled some riders.  What's more, the new Amtrak station here is separated from the Boardwalk by a cab or bus ride or a mile-long walk past a rescue mission and a shuttered housing project.  Amtrak officials say they will make major route and schedule changes in September.  But they dismiss speculation that their role in the $100 million gamble to bring back passenger rail service to Atlantic City is in jeopardy.  Amtrak officials criticize Atlantic City casinos, which continue to shower bus and auto visitors with cash, meal coupons and other bonuses but have been slow to offer similar incentives to Amtrak riders.  Casino officials fault Amtrak for focusing on the short-haul Atlantic City-Philadelphia market more than on longer-distance travelers more inclined to value the added comfort of a train ride.  Rail passenger promoters around the country are hoping for the eventual success of the Atlantic City Express to encourage revival of rail in other corridors.  "Upgrading railroad tracks is a much more efficient way to improve transportation than construction of new highway lanes or airport facilities," said Ross Capon, executive director of the National Association of Railroad Passengers, a Washington lobbying group.  Amtrak was lured here by the sharp growth in visitors, now estimated at more than 33 million a year, since Atlantic City's first casino opened in 1978.  Most of them travel to Atlantic City by auto or bus; a few arrive by helicopter or airplane.  Before it could rebuild the 67-mile rail line between Atlantic City and Philadelphia though, Amtrak had to overcome efforts to derail the project by bus industry lobbyists, Reagan administration budget-cutters and local communities worried about train noise.  The previous train service between New York and Atlantic City expired 28 years ago; the previous Atlantic City-Philadelphia service expired 20 years ago, and commuter service on the line withered in the early '80s.  Amtrak launched its new train service from Atlantic City to Philadelphia, New York and Washington last May 23.  New Jersey Transit, which is sharing the cost of restoring the rail route, plans to operate commuter trains over the lines this fall.  But luring riders to the Atlantic City Express has proven to be a big headache because of the incentives that casinos give to bus and auto travelers.  For example, John Russo paid $19 roundtrip last Thursday to board an Atlantic City-bound charter bus a few blocks from his home in New York's Brooklyn borough.  When Mr. Russo, a local building contractor, presented his bus voucher at a casino change window, he was handed $12 in cash.  In contrast, Amtrak, which charges $39 for the New York-Atlantic City roundtrip, "gives you absolutely nothing," he said.  "Amtrak is trying to get people to pay full fare to the only city in the U.S. where most travelers have their transportation costs subsidized by private industry," said Anthony Marino, deputy executive director of the New Jersey Expressway Authority, operator of a toll highway in southern New Jersey.  Casinos have been reluctant to extend incentives to Amtrak passengers for fear that they would only reach the same customers that now arrive by bus.  "It's not in our interest to pay people to get off a bus and get onto a train," said Thomas Carver, president of the Casino Association of New Jersey, a trade group representing 10 of Atlantic City's 11 casinos.  Atlantic City's casinos, which last year spent $265 million on travel incentives, are hoping that Amtrak will expand their market beyond the day-trippers, retirees and housewives that now fill the gambling halls.  But help is on the way.  Harrah's Marina Hotel Casino, breaking ranks with its rivals, last month announced that it will grant rail passengers incentives in September.  Steven Rosen, vice president of marketing of Harrah's, a unit of Memphis, Tenn.-based Holiday Corp., said he believes the train will attract higher-income visitors.  "If they are willing to spend a little more money in the train, obviously they will spend a little more money in the casino," he said.  W. Graham Claytor Jr., Amtrak's chairman and president, said that once Harrah's incentives are in place ridership on the Atlantic City Express "will pick up substantially."  Mr. Claytor added that Amtrak will adjust its Atlantic City schedules to provide more service to longer-distance travelers.  For example, it will extend its direct New York-Atlantic City train to southern Connecticut and add a weekend roundtrip between Atlantic City and Washington.  Indeed, buses and autos have proven to have the edge between Philadelphia and Atlantic City because of the time needed to get to the rail stations.  Some Atlantic City travelers are impressed with the comfort of the train, which offers more space than the bus and avoids the hassles of driving.  "My time on the train is very nice," said attorney Emanuel Levin aboard an Amtrak train speeding over newly welded rail at 90 mph across southern New Jersey.  He is one of four people in the 84-seat coach car.  "I like the fact that I have a car to myself, but it's not very good for Amtrak," said Mr. Levin.  The growing cash crunch at Southmark Corp. has meant growing problems for its partnerships as well.  After years of pumping millions of dollars into public and private real estate partnerships that couldn't meet their obligations, troubled Southmark cut the cash stream to a dribble earlier this year.  And with the company's recent tumble into bankruptcy court, even less cash may be available to support syndications.  That means that the most distressed of the group -- 50 or more of Southmark's approximately 300 private partnerships -- must either restructure their debt, raise new capital or face bankruptcy, says Bruce A. Schnitz, a Southmark executive vice president who oversees the syndication properties.  Southmark has about 18,000 investors in private partnerships, where perhaps three dozen investors put up $25,000 to $150,000 each to purchase one or two properties, usually an apartment complex, nursing home, mini-warehouse or commercial property.  The larger public funds, with several properties in their portfolios to cushion their fall, aren't as troubled.  Still, some of their holdings may be lost to foreclosure because Southmark won't prop them up any longer.  Many of the company's 37 public partnerships, where thousands of investors put $2,000 or more into pools of properties, have stopped paying distributions, and some have lost properties to foreclosure.  The difficulties faced by Southmark's partnerships are a grim reminder of the impact a deeply troubled parent can have on limited partnerships.  Even though partnerships are owned by investors and managed independently, their fortunes are intertwined with the parent company's in many subtle ways.  If the parent company is in a cash bind, it can't as easily help a partnership -- for instance, by making loans for capital improvements that wouldn't be repaid until the property is sold.  Moreover, the parent's management isn't as able to deal with partnership problems when it is consumed with its own.  "Generally, when a general partner gets in trouble, it's not good for the partnerships," said George Wilson, managing director of Robert A. Stanger & Co., a New Jersey company that monitors partnerships.  Altogether, Southmark oversees more than 660 properties for about 145,000 investors in 335 partnerships.  During the third quarter ended March 31, it loaned $15 million to its private partnerships and another $2 million to public ones.  While numbers aren't available for the second quarter, officials say many payments that once were routine aren't being made now.  "I don't think we're advancing anything today that we don't expect to get back in the short-term," Mr. Schnitz says.  Thus, he says, a utility bill may be paid for a property awaiting rent payments.  But Southmark isn't advancing money to pay partnership distributions.  Nor is it loaning money for a shopping center to complete space for a major new tenant, even though the tenant's lease increases the center's value.  Instead, the tenant pays to finish the space and his rent bill is reduced, or outside funds are sought to pay for the work.  And property that is unprofitable without a turnaround in sight may simply see its cash support cut off.  "If all I'm doing is feeding a dying horse, then I'll walk away," Mr. Schnitz says.  During 1988, at least a dozen of the public partnerships received auditors' reports that questioned their ability to continue as going concerns, according to Partnership Profiles, a Dallas company that tracks public syndications.  But Southmark says some of the sick public partnerships are quite old and have only one or two critically ill properties left: Public partnerships generally have a limited life span.  Most of the problems in its other public partnerships stem from one or two bad investments that can be sold or returned to lenders, preserving the rest of the portfolio, the company says.  It's a different story at the private syndications.  About 45 of those partnerships are in bankruptcy-law proceedings.  Mr. Schnitz says most of the other 100 troubled properties on his "workout" list involve private syndications.  For the investors in these partnerships, the options are not pleasant.  When a private syndication founders, Southmark first tries to get a new loan for a property or restructure the current one.  But if that isn't successful, Southmark must try to find new capital, either from outsiders who would insist that their interest be senior to current investors or from the current investors themselves.  The last alternative is to seek bankruptcy-law protection to try to avoid foreclosure.  Selling the properties is another option, but that too can cause headaches for private-syndication investors if Southmark can't sell them for sizeable gains.  That's because many of the partnerships were sold as tax shelters and many investors reduced their tax bases as they took large tax deductions from the properties' operating losses.  When the property is sold, they must pay taxes on the gain, even if the selling price just covers the mortgage and nothing is paid to investors.  Mr. Schnitz says he believes Southmark will be able to restructure or raise funds for most of its troubled properties, preventing bankruptcies.  In particular, he is hopeful that Southmark's new investment banker, Shearson Lehman Hutton, will be successful in helping it find new funds to recapitalize struggling partnerships.  But the process is painstakingly slow.  During the last six months of 1988, the most recent period available, Mr. Schnitz said Southmark targeted 139 properties for restructuring.  Of those, nine were lost to foreclosure and only 13 were resolved.  A federal grand jury looking into possible bid-rigging among autoparts suppliers has indicted a U.S. subsidiary of Ames S.A. of Spain and two individuals in connection with an alleged scheme to defraud General Motors Corp.  Federal officials said the Detroit grand jury's investigation is continuing but indicated that so far the inquiry is focused on a single transaction involving the Ames unit and GM, and hasn't turned up evidence of a pattern of price fixing in the automotive-supplier industry.  The three-count indictment, unsealed in federal court in Detroit, names Ames Sintering Co., its U.S. engineering manager Jose L. Cornudella, and Patrick L. Dillon, a sales representative working for Ames in Michigan.  It charges that they violated federal conspiracy and wire-fraud statutes when they tried in June 1988 to persuade a competitor to fix prices on a bid to supply metal parts for GM power-steering systems.  William Joseph Linklater, an attorney for the Ames unit and Mr. Cornudella, said, "I have no reason to believe the conduct occurred in the way the indictment says it occurred."  He added that the company will "certainly plead not guilty."  Mr. Linklater is with the Chicago firm of Baker & McKenzie.  Mr. Dillon said he hadn't "heard a thing about" the charges.  He confirmed that he is the man described in the indictment, but denied involvement in a bid-rigging scheme.  "I haven't been contacted by anyone," he said.  According to the indictment, GM asked Ames and another firm, Deco-Grand Inc. of Troy, Mich., to compete for a contract to supply certain metal parts for power-steering systems.  The winner was to supply parts for 40% of GM's total 1989-model power-steering system production.  "It was a large contract," valued at well over $1 million, a federal official said.  Mr. Cornudella and Mr. Dillon met with Deco-Grand's vice president and general manager, Keith Hale, and proposed that the two companies submit "collusive, noncompetitive and rigged bids" for the parts, the indictment charges.  The indictment doesn't say how the alleged bid-rigging was to be done or whether the two companies went through with the alleged scheme.  But it does say that GM awarded the contract to Deco-Grand, and Deco-Grand and Mr. Hale aren't named as defendants.  A secretary at Deco-Grand said Mr. Hale wouldn't be available for comment until today.  GM, meanwhile, said it was "aware" of the grand-jury inquiry and "did participate in the investigation."  A company spokesman declined to elaborate further on GM's role.  It's quiz time again.  How many of you can name three famous sporting Blanchards?  Of course, there's "Doc" -- real first name Felix -- who won the 1945 Heisman Trophy playing fullback for the U. of Army football team.  And Johnny, who played catcher and outfield on a lot of the New York Yankees' championship baseball teams of the 1950s and '60s.  But how about the third?  As of last week, you'd have to include Mary Ellen Blanchard, Doc's 16-year-old granddaughter.  She showed up at the Phillips 66/U.S.  Swimming Long Course Championships here and came away with a full medal packet: A gold for winning the women's 200-meter breaststroke, a silver for taking second in the 100, and a bronze for a third place in the 200-meter individual medley.  Freckled Mary Ellen, from Norcross, Ga., emerged not only bemedaled but also bedecked with praise from none less than Janet Evans, the U.S.'s three-golds aquatic queen of the 1988 Olympics at Seoul.  Still giggly despite having achieved the advanced age of 17, Evans won four races here, three of them by furlongs instead of body lengths, but edged Blanchard and second-place Summer Sanders, also 16, by only one second and change in the 200 IM.  "That was a race]" Evans enthused after the win.  "It was neat having someone near me at the finish."  She said she entered the 200, her shortest event ever in a national meet, because she knew that she'd get heat from Blanchard and Sanders.  She added: "Usually, the kids who do well the year after an Olympics hang around for the next three years.  That definitely should include Mary Ellen and Summer."  That this is, indeed, the first (and usually quietest) year of the four-year Olympic cycle that governs swimming and other sports that come to popular life only quadrennially was apparent from a glance at the meet's surrounding.  Its site was the 50-meter outdoor pool on the campus of the University of Southern California, where up to 14,000 people crowded high-rise bleachers for the swimming segment of the L.A. Olympics of 1984.  Now the bleachers are gone, and despite four California-perfect days, the pool's permanent seating of about 2,000 was mostly more than adequate to accommodate the usual complement of parents and teachers.  Sad to say, a goodly portion of the throng that showed up on Friday, the final day, went home feeling cheated.  The day's -- and perhaps meet's -- main event was to be a rematch in the men's 50- meter freestyle between Matt Biondi, the 1988 Olympic titlist and world's record holder, and Tom Jager, the runnerup at Seoul and the ex-record holder.  But one false start disqualified Jager and another removed Todd Pace, the fourth-fastest qualifier, cutting the field to six.  And when the race finally did get off, the 6-foot-7 Biondi started a whit slowly, maybe enough to have cost him another mark.  His winner's time of 22.36 seconds was .22-second over his standard, and he later remarked that his first two starts were better.  It's worth noting that the U.S. rule on false starts differs from the international one, which gives fields two misfires before heads are lopped.  It's also worth noting that a rules issue detracted from another event, the backstroke.  David Berkoff, a Harvard student, revolutionized that stroke's 100-meter race, and set a world's record last year, by swimming the first 30 or so yards underwater.  But after the Olympics, the sport's killjoy world governing body, FINA, decreed that, henceforth, backstrokers must surface by the 10-meter mark.  The U.S. retains the crowd-pleasing unlimited-underwater rule for domestic use, but used the FINA statute here because the Nationals were the qualifying race for a team that will compete in the international Pan Pacific meet in Tokyo later in the month.  Still, the no-false-starts rule wasn't altered.  "If we went with FINA on the backstroke, why not on the starts, too?" asked Jager afterwards.  He'd remonstrated with officials after he got the hook -- while fans chanted "Let him swim]" -- but later cooled off and called his disqualification "part of the game."  No one, however, could answer his question about the rules hodgepodge.  As is typical of most post-Olympic-year meets, the swim nationals were contested by a mix of vets and newcomers, and the vets generally posted the best times.  The stopwatch highlight was a new world's record of 2:12.90 in the men's 200-meter breaststroke by Mike Barrowman, a University of Michigan student who'd finished fourth in the event at Seoul.  He did it in the Thursday morning prelims, and while his time in the afternoon finals was nearly two seconds higher (he said he got water in his goggles) it still earned him a first.  "My mother, father and girlfriend hated me this summer for spending so much time in the pool, but this makes it worthwhile," the slim Barrowman said of his mark.  Spending a lot of time in the pool is what swimming is all about.  It seems like a drag, but some of the returning vets, including Biondi, a seven-medal winner at Seoul, admitted that life without laps wasn't what he thought it might be, so he ended a post-O Game retirement to swim again here.  Evans, who has grown two inches (to 5-foot-6) since last year and soon will enter Stanford, said she still enjoys being wet even though she hasn't trained as intensively as she did in 1988.  But rest assured that the killer instinct of Evans, who plans to stick around through '92, is intact.  Asked what she thinks about when she turns for home pool-lengths ahead of rivals, she said, "How to get farther ahead."  Mary Ellen Blanchard was one of a batch of other teen-aged winners among the women, but if genetics count she well might turn out best.  Besides grandpa Doc, father Tony and brother Rhett play or played football and mom Barbara and sister Lee Anne are tennis aces.  "In my family, it's compete or die," she smiles.  At 5-foot-9 and 127 pounds she has the size of a pool champ, and the proper interests.  Her hobbies?  "Music, reading, doing laps."  This isn't fur-buying season, but buying fur retailers seems to be getting trendy.  Centaur Partners II, a Bethesda, Md., investment partnership, said last week that it has amassed 25.6% of Fur Vault Inc. and may buy more.  Just last month, a group of Canadians in the fur business bought a controlling interest in Antonovich Inc., another of the small handful of public fur retailers.  Fur-industry experts say the buying activity in the two firms, while unrelated, indicates that the business may be poised for profitability after several dismal years.  In 1987, retail demand was strong and skin prices soared, but after the stock market crashed in October, sales plummeted and many fur stores were left with bloated -- and expensive -- inventories.  Both Fur Vault and Antonovich posted losses two years in a row.  Melvyn J. Estrin, one of Centaur's partners, said in an interview, "We believe this is an undervalued stock."  Fur Vault went public in 1984 at $11 a share and got as high as $15 in 1987, but it has been languishing lately at about $2.50.  Centaur has been buying the stock for as much as $4.50 a share and now has 3.2 million common shares.  Fur Vault shares fell 12.5 cents to $3.875 Friday in American Stock Exchange composite trading.  Mr. Estrin described Centaur's intentions as "friendly."  He added, "We've had some discussions with Fur Vault and would like to get some positions on the board and help with input on the future of the company.  We've left all our options open: We could buy or sell or increase our position."  At Fur Vault, which has been under new management for more than a year, Jeffrey A. Jones, chief financial officer, says, "We view this as maybe a very positive influence on the company.  We don't see it as hostile.  We're aware of {Centaur's} request for two board seats, and it's under review."  Centaur, whose general partners are Estrin Abod Equities Limited Partnership and Butler Acquisition Corp., failed in its recent attempt at a leveraged buy-out of Pennwalt Corp. Centaur is expected to receive about $50 million for its Pennwalt stake, and traders on Wall Street have speculated that Centaur is interested in making a bid for another company, perhaps Ferro Corp. or B.F. Goodrich & Co., which both have seen their stock prices reach new highs.  Despite its recent hard times, Fur Vault has a reputation for revolutionizing the fur business.  Founded by the furriers Fred and Harold Schwartz, Fur Vault wasn't a snobby high-priced retailer.  Rather, it emphasized medium-priced furs and aggressively targeted professional women.  Fred Schwartz appeared as "Fred the Furrier" in folksy ads that emphasized affordability.  From operating small fur departments in downscale department stores, Fur Vault expanded to 11 separate retail outlets and 10 salons within Bloomingdale's stores.  Then disaster struck, partly because of the whipsaw in fur prices but also because Fur Vault tried to upgrade its image and ended up confusing potential buyers.  Last October, Fred Schwartz resigned as chairman, leaving management of the firm he founded to a man he recruited, Robert H. Miller, former president of Charles of the Ritz cosmetics company.  Since then, Mr. Miller has tried to refocus the company, cut costs, hire new executive talent and diversify outside the fur business.  Mr. Jones, Fur Vault's financial chief, who joined the company soon after Mr. Miller, said the company is going to target more upscale customers, but "we won't abandon our bread-and-butter business of middle-priced minks and some long-haired furs."  Mr. Jones said that Fur Vault wants to avoid the low end of the fur market, where Korean manufacturers have sharply boosted competition.  This fall, Fur Vault will unveil a new marketing campaign that won't use "Fred the Furrier," Mr. Jones said.  The company is naming all of its 11 stores "The Fur Vault"; previously some operated under "Fred the Furrier's" or other names.  In addition, Fur Vault is expanding a leather-goods division started several years ago by Andrew Schwartz, the son of one of the founders.  That division, under the label Andrew Marc, is expanding quickly, selling its leather jackets and other apparel at two Andrew Marc stores and within upscale department stores.  Mr. Jones said he is cautiously optimistic about the coming year, which could return Fur Vault to profitability "if we're lucky enough to have a cold winter."  In the year ended June 3, Fur Vault had a $2.9 million loss on sales of $106 million.  For the fiscal fourth quarter, a weak one for the fur business, Fur Vault narrowed its loss to $3 million from $5.2 million in the year-earlier period.  The investors who just bought a 60% stake in Fur Vault's competitor Antonovich are equally optimistic.  "I don't think fur prices can go any lower because it would be uneconomical to make coats," said Charles Shushat, a Canadian fur retailer who is about to become chief financial officer at Antonovich.  He said his partners include two Canadians and one Swiss, all with experience in the fur business.  "We feel this is an enormous opportunity, and I expect to make a great deal of money."  Spurred by public outcry and a determined leader, Congress appears headed toward breaking a 14-year deadlock over comprehensive oil-spill legislation.  By a 99-0 vote, the Senate on Friday approved a measure aimed at preventing future accidents, improving efforts to clean up those that do occur, and making sure that shippers and oil companies pay for them.  The day before, the House Public Works and Transportation Committee passed a similar bill by a voice vote.  The major difference between the two versions is one that has helped kill oil-spill measures in the past: whether federally imposed limits on polluters' liability should supersede state laws.  The Senate measure would allow state liability laws to take precedence over federal limits.  Seventeen states, including Alaska, have laws that don't limit oil spillers' liability.  The legislation that cleared the House panel would override state laws.  But two powerful forces could combine to overcome the conflict on that issue this year.  One is the vivid image of the oil-covered beaches and wildlife of Alaska's Prince William Sound, coated with some of the 11 million gallons of thick crude that spilled from Exxon Corp.'s Exxon Valdez tanker ship in March.  The other is the resolve of Senate Majority Leader George Mitchell of Maine, the prime mover behind the legislation.  "I have been active on this for nine years," he said, "and I do not wish to make it my life's work."  The Senate measure that was cleared would raise significantly from current levels the federal liability limits for oil shippers and producers, and require the president to adjust them every three years to keep pace with inflation.  Liability for spills from tankers, for example, would rise to $1,000 per gross ton of ship from $150.  Spillers guilty of gross negligence, willful misconduct or failure to observe navigation or safety laws would face unlimited liability.  During consideration of the Senate bill, senators were eager to take tough stands against potential oil spillers.  By a voice vote, they adopted a provision offered by Sen. Pete Wilson (R., Calif.) that would remove all limits on liability for spills from offshore drilling on the Outer Continental Shelf.  Also by voice vote, they approved an amendment from Sen. Howard Metzenbaum (D., Ohio) that doubles the proposed liability limits on oil tankers and barges.  In addition, lawmakers narrowly rejected attempts to remove liability limits for all spills and to require double hulls on new tankers.  To ensure immediate action after a spill, the Senate-passed bill would set up an industry-financed fund that could provide as much as $1 billion for each accident for cleanup activities and compensation to those who sustain damages.  Those ultimately found liable for spills would have primary responsibility for paying for the cleanup and damages.  Money from the fund would be used to cover damages exceeding their liability.  The total cost for the Exxon Valdez spill is estimated at more than $1 billion.  The money would come from a tax of 1.3 cents a gallon on crude oil and imported petroleum products that was approved in 1986, contingent upon enactment of oil-spill legislation.  The House Ways and Means Committee recently approved an increase to three cents a barrel.  Responding to the circumstances of the Exxon Valdez spill and its aftermath, the legislation also would set minimum requirements for crew on oil-tanker bridges, require periodic and random alcohol testing of tanker crews, allow the transportation secretary to suspend a mariner's license for alcohol abuse, and establish regional oil-spill response teams.  Also, the Senate adopted legislation that would establish a citizens' council with a high-profile advisory role in the affairs of the Valdez, Alaska, oil terminal operated by Alyeska Pipeline Service Co.  The proposal now goes to the House, where Alaska sponsors are optimistic about its adoption.  While the council won't be able to veto or mandate actions by the terminal's operators, the legislation provides funding that allows the council to hire scientific and technical staff to conduct studies to determine the impact of terminal operations on fisheries and the environment, and the effectiveness of oil-spill response plans.  Thomas A. Saunders III, a managing director of Morgan Stanley & Co. and chairman of its leveraged buy-out fund, said he resigned to pursue other, unspecified interests.  Mr. Saunders, 53 years old, was responsible for raising $2.3 billion for Morgan's Leveraged Equity Fund II from U.S., Middle East and Asian investors.  The LBO fund is considered the largest of its type by a securities firm, and it has backed numerous buy-outs and takeovers including Colt Industries Inc., Fort Howard Corp. and Cullum Companies Inc.  In a terse internal memorandum, Morgan Chairman S. Parker Gilbert said Morgan regretted Mr. Saunders's departure, which takes effect Thursday.  Officials at several of Morgan Stanley's competitors said Mr. Saunders's departure may have been accelerated because of conflict among the investment-banking, merchant-banking and corporate-finance divisions at the firm.  Mr. Saunders said in an interview that he "feels very close to Morgan Stanley as an institution" and that his resignation "has nothing whatsoever" to do with any professional rivalries within the firm.  For much of his 22 years at Morgan Stanley, Mr. Saunders was the public face of the firm, managing its syndicate department for 10 years and acting as the firm's senior representative in several major transactions, including American Telephone & Telegraph Co.'s $3.8 billion stock offering in 1981, its $150 billion divestiture of its Bell system telephone companies in 1984 and the $4.8 billion privatization of British Telecom during the mid-1980s.  Mr. Saunders, like many senior officials at Morgan Stanley, became an instant multimillionaire after the firm sold its stock to the public earlier in the decade.  He declined to discuss his net worth, which company documents and colleagues say totals tens of millions of dollars.  "I just felt it was an appropriate time to pursue business ideas of my own," Mr. Saunders said.  "I'm not going to retire, but I'm unlikely to go to any large investment banking firm" that rivals Morgan Stanley.  "I prefer not to say anything more than that."  He added: "I felt the LBO activities at Morgan Stanley were in great shape, and I felt I could leave with a great feeling that we had just increased the size of the fund from $1.6 billion."  When the jury comes in, the judge may be out.  U.S. Supreme Court Justice William Brennan Jr., honored last year when a county courthouse in New Jersey was named after him, may have to look elsewhere for his portion of immortality.  Under pressure from local veterans' and civic organizations incensed over Justice Brennan's decision last term protecting flag burning, the Hudson County Board of Freeholders is expected to vote Thursday on a proposal to take Justice Brennan's name off the county courthouse.  Eleven months ago, they were singing a different tune.  By unanimous vote, the nine-member governing board in Jersey City named the 83-year-old county courthouse after the 83-year-old justice.  The Newark native served in the building as Hudson County's first assignment judge between 1949 and 1951.  But at last month's meeting, the board was besieged by protesters demanding that Justice Brennan's name be stricken from the courthouse because of the flag vote.  "The veterans are mad as all hell," says Joseph Duffy of Jersey City, self-described leader of the anti-Brennan forces.  Mr. Duffy is a member of the Citizen's Committee of Hudson County, a group that last year objected -- for reasons involving mainly local issues -- to naming the courthouse after the justice.  Mr. Duffy promises that his forces will "fill the chamber to protest" at the freeholders' meeting.  Justice Brennan won't comment on his quick fade from hero to heel in his old stamping ground.  However, his son, William Brennan III, a partner at the Princeton, N.J., law firm of Smith, Stratton, Wise, Heher & Brennan, says of himself that he is offended.  "I really don't think any of those birds up there can tell my family what patriotism is," says Mr. Brennan, noting that his father held the position of colonel during noncombat army duties during World War II. Moreover, the justice's brother, Charles, was a World War II infantry staff sergeant who was awarded the Silver Star posthumously; and another brother, Francis, also was a decorated soldier in the war.  That's news to three freeholders, who say they're giving the issue second and third thoughts.  Nine major auto makers built 491,210 cars and trucks in the U.S. during July, down 17% from 592,412 vehicles a year ago.  The Big Three U.S. auto makers cut their U.S. car and truck production by 23% during July, compared with a year ago.  General Motors Corp., Ford Motor Co. and Chrysler Corp. built 33% fewer cars in the latest month than a year earlier.  The Big Three's share of total U.S. car output fell to 76% in July from 87% a year ago.  The five major Japanese auto makers with U.S. plants boosted their total car and light truck production in July by 50%, to 72,941 vehicles from 48,456 a year earlier.  Meanwhile, auto makers last week expected to build 86,988 cars in the U.S., up 5% from 82,853 cars in the year-ago week.  A 29% rise in output from Japanese-owned or joint venture plants offset an expected 1.5% decline in Big Three car output for the week.  GM is expected this week to reopen nine U.S. assembly facilities that had been idled for model changeovers, parts shortages or to cut inventories.  Chrysler said all eight of its U.S. car and truck assembly plants will work this week.  As previously reported, Ford's Atlanta midsized car plant will be idle this week because of a shortage of dealer orders for 1989-model Taurus and Sable cars.  For the year to date, U.S. auto output is down 1% from the year-ago level.  Car production by Japanese plants is up 47% for the year through last Friday, while Big Three car output is down 5.4% for the year so far.  ---  @ AUTO PRODUCTION MONTHLY  @ July July Yr to date Yr to date  @U.S.  Output 1989 1988 1989 1988  @GENERAL MOTORS  @ Cars-b ........ 124,313 176,814 1,976,442 1,983,254  @ Trucks-buses .. 129,722 132,122 993,193 957,999  @ Total ........ 254,035 308,936 2,969,635 2,941,253  @FORD MOTOR  @ Cars .......... 64,669 84,609 1,024,330 1,083,866  @ Trucks ........ 53,074 60,537 932,378 890,036  @ Total ........ 117,743 145,146 1,956,708 1,973,902  @CHRYSLER CORP.-c  @ Cars .......... 23,343 56,787 545,597 639,312  @ Trucks ........ 23,148 29,575 402,996 367,717  @ Total ........ 46,491 86,362 948,593 1,007,029  @HONDA  @ Total ......... 23,452 23,227 221,635 212,616  @NISSAN  @ Cars .......... 6,194 5,697 67,880 59,187  @ Trucks ........ 5,404 2,645 70,698 58,667  @ Total ........ 11,598 8,342 138,578 117,854  @TOYOTA  @ Total-a ....... 20,115 3,498 120,471 33,952  @MAZDA  @ Total ......... 12,262 13,389 130,198 61,123  @DIAMOND STAR  @ Total ......... 5,514 32,012 0 --  @INDUSTRY  @ Cars .......... 279,862 367,533 4,107,652 4,108,615  @ Truck/bus-x ... 211,348 224,879 2,397,182 2,274,419  @ Total ........ 491,210, 592,412 6,504,834 6,383,034  @ a-Includes Toyota Corolla and Camry cars only.  @ b-GM car figures include the Chevrolet Nova built at Nummi.  @ c-Includes AMC car and truck production for 1987 and 1986.  @ x-Includes only buses and trucks built by auto makers.  ---  @ This Last Yr.  Ago -Yr. to Date- %  @ Week-e Week-r Week 1989 1988 Chg.  @GM ........ 19,506 20,403 30,995 1,918,499 1,972,886 - 3  @Ford ...... 32,163 32,372 27,229 1,053,459 1,111,051 - 5  @Chrysler .. 12,800 6,523 7,227 555,436 647,202 - 14  @Honda ..... 7,610 7,665 7,454 227,900 220,010 + 4  @Nissan- ... 2,020 3,192 2,882 69,333 62,076 + 12  @Nummi ..... 4,000 4,286 3,252 122,704 99,239 + 24  @Mazda ..... 2,617 4,277 3,814 134,924 64,499 +109  @Toyota .... 3,675 3,705 0 34,172 0 d  @Diam.Star . 2,597 1,889 0 67,985 0 d  @Industry .. 86,988 84,312 82,853 4,184,412 4,212,802 - 1  @ d-Percentage change is greater than 999%. e-Estimated. r-Revised. -Includes Chevrolet Prizm and Toyota Corolla.  If all goes according to plan, the space shuttle Columbia will loft a secret spy satellite into orbit tomorrow.  The Pentagon, as is its custom, won't say a word about the classified mission.  But outside space experts, as is their custom, are ready to spill the beans.  Trouble is the experts disagree over whether Columbia will carry a radar satellite that can see through clouds, a photo satellite that can make out license plates or, maybe, a signal-intercept satellite that can pick up Soviet missile tests.  "It's a guessing game," admits William Burrows, a New York University journalism professor who wrote a book about spy satellites.  "We're trying to be oracles."  Divining the U.S. capability to spy from space on the Soviet Union is devilishly tricky work.  Satellites orbit far beyond sight, and the Pentagon tries to disguise its launches, sometimes misleading reporters.  Space sleuths hunt for satellite descriptions made public at spy trials or congressional hearings, and combine that with launch information leaked to news organizations to predict which satellites the U.S. will launch and when.  The reporting gives U.S. intelligence agencies fits.  William Odom, former head of the secretive National Security Agency, which eavesdrops by satellite on foreign communications, says the Soviet Union "turns up defensive measures ferociously" after reports of new U.S. spy satellites.  But private military-space researchers contend that the public should know more about the ability of spy satellites to photograph Soviet missile bases and intercept weapons-test results.  "That can improve public confidence in American capabilities to police arms-control treaties," says Paul Stares, a Brookings Institution space scholar.  Nearly all reporting on spy satellites begins with Aviation Week & Space Technology, an influential trade magazine dubbed "Aviation Leak" at the Pentagon.  In the past year, Aviation Week broke the stories that the space shuttle Atlantis would carry a new radar satellite code-named Lacrosse that can see at night and through clouds, and that the Titan 4 rocket would launch a new satellite to warn of missile attacks.  The magazine also reported in May that a Titan 34D rocket launched two communications satellites, but later ran a correction after the Pentagon called to complain that it really launched a single signal-gathering satellite instead.  On military-satellite stories, Aviation Week works with Pentagon sources that are never named, and makes predictions that frequently can't be fully confirmed.  But its reports become gospel as larger news organizations embellish and recirculate them.  The day Aviation Week published its Lacrosse story, for instance, United Press International, Reuters and even the Chinese news agency Xinhua spread the report world-wide.  But the best confirmation the magazine could offer that its original story was true was when the shuttle Atlantis headed in a northerly direction from Cape Canaveral.  That indicated that the satellite would head over much of the Soviet Union, as predicted.  But this gave no indication that the satellite was equipped with radar -- the nub of the Aviation Week story, and a crucial technology to track Soviet mobile missiles that might move at night.  For tomorrow's planned shuttle launch, Aviation Week predicts that the Pentagon will loft an advanced photo satellite, codenamed the Strategic Response Satellite, over the Soviet Union.  But other spy-satellite watchers figure the shuttle will launch another Lacrosse instead.  Amateur astronomers will help settle the debate by tracking the satellite's altitude -- photo satellites generally orbit 100 miles up; radar satellites can orbit a few hundred miles higher than that.  Ironically, the Soviet government will quickly know the truth because its sensors can detect radar transmissions overhead.  "The Pentagon is only hiding the information from the American public," says Allan Krass, a Hampshire College physicist and arms-control expert.  To keep satellites secret, the Pentagon sometimes constructs elaborate lies that only become apparent years later.  Early in the space age, for instance, the U.S. heavily promoted its Discoverer series of satellites as investigating the effects of space on small animals.  But years later, it became clear that the real purpose of Discoverer was to develop technology for Corona, a Central Intelligence Agency reconnaissance satellite that snapped detailed photos of Soviet airfields and missile bases.  More recently, claims Mr. Burrows, the space author, the Pentagon tried to mislead a New York Times reporter about the cargo in a secret shuttle launch by revealing the satellite's unusual initial orbit, which differed from the path normally taken by spy satellites.  That masked the satellite's real purpose of orbiting high above the globe picking up communications and data on missile tests.  Wayne Biddle, the Times reporter who now works as a free-lancer, doubts he was deliberately misled.  "If there was an error made, it was through lack of information, not disinformation," he says.  Given the uncertainty about the reliability of Pentagon leaks, Mr. Krass, the Hampshire College physicist, studies technology instead.  Military satellites are at least as good as civilian ones, he reasons.  So the best U.S. photo reconnaissance craft should be able to match the quality of NASA's most advanced space camera, the Hubble Space Telescope, which is scheduled for launch early next year.  He calculates that pointing the space telescope down at earth, as a military version would certainly do, would produce pictures with details as small as four inches.  Spy trials also help.  Jeffrey Richelson, who has written four books on intelligence collection, says the U.S. admitted the existence of the Keyhole, or KH, series of photo satellites in 1978 when it prosecuted a CIA official for selling a KH-11 manual to the Russians.  John Pike, a space analyst for the Federation of American Scientists, keeps spy-case tidbits, plus orbital characteristics of U.S. satellites and reports from congressional hearings and the press in a computerized data bank listing 20,000 satellites and other space cargo.  Putting together apparently unrelated space facts -- for instance, the crew of the shuttle Columbia trained earlier to launch a reconnaissance satellite -- helps him piece together information about planned classified launches.  His greatest joy comes on those occasions when he uncovers new satellite programs unwittingly revealed in government launch records.  He calls one of his recent discoveries Jeroboam -- a giant-sized bottle of champagne -- because he estimates it will be twice as big as a spy satellite called Magnum.  "I'm like a comet watcher," he says.  "If you discover a new comet, you get to name it.  If you discover a new satellite, you get to name that, too."  ---  @ Military Space Launches And Their Likely Cargoes  @DATE LAUNCHER PAYLOAD  @December 1988 Shuttle Atlantis Lacrosse radar satellite  @May 1989 Titan 34D Signal-gathering  @ satellite  @June 1989 Titan 4 Missile-warning  @ satellite  @August 1989 Shuttle Columbia Lacrosse radar satellite  @ or photo-reconnaissance  @ satellite  @Late 1989 Titan 34D Two Defense Satellite  @ Communications System  @ satellites  @December 1989 Shuttle Discovery Magnum communications-  @ interception satellite  @Early 1990 Titan 4 Advanced photo-  @ reconnaissance  @ satellite  @Source: Aviation Week; space analyst John Pike, Federation of American Scientists  Atlantic Richfield Co. said testing of its second Point McIntyre delineation well on the North Slope indicates that the field could be one of this decade's largest U.S. oil discoveries.  The testing showed oil-flow rates of as much as 5,400 barrels a day, about the same as rates turned in by the first well in June.  Taken together, the Los Angeles-based energy company said, the tests on both wells indicate that the ultimate recovery at Point McIntyre could reach 300 million barrels.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Arco shares closed at $101.125, up $3, on heavy volume of slightly more than one million shares.  The discovery at Point McIntyre, about two miles north of the giant Prudhoe Bay producing area, was announced in January by Arco and its partners, Exxon Corp. and British Petroleum Co.  Their ownership interests in the field are still being negotiated.  Arco has said, though, that it expects to retain an interest between 30% and 50%.  The second delineation well is about 2.5 miles from the discovery well, initially drilled last year.  Test results from that well yielded a sustained flow rate of 2,500 barrels a day.  "We have confirmed the presence of a high-quality reservoir with good porosity and permeability," said Jerry Dees, Arco Alaska's vice president, exploration.  Arco previously said production at Point McIntyre won't begin until at least the early 1990s.  Analysts noted, however, that aside from possibly being the largest domestic oil discovery in recent years, it also is important because Prudhoe Bay production is slowing.  The Point McIntyre find "comes at a good time," said Eugene Nowak, an oil analyst at the New York brokerage firm of Dean Witter Reynolds Inc.  He added that although it is too early to estimate production costs, "It doesn't appear that there's anything inordinate about it that would suggest they'd be extremely high."  Eastern Airlines pilots are reviewing strategy in their five-month strike against the carrier.  Regional meetings between rank-and-file pilots and their union representatives began last night and are to continue over the next several days.  The effort to map future union moves in the stalemate began Friday when Henry Duffy, national head of the Air Line Pilots Association, met in Washington with local Eastern union leaders.  Another Washington session is expected later this week.  A union spokesman characterized the regional pow-wows as "town meetings" and denied any back-to-work movement.  There aren't any proposals up for a vote.  But it is understood that, in the last 10 days, Frank Lorenzo, chairman of Texas Air Corp., Eastern's parent, has been in touch informally with top union leaders.  It isn't known what he told them.  Some Eastern pilots plan to use the meetings to convey to the national pilot-union leadership their continued commitment to the strike.  ALPA leaders "may need some reminding how we feel," said one.  National ALPA leaders last week turned aside a request for a nationwide suspension of service on other major airlines to demonstrate support for the walkout.  Also, last week, 13 Eastern pilots picketed ALPA headquarters protesting what they see as weakening support.  Cindy Ireland has spent the past 10 years on welfare.  Now she is an entrepreneur.  Last year, the single mother of two children entered Iowa's Self-Employment Investment Demonstration, a pilot project with a herculean task: to help welfare recipients start their own businesses.  Seven months later, she opened Ireland Design & Publishing in her home.  Working 12 hours a day on a personal computer, she printed brochures, letterheads and logos for local businesses.  Already she has hired an employee, added equipment, moved to an office in Cedar Falls and diversified into producing resumes for students at a nearby university.  Ms. Ireland continues to collect welfare while she gets her business off the ground, but the 30-year-old Iowan plans to cut those strings in December.  "You can't work your way off (welfare), you have to jump off," she says.  From California to Connecticut, cities and states are offering more than 60 such training programs -- most of them pilot projects.  All aim for the same goal: to transform welfare recipients into self-sufficient business people.  But critics wonder if the programs' promise of the American dream is overextended.  Some say they are too expensive for the number they serve.  And while most of the projects are only three or four years old, making it hard to estimate their value, there is evidence that the success rate will be low.  Given the high failure rates of small businesses in general, critics question whether program participants -- almost all living at or below the poverty level -- have the business savvy or money to sustain fledgling firms.  According to the Small Business Administration, three out of five companies fail within the first six years.  Nonetheless, these and similar programs are gaining momentum.  Washington state already is expanding its new welfare-entrepreneur training program.  Beginning this fall, the state will allow some people to get a lump-sum advance in unemployment benefits to use as seed capital to start new businesses.  Practically all of the existing welfare-entrepreneur programs follow the same model, offering a combination of training and financial help.  Because would-be entrepreneurs must be recipients of Aid to Families with Dependent Children, most applicants are women.  The ranks are further thinned through self-selection: After a few weeks of hearing the time commitment and money involved, not to mention blunt critiques of business plans, many applicants quit.  Most of those who continue are women around 30 years old, with high school degrees and some full-time job experience.  After four years on welfare, Shirley Kelley signed up for a self-employment training program in St. Paul, Minn., hoping to turn a profit with her cooking skills.  In three months at the Women's Economic Development Corp., a private organization, she picked up basic accounting and marketing strategy and learned how to write a business plan for the catering business she wanted to launch.  As part of the program, all "prohibitive" federal rules concerning her income were waived.  Normally, she couldn't have more than $1,000 in financial assets without losing her benefits.  The waiver allowed Ms. Kelley to lay aside money to start her business.  With a $5,000 loan from a program fund, she bought cooking utensils and a cash register, and hired two employees.  Today, Kelley's Gourmet Catering serves shrimp scampi, potato salad and other dishes at business luncheons and weddings all over St. Paul.  She also runs a kitchen for a local social-service program.  "I'm still a long ways from where I want to be," says Ms. Kelley, "but I feel like I've opened some doors."  Program directors admit the task is anything but easy.  "It's the supreme challenge," says Kathryn Keeley, president of the Women's Economic Development Corp., where Ms. Kelley got her assistance.  "It's like a salmon swimming upstream in a drought."  The Corporation for Enterprise Development, a nonprofit economic research firm in Washington, D.C., runs similar self-employment pilot programs in Minnesota, Michigan, Mississippi and Iowa.  It, too, concedes that the task is enormous.  Early evidence from those programs suggests the odds are less than favorable: Out of 543 initial program recruits surveyed in a preliminary study, 187 enrolled in the training phase.  Of those, only 29 actually started businesses.  And it's too early to know how many of those will survive.  The CED's programs cost between $3,000 and $5,000 per person who starts a business.  The figure includes nonrecurring start-up costs and evaluations.  Participating states will need to spend about $1 million during the four-year pilot project, the CED says.  Slightly older programs in France and the U.K. -- the models for many U.S. programs -- have shown that only 2% to 3% of the trained welfare recipients actually succeed in small businesses, according to data cited by the National Conference of State Legislatures.  Besides pointing to the low success rate, critics say the programs help only recipients who would have succeeded anyway.  They note that most enrollees who actually start businesses are more educated than the others and have more work experience in full-time jobs.  The "self-employment option is not meaningful for the severely disadvantaged, the long-term unemployed or young job seekers with little job experience," says Marc Bendick of Bendick & Egan Economic Consultants Inc. in Washington, D.C., who has studied such programs in Europe for the past five years.  Many also wonder how welfare recipients can raise enough money to finance a firm, when conventional entrepreneurs can barely find adequate capital.  "It begs the first question any entrepreneur should ask: Will I be able to raise some basic funds?" says Sar Levitan, director of the Center for Social Policy Studies at George Washington University.  "I'm all for a comprehensive welfare system, but this is very risky."  Program directors counter that loan funds have been set up to help the fledgling firms.  Many banks have come to the aid of enrollees, knowing they have the backing of the state programs.  More important, proponents say that even a few success stories make the programs worthwhile.  "This is not a panacea," says Robert Friedman, president and founder of the CED, the Washington, D.C., group that organizes such programs.  "It may only provide an escape for a relatively small percentage of recipients."  But, he adds, if you can uncover that entrepreneurial drive, "it makes people look at who they are.  We want to build on that capacity."  Mr. Friedman, who has written a book on the concept, says this sort of entrepreneurial training gives low-income neighborhoods new role models.  And the training helps many find jobs and get off welfare even if they don't start businesses, he adds.  Although the programs are costly, through savings on discontinued welfare payments and increased revenue from taxes on new businesses, Mr. Friedman argues that they can pay for themselves.  ---  @ Profile of Welfare Entrepreneurs  Characteristics of enrollees in Self-Employment Investment Demonstration of Corporation for Enterprise Development, Washington, D.C.  @ High school diploma ........................ 88%  @ Ever employed for pay ...................... 98  @ Receiving Aid to Families With Dependent  @ Children for two or more years .............. 66  @ Age  @ Teens 0  @ Twenties 30  @ Thirties 50  @ Forties 18  @ Fifties 2  @ Ethnicity  @ White 69  @ Black 25  @ Asian or Pacific Islander 3  @ Native American 1  @ Hispanic 3  NOTE: Percentage for ethnicity add to over 100 due to rounding  Source: Manpower Demostration Research Corp. New York  Union workers struck Nynex Corp., Bell Atlantic Corp. and Pacific Telesis Group after negotiators couldn't agree on several thorny issues, chiefly health-care and wage packages.  Just how long the strikes will last is unclear.  Negotiators for Pacific Telesis's telephone units in California and Nevada met yesterday with the Communications Workers of America, which represents about 42,000 employees in the two states.  Meanwhile, spokesmen for the CWA and for Nynex indicated that the union and the company were far apart on a number of important issues.  In bargaining three years ago, the CWA struck Nynex for nine days.  At Bell Atlantic, a union spokesman speculated that negotiations, which broke off just before 7 a.m. EDT yesterday, might resume soon.  The old contracts expired at 12:01 a.m. EDT yesterday.  The strikes had little effect as managers scrambled to fill in for striking operators, installers and repair workers.  But with business in full swing today, gaps in operator assistance and repairs are expected to grow.  Overall, however, computer-driven telecommunications networks blunt the effect of strikes; customers aren't expected to encounter many problems in placing or receiving calls.  At Nynex, whose territory includes most of New England and New York State, about 40,000 CWA members and 20,000 members of the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers struck.  The two sides had not even been meeting face-to-face in the days before the expiration of the contract, and the union didn't acknowledge a package that New York-based Nynex put on the table Friday afternoon before it struck.  Both sides indicated they wouldn't budge on the crucial issue of health care.  The company, under pressure to control expenses, has sought to shift some medical costs to employees.  Health-care cost shifting was among the top issues for some 41,000 CWA members who walked off their jobs at Bell Atlantic's phone companies in Delaware, Washington, D.C., Maryland, New Jersey, Pennsylvania, Virginia and West Virginia.  Bell Atlantic, based in Philadelphia, prepared for a strike today by 9,000 employees in New Jersey represented by the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers.  Meanwhile, the company continued negotiating with IBEW representatives of 2,000 employees in Pennsylvania.  Employees in both states, however, weren't crossing CWA picket lines yesterday, according to the company.  In California, the IBEW extended for a week its contract covering about 1,600 employees at Pacific Telesis's Pacific Bell Directory unit.  Meanwhile, BellSouth Corp. and CWA negotiators representing some 64,000 employees at the Atlanta-based company's two telephone units reached a tentative agreement late Saturday night.  CWA spokesman Tim Ryles in Atlanta said the new three-year agreement retained a cost-of-living adjustment, boosted wages moderately and added some family benefits without tinkering with the existing health-care package.  Three years ago, the union agreed to significant steps to rein in skyrocketing costs for medical care.  "As for health care, our position going into negotiations was: Don't even think about it," Mr. Ryles said.  CWA contracts expire next Saturday with the three other regional telephone companies created by the Bell System breakup: Southwestern Bell Corp., St. Louis; U S West Inc., Denver; and Ameritech, Chicago.  Ameritech's Illinois Bell unit has already settled with the IBEW, its major union.  The strikes are in sharp contrast to the agreement between American Telephone & Telegraph Co. and the CWA and IBEW last May.  That agreement won wide praise for its family-care provisions such as dependent-care reimbursement accounts; flexible work hours; leaves of absence to care for infants or ill family members; and a fund to improve child-care and elder-care services.  In unusual moves that underscored the contentiousness of the talks, Nynex publicly disclosed details of the negotiations and Bell Atlantic called a news conference on the strike.  In more traditional fashion, San Francisco-based Pacific Telesis's telephone companies issued a brief statement expressing the hope that the strike would be settled soon.  Nynex acknowledged that it wants to get a better handle on health-care costs and that it has proposed alternative arrangements, but its annual contribution would rise 49% to $3,520 per employee in the next three years.  Among other things, Nynex also said it proposed an immediate 5% wage increase, including a payout of as much as $1,000; a 2% increase and a cost-of-living adjustment in both the second and third years; a 14% increase in pensions for those retiring after Jan. 1, 1990; a 20% increase for those who retire before then; and a bonus program tied to the performance of each subsidiary.  In a three-page news release, the company also gave details of dental-plan improvements; new education loans; family-care leaves of absence for as much as two years; reimbursements for adoption expenses; and an eye-care program for workers who use video display terminals.  Bell Atlantic was a little more guarded.  Ed Grogan, vice president of human resources, said the strike caught Bell Atlantic by surprise.  The company, he said, was working with the union on a final offer when the strike was announced.  The company also disclosed details of its offer, including wage increases with a $300 bonus upon ratification of the contract, profit-sharing and medical cost-sharing plans.  Separately, the labor unrest may be spawning the sabotage of telephone equipment.  Bell Atlantic said two fiber-optic cables at a New Jersey Bell central office in Caldwell, N.J., were severed last Monday, causing a disruption of local and long-distance service for thousands of businesses and residents that lasted more than nine hours.  Since that incident, the company said it has had 70 instances of vandalism to plant equipment and phone lines.  Peter Ventimiglia, a New Jersey Bell spokesman, said it was "clear the acts of vandalism accelerated" as the contract expiration drew near.  IBEW President Joe McLaughlin denied that there was any connection between the union and the vandalism.  "The companies are using this as a propaganda lever," he said.  The following U.S. Treasury, corporate and municipal offerings are tentatively scheduled for sale this week, according to Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ U.S. TREASURY  @ Today  $13.2 billion of 13-week and 26-week bills.  @ Tuesday  $10 billion of three-year notes.  @ Wednesday  $9.75 billion of 10-year notes.  @ Thursday  $9.75 billion of 30-year bonds.  @ CORPORATE  @ One Day This Week  BET PLC -- $360 million of auction market preferred, via Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Bizmart Inc. -- initial offering of 3.4 million common shares, via Alex.  Brown & Sons.  Bonneville Pacific Corp. -- $40 million of convertible debentures, via Kidder, Peabody & Co.  Continental Bank Corp. -- offering of 11.4 million shares of deputy cumulative adjustable-rate preferred, via Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  Devon Enery Corp -- one million shares of convertible preferred, via Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  Edgcomb Metals Co. -- $110 million of senior notes, via Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  Ohio Mattress Co. -- $75 million of senior notes; $225 million of senior discount notes and $175 million of debentures, via First Boston Corp.  UDC-Universal Development L.P. -- two million shares of preferred, via Smith Barney.  @ MUNICIPAL  @ Tuesday  Connecticut -- $150.7 of million general obligation bonds, 1989 Series B-1 to B-5, via competitive bid.  Rutgers-The State University of New Jersey -- $74,815,000 of general obligation bonds, 1989 Series A, via competitive bid.  Nevada -- $119,250,000 of various limited tax general obligation bonds, including $94,970,000 of building bonds, 1989 Series A, and $24,280,000 of reservoir refunding bonds and Nevada Municipal Bond Bank refunding Project No. 4 bonds, via separate competitive bids.  @ Wednesday  Orlando Utilities Commission, Fla. -- from $75 million to $225 million of water and electric revenue bonds, 1989 Series C, via competitive bid.  Vermont -- $65 million of general obligation temporary notes.  @ One Day This Week  Southern California Public Power Authority -- $650 million of multiple project revenue bonds, 1989 Series, via a Smith Barney group.  Triborough Bridge & Tunnel Authority, N.Y. -- $250 million of general purpose revenue bonds, Series Q & R, via a Goldman, Sachs & Co. group.  Virgin Islands Public Finance Authority -- $138,410,000 revenue bonds, Virgin Islands General Obligation/Matching Fund Loan Note, 1989 Series A, with $17,225,000 due in 2009 and $121,185,000 due in 2018, via a Merrill Lynch group.  Port Everglades Authority, Fla. -- $113,325,000 of port facilities refunding revenue bonds, 1989 Series A, via Bear, Stearns & Co.  California Health Facilities Financing Authority -- $97,115,000 of hospital revenue bonds, Sutter Health, via a PaineWebber Inc. group.  Illinois Housing Development Authority -- $83,445,000 of residential mortgage revenue bonds, via a Bear Stearns group.  Municipality of Anchorage, Alaska -- $80,625,000 of senior lien refunding electric revenue bonds, 1989, via a Goldman Sachs group.  Ohio Air Quality Development Authority -- $50 million of state of Ohio air quality development revenue bonds, Ohio Power Co., Series B, via a Goldman Sachs group.  Indefinite Port Authority of New York & New Jersey -- $100 million of consolidated bonds, 65th Series, via competitive bid on 48 hours' notice.  When W.J. Sanders III told employees of a planned nationwide shutdown at Advanced Micro Devices Inc., the chairman of the Sunnyvale, Calif., chip maker tempered the bad news with a pot shot at a troubled rival.  Faced with weak demand for chips, Mr. Sanders wrote in a memo to employees, AMD would shutter most plants and offices for four days in September.  "There is no point in creating future problems as one of our competitors has," he wrote, "by building inventories of products for which there is no immediate demand."  AMD officials say the chiding reference was to National Semiconductor Corp., where piles of unsold chips helped create a net loss in each of National's last four quarters.  But AMD is in no position to gloat, with profits falling 54% in its latest quarter.  Indeed, AMD and National have become the most visible illustrations of a pall that has fallen over the semiconductor industry.  Economic jitters have big chip buyers in the computer, auto and military industries holding back on new purchases and keeping their own inventories to a minimum.  And the nearly flat sales, together with falling prices, are producing lower profits at a number of big semiconductor companies.  "Prices decline -- that's one of the premises of the business," says an AMD official.  "So slack demand is the enemy of maintaining improving margins."  No one is projecting a precipitous price plummet like the one that dragged the industry into a recession in 1985 and 1986.  Lower sales may reflect seasonal factors, which may be compounded by changing buying habits among purchasers.  Some purchasers expect demand to pick up soon.  And some chip makers continue to do well by focusing on specialty markets.  Overall, however, annual growth in world-wide chip sales is expected to slow to 2.4% in 1990 from 12.3% this year and 33% in 1988, according to Dataquest, a San Jose, Calif., market-research concern.  According to another industry estimate, while U.S. shipments hit a record $1.1 billion in the second quarter, the combined U.S. backlog of orders shrunk an ominous 50% between December and May.  Some analysts say the slowdown could lead to another round of cost-cutting among a number of makers of standard chips, where factories are running far below capacity.  National's plants will be producing at 65% to 70% of capacity even after several factories are shuttered this year.  At LSI Logic Corp., overcapacity "is the only thing between us and profitability," says George D. Wells, president and chief operating officer.  The malaise isn't universal.  Like growing segments within the computer industry, chip makers are increasingly divided in two camps with increasingly divergent results: those who produce standardized chips and those who have carved out specialty niches supported by proprietary technology.  "There is no semiconductor slump," declares Andrew Grove, chief executive of Santa Clara, Calif.-based Intel Corp., which gets about 35% of its revenue from products that only it supplies.  Despite sluggish sales of older machines, computer makers say demand for high-end, high-speed desktop machines that use Intel's 80386 microprocessor chip remains strong.  Being the sole supplier of the 80386 and the many companion chips that are used with it, Intel has been able to keep prices high, maintaining profit margins even while its other product markets are flat.  Companies like Intel are "in a position to make sure they make a profit," says Millard H. Phelps, an analyst at Hambrecht & Quist.  Cypress Semiconductor Corp. also has kept up profits by focusing on a broad range of specialty markets, including sophisticated memory chips used in pricier computers.  "Nobody else has got them," says Cypress president T.J. Rodgers.  Cypress's net income rose 62% in its latest quarter.  But for the others, the root of the problem is that many of their big buyers are suffering slumps, too.  "Auto is down.  The computer market is soft. (Telecommunications) is soft.  The military market has been flat," says National president Charles Sporck.  With chips plentiful, and a growing uncertainty as to whether the U.S. economy will fall into a recession, chip buyers are cutting inventories to the bone rather than stocking up as they did in 1988.  "It's a day when everybody is keeping inventories very tight," says a Ford Motor Co. spokesman.  Some industry officials, including Intel's Mr. Grove, say that the erratic orders are an indication of fundamental changes in how chip consumers manage their inventories.  Companies increasingly employ "just-in-time" manufacturing techniques, in which a factory line stocks only enough parts for its immediate production.  Computer maker AST Research Inc., for example, cut its inventory to 90 days in June from 120 days last December.  The problem is that tighter inventory management is making it harder for chip makers to read the market.  In addition, U.S. chip makers are facing increased competition from South Korea and Japan.  Korean newcomers, such as Samsung Electronics Co., have spent hundreds of millions of dollars on plants that churn out off-the-shelf "commodity" chips that compete with some U.S. products.  U.S. industry officials say Korea is a "wild card" that could depress memory-chip prices next year and hurt profits at companies such as Texas Instruments Inc. and Micron Technology Inc.  Hitachi Ltd., Fujitsu Ltd. and other Japanese giants, meanwhile, are beefing up their product lines with specially tailored chips -- such as application-specific integrated circuits, or ASICs -- that compete directly with U.S. makers' more profitable products.  Fujitsu, for instance, has set up design centers across the U.S. to attract business from American computer companies.  Japan's share of the world's ASICs market grew to 39% in 1988 from 26% in 1984, while the U.S. share fell to 52% from 59%, according to Dataquest.  ---  @ Top U.S. Chip Makers Sales  @ (in billions of dollars)  @ EXPECTED  @ LAST CURRENT  @ FISCAL FISCAL EXPECTED  @ YEAR YEAR PCT. CHG.  @ Texas Instruments $6.29 $6.6 4.9%  @ Motorola 8.25 9.3 12.7  @ Intel 2.875 3.2 11.1  @ National Semiconductor 1.648 1.78 7.9  @ Advanced Micro Devices 1.126 1.095 -2.8  NOTE: Projections are Shearson Lehman Hutton estimates, sales include divisions other than semiconductors  CITICORP is a New York-based financial and banking services company.  An earlier edition misstated the company's business.  (See: "Who's News: Citicorp" -- WSJ Aug. 7, 1989)  ASA LTD. was removed from Standard & Poor's Corp. index of 500 stocks.  An earlier edition said ASA International Ltd., which isn't part of the index, had been removed.  ASA Ltd. hasn't been the subject of a recent takeover agreement, as reported in Friday's Abreast of the Market column.  (See: "Shifts in S&P 500 Index" -- WSJ Aug. 7, 1989)  Almost everyone, from Federal Reserve Chairman Alan Greenspan on down, agrees that the Fed has caught the scent of recession and is making money both cheaper and more readily available.  Disagreement is mainly a matter of degree.  Some Bush administration officials fear the central bank isn't doing enough to preserve the long business expansion.  A look at developments, however, suggests that the Federal Reserve so far hasn't done much of anything.  In congressional testimony last month, Mr. Greenspan said "recent developments suggest that the balance of risks may have shifted somewhat away from greater inflation."  Some of the reporters in the audience may have tuned out at that point, for headlines the next day proclaimed that the Fed was making a U-turn, opting for a considerably more expansionary policy.  Actually, the Federal Reserve chairman went on to say inflation was still higher than the Fed wanted.  "Monetary policy," he said, "will need to continue to focus on laying the groundwork for gradual progress toward price stability."  He didn't sound like he was ready to flood the economy with money.  The most visible tool of Federal Reserve policy is the federal funds rate, the fee that banks charge each other for overnight loans of reserves.  Reserves are crucial to the banks, since they are needed to expand loans.  The Fed can raise or lower the supply of reserves by buying or selling Treasury securities in the open market, so it can strongly influence the funds rate.  From the spring of 1988 until last April, the Federal Reserve allowed the funds rate to rise by about three percentage points.  This encouraged increases in other shortterm interest rates.  In the same period the Fed sharply slowed the growth rate of the money supply, however measured.  By mid-1989 housing starts were slowing, auto sales were weak and there was a growing belief that an economic slowdown was at hand.  Nearly everyone agreed the Fed should ease, and the Fed says it has -- once in early June, once in early July and once in late July.  In each case the central bank meant that it had allowed the funds rate to fall by a quarter of a percentage point.  The money supply spurted upward in June, but this resulted partly from taxpayers rebuilding bank deposits depleted by the unexpectedly high tax payments in April.  Chairman Greenspan told Congress last month that "clearly interest rates are down significantly."  Presumably, he had in mind that market rates have fallen more than the funds rate.  This led Paul Kasriel, an economist at Chicago's Northern Trust Co., to remark that the chairman's statements indicate a hope that the market "can do the Fed's easing without the Fed having to do much itself."  Some analysts think the economy is facing a recession now because the Fed pushed a restrictive policy too long.  The Shadow Open Market Committee, a group of academic and business economists that attaches considerable importance to monetary data, last spring urged the Fed to promote a somewhat swifter growth of the money supply.  Otherwise, the group said, there was a risk of a serious recession.  Some officials within the Bush administration agree the Federal Reserve should move more aggressively toward ease.  The New York investment firm of C.J. Lawrence, Morgan Grenfell Inc. comments, "Fed funds are still well above market yields, and reserves have been flat for nearly three years, giving the Fed plenty of room to ease further."  Other observers, however, think it's too late to do much now.  William Tehan of the New York securities firm of P.R. Herzig & Co. thinks the Fed has helped push the economy toward deflation and adds that "a new recession probably started about a month ago."  David H. Resler, chief economist of Nomura Securities International, Inc., in New York, says Fed restraint has already brought on a growth recession, the term analysts apply to periods of subpar growth.  Leif H. Olsen, former chief economist of New York's Citibank, thinks the economy may be heading into a mild recession now.  Monetary policy, he observes, operates with long lags that usually are hard to predict.  "The economy," he says, "is being influenced today by policy which was executed six to nine months ago" -- when policy was still restrictive.  What can the Federal Reserve do now?  Mr. Greenspan appears to believe that the best course is to proceed with a cautious move toward ease and to hope for a soft landing.  Sometime next year, he said last week, we'll know whether the Fed's plan has been successful.  Friday, August 4, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 8 15/16% high, 8 13/16% low, 8 13/16% near closing bid, 8 7/8% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.50% 30 to 44 days; 8.375% 45 to 59 days; 8.25% 60 to 89 days; 8% 90 to 119 days; 7.875% 120 to 149 days; 7.75% 150 to 179 days; 7.375% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.70% 30 days; 8.50% 60 days; 8.40% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.15% one month; 8.08% two months; 8.02% three months; 7.94% six months; 7.84% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.70% one month; 8.55% three months; 8.50% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.67% 30 days; 8.50% 60 days; 8.38% 90 days; 8.28% 120 days; 8.20% 150 days; 8.13% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% one month; 8 13/16% to 8 11/16% two months; 8 3/4% to 8 5/8% three months; 8 11/16% to 8 9/16% four months; 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% five months; 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 3/4% one month; 8 9/16% three months; 8 3/8% six months; 8 5/16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, July 31, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.65% 13 weeks; 7.35% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 9.94%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 9.76%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.70%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.86%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it assigned a single-B-2 rating to this biotechnology company's $50 million face amount of convertible subordinated Eurodebentures due 2004.  The rating reflects the risks of an early-stage company in a highly competitive industry, the uncertainty of legal proceedings involving Amgen, and the likelihood that its cash needs will continue to be heavy, the rating concern said.  Moody's said the rating also "takes into consideration that Amgen is one of the few biotechnology companies that has a product on the market and anticipates that Amgen's profitability will improve substantially in the near future."  Prices on the world spot market in recent months have dropped $40 to $50 a metric ton, or between 9% and 11%, for standard rolled steel, used to make everything from appliances to cars, reports PaineWebber Inc.  LTV Corp. just boosted discounts to buyers $20 a ton for hot and cold rolled sheet and hot-dipped galvanized sheet steel, also used to make appliances and cars, as well as containers.  The move is considered the first broad-based price drop by a major steelmaker in recent years.  Furthermore, foreign steelmakers are more aggressively wooing U.S. customers with discounts.  Triggering the weakening prices has been lackluster demand reflecting seasonal factors, a softening economy and increased competition.  Lower domestic consumption, in turn, translates into more steel for U.S. producers to export.  James F. Collins, president of the Steel Manufacturers Association, which represents the smaller, specialized manufacturers known as minimills, notes that higher interest rates in recent months have curbed consumer buying for such products as cars, while heavy rain this year limited building construction in the Northeast.  Indeed, auto makers, the single largest steel user, continue to scale back third-quarter and fourth-quarter production schedules.  That has prompted the some steel marketers to look elsewhere, including home and office furniture markets, to pick up the slack.  But that isn't always possible.  Andrew G. Sharkey, president of the Steel Service Center Institute, serving steel distributors, notes that the group's members, though wary about further price erosion and afraid of getting stuck with expensive inventories, can't always reduce those inventories.  "The bottom line is that there is simply too much steel in the pipeline given current seasonal factors," he says.  Moreover, the institute forecasts a 3% decline in steel shipped in 1989, the first drop in such shipments after six years of record increases.  Steel service centers are the second largest domestic steel consumer.  Some steel executives, though, think the industry may be overreacting.  "Frankly, I don't think the demand has fallen off as dramatically" as some service centers fear, says an executive at a Midwestern service center.  In fact, major steelmakers report firm orders for many product lines as of the middle of last month and the capital-goods sector remains relatively robust.  Moreover, the executive, who didn't want to be identified, questions whether the price discounts offered by LTV were necessary.  He said the discount seemed less a reaction to a weak market than to efforts by competitor Bethlehem Steel Corp. to snare a bigger share of the road-machinery and bridge-construction market.  Indeed, the price discounts cover hot-dipped galvanized sheet products, which are still in a relatively tight market.  LTV officials won't comment on pricing.  Sluggish steel demand doesn't appear restricted to the U.S. Peter Marcus, a metals analyst for PaineWebber, says recent reports indicate that Europe is also experiencing a surplus in major mill-type products.  That, in turn, could further squeeze world spot prices.  Mr. Marcus predicts a significant drop in prices through early next year, though he expects a comparable price surge to follow.  In the meantime, lower domestic spot prices are causing U.S. steelmakers increasingly to look abroad.  Steel exports have grown markedly in the last two years, albeit from virtually a nonexistent base.  Menno Ratzker, president of international marketer M&M Ferrous America Ltd., attributes the rise in the last 18 months to American steelmakers' increased competitiveness and to weakness in the dollar.  But that picture has changed with the U.S. currency's strength this year.  Moreover, demand has eroded in Asia -- including Japan -- where customers are also trying to shrink high inventories.  Indeed, John Corey, Armco Inc.'s chief economist, says he expects industry exports to decline about 10% in the second half to 900,000 tons from 1.1 million in the first half.  The drop reflects currency changes and a slowdown in the world economy.  USX Corp., the nation's largest maker and exporter of steel, doesn't anticipate a decline and is holding to earlier estimates that it will export one million tons this year.  Christopher Plummer, who follows the steel industry for WEFA Group, doesn't expect much export growth for the next couple of years.  He said other economies are expected to follow North America's slowdown, which will cause foreign steelmakers to look abroad for business.  "If that happens, we're likely to see a glut in the world market," he said.  "That would put a damper on future growth of U.S. steel exports."  He said surplus steel, along with the strength of the dollar, also has caused foreign steelmakers to be more aggressive in the U.S. pricing arena.  Indeed, some 30% of steel service centers recently surveyed said foreign mills are stepping up their attempts to land U.S. business compared with three months ago.  That is up from 13% in June.  The recent decline in steel prices apparently has little to do with import trade-restraint agreements.  Indeed, the effect of such voluntary restraint pacts on pricing is hotly debated.  Thomas C. Graham, president of USX's steel division, argues vehemently that the agreements have not affected pricing.  Other industry consultants and analysts say the restraints would push prices up only when the market is tight.  Still, John Jacobson, an analyst with AUS Consultants, recently completed an eight-month study suggesting that the restraints have increased domestic prices by 8% and import prices by 12.5%.  The study also looked at external factors, including currency rates and demand.  Moreover, he says he expects "a decline in prices of roughly the same magnitude" as the restraints expire in the next few years.  The U.S. has entered a new stage in which it is involved in clear, though indirect, bargaining over the release of hostages in the Middle East.  The Shiite extremists holding U.S. and other Western hostages in Lebanon began to bargain yesterday over their release.  The "Revolutionary Justice Organization," the group that just last week threatened to kill U.S. hostage Joseph Cicippio, announced that it will free him if Israel releases a Shiite cleric it has kidnapped, as well as 150 other Lebanese Shiite prisoners and 300 Palestinians it is holding.  The organization also demanded that Israel allow the return of Palestinian activists it recently deported.  That offer certainly won't be acceptable to Israel, which insists that three Israeli soldiers believed held in Lebanon as well as 15 other Western hostages -- including seven from the U.S. -- be released in any swap.  But it shows that the hostage-holders are beginning to dicker over what conditions would produce freedom for hostages.  Israel and the Shiite groups holding hostages now are bargaining mainly through public statements, but Israeli officials say they also have been holding discussions with Shiite leaders and intermediaries in southern Lebanon.  The Bush administration, without officially changing U.S. policy against negotiating with hostage-takers, is tacitly cooperating in the bargaining -- as long as Israel takes the public lead.  Secretary of State James Baker acknowledged as much yesterday when he told reporters that the U.S. and Israel are "consulting very, very closely together with respect to the whole range of issues that are involved here."  Flying to Mexico for a meeting, Mr. Baker told reporters on his plane that "consulting with a country that pursues a policy of negotiations is not tantamount to negotiating yourself."  For his part, President Bush also is signaling that he will have "a little bit greater flexibility" in discussions over the hostages than the U.S. has shown in the last few years, said one senior administration official.  As an indication, the official pointed to a carefully worded statement given by President Bush on Friday when he was asked to respond to a declaration by Iranian President Hashemi Rafsanjani that Iran is ready to work with the White House to resolve the hostage situation.  "I don't know what it means fully, but I think the world is familiar with our policy," Mr. Bush said.  "But there will be nothing that will be done ever that will create a new incentive for taking somebody else hostage."  The statement by the president suggests "there might be a way of having discussions in a way that won't encourage people to take hostages," said the official.  "The fact is, the bazaar is open" Richard Murphy, until recently the assistant secretary of state for Middle Eastern affairs, said yesterday on NBC-TV's "Meet the Press."  The White House didn't have any response yesterday to the offer from Mr. Cicippio's captors, which came less than a week after a related Shiite group claimed to have killed U.S. Marine Lt. Col. William Higgins.  But the administration's strategy is to give Israel a green light to pursue a deal involving U.S. hostages as well as Israeli soldiers.  Because the bargaining chips being used in the dealing -- Lebanese Shiites now in Israeli hands -- aren't controlled by the U.S., the Bush administration doesn't have to be directly involved in the give-and-take.  Meanwhile, the U.S. has sent its own messages, about the importance it attaches to the hostages, to Algeria and others thought to be influential with the hostage-holders and the Iranian government that is believed to inspire them.  Despite the signs of movement, of course, it will be enormously difficult to strike any deal resulting in the release of hostages.  Over the weekend, for instance, both the Lebanese terrorists holding the hostages and Iran, which has supported the terrorists, sent conflicting signals.  At the same time that Mr. Cicippio's captors were suggesting a deal for his release, Hussein Mousawi, a leader of Lebanon's Hezbollah party, threatened to kill one of the Israeli soldiers held by Shiites unless Israel frees Sheik Abdel Karim Obeid, the Lebanese cleric it kidnapped.  And Hezbollah also insisted that it won't release Israeli soldiers as part of any deal.  Hezbollah is a Lebanese Shiite organization that is believed to be the sponsor of the smaller groups holding hostages in Lebanon.  The key to breaking the hostage impasse may well lie in the hints that Iran wants a less hostile relationship with the U.S. now that Ayatollah Khomeini has died and Mr. Rafsanjani has risen to the presidency.  "The U.S. ought to keep its eye on the Iranian negotiations and not on the Lebanese negotiations," said former Secretary of State Henry Kissinger yesterday on ABC-TV's "This Week with David Brinkley."  Mr. Bush said he was pleased with Mr. Rafsanjani's statement Friday that "the freeing of the hostages has solutions, reasonable, prudent solutions."  Privately, Mr. Bush's aides say that, while intrigued with the turn of rhetoric, they remain skeptical.  There won't be "any real recognition there's a real opening" until Tehran's leaders produce "tangible actions" to illustrate they've changed their behavior, said one administration aide.  U.S. officials also remain uncertain about the control Mr. Rafsanjani can exert over his government even if he wants to be helpful.  Other powerful Iranian officials are far less interested in cooperating with the West.  In the past, Lebanese Shiite extremists have taken their lead from Iran's hard-line interior minister, Ali Akbar Mohtashemi, whose comments have been far less encouraging than Mr. Rafsanjani's in the last week.  Yesterday's statement from Mr. Cicippio's captors also suggested that Syria, whose forces patrol the area of Lebanon where hostages are believed held, could be instrumental in arranging a solution.  Mr. Cicippio's captors appealed to Syria to "agree to negotiate through international organizations to ensure success" of the captors' offer.  A federal judge froze the assets of two corporations and three individuals that the Securities and Exchange Commission has charged with an allegedly fraudulent "bucket shop" scheme to sell falsely inflated penny stocks.  In a suit filed here, the agency charged that the three men ran an international stock fraud and money laundering operation that used blind-pool public offerings to cheat small investors out of millions of dollars.  In a complex scheme, the agency alleges, securities in bogus blind-pool companies were sold to phony investors.  The investors' stock was then sold to the public at substantially higher prices and the proceeds laundered through Swiss banks, court documents say.  The suit asks for injunctions to bar the defendants from any future participation in the securities business and also seeks to disgorge all allegedly illicit profits.  The complaint is the latest move in a series of investigations of Arnold Kimmes, Thomas Quinn and Michael Wright in several nations that includes a federal grand jury investigation in Las Vegas, Nev., an Internal Revenue Service inquiry and criminal proceedings in Geneva and Paris.  The complaint also names GSS Venture Capital Corp., a Utah corporation based in Fort Lauderdale, Fla., and Max Inc., a Nevada corporation, which the SEC says the defendants used to conduct the stock transactions.  The complaint also charges 11 others associated with or employed by the lead defendants.  An SEC affidavit alleges that investors in GSS and Max may have lost millions of dollars in the scheme.  The agency alleges that the two companies operated from 1985 to 1987 when they were permanently enjoined from violating anti-fraud and registration provisions following a proposed merger of the two companies.  The complaint is part of a multination effort to crack down on penny stock firms that sell securities in blind pools, which are companies without any operations of their own that seek to raise money to acquire other companies.  Salesmen for these securities often use high-pressure telephone sales techniques out of so-called boiler rooms, making hundreds of sales in a day.  The SEC says that GSS and Max sold shares at 20 to 40 times the initial public offering prices of the units despite the fact that the companies never engaged in any revenue-producing business.  Mr. Kimmes is currently under indictment in Switzerland and facing an arrest warrant in France, according to his attorney, Robert M. Silverman of Los Angeles.  Mr. Silverman wouldn't disclose his client's whereabouts.  Mr. Quinn has been imprisoned for over a year in Paris awaiting fraud charges, according to Richard BenVeniste, a Washington, D.C., attorney who has represented Mr. Quinn in the criminal investigation.  Mr. Wright is engaged in horse ranching in Utah, according to Joseph H. Bottum, his attorney in Salt Lake City, and can't be reached to comment.  The SEC says that nearly $13 million belonging to the lead defendants has been frozen by Swiss and French authorities in banks in Switzerland, France, Luxembourg and Gibraltar.  Federal Judge Milton I. Shadur ordered that the assets of all defendants be temporarily frozen.  All of the lead defendants are currently enjoined from engaging in securities activities and attorneys for several defendants expressed frustration with the SEC's latest move.  "My client's assets are already frozen in Europe," said Mr. Silverman.  "This is a case of too little, too late on the SEC's part.  It's like when the Soviet Union invaded Japan only in the final days of World War II."  An attorney for another defendant described the complaint as weak.  "The SEC is asking the court to enjoin future actions that will never take place based on allegations of prior actions that are over and done with," the attorney said.  Two thrifts based here reported losses for their third quarters, ended June 30, after boosting their provisions for loan losses.  CenTrust Bank, the largest thrift in Florida, reported a fiscal third-quarter loss of $5 million compared with year-earlier net income of $8 million, or 31 cents a share.  And Amerifirst Bank reported that its net loss widened to $49.1 million from $1.8 million.  CenTrust's results were affected by an addition of $22.5 million to its general reserves for loan losses in the quarter.  Without the additional reserves, CenTrust would have reported net income of $17.5 million.  For the nine months, CenTrust's loss narrowed to $21.3 million from $52.8 million.  Separately, CenTrust said it elected three directors, filling vacancies on its board.  The directors are Jesse J. McCrary Jr., senior partner of the law firm of McCrary, Ferguson, Lee, Adderley, Culver & Long; Jorge L. Mas Canosa, president of Church & Tower Inc., Engineering Contractors; and Richard N. Goodwin, an author and attorney.  Amerifirst's loss was the result of a big boost in its provision for loan losses, to $57.3 million from $2.4 million, a year earlier.  The latest quarter's loss was after a $3 million loss from discontinued operations and a $6.6 million one-time gain.  The year-earlier net loss included a loss of $842,000 from discontinued operations.  In the nine months, Amerifirst had a net loss of $68.7 million, compared with net income of $7.3 million, or 66 cents a share.  The latest period's loss included a $5.5 million loss from discontinued operations and a one-time gain of $6.6 million.  In the 1988 period, the loss included a $1.4 million loss from discontinued operations and a gain of $7.9 million from an accounting change.  Japan's ruling party will pick a new leader tomorrow in a rare contested election.  But despite the effort to put a democratic face on the proceedings, the outcome already has been orchestrated in the back room.  Four of the Liberal Democratic Party's six major factions are supporting Toshiki Kaifu, a 58-year-old former education minister, and their support makes Mr. Kaifu a strong frontrunner.  Although he is little known outside Japan and lacks top policy-making experience in economics or foreign affairs, Mr. Kaifu appeals to both sides of the sharply divided LDP: those who would do anything to clean up the party's scandal-plagued image, and those who desperately want the party to cling to its traditional ways.  Mr. Kaifu has some genuine reform credentials -- he is a protege of the late reformist prime minister of the mid-1970s, Takeo Miki -- but he is also said to have the trust of one of the party's traditionalist power brokers, former prime minister Noboru Takeshita.  Theoretically, the 405 LDP members of the Japanese parliament, or Diet, and 47 local delegates could still cast their secret ballots for one of the other two candidates who entered the race Saturday -- Shintaro Ishihara, 56, a novelist and former transportation minister, and Yoshiro Hayashi, 62, a former health and welfare minister.  And Mr. Ishihara, in particular, is the favorite of a group of young, right-wing LDP Diet members, who like his hawkish nationalist views.  But for either of Mr. Kaifu's opponents to be elected would require an unprecedented breach of factional discipline, something that seems unlikely even in a truly secret election.  And some LDP politicians were known to be wondering last week how secret the voting would be.  Such musings, even if totally ungrounded, would help maintain factional discipline, and might have been encouraged for just that reason.  Whoever is elected LDP president is certain to succeed Sosuke Uno as prime minister.  Although opposition parties, who won a combined majority in the upper house of the Diet three weeks ago, may propose Japan Socialist Party leader Takako Doi, the constitution gives the final decision to the lower house, which the LDP still controls by a large majority.  Both houses of the Diet are to open today in special session, with the LDP picking its leader tomorrow and both houses then selecting the prime minister on Wednesday.  Mr. Uno, whose two-month reign was plagued by revelations of his involvement with a geisha, announced after the upperhouse election debacle that he would resign when the Diet's special session convened.  At a joint televised news conference Saturday, all three candidates promised to address the major issues that cost the LDP its upper house majority.  They all promised political reform measures, a review of the recently enacted 3% consumption tax and no weakening of the government's opposition to importing foreign rice.  Since most recent LDP presidents have been picked in back-room deals, having an election can't help but improve upon the party's arrogant, undemocratic image.  An editorial in the Yomiuri Shimbun, Japan's largest newspaper with 9.2 million morning subscribers, praised the procedure and said it marks the beginning of a "new era" for candidates for party president to discuss their views on television.  But whether the Japanese public will be as impressed as the Yomiuri, which traditionally supports the LDP, remains to be seen.  Lower-house elections must be held by next June and are likely to be held much sooner.  On a sunny afternoon three months ago, half a dozen pistol-packing U.S. Customs Service agents battered down the door of Ramon Cernuda's luxury condo overlooking Biscayne Bay.  About the same time, other agents were swarming over Mr. Cernuda's book-publishing office in Miami's Little Havana.  It may have looked like a drug bust, but it wasn't.  This was an art bust.  The agents were after the collection of Cuban paintings on the walls of Mr. Cernuda's apartment and office.  In 24 hours they relieved him of about 200 paintings that the Customs Service asserts were smuggled into the U.S. from Cuba.  Although Cuban art has been bought and sold in the U.S. for years, this was the first time since the trade embargo against Cuba 26 years ago that the U.S. government had seized any as contraband.  The raid climaxed a tale that is bizarre even by Miami standards.  It involves ferocious exile politics and vendettas, allegations of abuse of U.S. government power and, on the government's part, broad if less-than-persuasive hints of smuggling conspiracies involving two diplomats -- one American, the other Belgian -- and Cuban officials.  Yet a large number of the paintings seized by the G-men were by an artist whose work had been confiscated before -- by Cuba's secret police.  He ekes out a living in Cuba partly by trading paintings for food.  More than 90 days after the seizure, the central figure, Mr. Cernuda, has yet to be charged with any crime.  But the slight, prematurely white-haired publisher has already spent more than $130,000 in legal fees.  His lawyer, who has asked a federal court to return the paintings, says Mr. Cernuda is the subject of a grand jury investigation into embargo violations.  The Treasury Department says anybody convicted of such a violation could be imprisoned 10 years and fined $50,000.  "I didn't think this could happen to anybody in the U.S.," says Mr. Cernuda between puffs of his (non-Havana) cigar.  Jerry Scott, in Washington, says he feels the same way.  Mr. Scott, former press secretary for the U.S. Interest Section in Havana, had brought to the U.S. some of the seized works painted by the Cuban dissident.  With his government career under a cloud, Mr. Scott has hired a lawyer.  "I feel as if I've been mugged," he says.  The arts and militant anti-communism have never mixed felicitously in Miami.  Singers and playwrights have been routinely banned from festivals and airwaves for having performed or traveled in Cuba.  But this time, the government is deeply involved.  The U.S. Attorney's office and the Customs Service appear to have stumbled -- or been drawn -- into an ideological squabble by exile factions, though both agencies deny it.  "Politics stop at my desk," says Customs Service group supervisor Keith Prager.  U.S. Attorney Dexter Lehtinen, who trumpeted the seizure at a press conference while agents were still carting away Mr. Cernuda's artwork, blames the "the other side" for politicizing the case.  Mr. Cernuda, who has made a small fortune by selling English-language instruction courses to fellow Hispanic immigrants, blames a conservative lobbying group, the Cuban American National Foundation, and its chairman, Jorge Mas Canosa, for his troubles.  "I'm sorry to say that Jorge Mas and the Cuban American National Foundation have used their political influence to loosen a campaign of political intimidation in Miami," he says.  The reason, says Mr. Cernuda, is that Mr. Mas Canosa and the foundation resent the emergence of another moneyed group of Cuban exiles who take a softer line against the Castro regime, and who challenge the foundation's claim to speak for the exile community.  Mr. Cernuda and the foundation also support rival Cuban human rights groups.  Mr. Mas Canosa is a millionaire utility-company contractor who owns an armored Mercedes-Benz. (It once belonged to the late Nicaraguan dictator Anastasio Somoza.) Mr. Mas Canosa denies Mr. Cernuda's accusations.  "That's a police problem, not a political problem," he says of the art seizure.  But three days after the Cernuda bust, Mr. Mas Canosa made a broadcast on Spanish-language radio here.  He denied having specifically instigated the Cernuda seizure but said nonetheless that he and the foundation were responsible for the federal investigation "and 20 more like it" that preceded the raid.  He says he was referring to the foundation's strong lobbying to strengthen and enforce the trade embargo.  The trouble started 15 months ago, when Mr. Cernuda, then a vice president of the museum, refused to withdraw a handful of paintings by pro-Castro Cubans from a benefit auction.  The beneficiary was the Cuban Museum of Art and Culture, founded by exiles 14 years ago.  Mr. Cernuda said the paintings had been done before the trade embargo and, therefore, could be sold legally.  The auction provoked furious controversy that aroused the interest of the Miami city commission and led it to request an investigation by the U.S. Attorney's office.  The office refused to get involved.  "I thought it was horse manure," Richard Gregorie, then chief of criminal investigators at the U.S. Attorney's office, says of the call for an investigation.  Mr. Gregorie, now in private practice, left the government shortly after Mr. Lehtinen, a conservative Republican state senator, was appointed U.S. Attorney last year.  Mr. Lehtinen shares many foundation views.  His wife, state Sen. Ileana Ros-Lehtinen, a Cuban-American, is running for the late Rep. Claude Pepper's congressional seat with the foundation's support.  In November, the city again wrote the U.S. Attorney's office about the status of the requested investigation.  Then, six months later, the customs agents descended.  "It was a nightmare," says Mrs. Cernuda, who wasn't at home when the Customs agents broke in but who returned home later; she remembers Castro militiamen searching her house in Cuba as a little girl.  After the Customs agents arrived, she recovered sufficiently to serve Cuban coffee to two of them who slept overnight on her living-room couches to guard the art before it was hauled away.  The bust also came as a rude shock to the small circle of people who sell, exhibit and collect Cuban art.  Most are nostalgic exiles.  Hardly any had considered that buying and selling Cuban art could violate the law.  Auction houses such as Sotheby's and Christie's, where Mr. Cernuda bought many of his confiscated paintings, had even, until recently, listed post-1963 Cuban works in their catalogs and sold them at auction.  "We didn't know we weren't supposed to sell Cuban paintings," says Lisa Palmer, who started Christie's Latin American division in 1981.  Mr. Cernuda was no more secretive.  He published a hardbound book of photographs showing his collection.  He gave an extensive interview to a reporter from a Miami newspaper when he bought a batch of paintings, now confiscated, from a Belgian diplomat.  He hung many of the forbidden canvases at a college exhibition.  Mr. Lehtinen, the U.S. Attorney, says the Cernuda inquiry concerns the commercial smuggling of artwork possibly worth hundreds of thousands of dollars.  In its search-warrant affidavit, the government says the diplomat, now Belgium's commercial attache in Atlanta, set a market price for Cuban art by selling a few paintings at New York auction houses before disposing of the rest.  That, says the affidavit, benefits the Cuban government, as it is "the holder of the greatest quantity of Cuban artwork."  The diplomat had sold 110 paintings to Mr. Cernuda for $54,000, about $490 per canvas.  The diplomat didn't answer telephone messages left at his office.  To art specialists, the idea of smuggling conspiracies in Cuban art seems silly.  They say that Cuban art is inexpensive and that prices on it haven't risen recently.  The average Cuban canvas sells at auction for only $3,000 to $5,000.  "Nobody is amassing a fortune in Cuban art," says Ms. Palmer of Christie's.  The Customs Service seized about 40 canvases (32 of which were returned last month), and 80 paintings and drawings by Nicolas Guillen Landrau, a political dissident in Cuba whose work had been seized before by the secret police.  Said to be half-crazed by electroshock treatments in prison, Mr. Guillen Landrau lives in a dilapidated Havana apartment and survives by selling off his meager possessions and trading an occasional painting for food.  As the U.S. press officer in Havana, Mr. Scott had actively supported human rights, and helped Mr. Guillen Landrau with food, cigarettes, clothes and money.  In return, the artist gave him some paintings and sold him others for a total of less than $400.  Mr. Scott planned to exhibit the paintings at the Cuban Museum to focus attention on the plight of the artist and other Cuban dissidents.  Last December, hoping to allay any official concern, Mr. Cernuda wrote the Treasury Department (of which the Customs Service is a part), informing it that the paintings would be shown, and he enclosed Mr. Scott's government business card.  The Treasury didn't respond.  Mr. Scott remains baffled by the affair.  "I got caught in the crossfire," he says.  Kenneth Ryskamp, a federal judge in Miami, also seemed confused.  In a hearing last month on Mr. Cernuda's request to have his paintings returned, Judge Ryskamp recalled an announcement by the U.S. Attorney that his office wouldn't prosecute cases involving small amounts of cocaine.  This made it hard to understand the priorities involved in expending prosecutorial resources on paintings, the judge said.  He hasn't ruled yet on Mr. Cernuda's request.  Carl C. Icahn, chairman of Trans World Airlines, signaled that a merger of his airline with another carrier may be in the offing.  The signal came last week when TWA officials announced during the course of contract negotiations with the machinists' union that a "corporate change" is possible as the result of a "merger or combination " with another carrier.  Federal mediator Robert Martin suspended contract talks indefinitely following the company's remarks.  But on Friday, Mr. Icahn moved to suppress any speculation that a sale or merger is imminent.  An internal memorandum to TWA managers said that a merger was "one of several possible strategies for TWA" but that speculation of an imminent change would be "premature."  TWA and union officials said they didn't know what, if any, airline Mr. Icahn may be seeking to merge with TWA.  It is also possible the company has raised the specter of change to delay negotiations.  In any case, the airline's announcement followed widespread speculation in airline stocks.  Shares of UAL Corp., the Chicago parent of United Airlines, increased sharply last month on takeover speculation; on Friday, they closed at $164.50, down $9.50, in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  Trading also was heavy much of last week in Midway Airlines shares.  Stock of Chicago-based Midway, also traded on the Big Board, reached a 12-month high Wednesday, closing at $18.875.  Midway closed at $18.25, up 12.5 cents, Friday.  An individual familiar with the situation said that Mr. Icahn wasn't responsible for the run-ups in the shares of Midway and UAL and that Mr. Icahn doesn't own any shares of either airline.  The individual added that Mr. Icahn hasn't recently owned shares of either carrier.  The individual said that the TWA chairman was exploring a number of options, including enlisting a foreign airline to invest in TWA. Mr. Icahn declined to comment.  UAL said that it doesn't comment on the activity of its stock; Midway said it doesn't know why its shares have been heavily traded.  TWA has been on the block for several months now, if not officially.  The airline's pilot and machinist unions, both in disputes with Mr. Icahn, have been seeking buyers.  The Air Line Pilots Association has tried to interest prominent St. Louis businessmen in TWA and the International Association of Machinists has explored the possibility of employee ownership.  But the unions' efforts haven't gone far.  Last November, Mr. Icahn said he was considering acquiring another airline to join with TWA and repeatedly has said TWA needs to expand in order to survive.  TWA has about $1.3 billion in cash and securities on hand, enough to launch a bid for another carrier.  However, union officials and many industry analysts believe Mr. Icahn, who took TWA private last fall, is more interested in selling TWA than in acquiring another airline.  When Mr. Icahn took control of TWA in 1986, few in the industry expected the career Wall Street speculator to make running an airline a long-term commitment.  After Mr. Icahn took TWA private last year, recouping about 90% of his original investment in the process, many observers predicted that it wouldn't be long before he tried to sell all or part of TWA.  TWA's labor contracts could stand in the way of a sale.  They prevent Mr. Icahn from selling the airline unless it sustains a year of net losses.  Then, too, a merger with another airline would have to be approved by the Justice Department, which already has expressed its dismay over the recent consolidation in the airline industry.  However, TWA could use the "failing airline doctrine" to argue that it couldn't survive without a merger partner.  A last-minute political compromise over how to finance the sweeping thrift-bailout bill could bring down deposit rates in the savings and loan industry more quickly than expected.  The historic bill, adopted by the House and Senate near midnight Friday, includes a patchwork finance scheme combining elements of the Bush administration's "off-budget" plan with a Democratic-backed proposal to rely on Treasury borrowings.  Under the compromise, the U.S. will have to lay out $20 billion of the rescue funds before Sept. 30 -- twice the level that would have been spent by that time under President Bush's original proposal.  According to administration officials, that means the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. could begin pumping cash into insolvent S&Ls this week, thus reducing their need to offer above-market rates to attract deposits.  "This will let us move more quickly," said Treasury Undersecretary Robert Glauber.  The speed with which regulators intend to act contrasts sharply with the years of regulatory and legislative neglect that led to adoption of history's biggest financial bailout.  The bill ultimately will commit $50 billion in borrowings, plus more than $100 billion of interest over the next 10 years, to close or merge insolvent S&Ls.  The legislation will prompt huge changes in the financial-services industry, blurring further the differences between banks and thrifts.  Thrifts will be forced to employ the more-realistic accounting practices of the banking industry and will be subject to banks' tougher capital standards.  Thrifts will be restricted to investing in more-conservative bank-like instruments, thus excluding such things as junk bonds and direct equity holdings, unless they invest through separately capitalized subsidiaries.  Banks, for their part, will be permitted to buy healthy S&Ls for the first time.  And Federal Home Loan Banks, an important source of funds for most thrifts, will be permitted to lend to banks that invest in home mortgages.  Passage of the bill was perhaps the biggest victory yet for the Bush administration in Congress.  But negative repercussions may persist from a White House confrontation with Congress during the tense days before passage.  President Bush explicitly threatened to veto the package, causing Democrats who initially backed the proposal to abandon it at the last minute.  That is likely to take a toll on the president's relations with Congress, several important Democrats said.  "There is a very bad taste in the mouth of the Democrats," said Rep. Charles Schumer (D., N.Y.).  With more than 500 S&Ls insolvent, the Treasury's Mr. Glauber said yesterday that the government won't have any difficulty spending $20 billion before the current federal fiscal year ends Sept. 30.  "We can spend that easily," he said.  The largest chunk, $15 billion, will go to replacing the highest-cost deposits or other forms of borrowing at some of the 250 thrifts that are already under the management of the FDIC.  Many of these institutions, in order to preserve liquidity, are paying steep premiums over market rates in order to attract depositors.  By easing the pressure on unhealthy S&Ls to boost rates, the legislation is expected to help reduce interest rates for thrifts in general.  Even though it is parking the $15 billion in the sick thrifts now, the FDIC will be able to use the money to dispose of institutions after the fiscal year ends.  The funds injected into the thrifts now will reduce the operating losses that regulators ultimately will have to subsidize when the sick thrifts are closed or sold.  And presumably, the FDIC can use cash from one institution to complete transactions involving other institutions.  The remaining $5 billion of the $20 billion to be spent within the next two months would go toward merging or liquidating the worst of the sick thrifts, using the funds to pay off depositors or compensate buyers of sick thrifts for existing losses.  Of course, before the government can spend $20 billion, it must raise that sum.  Mr. Glauber said the money will be drawn initially from Treasury cash balances and from the sale of cash-management bills, or short-term IOUs.  The debt will be refinanced across the spectrum of Treasury securities in October, November and December, he said.  The Treasury won't sell any other long-term securities in August or September beyond those already scheduled.  In addition to reformulating the accounting and regulatory rules that govern thrifts, the law will put thrift-industry regulators under the supervision of the Treasury and the FDIC.  It also will create a new arm of the FDIC, called the Resolution Trust Corp., which will inevitably put pressure on real estate markets across the country as it disposes of up to $400 billion in office buildings, shopping centers, raw land, apartment buildings and other investments formerly held by sick S&Ls.  In a provision that most Republicans fought, the Federal Home Loan Banks must set aside a portion of annual earnings to subsidize low-income mortgages.  The total from the home loan banks would start at $75 million in 1990, and increase to $150 million after 1995.  In a similar provision, the Resolution Trust Corp. would also be required to give state and local non-profit housing agencies a 90-day right of first refusal to purchase certain low-cost residential properties.  Despite a fight over the matter, the bill maintains a new practice in which the FDIC protects so-called bank investment contracts, or huge pension fund deposits, with deposit insurance.  While federal deposit insurance explictly guarantees deposits up to $100,000, the huge funds will be protected up to $100,000 per individual investor in a given beneficiary program.  Several legislators argued that allowing that rule to stand magnifies the risk to the deposit insurance fund.  In the bill, the issue was relegated to a study.  Legislators also consigned, to two studies, to assess risk presented by other "off budget" government liabilities.  In the fight over financing the bailout, Democrats argued that government-sponsored enterprises are proliferating for such items as student college loans, farm credit and housing subsidies.  Using those vehicles to deal with such problems as the thrift bailout helps hide the extent of the government's liability.  Some lawmakers expressed concern that other big problems such as drug abuse or homelessness could be dealt with similarly.  "This will be a precedent cited by many in Congress in the future," warned House Ways and Means Committee Chairman Dan Rostenkowski (D., Ill.)  In a strange political deal, the bill preserves the status of the nation's top thrift regulator, embattled Danny Wall, without new Senate confirmation.  Thanks to his close ties to Sen. Jake Garn (R., Utah), Mr. Wall's job was protected in the House-Senate conference committee as part of a trade-off involving the House's financing package, which itself was ultimately altered in a compromise.  The trade-off that preserved Mr. Wall's position was arranged with the help of Sen. Alan Cranston (D., Calif.), who has been embarrassed by recent reports of his efforts to help the executive of an insolvent thrift who fought Mr. Wall's efforts to take control of the thrift.  Should Mr. Wall have been forced to endure confirmation proceedings, Sen. Cranston's actions could have become the subject of new scrutiny.  The bill also budgets $75 million for the Justice Department to prosecute thrift and bank crimes, and requires the creation of a new deposit-insurance window insignia to be displayed by thrifts.  The logo is to include the words, "Backed by the full faith and credit of the United States Government."  By the end of last week, it was unclear whether the bill would pass at all.  In a last-minute confrontation to try to keep the financing off of the federal budget, Mr. Bush sternly threatened a veto, which would have placed the entire $50 billion in borrowings squarely on the budget -- swelling the budget deficit by that amount.  In the resulting game of brinkmanship with congressional Democrats, the bill ultimately emerged with a Republican stamp.  Earlier last week, in the House-Senate conference working out differences between the chambers, negotiators agreed to adopt the House financing plan, which would have saved roughly $5 billion over 30 years in the bill.  The House measure would have been cheaper because direct borrowings by the Treasury would have been less expensive than the borrowings by the off-budget agency envisioned by the president.  But on Thursday, mindful of the president's veto threat, the Senate shot down the conference plan.  The bill failed to receive the "supermajority" of 60 votes necessary in this case because it would have required a waiver of the Gramm-Rudman deficit-reduction targets.  With a monthlong recess scheduled to begin the next day, late-night negotiations commenced among Budget Director Richard Darman, Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady and representatives of the House and Senate.  House Banking Committee Chairman Henry Gonzalez (D., Texas), desperate to find a solution, squeaked through the compromise plan on a 26-22 vote, with $20 billion on budget and the remainder off budget.  Rep. Gonzalez got the measure through only by voting the proxies of at least five absent members.  Furious Democrats warned the administration that it might have pushed so hard for its financing plan that support for the overall bill could dissolve.  "This legislation is not terribly appetizing to members generally," Sen. Donald Riegle (D., Mich.) warned Messrs.  Brady and Darman.  "We may not muster enough votes on the final passage."  By Friday, enough support was lined up in the Senate to pass the bill on a voice vote, but not until Sen. Charles Grassley (R., Iowa) demanded a standing count of senators.  Of those remaining in the chamber late Friday, 17 senators stood in favor of it, and seven against it.  The rest had begun their recess.  In the House, the vote was more dramatic.  Earlier in the day, four influential Democratic committee chairmen sent letters to their colleagues urging them to oppose the bill, while the administration pushed hard for support from Republicans who were lukewarm to the bill.  Republicans who had previously opposed the bill were suddenly lining up behind it.  "Yesterday I stood in this well and argued against this measure," said Rep. David Dreier (R., Calif.).  "Today I am just as strongly in favor of it."  It passed 201-175, with overwhelming Republican approval.  ---  David Wessel contributed to this article.  Prime Computer Inc. reluctantly agreed to be acquired by friendly suitor J.H. Whitney & Co. at a lower price after Whitney reduced its offer for the computer maker.  The new offer by Whitney, which was hard pressed to find adequate financing, lowers by about $74 million its previous bid, which analysts had valued at $1.2 billion.  But assured of funding, the revised offer of $1.13 billion boosted the value of Prime stock on Wall Street.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Prime closed at $17.75, up $1.125 in heavy trading.  Prime said it was disappointed by the lower offer.  But analysts said the company had little choice because Whitney's lenders had backed off from financing the higher bid after Prime's second-quarter loss of $19 million.  MAI Basic Four Inc., which began the takeover fight with a hostile bid for Prime last year, has since dropped its tender offer and now is seeking to acquire only part of Prime.  Prime settled for the amended bid a few hours after DR Acquisition Corp, a firm organized by J.H. Whitney, proposed to buy 49.5 million Prime shares for $20 a share, or $990.4 million.  Its previous bid had been for $21.50 for an equal number of shares.  Terms for the remainder of Prime equity remain unchanged.  After the offer, DR Acquisition will buy out stock options covering 3.1 million Prime shares, and swap $22 face amount of 15 1/2 senior subordinated debentures due 2001 for the 13 million remaining Prime shares on a fully diluted basis.  The blended value of the revised bid, which arbitragers estimate at between $18 and $18.50 a share, is only slightly higher than MAI Basic Four's most recent hostile offer for Prime.  That offer, analysts calculated, carried a blended value of between $17 and $18 a share.  That offer of cash and notes for all of Prime has since been withdrawn and replaced with a $525 million cash offer for Prime's minicomputer division.  MAI, a Tustin, Calif.-based computer company, declined to say whether it would renew its offer for all of Prime, saying that it hadn't yet had a chance to study the details of Whitney's amended offer.  An MAI spokesman added, however, that Whitney's lowered bid for all of Prime "makes our offer for the minicomputer business even better."  Initially, MAI offered $20 a share for all of Prime shares, an unsolicited proposal that Prime rebuffed.  Prime rejected the offer because it doubted MAI's ability to get adequate financing for such an acquisition, a Prime spokesman said.  But it deemed Whitney's new, lower offer acceptable "because the deal was backed by real financing," he said.  Prime said, "After review of all the alternatives, the board of directors believes that the revised J.H. Whitney offer is the best economic alternative available for Prime stockholders."  Analysts noted that, over the past 10 months as it struggled to fend off MAI's advances, Prime wasn't able to find a more generous suitor.  David Wu, an analyst for S.G. Warburg & Co., said, "It may do well now for Prime to be married off and live happily after."  As a result of the new offer, Prime also postponed its annual shareholder meeting to Aug. 24 to give its holders time to consider the newly revised terms.  The meeting had been scheduled for Wednesday.  Friday, August 4, 1989  @ Following is a weekly listing of unaudited net asset values of publicly traded investment fund shares, reported by the companies as of Friday's close.  Also shown is the closing listed market price or a dealer-to-dealer asked price of each fund's shares, with the percentage of difference.  @ Stock N.A. Stock %  @ Fund Name Exch.  Value Price Diff.  @ Diversified Common Stock Funds  @ AdamsExpress NYSE 19.35 16 3/8 - 15.37  @ BakerFentress NYSE 28.56 23 7/8 - 16.40  @ Blue ChipValue NYSE 8.37 7 1/8 - 14.87  @ Clemente GlobalGro NYSE b10.53 8 1/4 - 21.65  @ Gemini IICapital NYSE 20.57 16 3/4 - 18.57  @ Gemini IIIncome NYSE 9.64 12 5/8 + 30.96  @ General AmerInvest NYSE 21.82 17 7/8 - 18.08  @ Growth StockOutlook NYSE 10.35 9 3/4 - 5.80  @ LehmanCorp.  NYSE 16.72 14 - 16.27  @ Liberty All-StarEqty NYSE 9.82 7 7/8 - 19.81  @ Niagara ShareCorp.  NYSE 17.88 14 5/8 - 18.20  @ Nicholas-Applegate NYSE 11.23 9 1/4 - 17.63  @ Quest For ValueCap NYSE 17.32 12 5/8 - 27.11  @ Quest For ValueInco NYSE 11.73 12 1/2 + 6.56  @ Royce ValueTrust NYSE 11.14 9 5/8 - 13.60  @ Schafer ValueTrust NYSE 12.10 10 5/8 - 12.19  @ SourceCapital NYSE 43.52 41 1/8 - 5.50  @ Tri-ContinentalCorp.  NYSE 29.34 24 1/4 - 17.35  @ WorldwideValue NYSE 21.37 17 1/8 - 19.86  @ ZweigFund NYSE 11.48 11 7/8 + 3.44  @ Closed End Bond Funds  @ CIM High Yield Secs AMEX 8.95 8 1/2 - 5.03  @ Franklin Prin Mat Tr NYSE b9.29 10 1/8 + 8.99  @ Franklin UniversalTr NYSE b9.61 9 5/8 + 0.16  @ Municipal High Inco NYSE 9.63 10 1/8 + 5.14  @ Zenith Income Fund NYSE 8.50 9 1/2 + 11.76  @ Flexible Portfolio Funds  @ America's All Seasn OTC z z z  @ America's All S Inco OTC z z z  @ Zweig Total Return Fd NYSE 9.74 9 3/4 + 0.10  @ Specialized Equity and Convertible Funds  @ American CapitalConv NYSE 24.12 21 5/8 - 10.34  @ ASA Ltd NYSE bc62.51 43 7/8 - 29.81  @ Asia Pacific NYSE 13.06 11 - 15.77  @ Bancroft Convertible AMEX 21.72 18 3/4 - 13.67  @ Bergstrom Capital AMEX 62.41 57 1/4 - 8.27  @ BGR Precious Metals TOR be11.76 10 1/4 - 12.84  @ Brazil NYSE 18.71 10 3/4 - 42.54  @ CNV Holdings Capital NYSE 10.30 5 - 51.46  @ CNV Holdings Income NYSE 9.45 11 7/8 + 25.66  @ Castle Convertible AMEX 22.37 19 1/4 - 13.95  @ Central Fund Canada AMEX b5.07 a - 2.61  @ Central Securities AMEX 12.77 10 1/8 - 20.71  @ Couns Tandem Secs NYSE 12.42 10 3/8 - 16.47  @ Cypress Fund AMEX 10.79 10 - 7.32  @ Duff&Phelps Sel Utils NYSE 8.57 8 7/8 + 3.56  @ Ellsw Conv Gr&Inc AMEX 9.03 7 3/4 - 14.17  @ Engex AMEX 13.65 9 5/8 - 29.49  @ Financ'l News Compos NYSE 20.69 19 3/4 - 4.54  @ 1stAustralia AMEX 10.57 8 1/4 - 21.95  @ First Financial Fund NYSE 10.95 10 - 8.68  @ First Iberian AMEX 10.17 8 3/4 - 13.96  @ France Fund NYSE b12.94 11 3/4 - 9.20  @ Gabelli Equity Trust NYSE 14.32 13 3/4 - 3.98  @ Germany Fund NYSE 9.77 9 - 7.88  @ H&Q Healthcare Inv NYSE 9.69 7 3/4 - 20.02  @ Hampton Utils Tr Cap AMEX b11.87 9 7/8 - 16.81  @ Hampton Utils Tr Pref AMEX b48.84 47 1/2 - 2.74  @ Helvetia Fund NYSE 12.88 11 - 14.60  @ India Growth Fund NYSE f13.49 13 1/4 - 1.78  @ Italy Fund NYSE b11.73 10 - 14.75  @ Korea Fund NYSE 16.28 33 5/8 +106.54  @ Malaysia Fund NYSE 11.56 11 - 4.84  @ Meeschaert G & C MWSE 8.35 8 1/8 - 2.69  @ Mexico Fund NYSE b11.26 7 1/4 - 35.61  @ Morgan Grenf SmCap NYSE 10.41 9 1/8 - 12.34  @ Patriot Prem Div Fd NYSE 9.97 10 1/2 + 5.32  @ Petrol & Resources NYSE g29.78 25 1/8 - 15.63  @ Pilgrim Regional NYSE 11.02 9 1/2 - 13.79  @ Rl Estate Sec Inco Fd AMEX 8.82 8 3/4 - 0.79  @ Regional Fin Shrs Inv NYSE 9.57 8 1/2 - 11.18  @ ROC Taiwan Fund NYSE 14.72 16 1/4 + 10.39  @ Scudder New Asia NYSE 14.24 11 - 22.75  @ Spain Fund NYSE 13.73 15 + 9.25  @ Taiwan Fund NYSE b40.36 38 - 5.85  @ TCW Convertible Secs NYSE b8.86 8 - 9.71  @ Templeton Em Mkts AMEX b11.97 10 5/8 - 11.24  @ Templeton Value Fund NYSE b10.57 9 3/8 - 11.31  @ Thai Fund NYSE 15.13 17 3/8 + 14.84  @ United Kingdom Fund NYSE h12.15 10 3/8 - 14.61  @ Z-Seven OTC z z z  @ a-Stock price 4 15/16. b-As of Thursday's close. c-Translated at Commercial Rand exchange rate. e-In Canadian dollars. f-As of Wednesday's close. g-7/28/89 NAV: 29.34. h-7/28/89 NAV: 12.36. z-Not available.  Oxdon Investments Inc. asked Quebec Superior Court for an injunction blocking rival bidder Socanav Inc.'s 1.33 Canadian dollar (US$1.13 billion) offer for Steinberg Inc., alleging Socanav is acting as front for a Quebec government agency that can't legally make an offer on its own.  An Oxdon lawyer said the request for a temporary injunction will be heard this morning.  If the court grants a permanent injunction, it will clear the way for Oxdon's own C$1.31 billion bid for Steinberg, a real estate and food retailing concern based here.  Separately, Steinberg's board cast doubt on a key element of Socanav's bid.  In a directors' circular, the board said its lawyers advised directors that if Socanav fails to acquire 90% of Steinberg and attempts a "going-private" transaction, it wouldn't be able to vote a 52% stake that it is acquiring under an option agreement, because the agreement was signed before Socanav launched its tender offer.  In that case, holders of 24% of Steinberg's voting stock could block Socanav from buying Steinberg and shifting the debt incurred in the acquisition onto Steinberg's books, because a majority of minority holders must approve a "going-private" transaction under Canadian law.  Oxdon, a Toronto group including Unicorp Canada Corp., alleges that Socanav's bid for Steinberg is illegal because Socanav isn't the "true offeror."  Oxdon alleges that the true offeror is Socanav's financial backer, Caisse de Depot et Placement, the Quebec government's pensionfund agency.  Socanav, a small shipping concern here, declined to comment.  Caisse de Depot said it is confident the bid is legal.  Socanav made its takeover bid through a company that is 85%-owned by Socanav and 15%-owned by Caisse de Depot.  According to its offering circular, Socanav is putting up less than C$50 million in financing for the bid, with about C$1 billion supplied by Caisse de Depot and another Quebec government agency.  Socanav is also seeking C$330 million in financing from private lenders, but Caisse de Depot has agreed to supply that additional amount if Socanav can't find it elsewhere.  In its petition to Quebec Superior Court, Oxdon alleges Caisse de Depot is supplying "at least 93.9%" of the financing for Socanav's bid, and on terms that "can't be described as commercial."  Caisse de Depot is therefore the real offeror, Oxdon alleges.  However, Caisse can't make an offer name because it can't own more than 30% of a company except a real estate firm.  Jefferson Smurfit Group, an Irish paper products company, and Morgan Stanley Group Inc. said they are considering a recapitalization and consolidation of their U.S. paper and packaging interests.  Under the plan, the two parties would form a new company to purchase for $38 a share, or more than $320 million, the 22% of the stock of the U.S. subsidiary, Jefferson Smurfit Corp., St. Louis, Mo., not already owned by the Irish parent company.  A committee of Jefferson Smurfit Group's independent directors is studying the proposal.  Jefferson Smurfit Corp.'s stock gained $6.875 to close at $37.875 in national over-the-counter trading Friday.  The new company, SIBV-MS Holdings Inc., owned by Jefferson Smurfit Group and the limited partnership Morgan Stanley Leveraged Equity Fund II, would combine Jefferson Smurfit Corp. with Container Corp., a paper products company that was purchased from Mobil Corp. by Jefferson Smurfit Group and a Morgan Stanley-led investment group in 1986 for $700 million, plus the assumption of $520 million in Container Corp. debt.  The recapitalization would yield $140 million in pretax profit for Morgan Stanley, and $360 million for the other investors who joined with it to buy Container three years ago, a Morgan Stanley spokesman said.  Jefferson Smurfit Group said that under the proposed plan it would receive more than $1 billion for the sale of its U.S. interests to the new company.  The Department of Housing and Urban Development under former Secretary Samuel Pierce provided $4.5 million for a project -- converting an aircraft carrier into a museum -- that was championed by his old New York law firm and former clients of Mr. Pierce.  Mr. Pierce's HUD correspondence, released last week by current HUD officials, indicates that the Reagan administration Cabinet member backed the project but doesn't show whether he personally directed its funding.  Nonetheless, according to HUD officials and agency documents, the project was approved only a few months after a former client, Larry Fisher, a prominent and wealthy New York real-estate developer, solicited Mr. Pierce's help.  The nonprofit project involved developing the USS Intrepid, first commissioned in World War II, into an air, sea and space museum on the Hudson River in Manhattan.  Its principal benefactor and promoter was Larry Fisher's brother, Zachary Fisher, who has spent millions of dollars of his own money to shore up the troubled museum.  Although Zachary Fisher didn't profit personally from the HUD funds, his case makes it plain that political connections were an important part of HUD's granting process, even where nonprofit activities were concerned.  In addition, the matter calls attention to how funds were used during the Pierce years at HUD.  The museum project was partially funded under the federal urban development action grant program, which was meant to assist low-income people but which has been criticized for aiding hotels, shopping malls and other projects that may provide only minimal benefits to the poor.  Under the so-called UDAG program, a grant of about $4.5 million went to the city of New York, which lent the funds to the nonprofit Intrepid Museum Foundation, the museum's owner and operator.  Zachary Fisher is chairman of the foundation's board of trustees and was the driving force behind the museum project.  Friends described his motivation as patriotism and said he was dedicated to the museum.  The foundation has had severe financial problems from its inception, and its finances were reorganized in 1988 under federal bankruptcy-law proceedings.  The foundation will have to pay back less than $1 million of the UDAG money because of the restructuring.  Mr. Pierce hasn't been available for comment for months on the widening HUD scandal.  The Fishers didn't respond to messages seeking comment.  Mr. Fisher and his brother, Larry, are major principals in Fisher Brothers Management Co. in New York.  Their combined fortunes in Manhattan office buildings and other assets have been estimated at more than $600 million.  They also have been big Republican contributors; the two brothers and two other Fisher family members contributed $80,000 to the Republican party last year, according to a Washington Post account.  Mr. Pierce represented Fisher Brothers Management while he was a member of the New York law firm of Battle, Fowler.  In papers filed with the Senate Banking, Housing and Urban Affairs Committee during his confirmation hearing in January 1981, Mr. Pierce wrote, "I have served as an attorney and adviser to Fisher Brothers."  He left the firm when he became HUD secretary.  Battle Fowler continues to represent Fisher Brothers.  But the law firm's managing partner, Eric Shaw, declined to comment about the two brothers' involvement in the Intrepid project or the involvement of the law firm itself.  HUD officials said the project was approved for funding in January 1982.  Just a few months earlier, Larry Fisher wrote Mr. Pierce asking him for help and a personal meeting, according to Mr. Pierce's files.  Mr. Pierce responded that he had talked with Martin Edelman, a Battle Fowler partner, about the Intrepid "and he is pursuing it with the mayor's office along the lines I discussed with you."  Mr. Pierce suggested he would meet with Larry Fisher in a few weeks.  It isn't known if the meeting occurred.  Ultimately, Mr. Edelman wrote Mr. Pierce praising his aides who worked on the Intrepid grant.  "The UDAG program has had marvelous results in my opinion," he said, "and I believe your staff has made it possible."  The Navy, which donated the 960-foot, 40,000-ton warship to the foundation, was equally enthusiastic.  In a letter to Zachary Fisher, a rear admiral wrote that the museum would serve as a strong recruiting tool for the Navy.  According to the museum foundation, the federal UDAG funds were used in refurbishing the pier where the Intrepid is permanently berthed.  A spokesman said, for instance, that the funds were used to help pay for construction of a structure allowing tourists to board the ship.  Mr. Pierce's files show that aides kept him abreast of the Intrepid foundation's financial problems.  In May 1984, Lance Wilson, then his executive assistant, urged Mr. Pierce to seek New York City's help to retire $15.2 million in tax-exempt revenue bonds sold to private investors.  The admission fees -- now $6 for adults and $3.25 for children -- weren't sufficient to retire the debt, and the museum foundation was forced into bankruptcy proceedings.  But the foundation's executive director, Wayne Schmidt, said the museum is now on sound financial footing, thanks to the bankruptcy-law reorganization and the help of Zachary Fisher.  He said Mr. Fisher had contributed more than $10 million over the years.  In addition to the Intrepid, which was used in the Vietnam conflict and decommissioned in the mid-1970s, the USS Growler also is berthed at the museum site, along with a third ship, the destroyer USS Edson.  The Growler was the first U.S. submarine to carry nuclear missiles.  Microsemi Corp. posted a net loss of $707,000 for its third quarter ended July 2 and said it expects a current-quarter charge of about $8 million related to the planned disposal of certain of its businesses.  A year earlier, net income was $548,000, or six cents a share.  Revenue rose 21% to $26.4 million from $21.8 million.  The latest results were hurt by an estimated $2 million pretax loss from five semiconductor service and electronic parts assembly businesses that Microsemi says it has targeted for sale or closing.  The disposals are part of a plan the company announced in June to focus on its core chip-manufacturing operations.  The results also include a $800,000 pretax loss related to Microsemi's 25% equity stake in Diodes Inc. Diodes, a Chatsworth, Calif., semiconductor concern, recently posted a $3 million fiscal fourth-quarter loss, which Microsemi must reflect on its own financial statements under equity accounting rules.  Microsemi also blamed its disappointing quarter in part on "some softness" in sales of its core business and in work delays at its Hong Kong operations related to the turmoil on the Chinese mainland.  But "the most significant disappointment" was the cancellation of a major contract by General Instrument Corp., Microsemi said.  The company had expected the contract to contribute third-quarter sales of $1.2 million and pretax profit of $400,000.  Microsemi said it charged General Instrument with breach of contract in a lawsuit filed last month in federal court in San Diego.  General Instrument officials couldn't be reached for comment.  In the first nine months, net fell 34% to $1.1 million, or 14 cents a share, from $1.6 million, or 18 cents a share, a year earlier.  Sales climbed 36% to $78.3 million from $57.5 million.  In national over-the-counter trading Friday, Microsemi was unchanged at $4 a share.  Tri-State Motor Transit Co. said it received a revised proposal from Trism Inc. to acquire all of its stock for a maximum of about $21.9 million.  In a letter to Tri-State's board, Trism proposed to buy the trucking concern by offering shareholders a choice of accepting either $21.25 in cash; $22.50 in the form of a Trism note bearing interest at 14 7/8% a year due Dec. 15, 1996; $21.87 a share payable 50% in cash and 50% in a note; or $21.56 a share payable 75% in cash and 25% in a note.  Tri-State said the proposal, however, places a maximum cash payment to shareholders equal to $21.9 million.  If shareholder elections exceeded this cash amount, Tri-State said the difference would be paid by a note regardless of the shareholder's choice.  The proposal calls for a five-week period to allow Trism to obtain financing.  Tri-State said its board has scheduled a meeting for Tuesday to consider the proposal.  In June, Trism had increased its bid to $21 a share, after Tri-State terminated an earlier agreement to be acquired by Trism for $20 a share due to the New York-based investment concern's inability to obtain financing.  Residential Resources Mortgage Investments Corp. said it filed a plan of reorganization with the U.S. Bankruptcy Court in Phoenix.  In a statement, the company said the plan provides, among other things, that shareholders will retain their common stock rights in the real estate investment trust.  It also calls for certain secured creditors -- which it didn't identify -- to receive warrants to acquire as much as 30% of its common.  Under the plan, certain unsecured creditors would also receive cash payments of about 75 cents on the dollar for their claims.  Residential Resources said it expects the court to spend at least 30 days reviewing the plan and its related disclosure statement.  If the court approves the plan, shareholders and unsecured creditors will vote on it.  Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis has made a takeover proposal for UAL Corp., the Chicago-based parent of United Airlines, according to people familiar with UAL.  The board of UAL is to consider the proposal at a meeting sometime this week.  Although the Davis proposal is said to be well over $200 a share, or $4.32 billion, the board hasn't disclosed it publicly.  The board's decision not to disclose the bid suggests that it falls well short of being a formal offer.  However, it could trigger a battle for control of the nation's second-largest airline.  A spokesman for Mr. Davis wouldn't comment on the reports.  In Chicago, a spokesman for UAL wouldn't comment either.  The overture from Mr. Davis comes at a difficult time for United, which just last month had its second fatal accident in six months when a DC-10 crash-landed in Sioux City, Iowa.  Mr. Davis's move is also certain to rekindle the debate over whether airlines should be subject to leveraged buy-outs and the financial risk they entail.  Although Mr. Davis is a former oil wildcatter with a reported net worth of $1.6 billion, he has a track record of making lowball bids for companies that are then topped by others.  Only last March, he made an opening $2.7 billion bid for NWA Inc., the parent of Northwest Airlines, but was later outbid for the company in a two-round auction won by another Los Angeles investor, Alfred Checchi.  As it happened, it was Mr. Checchi's successful $3.65 billion bid for NWA that put the spotlight on the values of UAL and other U.S. airline companies.  With 1988 revenue of $8.98 billion, United was recently surpassed as the largest U.S. airline by the American Airlines unit of AMR Corp.  UAL stock has soared from $117.50 a share a week before the Checchi-NWA pact was reached in mid-June to an intraday peak of $190 in late July.  Much of the speculation was fueled by reports that investors such as Robert Bass and Mr. Davis had purchased stakes in UAL, and analysts have published estimates of its value as high as $300 a share, or $6.5 billion.  However, UAL stock has been faltering in the past week as the speculation lost momentum and a firm bid failed to emerge.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, UAL tumbled $9.50 a share to $164.50 amid reports that Mr. Checchi has been telling associates that the Transportation Department won't allow any more leveraged takeovers of major U.S. airlines.  Mr. Checchi's bid included $3.3 billion of debt.  Mr. Davis's original 2.9% investment in NWA resulted from a study of the airline industry that suggested that a small group of airlines had emerged from deregulation whose results would be steadier, with less fare-cutting, than in the past decade.  With aircraft values soaring amid a scarcity of available planes, several analysts such as Paul Karos of First Boston Corp. have suggested that several airlines including UAL could be ripe for a round of leveraged buy-outs despite their pattern of cyclical profits that fluctuate with the economy.  The willingness of leveraged buy-out firms to consider buying airlines was underscored by the fact that Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co., the largest leveraged buyout firm, submitted a bid for NWA. People familiar with KKR say it would probably be interested in UAL as well.  Another losing NWA bidder that might covet United is Pan Am Corp., which has said it needs a merger partner to survive.  Like NWA, United has a history of stormy labor relations and lacks a controlling stockholder or any other strong defense against a takeover.  Unlike NWA, it has a well-regarded management team led by Chairman Stephen Wolf.  One of its largest holders is Reliance Group Holdings Inc., whose chairman, Saul Steinberg, is no stranger to takeover activity.  Two years ago, UAL was put into play by its pilots union and a slew of corporate raiders.  A campaign led by the New York investment firm of Coniston Partners forced the ouster of former Chairman Richard Ferris and the breakup of the travel conglomerate he had built with the sale of UAL's hotel and rental-car units.  The United pilots' union, which is working without a contract, has said it might revive its bid if UAL becomes a takeover target.  However, it doesn't appear that Mr. Wolf would welcome the prospect of working for the pilots.  ---  Judith Valente contributed to this article.  Harken Energy Corp. said it will sell its 8.5 million shares of Crystal Oil Co. to Quantum Overseas Funds for $16 million, or about $1.86 a share.  The transaction also gives Quantum the right to purchase an additional 1.8 million Crystal shares to be issued at a later date.  Quantum is a mutual fund managed by New York investor George Soros, who last month sold his 6.9 million shares in Harken back to the company for $29 million.  Harken, an oil and gas concern, said its sale of Crystal stock to Quantum wasn't connected to that transaction.  Harken said its holdings in Crystal represented about 37% of the shares outstanding in the Shreveport, La.-based company.  Quantum already owns 6.6 million shares of Crystal, or about 28.7% of the company's shares outstanding.  Harken said it expects the sale, which is subject to federal regulatory approval, to be completed by mid-September.  In national over-the-counter trading Friday, Harken closed at $4.875, up 6.25 cents.  Avacus Partners Limited Partnership filed suit, charging that directors of Infotechnology Inc., 45%-holder of Financial News Network, overpaid for certain assets to fend off the Washington partnership's takeover interest in Infotech.  Specifically, the complaint, filed in Delaware Chancery Court, charges the board breached its fiduciary duty to shareholders.  And it describes the asset-purchase transactions as "self-dealing," or designed to benefit the directors themselves rather than shareholders.  Infotech called the lawsuit without merit.  The suit charges that Infotech paid 1.5 million of its shares, valued at about $16.2 million, for the assets of WNW Group Inc., which Infotech's directors or their associates allegedly formed and controlled.  The suit says that only a year before, WNW paid only $110,000 for its main asset, control of the news service United Press International.  Avacus charges that this and other transactions put about two million Infotech shares "into friendly hands at a grossly and fraudulently inadequate consideration."  Avacus claims that the transactions diluted its holding in Infotech to 7.8% from 9.9%.  The partnership has said in a Securities and Exchange Commission filing that one course of action it has been considering is seeking control of Infotech.  Avacus's general partner is A.C.A. Inc.; Hans Nyks is president of A.C.A.  In national over-the-counter trading Friday, Infotech shares closed unchanged at $6.625.  Equitable Life Assurance Society of the U.S. said Frederic W. Jacoby, a senior vice president in charge of the insurance products group, resigned last week.  The insurer said that it was a personnel matter.  Equitable declined to comment further.  People close to the company said Mr. Jacoby had repeatedly clashed with his boss, Jeff R. Hart, an executive vice president in charge of products, pension management and joint ventures.  Messrs.  Jacoby and Hart couldn't be reached for comment.  Mr. Jacoby, 45 years old, had been named to this post last April when the company consolidated responsibility for the development and management of Equitable's life, health, annuity and pension products in this position.  The move was part of a major home-office reorganization, the second in the past two years.  Last spring, the company also created a marketing division to handle marketing, merchandising and training.  Equitable hasn't named anyone to fill Mr. Jacoby's post.  He will remain with the company through the end of the year.  The Senate gave final congressional approval to legislation that would raise the federal government's debt limit to $2.87 trillion through Oct. 31.  On a voice vote, lawmakers passed the bill and sent it to President Bush, who is expected to sign it to avoid a default later this month.  Under the measure, the debt ceiling would revert to the current level of $2.80 trillion Nov. 1.  By that date, lawmakers expect to have approved legislation raising the debt ceiling to $3.123 trillion, estimated to be enough to last through the end of fiscal 1990 on Sept. 30, 1990.  Some congressional budget writers say the longer-term extension measure could be a vehicle for a possible budget agreement between lawmakers and President Bush for fiscal 1991, which begins Oct. 1, 1990.  The bill also would provide that Treasury-issued zero-coupon bonds, which pay interest at maturity rather than periodically, be counted under the debt limit at their current accrual value rather than face value.  That accounting change, sought by the Treasury, would reduce the amount of federal borrowing subject to the debt limit by about $15 billion, according to congressional estimates.  Last year, the Treasury issued zero-coupon bonds to help refinance Mexico's debt and may issue more in connection with other international debt problems and to deal with the savings-and-loan problem.  Sir James Goldsmith may be running into roadblocks as he tries to take over Britain's B.A.T Industries PLC.  But had he tried his hostile leveraged buy-out elsewhere in Europe, he probably never would have gotten started.  "It will be a long time before the transaction methods practiced in the Anglo-Saxon systems will be used on the continent," says Martin Waldenstrom, president of Booz-Allen Acquisition Services, a unit of Booz-Allen & Hamilton Inc.  "There are different systems of raising liquidity, market funding and corporate controls."  Indeed, despite predictions that takeover fever would sweep the continent in the wake of Sir James's bid for B.A.T, there are plenty of reasons why it won't, at least not for a while.  For one thing, hostile takeovers, let alone ones involving huge debt that can be repaid only by selling assets, are still largely anathema.  And the few European raiders -- like Italy's Carlo De Benedetti, who launched a hostile assault last year on Societe Generale de Belgique -- have usually had their wings clipped.  Governments' inclination to intervene and limits on shareholders' rights in several countries ensure that.  Nonetheless, Sir James's move on B.A.T is likely to have an impact on business on the continent.  Some businessmen say his bid could accelerate corporate restructurings as managements try to do themselves what a raider might attempt.  And there will be merger activity -- some of it unfriendly -- as European companies prepare for the European Community's planned barrier-free internal market after 1992.  Already, mergers and acquisitions activity on the continent has picked up over the past two years, and such techniques as leveraged buy-outs have begun appearing.  But much of this restructuring is likely to take the form of alliances, joint ventures or friendly takeovers rather than aggressive, debt-financed raids, businessmen say.  "There's much more sympathy for transactions that aim to develop companies than for financial operations where you take over a company, sell nine-tenths or all of it and keep the profit," says Patrick Ponsolle, managing director of France's Cie.  Financiere de Suez, which acted as a white knight to defeat Mr. De Benedetti in the epic Generale de Belgique battle.  With Anglo-Saxon ideas slowly gaining ground, however, there will be the occasional big raid or buy-out.  "Within two, four or six years, Goldsmith-style raids will come to continental Europe," says Alain Minc, vice chairman of Cerus S.A., Mr. De Benedetti's French holding company.  "People have built up a sociological system of defense, but this can't resist the wind of the market."  Even before then, some supposedly friendly takeovers will be less friendly than they seem, like Bernard Arnault's move last year on luxury-goods conglomerate LVMH Moet Hennessy Louis Vuitton.  "Everybody will appear reluctant to appear as a raider and will try to make it look user-friendly," says Yves-Andre Istel, vice chairman of Wasserstein, Perella & Co., the mergers and acquisitions concern.  He and others predict that after Britain, the next likely setting for such activity will be the more open countries, such as France.  Prime targets could be diversified groups that can be broken up, such as Cie. de Navigation Mixte, whose capital structure is fragile, or Financiere de Suez.  Mammoth companies elsewhere, such as West Germany's Siemens AG or Switzerland's Nestle S.A., may be tempting targets but are well-protected.  But in the meantime, the emphasis in corporate restructurings will be on building a bigger share of Europe's post-1992 unified market.  "Many businesses are looking for European size and are busier trying to work out alliances than attacking each other," says Michel Francois-Poncet, chairman of Cie.  Financiere de Paribas, the French banking group, which is nevertheless supporting Sir James in his B.A.T bid.  "Energies are more focused on that than playing a pure financial game.  We're more in the U.S. of 1975 than the U.S. of the 1980s."  At the same time, executives say, by raising the takeover stakes Sir James is forcing European businessmen to think hard about refocusing their businesses and improving returns to shareholders.  Since markets here generally put a higher value on better-focused companies, executives in diversified groups might face shareholder pressure to sell off parts.  "If the B.A.T bid succeeds, it would set a new tone, and even if it doesn't it will set new thoughts in motion," says Mr. Istel of Wasserstein Perella, which was on the losing side in the recent $3.5 billion unfriendly leveraged buy-out of the British supermarket chain Gateway Corp.  "The notion of shareholder value will have to be taken into account."  Adds Percy Barnevik, chief executive of ABB ASEA Brown Boveri, the giant Zurich-based industrial equipment maker: "In Europe, a lot of resigned shareholders get lousy dividends.  Managements sit on cash hoards.  Companies say they've gotten a 1% or 2% return on assets for 30 years, so why can't they go on doing this?  The pressure against this is healthy, so healthy that we might have to put up with some unpleasant aspects of the process, like these raiders."  "Restrictions (on takeovers) don't last forever," says Albrecht Matuschka, a Munich management consultant and investor.  "The higher the barriers to the takeovers get, the greater the difference between the quoted price and the potential value of these protected companies gets, so the greater incentive for somebody with money to go after them.  There will continue to be pressure on managements, a warning finger pointed at them saying they should use all their management tools to restructure from within."  Already, there are signs that some of these protective barriers are cracking, if not crumbling.  In Switzerland, the practice of limiting foreign shareholdings is fading.  Increasingly, foreigners are treated on an equal basis with Swiss shareholders, although many companies, such as Nestle, still retain the right to limit any single shareholder to 3%.  And in West Germany, regarded by many as the most impenetrable corporate network in Western Europe, banks are under pressure to reduce their dominant stakes in companies -- even though they retain other ways of keeping undesirable bidders out, such as restricting available financing.  Still, many think that West Germany can't resist forever.  Some bankers and businessmen think Germany could be ripe for hostile takeovers and even LBOs because its cozy protection system has spared many companies the restructuring other European concerns have had to undertake.  "There will be pressure from the outside to change the system of protecting companies," predicts ABB's Mr. Barnevik.  "In the U.S., companies have to defend themselves.  In Europe, they run to their governments.  This will gradually change here, and we'll see more unfriendly takeovers not just in the U.K."  Will the Nestles and Siemenses stay shielded?  "There is nothing fundamental standing in the way of a raid against companies like that one day," Mr. Waldenstrom says.  "But the continental system makes it slower and harder because it is more institutionalized.  Investing institutions are more industrial partners, which gives them longer perspectives on creating shareholder value."  ---  @ Most Favored Nation  Value of foreign acquisitions in major European countries in first half of 1989  @ VALUE  @ (in billions PERCENT  @ of dollars) OF TOTAL  @ Britain ............. $6.65 39%  @ France .............. 2.57 15  @ Italy ............... 2.28 13  @ West Germany ........ 1.98 12  @ Spain ............... 1.20 7  @ The Netherlands ..... 0.57 3  @ All Western Europe .. 17.23 100  AIR PRODUCTS & CHEMICALS Inc., Allentown, Pa., said it began a public offering of $100 million of 12-year notes.  The notes, underwritten by Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. and Goldman Sachs & Co., are priced at 99.596 to yield 8.93% to maturity in 2001.  The industrial-gas and chemicals concern said it plans to use the proceeds from the offering for general corporate purposes.  London shares rose sharply Friday to a 1989 closing high as stock shortages accentuated the impact of fresh speculative buying.  Tokyo stocks closed easier in thin dealings as investors turned lethargic ahead of the "Obon" summer holidays and a forthcoming U.S. economic indicator, brokers said.  In London, strong investor interest in composite insurance and pharmaceutical stocks, combined with news of a higher offer by Boots for Ward White Group, underscored the market's rise.  Dealers said market makers interpreted the renewal of speculative interest as an excuse to mark prices higher, thus giving a technical twist to the market's rise.  "There's no real selling pressure at all because people are afraid of being left out when the market makes its next move forward," a dealer said.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index closed up 21.2 points at 2327.5, just a shade below the day's high of 2329.1.  At its lowest, the index opened at 2315.9, a rise of 9.6 points.  The narrower Financial Times 30-share index ended up 16.8 points at 1940.8.  Volume rose to a robust 731.4 million shares Friday, from 550.1 million Thursday.  Dealers said the market's strength was also demonstrated by its ability to withstand a retreat on Wall Street during the London afternoon.  At the London close, the Dow Jones Industrial Average was down 10.62 points at 2650.99.  The market received an early upward impetus from news that scientists at the U.S. National Institutes of Health have found that Wellcome's antiviral drug AZT can forestall the development of AIDS or severe AIDS-related complex in patients with early infection.  Wellcome ended 67 pence ($1.10) firmer at 514 pence ($8.42).  Other pharmaceutical stocks rallied in sympathy.  Fisons climbed 8 pence to 349, SmithKline Beecham jumped 8 pence to 582, and Glaxo rose 20 pence to #15.10.  Dealers said Glaxo's rise was also fueled by rumors that it is considering merging its research and development facilities with ICI's.  Composite insurance stocks rallied sharply on news that Australia's Adelaide Steamship Co., a group of companies headed by Australian financier John Spalvins, had sold its 13.01% stake in Commercial Union Assurance to Sun Alliance Group for #256 million.  Pharmaceuticals retailer Boots raised its hostile takeover offer for the stores company Ward White Group to 445 pence a share, or around #900 million.  Ward White swiftly rejected the offer and hinted that a rival higher offer may be forthcoming.  Ward White shares ended 12 pence higher at 451, while Boots closed up 2 pence at 301.  Meanwhile, in Tokyo, most investors stayed on the sidelines ahead of the release after the close of U.S. jobless figures for July and the start of the holidays.  The summer holiday season began over the weekend in Japan.  It draws many investors and brokerage employees away from the markets from mid- to late August, but major financial markets will remain open through the month.  The Nikkei average of 225 issues dropped 37.82 points to 34741.99.  The index fell 119.53 points Thursday.  Volume on the first section was estimated at 350 million shares, down from 500 million shares Thursday.  Declining issues outnumbered advancers 430 to 416, while 240 issues were unchanged.  In early trading Monday in Tokyo, the Nikkei index fell 41.44 points to 34700.55.  Higher-priced stocks served as the main springboards for buying last week.  But they didn't have the strength to pull the rest of the market higher by Friday afternoon's close, brokers said.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index of all issues listed in the first section, which fell 16.55 points Thursday, was down 3.42 points at 2613.27.  Currency shifts also damped investor buying interest, brokers said.  The dollar, which fell to 135 yen in Tokyo earlier in the week, surged to 138 yen Friday after a report in the Japanese press that the U.S. was poised to retaliate in Lebanon in the face of the hostage crisis.  In Tokyo Monday, the dollar opened for trading at 139.55 yen, up sharply from its Tokyo close Friday of 138.05 yen.  Also, reports that Chinese leader Deng Xiaoping is in critical condition from cancer gave a boost to the U.S. currency.  In addition, the stock market was bruised by a fall in the bond market.  Market activity in the afternoon reflected morning trading.  Higher-priced stocks remained the focus of buying interest by individual investors, who were leading participants in thin dealings.  Much of Friday's buying centered on advanced technology issues, partly because of their strong earnings outlook, brokers said.  Kyocera was up 130 yen (95 cents) to 6,450 ($47.05), Sony rose 50 yen to 7,980 and Fanuc gained 40 yen to 6,690.  Several issues rose on rumors of speculative buying.  Among them were Konica, Dai-ichi Hotel and Nippon Shinpan.  Friday's losers included Tokyo Electric Power, which was down 100 yen to 6,210 on profit-taking along with many construction, steel and financial issues.  In Hong Kong Friday, a Japanese news service report on Chinese leader Deng sent share prices into a tailspin, wiping out gains from Thursday's broad rally.  But bargain-hunters swept in after the sell-off and carried prices solidly above the day's lows.  Shares in Sydney firmed as steady buying support from local institutions carried the market to its second consecutive post-crash high.  In other Asian and Pacific trading Friday, share prices closed lower in Taipei, Singapore and Seoul, mixed in Manila and higher in Wellington.  In Frankfurt, share prices resumed their summer rally Friday after a one-day breather and closed sharply higher in active trading.  Stocks in Amsterdam closed at a high after the firm dollar delivered a boost to most sectors in the final hour.  Elsewhere, share prices closed higher in Brussels and Milan, lower in Paris and Stockholm and mixed in Zurich.  South African gold stocks closed mixed.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Aug 3 Aug 2 Year  @U.S. ........................... 317.4 317.0 + 24.0  @Britain ........................ 697.5 697.9 + 27.7  @Canada ......................... 433.2 432.5 + 18.0  @Japan .......................... 1549.1 1560.2 + 9.1  @France ......................... 526.9 527.4 + 19.0  @Germany ........................ 247.5 250.0 + 19.0  @Hong Kong ...................... 1970.7 1939.6 - 2.9  @Switzerland .................... 228.4 225.9 + 32.1  @Australia ...................... 335.1 332.4 + 15.4  @World index .................... 545.4 551.2 + 10.3  Fremont General Corp. posted a second-quarter loss of $6.8 million, including a $13.7 million loan-loss provision, and raised its quarterly dividend to 20 cents a share from 15 cents.  Fremont General, a Santa Monica, Calif., life insurance and financial-services company, said the loss provision relates to potential losses on certain commercial loans.  The loss compares with restated net income of $6.9 million, or 67 cents a share, a year earlier.  The dividend is payable Oct. 31 to stock of record Sept. 29.  James A. McIntyre, chief executive officer, said the company raised the dividend despite the loss provision because "we have confidence in the future of our earnings."  He added that the problem loans were made under the direction of commercial finance managers who have since been replaced.  In over-the-counter trading Friday, Fremont General closed at $16.125, down 75 cents.  Salant Corp. said it is discussing the transfer of its Perry Ellis Collection for Women business to Perry Ellis International Inc., the owner of the Perry Ellis trademark.  Salant, a New York apparel company, also announced the closure of its Perry Ellis Portfolio for Women division.  Salant is continuing preparations for the spring collection of the Perry Ellis Collection for Women, pending the decision to dispose of the business.  Salant's second-quarter earnings will have a one-time charge of $6.5 million as a result of these actions.  American Savings Bank, White Plains, N.Y., said it applied to New York State to convert to a state chartered from a federally chartered savings bank.  Conversion would give American the option to withdraw from the Federal Home Loan Bank system and avoid possible costs related to the savings and loan bailout legislation.  American, which has $4.6 billion in assets, would continue to be insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp.  John T. Morgan, chairman, said he was concerned about the impact of the legislation on the capital of the Home Loan Bank system and its continued ability to pay dividends on its stock.  American Savings owns about $25 million of Home Loan Bank stock that generates about $2.5 million a year in dividends.  "We think the state system is a more stable one, at least at this time," he said, "and now we will be regulated by the state and the FDIC."  American's board approved the conversion plan last month and it will be proposed to holders at a meeting this year.  The Soviet government said its national debt is 312 billion rubles, or about $500 billion at the official exchange rate.  The disclosure was made in a gloom-filled speech by State Planning Committee Chairman Yuri Maslyukov to the Supreme Soviet, or legislature.  Mr. Maslyukov said the projected 1989 budget deficit has grown 20% in six months to 120 billion rubles ($192 billion) -- or 13.8% of gross national product, compared with 3%-4% in the U.S.  He added that Soviet stores are likely to become even more barren because wages are rising twice as fast as the output of consumer goods.  "No foreign uncle is going to solve this problem for us," he warned.  Mr. Maslyukov proposed issuing government bonds to cover the budget deficit and sop up some of the extra cash that currently is chasing an inadequate supply of consumer goods.  The planning chief, a candidate member of the ruling Communist Party Politburo, said almost all growth in the Soviet economy in 1990 will be dedicated to increasing the supply of consumer goods.  "We must stop the worsening of the economic situation and social tension," he said.  Hundreds of thousands of Soviet miners went on strike in July, largely over shortages of housing and simple goods like soap and meat.  The Soviet national debt, though large, is dwarfed by that of the U.S.  On Friday, the U.S. Senate voted to raise the government's debt ceiling to $2.87 trillion.  NEWSPAPERS: The Daily Mail, joining the exodus of papers from the Fleet Street area, moved to new quarters in Kensington, west London over the weekend.  Niagara Mohawk Power Corp. filed with New York state's Public Service Commission for an increase in electricity and gas rates of $369.6 million, or 13%, to take effect next July.  The Syracuse, N.Y., company has requested an increase of $342.4 million, or 15%, for electric service, and $27.2 million, or 5%, for gas service.  For the typical residential customer using 500 kilowatt-hours a month of electricity, a 30-day bill would increase $6.93, or 16.2%.  The residential customer using 400 therms of natural gas monthly would see a 6.7% annual increase, or $21.76 a year exclusive of changes in Niagara Mohawk's cost of natural gas.  Niagara Mohawk's current rates were frozen at 1987 levels for electric service and 1985 levels for gas service as part of a two-year settlement with various state agencies.  That agreement remains in effect until June 30, 1990.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. recently placed the utility's securities under review for possible downgrade.  Presidio Oil Co. said it acquired the stock of UKP Energy Holdings Inc. from Friends Provident Life Office of London for stock and convertible debt.  Presidio, an Englewood, Colo., oil and gas concern, said it paid Friends Provident 832,143 shares of its Class A common stock and $4.2 million in non-interest bearing debt convertible into 579,000 shares of its Class A common.  Friends Provident already is a major Presidio preferred stockholder.  Presidio said UKP's assets include $2.5 million in cash, 650,000 barrels of proven oil reserves and three billion cubic feet of proven natural gas reserves, as well as other acreage.  Most of the properties are located in Wyoming, western Texas, Oklahoma and Louisiana.  The state said it reached a $2.7 million settlement with royalty owners in a lawsuit over the state's right to revenue from a sliver of the oil-rich Yates Field.  In a lawsuit brought in March 1988, the state challenged a leasing arrangement devised in 1934 by a Midland, Texas, oil man on a 24-acre tract in the Yates field.  When the state sold the land years ago, it retained the mineral rights and became entitled to half the royalties from mineral production on the land.  In its suit, Texas argued that the oil man's leasing arrangement cheated it out of its fair share of royalties, which go to the state's Permanent School Fund.  Under the settlement, the state received $2.7 million immediately and estimates it will receive as much as $35 million more during the 50-year future life of the Yates Field.  Rubicon Corp. said it expects to report a loss for the fiscal year ended June 30.  The Richardson, Texas, marketer and developer of laboratory computer systems also said William G. Groves had resigned as chairman and chief executive officer and will be succeeded by Gary Freedman, who had been Rubicon's chief operating officer.  A company spokesman wouldn't say why Mr. Groves resigned, only that he had decided to "pursue other interests."  The loss, which the company declined to estimate, is the second consecutive annual loss for Rubicon, which reported a deficit of $2.4 million on revenue of $2.9 million during fiscal 1988.  The company blamed the current losses on slower-than-expected system installations, delays in contract signings and a revaluation of the company's capitalized software.  Despite the festive air surrounding the preview here of Toyota Motor Corp.'s new Lexus luxury cars, the wine glasses placed atop an LS 400 sedan weren't for anyone's enjoyment.  Instead the glasses were props to prove that the $35,000 Lexus car purrs on the highway.  Lexus officials filled the glasses with water, elevated the rear wheels so the car wouldn't zoom away and gunned the 32-valve, V-8 engine to 157 miles per hour.  The water in the glasses didn't even ripple.  "I'm pretty numb to new cars," said John C. Salagaj, a vice president of Diversified Services Inc. of Ft.  Lauderdale, Fla., a big Budget Rent a Car Corp. licensee.  "But these grabbed my attention."  That, of course, was the whole idea behind last week's unveiling, where the trappings went beyond the hyperbole that's typical at such events.  On Monday, Lexus officials played host for a lunch at the Pebble Beach resort and brought in former first lady Nancy Reagan to speak.  They also brought in competitors' cars -- Honda Motor Co.'s Acura Legend, the Mercedes-Benz 420 SEL and the BMW 735i -- to give attending fleet managers, auto writers and dealers a chance to compare firsthand.  Standing out in the luxury car market, which has been flat or shrinking in recent years, will be especially tough in the 1990 model year.  The new entries include a more responsive version of Ford Motor Co.'s boat-like Lincoln Town Car, Volkswagen AG's four-wheel-drive Audi V-8 Quattro and Mercedes-Benz's sleekly restyled SL convertible.  Not to mention the soon-to-debut Infiniti entries from Toyota's archrival, Nissan Motor Co.  In this flooded market, Lexus has an important strength: a big price edge on its German competitors.  But with the luxury market soft and consumer confidence about making car purchases waning, that may not be enough to establish a strong presence.  The line also faces the challenge of forging an identity -- one distinct not only from Lexus's rivals but also from Toyota itself.  The Lexus and Infiniti cars are priced about the same, but the two companies are taking radically different marketing approaches.  Infiniti is trying to define "Japanese luxury," with Zen-like advertising featuring rocks and pussy-willow buds, and rice-paper screens in its showrooms.  Toyota's approach is far less esoteric: Lexus is supposed to be a reasonably priced and better-performing version of Mercedes and BMW models that cost as much as $80,000.  "These cars are coming at a time when buyers are already ridiculing the price-value of German cars," says John Morzenti, a Porsche-Audi dealer near Philadelphia.  "We're going to see a bloodbath over the next couple of years.  The Japanese have never been beaten in any market they've attempted to attack."  The German makers argue that Lexus lacks character.  The wine-glass demonstration, they say, only shows that Lexus makes driving an antiseptic experience compared with German luxury cars, which are engineered to give drivers a feel for the road.  What's worse, "they have no tradition," sniffs Gunter Kramer, head of BMW's U.S. sales and marketing arm.  "At this end of the market, a tradition of prestige is what brings in buyers."  J. Davis Illingworth, head man at Lexus, retorts: "If I were Mercedes or BMW, I'd say the same thing about our lack of tradition.  But we have the 50-year heritage of Toyota's production of quality cars, and {Lexus is} the best car the company has ever produced."  Toyota worked on the two Lexus models -- the LS 400 and the smaller ES 250, priced at $21,050 -- for six years.  It put them through 2.5 million miles of test driving.  The cars are equipped with such antiaging features as stainless-steel exhaust pipes, to prevent corrosion.  All of the leather in each car comes from the hide of the same individual cow, Toyota says, to prevent uneven fading.  The full general warranty lasts for four years or 50,000 miles, except for the engine and transmission warranty, good for 72,000 miles.  The ES 250 model looks much like the Acura Legend and, like the Legend, has front-wheel drive.  But the LS 400 has rear-wheel drive, like the European cars against which it will compete, to better handle the output of the 250-horsepower engine.  Still, the LS 400 gets 23 miles a gallon, avoiding the federal "gas-guzzler" tax paid on some European luxury cars.  The engines on both Lexus models are mounted on liquid-filled braces, to reduce vibration and noise.  In strategic places, the cars feature "sandwich steel" -- a layer of plastic placed between two layers of metal.  Lexus officials extol the importance of this by rapping the stuff with a screwdriver, producing a thud instead of a metallic ping.  "I don't think you've driven a quieter car in your life," says Richard Chitty, manager of parts and service.  Optional equipment includes traction control, which, Toyota says, grips the road to prevent the car from spinning out when accelerating on wet pavement, and a cellular telephone that automatically mutes the sound of the stereo radio when phone calls are made.  But Lexus's biggest attribute may be timing.  It is hitting the market at a time when European auto makers are reeling from prices that began shooting up when the dollar dropped three years ago.  BMW has held its own, but Mercedes sales plunged 18% through July from a year earlier, after falling 7.4% in 1988.  And Porsche AG's sales are running 44% below last year, when they declined 33% from 1987.  "Brand loyalty in the luxury car market is very shaky," says Lexus's Mr. Illingworth.  "People have paid tremendous amounts of money on European cars, and they're questioning why."  But it's too early to judge whether Lexus will duplicate the market success of Honda's Acura division.  Creating a new image from scratch won't be easy.  Toyota cars, while technically sound, lack the panache of Honda models.  And by borrowing exterior and dashboard-styling cues from Mercedes-Benz, say some experts, Lexus risks getting a "copycat" label instead of a distinct identity.  Also, while Lexus's prices compare favorably with those of European cars, they don't look particularly attractive alongside the prices of Ford's Lincoln line and General Motors Corp.'s Cadillac division.  Both domestic luxury nameplates have scored some big successes recently: Lincoln with the Continental, and Cadillac with the restyled and lengthened Fleetwood and DeVille.  Lexus's target buyer for the LS 400 is 43 years old and has a household income of $100,000 a year.  But many people fitting that description are swamped with mortgage payments and staring at big college tuition bills -- and thus may conclude they can live without a $35,000 car no matter how good it is.  Another challenge will be keeping the dealers profitable.  Acura cars have sold well, but some dealers have been so overwhelmed by expenses that they've put their franchises on the market.  Lexus hopes to have 90 dealers by year end, sell 16,000 cars for the balance of this year, and 70,000 to 75,000 next year.  That's as many as BMW sold in the U.S. last year.  Lexus is drawing plenty of lookers.  Superior Lexus in Kansas City, Mo., reported giving so many test drives that it couldn't close until 11 p.m. on its opening day last week.  Longo Lexus in El Monte, Calif., stayed open until 11:30 p.m. one day recently.  Vaughn Szarka, a real-estate broker from Cleveland, flew to Monterey last week to test drive an LS 400 on the nearby Laguna Seca Raceway before buying one.  Mr. Szarka has owned 60 different cars in his life and frequently trades for newer models.  For the past five years, he has owned BMWs, but he now thinks BMW prices are "ridiculous."  "For years BMW catered more to its cars than its customers, but now it's going to find people won't take that anymore," Mr. Szarka says.  "Americans are thinking twice about what they're really getting for their money."  ---  @ The Crowded Luxury Car Market  @ Share of the standard luxury car segment by brand name in 1988.  @ Cadillac 26.9%  @ Lincoln 19.5  @ Buick-Oldsmobile 18.8  @ Mercedes-Benz 7.3  @ Acura 7.2  @ Volvo 5.9  @ Chrysler 5.2  @ Other 3.2  @ Audi 3.1  @ Jaguar 1.6  @ BMW 1.4  @ Note: Excludes sports luxury models  @ Base prices of Lexus LS 400 sedan and competitive luxury sedans:  @ Lexus LS 400 $35,000  @ Mercedes 420 SEL 61,210  @ BMW 735 i 54,000  @ Jaguar XJ6 43,500  @ Infiniti Q45 38,000  @ Cadillac Fleetwood 60 Special 34,325  @ Acura Legend Sedan LS 29,960  @ Lincoln Continental 29,910  @ Source: J.D. Power & Associates, Agoura Hills, Calif.  Playboy Enterprises Inc. said it is converting its ailing cable subscription network to a new pay-per-view service in a move to turn the operations around.  The company said that Dec. 1 it will launch a new service called "Playboy at Night" to replace its struggling Playboy Channel.  The "Playboy at Night" service will offer both Playboy original programs and R-rated films and will be offered nationwide through cable systems with pay-per-view addressability.  The publishing and entertainment concern said the move reflects the disappointment of its chairman and chief executive officer, Christie Hefner, with the channel that has drained the company's profits for much of the six years for which it has existed.  Last year Ms. Hefner announced a plan that would remove the Playboy name from the channel and switch to more mainstream adult entertainment from predominantly sexual programming.  The company said, however, that its decision to concentrate on the pay-per-view business rather than the monthly pay-cable subscription was based on market feedback that discouraged launching a new service in light of channel capacity problems and heavy upfront costs.  Also, cable operators have been reluctant to carry explicit programming that could offend their communities and jeopardize their licenses.  Playboy also said that this fall it will launch a broadcast television show in Europe called "Playboy Late Night."  UGI Corp., a Valley Forge, Pa., utility, said it signed a definitive agreement to buy the Utility Propane Co. unit of KCS Group, Edison, N.J., for $21.4 million, plus working capital.  The Utility Propane business would be wholly owned by UGI's AmeriGas subsidiary.  UGI has sold most of AmeriGas's industrial gas interests and is using proceeds mainly to expand the unit's propane operations.  Utility Propane serves more than 15,000 retail and wholesale customers in New Jersey and Pennsylvania.  The transaction is subject to approval by the government and by KCS holders, UGI said.  Bercor Inc., which is operating under Chapter 11 Bankruptcy Code protection, said it posted a $10.7 million net loss for its year ended March 31.  Bercor, a La Mirada, Calif.-based maker and distributor of consumer products, disclosed the loss in its annual 10K report to the Securities and Exchange Commission.  It compares with a $25 million net loss for the previous year.  The company said sales for fiscal 1988 fell 39% to $108 million from $176 million.  Under Chapter 11, a firm continues to operate under protection from creditors' suits while devising a plan to repay debt.  The federally appointed auditors who said they found "accounting gimmickry" at the insolvent Lincoln Savings & Loan unit of American Continental Corp. also may have identified a weak link in the chain of rules governing bookkeeping by thrifts.  Lincoln's books, according to a sometimes colorfully worded report by the firm of Kenneth Leventhal & Co., masked related-party dealings and the improper inflation of property values in what sometimes amounted to the trading of "two one-million-dollar cats for a two-million-dollar dog."  In a 10-page report summary dated July 14, which the Federal Home Loan Bank Board released last week, Leventhal said it examined 15 of the Irvine, Calif., thrift's real-estate transactions and found "substantially all" the $135.3 million of pretax gains Lincoln recorded from them should be reversed.  Eliminating gains from those dealings alone would negate more than half the $238.6 million pretax profits reported between 1984, when American Continental acquired Lincoln, and 1988.  The accounting firm of Arthur Young & Co., recently merged into Ernst & Young, wasn't mentioned by name in the Leventhal report summary.  But it signed off on the books of American Continental and Lincoln during the 1986 and 1987 periods in which most of the transactions occurred.  Arthur Young and American Continental mutually agreed to terminate their relationship in 1988, citing differences on two specific transactions.  An audit wasn't completed for 1988, during which four of the 15 questioned dealings took place.  American Continental, a Phoenix, Ariz., concern controlled by combative real-estate entrepreneur Charles H. Keating Jr., filed for Chapter 11 federal Bankruptcy Code protection April 13, a day before the Bank Board seized Lincoln and placed it under a conservator.  Under Chapter 11, a company operates under protection from creditors' lawsuits while it works out a plan to pay its debts.  Last week, the Bank Board took the more-severe step of appointing a receiver for Lincoln.  Mr. Keating has contended that Lincoln was solvent until regulators launched a conspiracy to undermine the S&L and its parent through unnecessary audits and leaks to the news media.  American Continental has sued, challenging the Bank Board's appointment of a conservator for Lincoln and seeking damages for its seizure of the thrift.  In a statement last week it called the recent write-down of asset values by regulators "baseless."  In Los Angeles, Eugene Erbstoesser, associate general counsel for Ernst & Young, said the firm "continues to stand behind its audit opinions for the periods 1986 and 1987."  He said he hadn't yet read the Leventhal report, but harshly criticized the Bank Board for releasing it.  "Arthur Young believes that they've embarked on this course of conduct because they can't prove any of these charges in a court of law.  Arthur Young will try it in a court of law, and Arthur Young believes it is going to prevail," Mr. Erbstoesser said.  A lawyer for American Continental didn't return a phone call seeking comment.  The Leventhal report charged that Lincoln's filings violated the accepted accounting principle that says "the economic substance of transactions are to be emphasized when economic substance differs from legal form."  The 15 transactions were identified by dates and parties involved, although details weren't provided and regulators declined to elaborate on the cases.  Leventhal charged that the transactions often involved "linked transactions (that) provided substantial benefits or concessions to the other party" and served to inflate value on Lincoln's books.  Lincoln's transactions, according to Leventhal, were "carefully constructed so as to comply in form only with the requirements of the controlling guidance" contained in accounting regulations.  Twelve of the transactions, it said, involved improper indirect funding by Lincoln of the downpayment on a piece of property.  In four cases there was a "pattern of swapping property" with buyers in a way that didn't legitimately qualify for inclusion as profit.  "In every instance, one or more linked transactions provided substantial benefits or concessions to the other party (beside Lincoln), undercutting the accounting treatment employed by Lincoln," the report said.  It added that transactions "were generally consumated for amounts materially above appraisal value."  The Bank Board has said that as of June 30, Lincoln had $4.08 billion of assets and $4.71 billion of liabilities.  The seizure of the 29-branch Lincoln system in April was based on a finding that assets had been "substantially dissipated through violations of laws, rules and regulations and unsafe and unsound practices."  Subsequently its examinations determined that Lincoln is insolvent, and had a negative net worth of $631 million after accounting for various write-downs.  The Bank Board last week also said Lincoln's second-quarter loss was $783 million, of which $325 million was an operating loss.  Leventhal apparently concentrated on 15 real-estate transactions that the Bank Board referred to it for validation of the agency's own conclusions, which one individual said isn't unusual in such conservatorship cases.  However, the accounting firm said that after reviewing the 15, "we would question whether the form of any major Lincoln transaction represents its substance."  The King of Torts has been hit with a king-sized tax bill.  Late last week, a U.S. Tax Court judge here held that lawyer Melvin Belli owes more than $500,000 in back taxes related to a transfer of title to his San Francisco law offices several years ago.  The judge, Julian Jacobs, decided that Mr. Belli had given the building to his children on Christmas Day 1978 -- Mr. Belli said he really sold the building to them in 1981 -- and slapped the well-known trial lawyer with an assessment reflecting the strict federal limits on intra-family gift-giving.  The Internal Revenue Service said it was "pleased" with the result.  The court also approved interest and penalties that may double or perhaps triple the amount of money that Mr. Belli will eventually have to pay.  An IRS spokesman said the final damage hasn't been figured.  In an interview, Mr. Belli said he was considering appealing the decision but was nonetheless "very happy that they said unequivocally that there was no fraud."  The IRS alleged that Mr. Belli intentionally concocted the 1981 sale to disguise the 1978 gift.  But the judge held there was no evidence of fraudulent intent.  Instead, he found that Mr. Belli "truly forgot" about the earlier transaction.  The judge said "transferring his interest in the building was so traumatic to Belli that he suppressed it from his consciousness," leading the 82-year-old lawyer to think three years later that he was free to sell it.  Mr. Belli purchased the building, a brick Victorian, in 1959.  He has said he was prompted to transfer it to family members in order to keep it clear from potential legal malpractice claimaints.  Fruehauf Corp., which is scheduled to be acquired by Varity Corp. in September, said it is changing its name until then to K-H Corp., effective today .  Last month, Fruehauf completed the sale of its truck trailer business to Terex Corp. Terms of that agreement require Fruehauf to change its name.  The name change has no effect on Varity's offer to buy what remains of Fruehauf for about $655 million in cash and securities.  Varity's purchase of Fruehauf is expected to be completed by the end of September.  Until then, the trading symbol for Fruehauf's Class B common stock and other outstanding securities will be changed to KH as of today.  Boots Co. raised its hostile takeover bid for Ward White Group PLC to 445 pence ($7.28) a share, or around #900 million ($1.47 billion), from 400 pence a share, or #800 million.  It said the offer is final.  Ward White immediately rejected the proposal and hinted that a rival higher offer may still be forthcoming.  Boots, a pharmaceuticals retailer, also announced an alternative under which Ward White shareholders can take one new Boots share plus 145 pence in cash for every Ward White share.  "We have looked very hard at its businesses and are certain our increased offers place a full valuation on Ward White, given its uncertain prospects," said Boots Chairman Robert Gunn.  Ward White, however, indicated it is considering a higher offer from another party.  "Following a number of approaches, the board of Ward White and its advisers are actively considering alternative proposals which could have a value to shareholders greater than Boots's offer," it said in a statement.  Ward White, which sells auto parts, bicycles and do-it-yourself home products, said it would give shareholders further information before Aug. 22, the closing date of Boots's new offer.  Ward White shares rose 12 pence (20 U.S. cents) to 451 pence in late trading Friday on London's stock exchange, reflecting market expectations of a higher bid.  Boots shares rose three pence to 301 pence.  Sleepless nights are no longer the chore they once were for Grace Young.  The 73-year-old widow from Belmont, Calif., now knows how to find some company.  Using a computer network linking older adults in North America, she sends an electronic hello to anyone using the system.  "All I have to do is go to my computer and there's always someone to talk to, laugh with and exchange ideas," Mrs. Young says.  The network, called SeniorNet, is designed for adults over 55, many of whom are or once were intimidated by computers.  So far, SeniorNet, a nonprofit organization, has trained 3,000 people on personal computers at 25 sites in 11 states and Canada.  The sites include doctors' offices, senior centers, colleges and even a nursing home, says executive director Mary Furlong, associate professor of education at the University of San Francisco.  Founded in 1986, SeniorNet sprang from a computer class and user manual called "Computers for Kids Over 60," which Ms. Furlong co-wrote.  For a $10 membership, older adults get an eight-week, in-person computer course and a newsletter.  They can then apply for a network account, giving them access to transmission lines.  SeniorNet is the first nationwide effort to help older adults participate in the telecommunications revolution, says Edith Bjornson, an official at New York's Markle Foundation, which has donated $700,000 to SeniorNet.  While SeniorNet's impact has been limited by a shortage of training sites, which cost $15,000 to $20,000 to equip, there are plans to expand.  "Our vision is to build an electronic community for older adults," Ms. Furlong says.  Older Americans are among the lowest users of computers, mostly because of a lack of exposure and cost.  While an estimated 17% to 20% of all households have home computers, only 9% of adults 60 to 69 have them -- and the figure drops to under 3% for adults 70 or older, according to industry surveys.  Some critics say computers could worsen the elderly's isolation, but those involved with SeniorNet contend the machines promote social contacts outside the home.  A two-year Rand Corp. study compared two groups of retirees assigned to develop a retirement plan.  The group equipped with computers had more face-to-face meetings and accomplished more, Ms. Bjornson says.  SeniorNet's heaviest users live in isolated or rural areas.  The oldest user is 95.  Of the 3,000 trained in the course, more than 1,000 have gone on to buy their own home computers.  Private industry -- seeing a growing, affluent and relatively untapped market for computers and information services -- has been quick to support SeniorNet.  "Apple believes this is a potentially large market," says a spokeswoman for Apple Computer Corp., which donated $200,000 of computers to equip 11 SeniorNet training sites.  Pacific Telesis Group and its Pacific Bell unit have contributed about $100,000 to SeniorNet to encourage use of services that generate telephone-line traffic.  To increase access, Pacific Bell is funding SeniorNet's development of an easy-to-use computer "kiosk" that would be installed with simple instructions in libraries and other public buildings.  Many SeniorNet trainees use computers for more than merely keeping in touch with family and friends.  Joan Elswit, 65, a retired graphic artist from Oakton, Va., says the computer allows her to continue her profession at home, designing graphics.  Other members have found jobs involving word processing and video graphics, she says.  The SeniorNet system uses General Videotex Corp.'s Delphi network.  Billing, which is done only for the time anything is sent over transmission lines, averages about three or four hours a month, at $12.60 an hour, for most SeniorNet users, Ms. Furlong says.  At the Sheyenne Care Center, a nursing home in Valley City, N.D., residents send upbeat messages to electronic pen pals across the country.  Such contact, says Tim Hager, the home's former marketing director, helps to ward off institutional depression.  Among the most popular SeniorNet activities is tele-conferencing, which allows members to debate hot issues like catastrophic health insurance and adjusting to retirement.  In some cases, members have organized lobbying efforts.  In the future, computers are expected to help older adults with health care.  Doctors could make electronic house calls, monitor vital signs and medications, and teach patients how to eat and exercise right, says Robert Harootyan, an expert on technology and older adults with the American Association of Retired Persons.  Quebecor Inc. fired James C. Duff, publisher and editor of the Montreal Daily News, its struggling 16-month-old tabloid and the smallest of Montreal's five daily newspapers.  In a terse memo, Quebecor told employees Mr. Duff "has left" the newspaper.  However, Montreal Daily News staffers said he was fired.  Neither Quebecor officials nor Mr. Duff could be reached.  Quebecor, a Montreal publishing, printing and forest products concern, didn't name a replacement for Mr. Duff.  Maxwell Communication Corp. owns a minority stake in the Daily News.  The softening in petroleum prices that was interrupted last week by the hostage crisis in Lebanon is expected to resume this week.  Analysts generally attribute the bearish tone in oil markets to a summer surge in production by the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries and to new sluggishness in demand.  Similar developments a year ago led to a plunge of $4 a barrel in four months in the price of West Texas Intermediate crude oil.  But despite the similarity, few expect a repetition of the price break that dropped the U.S. benchmark crude to less than $13 a barrel in 1988.  "We are off $2-plus from recent levels, and we could go off a little more, but not more than $1 a barrel," said Paul Mlotok, oil industry analyst at Morgan Stanley & Co., New York.  Before the recent slide began in July, West Texas Intermediate was near $20 a barrel.  In futures trading last week, the September contract for the crude oil closed at $18.03 a barrel.  Also on Friday, some refiners reduced their field-price postings 25 cents a barrel to $17.25.  Many analysts agree that prices would have been even lower if the oil markets hadn't drawn support from the political situation in Lebanon.  That was based largely on fears that possible U.S. military action against Iran linked to the fate of U.S. hostages in Lebanon would disrupt Persian Gulf oil exports.  The fading of the "hostage premium" -- as some analysts describe this effect -- from the oil market will direct attention back to the industry's fundamentals, which appear to be deteriorating.  Although the International Energy Agency estimates that world oil consumption this year will average 52.1 million barrels a day, 2.4% more than in 1988, growth in demand appears to be slowing.  At the same time, "heavy OPEC production is weighing on the market," says Peter Gignoux, manager of the international energy desk for Shearson Lehman Hutton in London.  OPEC pumped out more than 21 million barrels a day in the second quarter of this year and is expected to continue to exceed its second-half production quota of 19.5 million barrels a day.  Some output cuts were expected in this quarter in the wake of new promises from quota violators at the June meeting of OPEC oil ministers.  Instead, by most accounts, output continues to rise and is now near 21.4 million barrels a day.  "Political maneuvering ahead of OPEC's next meeting on Sept. 23 in Geneva could drive output even higher in the next two months," according to OPEC Listener.  These persistently high volumes, the oil-industry analysis service says, "are pushing world oil markets to the brink of a surplus, with falling prices pointing to higher stocks and weaker fundamentals."  Looking ahead to other commodity markets this week:  Grains and Soybeans  The weather and a major Agriculture Department crop report due Thursday will continue to dominate trading this week.  So far, conditions have been nearly ideal for the maturing corn and soybean crops in large parts of the Farm Belt.  Many traders will be watching a crop forecast by Conrad Leslie, a private grain analyst in Chicago, for further price signals.  The Leslie forecast is set for release after the markets close tomorrow.  Traders had been expecting a corn crop of 7.5 billion to 7.7 billion bushels, which would be 52% to 56% bigger than last year's drought-ravaged harvest.  But Sparks Commodities Inc. in Memphis, Tenn., last week predicted a harvest of only 7.35 billion bushels, a forecast that helped the grain markets rebound Friday.  Corn, wheat and soybean futures all rose as many traders covered short, or selling, positions.  After the markets closed, the National Weather Service predicted relatively cool weather and normal rainfall next week in much of the Corn Belt.  Copper  Copper traders enter the week with great uncertainty as to where prices are headed.  On the one hand, supplies are tightening when they normally would be showing a seasonal increase; on the other, a major producer could soon be back in business and helping to alleviate that tightness.  Negotiations at Highland Valley in British Columbia, a major Canadian mine where workers have been on strike since July 9, reportedly made significant progress late last week.  One analyst forecast that the negotiations will be the focus of traders' attention early in the week, and he said there appears to be a good chance the strike will end this week.  He said traders already have factored an early end to the strike into the copper market.  However, this analyst said, the reopening of the Bougainville mine in Papua New Guinea, which had been expected to take place late this month or early in September, may have been set back by a renewal of the attacks by rebel landowners that caused the mine to close May 15.  Copper supplies in warehouses of the London Metal Exchange, which last Monday were reported to have risen for the first time in 10 weeks, are believed to have increased by a further 2,000 to 5,000 tons last week, the analyst said.  Thereafter, however, inventories are expected to resume their decline as anticipatory buying for the fall's needs begins.  Another indication of the uncertainty among traders, the analyst said, is that the September futures contract last week topped $1.14 a pound three times only to fall back as selling developed.  The euphoric three-month rally in bond prices has screeched to a halt, and some analysts now look for interest rates to enter a holding pattern.  Friday saw the biggest one-day sell-off of bonds since January as prices of the benchmark 30-year Treasury bond fell more than two points, or about $20 for each $1,000 face amount.  The reversal came on news of an unexpectedly strong employment report and speculation that the Federal Reserve has paused in its march toward lower interest rates.  Some money managers and investors who were bullish on bonds just a week ago now are wringing their hands.  Before the employment report, "I was positive" on the outlook for bond prices, says Joel Kazis, a managing director at Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  But the market's bullish sentiment has "backed off considerably," he said Friday.  "There are no buyers, only sellers."  The market could bounce back, of course, after this week's big Treasury auction is completed and the market digests a big backlog of new corporate and mortgage-backed issues.  But meanwhile, Mr. Kazis is looking for rates on long-term Treasury bonds to stabilize or rise slightly.  "I can easily see the 30-year bond come in at 8 1/8% to 8 1/4%" at this week's auction, he says.  To some economists, Friday's employment report reflects an economy that is stronger than it was thought to be.  The report showed that non-farm payrolls grew by 169,000 in July and that the civilian unemployment rate fell to 5.2% from 5.3% in June.  June's gain in payrolls was revised to 250,000 from the original estimate of 180,000.  And the rise in average hourly earnings indicated that wages are creeping up and could cause inflation to accelerate.  "These figures don't look like a weak economy," says Charles Salisbury, a portfolio manager and managing director at T. Rowe Price Associates Inc.  "The Fed is not likely to ease in the face of a growing economy."  That's a disaster for bond investors who have rushed to buy bonds in large amounts in recent weeks on expectations that the economy was entering a recession.  To revive the ailing economy, they reasoned, the Fed would be forced to aggressively push interest rates lower.  Bond prices rose more than 15 points between mid-May and the end of July, according to Technical Data Global Markets Group.  Last Thursday and Friday, the market gave back more than three points.  It now appears that investors should expect the federal funds rate to remain at about 9%, according to many economists and analysts.  The funds rate, which banks charge each other on overnight loans, is influenced by the Federal Reserve and is closely watched by financial markets for signs of where the central bank wants interest rates to move.  The Fed began easing in June and since then has supplied enough additional credit to the economy to allow the funds rate to fall three-quarters of a percentage point.  Before Friday, many investors were betting that the Fed would allow the rate to fall an additional quarter of a point.  On that speculation, bond buyers bid prices sharply higher.  To some economists, it now appears that the bond market moved too far too quickly on pessimistic economic scenarios that were never borne out.  Lacy Hunt, an economist at Carroll McEntee & McGinley Inc., thinks the Fed itself may have moved too far.  "The last Fed easing may have been unnecessary," he says.  Yields on long-term bonds, after dropping as low as 7.83% early last week, are back up above 8%.  The discount rate on the three-month Treasury bill fell as low as 7.64% but was quoted late Friday at 7.86%.  Rates are expected to remain at those levels or move a little higher this week at the Treasury Department's quarterly auction.  The government is expected to sell about $29.5 billion of new notes and bonds starting tomorrow.  Still, most analysts are not quite ready to proclaim an end to the summer's big rally.  "This is a temporary, although severe, correction," contends Joel Marver, chief fixed-income analyst at Technical Data Global Markets Group in Boston.  Based on technical indicators, Mr. Marver says the bond market will move higher again soon.  "The market has a little more life left, but not much more," he says.  To Richard Berner, an economist at Salomon Brothers Inc., the current situation "should be viewed as a buying opportunity."  Although rates are likely to come in higher at the auction, he still says yields on long-term bonds will eventually fall to about 7.5%.  A similar conclusion comes from Philip Braverman, executive director of BNY Securities Inc., formerly Irving Securities Inc.  He told customers in his latest economic report: "Despite the market sell-off on stronger-than-anticipated employment data, the outlook still favors a new and further significant decline in yields."  ---  Friday's Market Activity  Treasury bonds ended near their session lows, with the bellwether 8 7/8% 30-year bond off 2 5/32 points on the day at 108 29/32 to yield 8.08%.  The selling spree began with the release of the July employment report and picked up momentum when prices slipped through technical support levels, traders said.  Another factor that contributed to the weak tone was the amount of mortgage-backed securities that thrift institutions liquidated throughout last week, which some traders said may have been as much as $10 billion.  Dealers who purchased those securities are believed to have hedged their positions by selling medium-term and long-term securities.  Corporate bond prices fell sharply in thin trading in tandem with the Treasury market.  Short-dated corporates were about 3/4 of a point lower, while the long end of the market was down 1 3/8.  The price plunge caused some issuers to cancel plans to tap the market.  General Electric Capital Corp., a Triple-A rated issuer, called off a competitive bid for a $250 million 20-year issue at the last minute.  Mortgage-backed securities fell, but not as much as the Treasury market.  Ginnie Mae 8 1/2% securities were off 1 2/32 at 95 26/32, while the Ginnie Mae 9 1/2% issue, at 99 28/32, was down 29/32.  Municipal bonds also were down, generally losing 3/8 to 3/4 and closing near their lows for the day.  New Jersey Turnpike Authority 7.20% bonds due 2018 were quoted at 98 5/8 to 98 3/4, off 1/2 from late Thursday and yielding 7.30%; Triborough Bridge and Tunnel Authority's 7 1/8% issue of 2019 was down 5/8 at 98 1/2 to 98 5/8, yielding 7.24%; and Oregon's 7% general obligation bonds maturing in 2015 were 1/2 point weaker at 99 1/8 to 99 1/2, where the yield was 7.04%.  (See related story: "Abreast of the Market: ...But Bearish Camp Still Talks Recession" -- WSJ Aug. 7, 1989)  Pan Am Corp. said it posted a $7.7 million net loss for the second quarter, despite a one-time gain of $92.1 million from the sale of its contract-services unit.  As recently as two months ago, the airline holding company said it would report a profit, compared with a year-earlier loss of $5 million.  The company said it based its earlier projection on April passenger traffic, which showed travel to Europe was beginning to pick up.  However, bookings dropped off later in the quarter and Pan Am was forced to offer heavily discounted fares to stimulate traffic.  The discount fares cut into the airline's yield, or amount of profit earned on tickets sold.  "Revenue would have been even further depressed without those discounts," a company spokesman said.  Second-quarter results show the public is the still wary of European travel though more than a half year has passed since the bombing of Pan Am Flight 103 over Scotland, the company said.  Pan Am acknowledged that its traffic was hurt by fear of terrorism and by published reports that some U.S. corporations, including International Business Machines Corp., recommended its employees avoid U.S. carriers in travel to Europe.  Most of those companies have rescinded those recommendations.  A Pan Am spokesman said bookings trends so far in the third quarter are "encouraging."  The airline said it spent $28.2 million in the quarter to pursue an unsuccessful takeover bid for NWA Inc., the St. Paul, Minn., parent of Northwest Airlines.  A spokesman said Pan Am is still seeking a merger partner, but has been unsuccessful so far.  Among other negative events, the company said its fuel expenses were up 6.2% in the quarter, and it continued to lose business on its internal West German routes.  Thomas G. Plaskett, chairman and chief executive officer, said, "We are determined to stay on course with our efforts to restore Pan Am's competitive position despite these unfortunate setbacks."  Despite the problems on its international routes, Pan said revenue from its other units, including its East Coast shuttle and its Pan Am Express commuter service, was up 48%.  Revenue fell 1.7% to $909.4 million from $925.4 million a year ago, while operating expenses rose about 5% to $959.0 million from $910.5 million.  In the first half, the loss widened to $158.8 million from $88.4 million a year ago.  Revenue fell 2.7% to $1.64 billion from $1.69 billion.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Pan Am closed at $3.625 a share, down 12.5 cents.  The pace of mergers and acquisitions involving members of the Securities Industry Association advanced in 1988 from the previous year, according to the trade group's latest yearbook.  The association said in a statement that the increase in activity, to 25 mergers or acquisitions in 1988 from 19 in 1987, suggests firms are "continuing to seek solutions to problems resulting from the low securities market volume since the October 1987 market break."  Using its member firms as a guide for the industry, the group pointed out that 1988 saw a 6% decline in registered representatives, an 8% drop in total employees and a 3% decline in the number of offices.  The association has published the yearbook since 1980.  In the 1989-1990 yearbook, published today, the group reported that mergers among the group's member firms rose to 17 in 1988 from eight in 1987.  There also were eight combinations involving nonmembers merged into or acquired by association members in 1988, compared with seven in 1987.  Separately, the association said that at the start of 1989, Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. continued its ranking as its largest member in terms of capital, with $6.6 billion, followed by Salomon Brothers Inc. with $3.1 billion, and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith with $2.9 billion.  The association for the first time ranked the parent companies of the 15 largest member firms by capital.  The largest was Merrill Lynch & Co., with $9.8 billion, followed by Prudential Insurance Co. of America, $6.8 billion, and Shearson Lehman Hutton Holdings Inc., $4.9 billion.  Kenneth J. Thygerson, who was president and chief executive officer of Imperial Corp. of America and, before that, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp., was named president of this thrift-holding company.  He succeeds J.F. Baxter, who remains chairman and chief executive but who has said he plans to retire by year end.  Comprehensive Care Corp. agreed to accept a revised merger proposal from First Hospital Corp. that reduces the amount that Comprehensive Care shareholders would receive in the transaction.  The two companies agreed in April to form a publicly traded health care concern specializing in chemical dependency and psychiatric treatment.  First Hospital submitted an amended proposal to Comprehensive Care last month, after Comprehensive Care posted a $5.1 million fiscal fourth-quarter loss.  The revised agreement lowers the transaction's indicated value to about $58 million from about $76 million, excluding the value of stock in the new concern that Comprehensive Care shareholders would receive.  The agreement also permits Comprehensive Care to solicit other acquisition proposals, the companies said.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday, Comprhensive Care shares rose 62.5 cents to $8.375.  Under terms of the revised agreement, holders of Comprehensive Care's 10.1 million common shares would receive for each of their shares $3 in cash, $2.75 of senior subordinated notes and 0.78 of a common share in the new company.  The interest rate on the debt would be 10% for the first three years, increasing to 15 1/2% thereafter.  The original proposal called for holders to receive for each of their shares $5 in cash, $2.50 of 12-year, 14 3/4% senior subordinated notes and three-quarters of a common share in the new company.  Prudential Bache Capital Funding, Comprehensive Care's financial adviser, has told the company that the revised offer is fair to shareholders, Comprehensive Care said.  The company has scheduled a special meeting Sept. 13 for holders to vote on the proposed transaction.  Comprehensive Care develops, markets and operates chemical dependency and psychiatric programs, primarily under the Care-Unit name.  First Hospital, a closely held concern based in Norfolk, Va., owns and operates 10 psychiatric facilities and three substance abuse facilities.  Charles J. Aschauer was named a director of this biomedical concern, increasing the company's board to eight members.  Mr. Aschauer was formerly an executive vice president with Abbott Laboratories.  Britt Evans, president, was named to the additional post of chief executive officer of the company's Homestead Savings unit.  He succeeds Lawrence Weissberg, who remains chairman of the unit, and chairman and chief executive of the savings and loan company.  What's wrong with this statement?: The economy is slumping and the stock market is soaring.  Nothing, say lots of analysts and stock market traders.  They figure the slump is simply the economy's glide path down to a soft landing and investors are enjoying the ride.  But there's a minority of economists who monitor the stock market who are becoming convinced that if the economy isn't already in a recession, it isn't very far away.  To these pessimists, there's something wrong with the premise that the economy can keep sinking while stock prices keep rising.  Several months ago, when the soft landing thesis -- moderate economic growth with declining inflation and lower interest rates -- first emerged, some of these economists conceded that a soft landing was possible, even though they thought it wasn't very probable.  Now they are convinced the soft landing was merely wishful thinking, and a recession is imminent.  "All the classic signs are there," warns A. Gary Shilling, an economist and partner in Thematic Investment Partners.  "The run-up in interest rates slowed the growth of housing and auto sales, which in turn slowed employment growth, which in turn has made consumers cautious.  All that is leaving retailers, wholesalers and manufacturers with inventories they don't want, setting the stage for a big recessionary decline."  These economic bears see the latest evidence of slowdown in last week's economic reports.  Although the economy overall created some 169,000 jobs in July, the manufacturing sector of the economy added a scant 3,000 jobs.  And earlier in the week the National Association of Purchasing Managers' survey hit a six-year low.  That was enough to push Bostian Research Associates' macro-economic index well into negative territory, which is supposed to signal that a recession is imminent.  "In the past, when the index has signaled a recession, the economy has managed to struggle higher for an average of five months before a recession started," says David Bostian, president of the firm.  "But with the very volatile world we live in, the recession could come a lot sooner than five months," he says.  To be sure, there are plenty of economists who think the soft landing is still on track.  Robert Barbera, chief economist at Shearson Lehman Hutton, says that past recessions have been preceded by persistent Fed credit tightening that drove up interest rates.  Past recessions "weren't accidents; they were engineered to remedy severe inflation problems," he says.  This time it's different.  "The Fed already has eased three times.  If the Fed is easing before the economy goes negative, the risk of a big recession is small."  Skeptics might ask the doomsayers why stock prices don't reflect the recessionary threat.  The easy answer, the pessimists say, is that many investors are still betting on the soft landing.  Investors haven't seen enough evidence yet that corporations are cutting back on production to be convinced that a recession is under way.  And they like the fact that merger and buy-out activity continues to demonstrate that companies are willing to pay premiums above current prices for corporate assets.  But James Solloway, an economic bear at Argus Research, suggests that stock prices do reflect recession worries.  He says the traditional measures of stock prices -- the Dow Jones Industrial Average and the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index -- are merely the average of a variety of stock prices.  But if the stock market is viewed as two distinct markets -- one cyclical and the other defensive -- there's clear evidence that investors are bracing for a recession.  "The action has been in the defensive stocks like food, utilities and beverages," he says.  These stocks tend to fare well in economic declines.  "The traditional industrial stocks, such as steels, chemicals and papers, haven't done that well."  These so-called cyclical stocks are sensitive to the ups and downs of the economy.  While the two-tiered stock market indicates some recession anxiety, Mr. Solloway thinks that investors still haven't fully discounted the effects of a recession he believes is at hand.  "The fact that the stock market is trading at about 13 times earnings is some indication that investors are discounting a decline in profits," he says.  "But that doesn't mean that prices can't move lower from this point.  It just isn't going to be the kind of bloodbath that we saw in October 1987."  Maybe.  But Wall Street's bears don't agree themselves about how severe the downturn will be and how far stocks will drop.  Mr. Solloway's predictions of modest declines are predicated on a mild recession.  But Mr. Shilling is worried that there will be nothing at all mild about the recession he thinks is developing.  Not only does he predict that it will be deep and long, but that it will be world-wide.  "Even though some people think Europe and Japan will continue to hold up the U.S. economy, those countries are going through the same cycle, only a little later than us," says Mr. Shilling.  "We're saying the whole world will be in recession by the first half of next year."  Mr. Bostian, too, is very bearish.  His concern is that the prevalence of tactical asset allocation -- computer-driven switches among stocks, bonds and cash -- and volatile program trading could bring about a startlingly swift decline in stock prices.  "Who knows what the cause will be, maybe some political or foreign event?" he says.  "But you give the market a little jolt, and you could get one of those futures-driven meltdowns."  In line with his grim outlook, Mr. Bostian is recommending to his pension-fund clients that they hold only 10% of their portfolios in stocks, while keeping 40% in high-quality bonds and 50% in cash.  And he figures he will soon recommend that conservative investors get out of stocks altogether.  "People say, 'Why rush?  Stocks can go higher?'," he says.  "But I tell them to remember how they felt in October 1987.  The time to get rid of stocks is before that happens, not afterward."  Obviously, the majority of investors don't buy the bears' doomsday scenario.  Right after the 1987 crash, there were widespread warnings that the nation was headed for a deep recession.  Investors who ignored those predictions and stayed in stocks have been amply rewarded.  However, some bears like Mr. Shilling aren't recommending that investors dump all stocks, albeit he is counseling caution.  Right now, he says, the best shares to own are high-yielding stocks that act much like bonds, such as telephone and some electric utilities and some regional banks.  Later, after the recession is clearly under way and interest rates are tumbling, some growth stocks could perform well, he says.  What not to hold: Cyclical stocks and heavily leveraged issues.  Mr. Shilling also recommends high-quality bonds and intermediate-term notes on the assumption that interest rates will plunge as the Federal Reserve attempts to restimulate an ailing economy.  "The Fed is already easing, but when it becomes evident the economy is in trouble, they'll be virtually throwing money out of airplanes," says Mr. Shilling.  Because Mr. Solloway of Argus Research is predicting only a relatively mild recession, he finds it more difficult to come up with recommendations for investors.  He doesn't think investors should risk buying depressed cyclical stocks right now, yet the traditional defensive stocks that everyone wants to own are expensive, he believes.  While bonds look safe, Mr. Solloway doesn't anticipate a big enough drop in interest rates for bonds to provide much in the way of capital gains.  "We're at the point of a dilemma," he says.  "You can take stocks like PepsiCo, Coke, and Philip Morris because they all seem to have good-looking earnings patterns that will hold up in a recession.  But there isn't anywhere you can go at this point to get spectacular total returns on your money."  ---  Friday's Market Activity  The July employment report thundered through the stock market, causing broad selling of defensive stocks and aggressive bidding for cyclical shares.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average fell 8.16 to 2653.45, with the big defensive issues, such as Procter & Gamble and Merck among the decliners.  Standard & Poor's 500-stock index slipped 0.82 to 343.92, while the New York Stock Exchange Composite index fell 0.45 to 191.64.  Big Board volume was 169,750,000 shares compared with 168,690,000 Thursday.  Decliners outpaced advancers, 867 to 642.  For the week, the Dow industrials added 18.21 points, while the S&P 500 added 1.77.  The New York Stock Exchange composite gained 1.26.  After taking a look at July employment data, investors concluded that the U.S. economy is stronger than expected.  U.S. employment growth in July eased slightly less than projected, with new non-farm payrolls up 169,000; the civilian unemployment rate fell to 5.2% of the work force in July from June's 5.3%.  June employment data were revised upward to an increase of 250,000 jobs.  The employment report -- which suggests the economy is stronger than many investors believed -- diminished expectations of further interest-rate cuts from the Federal Reserve and supported the case for continued economic growth.  This resulted in an accelerated rotation Friday by many investors out of defensive stocks -- which perform well in a recession -- and into cyclical stocks, which move up and down with the economy.  This rotation began early last week.  Earlier this summer, investors fearing a recession bought drug, food and utility shares that retain earnings ability in an economic downturn.  But they stampeded out of those issues Friday.  Philip Morris fell 1 5/8 to 162, Merck tumbled 1 to 73 1/2, Gerber fell 2 1/8 to 96 7/8, Coca-Cola Co. tumbled 1 1/4 to 65 7/8, Procter & Gamble dropped 3 3/8 to 116, Quaker Oats fell 1 1/4 to 64 5/8 and Campbell Soup fell 1 3/4 to 53 1/4.  Money flowing out of defensive shares ran into cyclicals.  Dow Chemical rose 1 1/4 to 93, International Business Machines gained 1 3/4 to 115 1/2, Motorola rose 1 5/8 to 59 and Compaq Computer gained 3 3/8 to 94 7/8.  If recession fears do abate, cyclical stocks have room for a 5% to 7% gain before they catch up with the broader market, said John L. Manley Jr., portfolio strategist at Smith Barney, Harris Upham.  That could provide the market with the leadership it lacked all last week.  Another reaction to the July jobs report was an abrupt rise in the dollar.  Foreign exchange traders expect U.S. interest rates to remain high compared with foreign economies.  That in turn brought in a lot of Japanese buying Friday, traders said, which is expected to continue this week.  The employment data hurt bank stocks.  A slower decline in interest rates will keep the cost of funds high for banks.  Citicorp lost 7/8 to 32 1/8, Manufacturers Hanover fell 1 to 40 3/8, Bankers Trust slipped 3/4 to 54 3/4 and BankAmerica fell 5/8 to 31.  Brokerage stocks traded on heavy volume and slipped slightly.  Salomon Brothers traded at more than three times its average daily volume, slipping 3/8 to 26 on 1,417,200 shares.  Goldman, Sachs & Co. crossed two large block trades of Salomon.  Merrill Lynch fell 1/4 to 35 3/8, PaineWebber Group slipped 3/8 to 22 5/8, and Bear Stearns eased 1/4 to 17 1/2.  UAL, the parent of United Airlines, ended down 9 1/2 to 164 1/2, a plunge of 17 1/2 for the week.  There was talk in the market that regulators will take a harder look at airline mergers in the future, following the buy-out of Northwest Airlines.  Walt Disney dropped 4 7/8 to 116 1/8 after gaining 6 3/8 Thursday.  The drop was attributed to profit-taking following its recent strength.  Prime Computer gained 1 1/8 to 17 3/4, as some investors decided anew that the company will be taken over.  J.H. Whitney & Co. said it wants to lower its bid for Prime to $20 a share from $21.50.  Thursday, Whitney said it was doubtful it could get financing for the bid at $21.50 a share.  Federal Express lost 5/8 to 50 1/8.  The Wall Street Journal reported pilots are unhappy with the handling of the air freight concern's merger with Tiger International.  Orion Capital surged 2 3/4 to 25 3/4.  The company reported second-quarter operating net of $1.07 a share, compared with net income of 44 cents a year ago.  Atlantic Richfield rose 3 to 101 1/8.  The company's Arco Alaska unit said testing of one of its Alaskan wells indicates it may recover about 300 million barrels of oil from the area.  Crane added another 3/4 to 30 1/2, after rising 1 5/8 Thursday.  Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette added the company to its recommended list.  The stock was added to Shearson Lehman Hutton's recommended list Thursday.  Time slid 2 1/2 to 141 after Chris-Craft Industries' BHC Inc. unit elected to require Warner Communications and Time to distribute all of the BHC shares held by Warner to shareholders of Time Warner following the merger of the two media giants.  Warner rose 1/8 to 67.  Mylan Laboratories gained 1 to 10 1/2.  The Wall Street Journal reported that the company's 50-50 joint venture with Bolar Pharmaceutical, Somerset Pharmaceuticals, owns the U.S. rights to a drug that may help treat Parkinson's disease.  The American Stock Exchange Index eased 0.72 to 376.10.  Bolar Pharmaceutical plunged 4 3/4 to 23.  The company's stock was halted Thursday after congressional investigators accused the company of submitting brand-name drugs as its own in testing for generic-drug marketing approval.  The company has denied the allegations.  (See related story: "Credit Markets: Economy's Vigor Spooks Bond Market..." -- WSJ Aug. 9, 1989)  Is this the time to edge back into those stock market whipping boys -- the technology stocks?  Ask your favorite portfolio strategist and you're likely to get an ever-so-tentative thumbs up.  But the folks who make the investment decisions for the pension funds and mutual funds aren't byting -- with some exceptions, of course.  Calling the turn in any group of stocks is a tricky task, but technology issues are a notoriously thorny area.  Development of products moves at a stunning pace in the computer industry, for example.  And earnings at the hot companies often show the type of short-term sizzle that leaves investors gasping on the way up and weeping on the way down.  It is an extraordinarily complicated arena, too.  Unlike analyzing, say, a McDonald's, where the company either sells more food or it doesn't, trying to guess a turn at Digital Equipment requires a knowledge not only of the company's products but of a huge range of competitors, real and potential.  For investors, "It's a lousy business," says Ken Heebner, who runs several mutual funds for Loomis Sayles in Boston.  "It's a mine field, and as a generality, you shouldn't invest in it."  Generalities aside, some analysts are recommending the purchase of selected tech stocks.  At First Boston, for example, Carmine Grigoli, chief equity portfolio strategist, suggests in his model portfolio that investors overweight the group.  He notes, however, that his recommendations are limited to a few issues: International Business Machines, Compaq Computer and Novell.  His support isn't exactly overwhelming, either, and is based in part on how poorly stocks such as IBM have performed during the recent rally.  "Everyone seems to be throwing in the towel at this point" and dumping the stocks, Mr. Grigoli contends.  "That usually tells you they can't go much lower."  Tech stocks had a good day on Friday, fueled in part by Wall Street speculation that Goldman Sachs was preparing to recommend the issues today.  Michael Armellino, who heads the firm's research department, declined to comment on the rumor.  But IBM gained 1 3/4 to close at 115 1/2, Compaq jumped 3 3/8 to 94 7/8, Digital Equipment added 1 1/2 to 95 1/4, NCR rose 1 3/8 to 61 1/8, and Cray Research gained 5/8 to 44 1/2, all on the New York Stock Exchange.  L. Keith Mullins, emerging-growth-stock analyst at Morgan Stanley, also likes the group, because he too believes that small tech stocks won't fall much more.  So he believes investors should begin buying the issues now, because the rally will be short and swift.  "While we haven't reached an extreme bottom, technology stocks have historically had very rapid rallies with few opportunities to make a late entry," he says.  Mr. Mullins recommends purchase of Acuson on the Big Board; and Mentor Graphics, Novell, Oracle Systems and Silicon Graphics in the Nasdaq over-the-counter market.  The bullish line of argument isn't exactly compelling to portfolio managers such as John Neff, who runs Vanguard's Windsor Fund and is one of the best-performing portfolio managers in the business.  The computer companies haven't been able to keep their prices firm for the amount of computing power they are selling, a problem that is coupled with lower demand for the machines themselves.  About the only tech issue in Mr. Neff's portfolio is Intel, which he says he bought in December "after it got squashed."  Mr. Mullins's get-in-before-they-soar theory isn't winning over Loomis Sayles's Mr. Heebner, either.  "You've got to start looking at tech stocks like metals stocks," he says.  "It's a fundamentally lousy business with bad margins that every so often will have a nice period."  It certainly has produced a long period of pain for investors in tech stocks.  Even including shooting stars such as Sun Microsystems, Compaq and Apple Computer, the industrywide stock performance peaked in 1983, according to Ken Greiner, senior vice president at Dillon, Read Capital Management in New York.  The technology group "has been lousy, to put it mildly, yet many of the issues still aren't at bargain-basement prices," says Morris Smith, manager of Fidelity OTC Portfolio in Boston.  "You don't find many trading below book value, and a lot are trading at a premium to the S&P 500."  Mr. Smith's portfolio includes Chips & Technologies and Software Publishing, two OTC issues he says have attractive P-E ratios and strong earnings growth.  He isn't planning to add more tech stocks just yet.  "I'm willing to own technology stocks," he says, "but I can't say generically that you should mortgage the house on the group."  James Manley, portfolio manager of Chase Investors Management's Vista Growth and Income Fund, bought Seagate Technology earlier this year.  But he says he won't consider buying technology stocks again until there is clear evidence that the economy has slowed and that "technology stocks have fully discounted the economic slowdown."  This is exactly the type of talk that the folks at Dillon Read like to hear.  Timothy G. Dalton Jr., the firm's president, says, "We have been buying tech stocks and we're continuing to look at them."  The firm has been buying downtrodden issues such as IBM, Cray and Digital Equipment, which is selling at about 40 points lower than its post-crash level.  "The work we do would indicate that the group has never been cheaper," Mr. Dalton argues.  "It's at times like these when you can buy the quality companies at reduced prices."  That's not to say he is looking for a rebound in the next couple of weeks or even months.  "The thing that motivates Wall Street is short-term earnings results, and they're just not there," he says.  "And we can't tell you when they're going to be there.  It might be a year or more before we get paid."  But for a company like Digital Equipment, "The market is saying this company is a piece of junk, and it isn't," Mr. Dalton says.  Raj Rajaratnam, a managing director at Needham & Co., likes semiconductor makers Cirrus Logic, Altera, Weitek and Integrated Device Technology.  Though the semiconductor industry's book-to-bill ratio -- comparing orders to shipments -- is below 1 to 1, indicating that product demand is slowing, he notes that his picks have higher ratios.  "While the overall industry is flat, these companies are seeing tremendous increases in orders," Mr. Rajaratnam says.  "It represents an interesting opportunity."  When Thomas F. Baker was growing up on his family's small Arkansas strawberry farm before World War II, his father went out of his way to compensate the day pickers.  He would award bonuses to the most dependable and give travel pay to those who trekked to the fields from afar.  Now, though, Tom Baker is dealing with a tougher employer.  As president of District 751 of the Machinists union, he began last week in Wichita, Kan., to hammer out a new three-year contract with Boeing Co., the giant aircraft maker.  The current accord expires Oct. 3.  Mr. Baker is actually part of a six-member bargaining team that includes two other district presidents and three representatives from the union's international headquarters.  But of the 55,000 Boeing workers covered by the pact, 40,000 are on Mr. Baker's home turf around Puget Sound in western Washington.  That gives him special clout -- and makes him a lightning rod for criticism.  "He's in the primary bargaining position," says one union insider.  The Boeing agreement usually sets the pattern for Lockheed Corp. and McDonnell Douglas Corp., where contracts covering an additional 27,000 aerospace workers also expire in October.  The Machinists say their main goal at all three companies is to replace lump-sum bonuses with base-wage increases.  Increases in regular pay had been the norm for decades in the industry.  Then, amid a slump six years ago, the companies replaced them with one-time "productivity payments" handed out at Christmas.  Now, the Machinists are out to prove that "bonuses are an aberration," says Justin Ostro, the union's general vice president and the coordinator of all its aerospace talks.  The aerospace companies, he maintains, "have deprived the workers," who at Boeing now make roughly $8.70 to $18.70 an hour.  Indeed, for weeks Mr. Baker's staff has distributed a flier that says an annual general wage increase over the past six years would have put "almost 3 1/2 times as much cash in your pocket as lump-sum bonuses at the same percentage rate.  Who pockets the difference when you get the lumps instead of a pay raise?  Boeing does."  The company says it won't comment on the negotiations.  Pay, of course, is not the only bone of contention.  A slate of other important topics is sure to be discussed when Boeing and union representatives resume their meetings Wednesday in Seattle.  Among them are job security, overtime, cost-of-living adjustments, insurance, pensions, drug testing and worker training.  "There are a lot of things that need dialogue," Mr. Baker says.  "I want to make sure none gets bumped aside."  But, according to a union survey, it's the wage issue that stirs the rank and file most.  And Mr. Baker realizes there may never be a better time to "dump the lump," as some Boeing workers have grown fond of saying.  The company's order book is stuffed, and it is straining to roll out a load of 747s and other jets during the fourth quarter.  Traditionally reliable, Boeing "already has upset some customers" with late deliveries, says Bill Whitlow, an analyst with Dain Bosworth Inc., a securities firm in Seattle.  "They can't afford a strike."  The last walkout at the company, 13 weeks long, was in 1977.  If the union can't win a base-wage increase this year, Mr. Baker says, "it's going to be a long time coming."  Mr. Baker, 52 years old, was an electrical technician at Boeing for more than a decade before he joined the union full time in 1970.  He has since put together a powerful political machine, and recently began an unprecedented third term as president of the district lodge.  He works hard to stay in control, making regular rounds at seven locals and strolling through the district union hall, continually popping his head into various departments to see what the troops are up to. (He is extremely active off the job as well, hiking, skiing and golfing when he can.) "Tom gets criticized for things, but never inaction," says Larry Kenney, president of the Washington State Labor Council, the local AFL-CIO affiliate.  At the bargaining table, Mr. Baker is "no table pounder," says a colleague.  He is a smooth talker and able storyteller whose speech sometimes twangs with a hint of his upbringing in the Ozarks.  He prides himself on maintaining friendly relations with Boeing, something he believes amounts to a good negotiating strategy.  "The company has an agenda and we have an agenda, and some things are not necessarily conflicting," Mr. Baker says.  Some Machinist members, however, think such an amicable posture indicates soft leadership.  Mr. Baker's detractors charge, among other things, that he has become too cozy with Boeing.  They question his acceptance from the company of commemorative medallions for the new district union hall that was opened last summer.  They are wary of his big office and the fastidious way he dresses.  "I'm pro-union, but I don't think Tom Baker has the best interests of the membership at heart," says Arthur Ryan, a 34-year-old Boeing employee who makes the exterior wing panels for planes.  "He's not trusted."  Mr. Baker says he isn't daunted by his opponents.  "When you look at the issues they're trying to raise, they don't fly," he says.  As for the union hall, "It's their building, not my building."  He adds sternly, "I don't see down the road where there's going to be any kind of cooperation" between the company and the union on wages and other important contract matters.  But Mr. Baker's stance on wages may not be fully backed by the membership.  "The younger workers really think the bonuses are terrific," says Jerry Cantwell, who tracks Boeing for Wertheim Schroder & Co.  "It's the older guys who've discovered the magic" of compounding the base wage, which figures into the formulas for pension and other benefits.  Speculation in the Seattle newspapers has been that corporate negotiators will offer a bonus package of 18% the first year and 5% for each of the next two.  Others, though, suggest that Mr. Baker has a way of galvanizing support at contract time -- and that's as it should be.  "You don't want internal fighting now," says Franklin Knowles, a toolmaker who ran against Mr. Baker in the last two district elections.  "It's the same thing as if you didn't vote for the president of the United States, and then we went to war.  You still have to support him."  And, he adds, "This is war."  The dollar is expected to continue climbing this week, but analysts said remaining bearish sentiment could contain the rise.  After declining early last week, the dollar seemed to become rejuvenated and closed sharply higher Friday.  The Federal Reserve seems to be "finished easing for a while.  The dollar is going to strengthen a little bit," said Nancy Sotern, a futures analyst at Stotler & Co. in Chicago.  Relatively high U.S. interest rates have helped enhance the attractiveness of dollar-denominated investments.  Because it is considered likely the Fed will hold off on further rate reductions, "the dollar is very attractive again," said Francoise Soares-Kemp, a corporate foreign exchange adviser at Credit Suisse.  Concerns about declining U.S. interest rates prompted dollar bashing early last week, as did some forecasts for a steep dollar decline near-term.  But traders said the outlook changed with moderate but stronger-than-expected U.S. employment data in July, which was released Friday.  The key nonfarm payrolls rose 169,000 last month after a revised June gain of 250,000, and the jobless rate fell to 5.2% from 5.3%.  The data sent market participants scrambling to buy dollars in early trading in New York because many of them had expected a nonfarm payroll rise of 150,000 or less and a steady jobless rate of 5.3%.  In late trading Friday the dollar was quoted at 1.9070 marks and 139.90 yen, up from 1.8726 and 137.25 late Thursday.  The close was well above last week's intraday lows of about 1.8440 marks and 135.53 yen on Wednesday.  In Tokyo Monday, the dollar opened for trading at 139.55 yen, up sharply from Friday's Tokyo close of 138.05 yen.  "Prospects for the dollar aren't so bad," said Kevin Logan, chief economist at Swiss Bank Corp.  He forecasts the dollar could rise to 141 yen this week.  While the dollar had been battered by concern about possible credit-easing moves by the Fed, Mr. Logan said a play-it-safe easing approach is still considered most likely.  "A steady, prudent, cautious pattern of lowering the {federal} funds rate in small steps" is probable in coming months, he said, adding that such a tactic probably won't hurt the dollar.  The rate on federal funds -- reserves banks lend one another, usually overnight -- has been at about 9% since it was allowed to fall from 9 3/4 in early June.  Some analysts, such as Mr. Logan, expect an 8% federal funds rate by year end.  Indications about near-term Fed policy may be evident in Wednesday's release of the central bank's "beige book," a summary of economic conditions in each respective Fed district.  The report will be used by the policy-making Federal Open Market Committee at its Aug. 22 meeting.  Meanwhile, the dollar is still being buoyed by flight-to-quality buying encouraged by heightened U.S.-Middle East political tensions, traders said.  "There's still a lot of political unrest," and this helps the dollar, said Stotler's Ms. Sotern.  She sees the dollar testing resistance at 1.92 marks and 142 yen in coming days.  Some analysts, though, don't have much faith in the dollar's renewed bullish sentiment for a number of reasons, including remaining concerns about moderating U.S. economic growth, the nation's relatively large merchandise trade deficit and the likelihood that a strong rally would be foiled by concerted central-bank intervention.  Additionally, some analysts cited the lack of stability in the foreign exchange market.  "The sentiment in the market swings around so fast it's astonishing sometimes," said Mr. Logan of Swiss Bank; "We're not going to see a big break-out for the dollar."  He said lower U.S. rate jitters could resurface quickly and knock the dollar toward support at 1.86 marks and 135 yen.  Separately, many analysts said the Canadian dollar may run into trouble this week although it is trading at its highest levels in almost eight years.  "High {Canadian} interest rates are keeping buying interest alive in the Canadian dollar, but it's a very volatile currency," said a market participant.  The Canadian dollar stood at 84.87 cents in late New York trading Friday.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York Friday, gold for current delivery dropped $5.90 to $367.80 an ounce.  Estimated volume was a moderate three million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Monday, gold was quoted at $368.50 an ounce.  Wolohan Lumber Co. said July sales rose 3.4% to $25,819,000 from $24,968,000 a year earlier.  Same-store sales in the month rose 3.1% from a year earlier.  Sales in the first seven months this year rose 7.5% to $154,671,000 from $143,829,000 in the year-earlier period.  Same-store sales rose 3.4%.  MOSLEM EXTREMISTS OFFERED to free a U.S. hostage for Arab prisoners.  With the U.S. involved in clear, though indirect, bargaining over the release of hostages in the Mideast, the pro-Iranian Revolutionary Justice Organization said it would release American hostage Joseph Cicippio if Israel frees an abducted Moslem cleric as well as 150 Lebanese and 300 Palestinian prisoners.  The captors also demanded that Israel allow the return of all Palestinians deported during the uprising in the occupied territories.  Israel reiterated its insistence that any swap include three of its soldiers believed in Lebanon.  White House aides remain skeptical over Iranian President Rafsanjani's offer Friday to help in the hostage crisis, and are awaiting "tangible actions."  ---  New Zealand's prime minister said that he would resign today for medical reasons, following an operation last year to widen a heart artery.  David Lange, a 47-year-old anti-nuclear proponent who was elected in 1984, said that he would remain a member of Parliament and that he would ask the ruling Labor Party to elect a new leader.  ---  Central American presidents agreed in principle to disband the U.S.-backed Nicaraguan Contra rebels, but a timetable still had to be arranged.  The five-nation summit at the Honduran seaside resort of Tela also sought agreement on a plan for ending El Salvador's nine-year-old civil war.  The three-day meeting opened Saturday.  ---  A Senate panel is examining evidence that several countries believed to be working on clandestine nuclear-weapons programs have been getting sensitive data from three Energy Department weapons laboratories.  The recipients included Israel, India, Pakistan, Iraq, South Africa and Argentina.  ---  HUD under Pierce provided $4.5 million for converting the USS Intrepid aircraft carrier into a museum, a project that was championed by the then-housing secretary's old New York law firm and former clients.  Pierce's files indicate that he backed the project but don't show whether he directed its funding.  --- NASA pronounced the space shuttle Columbia ready for flight as a countdown continued toward a launch tomorrow at Cape Canaveral.  While the payload is classified, the shuttle's five astronauts are expected to launch a Pentagon reconnaissance satellite.  ---  Air Force officials are investigating an engineering officer for suspicion of selling military secrets to the East bloc while assigned to an electronic-security installation in West Germany, according to reports.  A spokesman said the officer, who returned from West Berlin last week, has been restricted to a base in San Antonio, Texas.  ---  The House has adopted a nearly $286.5 billion Pentagon bill, approving the legislation Friday by a 312-105 vote.  The Pentagon budget was the last of 13 annual appropriations bills -- pushed through the House in little more than a month -- totaling more than $639 billion for the year beginning Oct. 1.  ---  Bolivia installed a former leftist revolutionary, Jaime Paz Zamora, as president.  The 50-year-old Social Democrat, who succeeded his uncle Victor Paz Estenssoro, was elected Saturday by Congress to a four-year term after he formed an alliance with the country's former military dictator.  ---  Shevardnadze arrived in Kabul and met with President Najibullah and other Afghan officials to discuss bilateral relations and Afghanistan's continuing civil war.  Rebels bombarded the capital, killing at least nine people, authorities said.  The Soviet foreign minister is slated to leave Kabul today.  ---  Japan's ruling party is expected to select a new leader tomorrow, with four of the Liberal Democratic Party's six major factions supporting Toshiki Kaifu, the 58-year-old former education minister.  The LDP's choice is certain to succeed Sosuke Uno as prime minister.  ---  Hurricane Dean swept across Bermuda with torrential rains and winds as strong as 113 mph, flooding some coastal roads and knocking out power to parts of the Atlantic island chain.  There weren't any reports of casualties, and emergency officials reported only minor damage from the storm.  ---  A high-level U.S. team is to meet today with Mexican officials to discuss new ways of cross-border cooperation.  The meeting in Mexico City is expected to include talks on drug enforcement and Mexican economic prospects following a debt-reduction accord reached two weeks ago.  Secretary of State Baker is leading the U.S. delegation.  ---  An FBI report concluded that the number of violent crimes reported in the U.S. last year increased 5.5% from 1987.  There were 13.9 million crimes reported in 1988.  Murders rose 2.9% to 20,675 in the period.  --- Authorities in Pakistan said a senior member of Prime Minister Bhutto's political party was arrested in opposition-ruled Punjab.  The arrest in Lahore of the official, accused of incitement to violence, was viewed as tied to a rift between Bhutto's government and her political opponents.  Philippine exports reached $3.09 billion during the first five months of the year, up 17% from $2.65 billion a year ago, the Department of Trade and Industry reported.  The department traced the country's strong export performance to higher shipments of nontraditional products such as electronic parts, garments, metals, gift items, toys, housewares and petroleum products.  Nontraditional products accounted for more than 80% of total export shipments, the department said.  New-car sales dropped 4.5% in July to 51,093 from 53,479 a year earlier and were down 71% from 174,667 in June, according to Britain's Society of Motor Manufacturers and Traders Ltd.  The year-to-year decline follows a 3.5% rise in June from a year earlier.  The sharp fall from the previous month is due to seasonal factors.  July is normally the slowest sales month of the year as consumers await the beginning of the new registration year in August.  Canada's unemployment rate rose to 7.5% of the work force in July from 7.3% in June, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, said.  The higher jobless rate resulted from a decline in employment and an increase in the labor force.  Statistics Canada said, "Overall, employment has remained virtually unchanged since January."  GTI Corp., an electronics maker and distributor, said its electronics unit signed a long-term agreement with Corning Inc. for joint production of low-temperature sealing glass for diodes and rectifiers used by the semiconductor industry.  Value of the pact wasn't disclosed.  Corning, based in Corning, N.Y., is a glass and ceramic materials maker with interests in housewares, laboratory technologies and telecommunications.  Profits are still running above year-ago levels, but the gains are decreasing.  Analysts expect further weakening if, as they predict, the economy continues to slow down.  In the quarter ended June 30, after-tax earnings on continuing operations of 643 major corporations rose 5% from the 1988 second quarter.  Net income climbed 4%, compared with 10% in the first quarter and 20% in the fourth quarter of 1988.  Reported profits were boosted by a pair of misleading factors, as they had been in the first quarter.  Price increases raised inventory profits, but these are to some extent illusory, as the inventory usually will have to be replaced at higher cost.  The 1986 Tax Reform Act, moreover, continues to limit the amounts that companies can charge against earnings.  As Christopher Caton, a McGraw-Hill/DRI economist, says, this increases reported profits and leads to higher federal taxes.  Richard B. Berner, an economist at Salomon Brothers, looks for a sustained decline in corporate cash flow-after-tax profits plus depreciation allowances.  "By Labor Day," he says, "cash flow will be at its lowest level since late 1986.  This shrinkage threatens the growth of business investment, one of the few demand sectors still showing sustained vitality."  Consumer-oriented companies are usually expected to out-perform other corporations in a slowdown or a recession, but that may not be the case this year.  Economists at Merrill Lynch note that wholesale prices have risen about two percentage points more than retail prices in the past year.  "As a result," they say, "retail margins are being squeezed."  Among major groups, auto companies' second-quarter profits sagged and oil-industry results were overshadowed by Exxon's $850 million charge resulting from the Valdez oil spill in March.  Computer concerns and steelmakers reported lower second-quarter net income, while the aerospace sector posted mixed results.  The auto slump took its toll on Big Three earnings, but the worst is yet to come.  General Motors' net income dropped 3% and Ford posted a 15% decline.  Chrysler, which reported weak earnings a year earlier, had a 7% rise this year, but a top company executive painted a troublesome profit picture for the rest of the year.  "I can't give you any assurance of continuing year-over-year {earnings} gains," said R.S. Miller Jr., executive vice president and chief financial officer.  What's causing the slump to bite hard into Big Three earnings is the increase in Japanese auto production in the U.S.  The Big Three will build 18% fewer cars in the fourth quarter than a year earlier, forecasts Ward's Automotive Reports, a trade journal.  Meanwhile, Japanese car production in the U.S. will jump 41%.  Exxon's charge to cover its estimated out-of-pocket costs for cleaning the Alaskan shoreline and waters wiped out most of the company's quarterly net income, reducing it to the lowest profit for any quarter in 20 years.  Aside from the spill, Exxon's operations, like those of most major integrated companies, were strong.  Higher crude prices boosted production profits.  Gasoline-refining margins and petrochemical prices continued strong.  Toward the end of the period, however, and through July, the fundamentals worsened as crude prices fell and gasoline and chemical margins narrowed sharply.  Mobil had a $140 million charge related to the sale of operations in South Africa.  Chevron net fell mostly because of $148 million of special gains a year earlier.  Texaco and Amoco also had special year-earlier gains.  Most computer companies had a rough quarter; Wang, for instance, posted a $374.7 million loss, including restructuring and tax charges.  Poor demand in the U.S. and the stronger dollar hurt the industry.  In addition, mainframe companies got into a price war, and demand for minicomputers remained weak.  Supercomputer makers had an especially tough time, as Cray found demand soft and Control Data took a special charge to get out of the business.  But IBM posted an earnings gain of 39%; the rise was just 8% after adjusting the year-earlier results for a restructuring charge and a gain on a sale.  IBM had its first significant revenue gain in the U.S. in years, and got a strong performance from its AS/400 minicomputer line -- which wasn't yet introduced a year earlier.  The industry's situation should change little this quarter.  A wide-ranging performance by aerospace and defense companies reflected a boom in airliner orders and the poor state of military contracting.  "The defense-business environment is very tough," said Jerry Cantwell, an analyst with Wertheim Schroder & Co.  "And on the commercial side, it's almost totally the opposite."  General Dynamics, one of several companies hit during the quarter by overruns on fixed-price Pentagon pacts, took an after-tax charge of $50 million to reflect excess costs on an attack submarine program.  Lockheed's drop in profit was triggered by write-downs for overruns on two programs and the near phase-out of a third.  McDonnell Douglas attributed its stunning deficit to a variety of factors, including a $72 million write-down to reflect overruns on its C-17 cargo plane.  Northrop was hurt by a $150 million special provision stemming from additional costs incurred to complete a classified project.  Analysts' forecasts continue to be grim for the defense side and even more robust for the commercial.  Mr. Cantwell said that for military contractors, "there is no relief in sight."  He added, "The only way it will get easier is if the industry can cut costs even further."  But in the jetliner arena, several Boeing and McDonnell Douglas programs now strained by manufacturing inefficiencies should begin to work better by the end of the year.  Hurt by slowing demand, higher raw-material costs and only moderate price gains, steelmakers posted lower profits.  In the year-earlier period, producers benefited from higher prices, inventory buildup and relatively low raw-material costs.  Still, steelmakers in the latest quarter generated higher profits per ton of steel shipped than in the first quarter.  That reflected the tapering off of certain cost increases and the buildup of inventory by some customers.  Steel's outlook is weak for the typically sluggish third quarter.  Some steelmakers fared better than others.  Armco benefited from extraordinary gains, in large part from a joint venture.  Allegheny Ludlum continued to see robust demand for its specialty-steel market, while Worthington Industries' processed steel benefited from strong demand for pressure cylinders, as well as promising results for new retail-oriented products.  Profit at Inland Industries fell as it lost orders when contract talks stalled and as service-center volume declined.  Bethlehem Steel had a special $50 million charge.  Here are the second-quarter profits for various industry groups and comparisons with the year-earlier quarter.  When individual companies report for three-month periods other than calendar quarters, the nearest comparable periods are used.  In all the tables, 000s are omitted.  ---  BASIC MATERIALS  @ 2ND QTR. 1989 2ND QTR. 1988 % CHG.  @ 5,536,755 5,183,032 + 7  While steelmakers posted lower earnings, some aluminum companies enjoyed another quarter of robust profits despite sluggish consumer durables and construction markets.  They were aided by strong demand in aerospace and can-sheet markets.  Aluminum Co. of America was again bolstered by its overseas alumina operations.  Amax, though posting a 45% drop in net because of a year-earlier gain of $125 million, turned in a strong operating performance led by aluminum.  Copper companies generally reported strong earnings growth, as prices increased.  Some companies with coal interests said stoppages at mines in sympathy with a United Mine Workers strike at Pittston hurt earnings.  Looking to the third quarter, Peter Anker, analyst at First Boston, thinks copper companies "are going to do reasonably well."  Gold companies were hurt as prices declined substantially from a year earlier.  Although Homestake Mining posted an earnings increase, profit from continuing operations declined 67%.  Forest-products concerns showed modest improvement in the second quarter, boosted by increased wood prices.  Georgia-Pacific's profit jumped 46%, partly because of increased capacity and an acquisition.  Weyerhaeuser's profit was helped by strong paper and pulp markets but hurt by newsprint discounting.  Demand for forest products was high in the Western U.S. and overseas, Weyerhaeuser said.  Champion International, posting a 1% rise in profit, was hampered by restarting certain operations and softening newsprint prices.  Louisiana-Pacific's 23% gain was helped by increased prices for building products.  The company expects continuing price increases this quarter.  Boise Cascade's strong results in its building-products segment offset weakness in its paper-products business.  In the paper industry, Kimberly-Clark was hurt by newsprint discounting, increased fiber costs and a maintenance shutdown at a pulp mill.  International Paper was helped by acquisitions, increasing pulp prices and strong demand for paperboard and packaging.  Mead's net fell because of restructuring; the company expects demand to be flat or slightly higher for the rest of the year.  The chemical industry is finding it harder to post record earnings quarter after quarter, though results vary widely.  The second period saw declining profits at some big producers of commodity chemicals.  Rising raw-material costs and lower selling prices are slimming the swollen margins of recent years.  At Quantum, a producer of polyethylene and polypropylene, profit from continuing operations skidded 42%; the company had a nonrecurring gain of $129.4 million.  METALS  -- STEEL  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 6 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Allegheny Ludlum 36,685 26,263 + 40  @ Armco Inc 75,600 39,700 + 90  @ Bethlehem Steel 84,100 150,500 - 44  @ Inland Steel Ind 45,327 79,924 - 43  @ Nucor Corp 16,252 18,882 - 14  @ Worthington Indus 20,818 19,478 + 7  @ TOTAL 278,782 334,747 - 17  @ -- ALUMINUM  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 4 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Aluminum Co of Amer 285,200 237,600 + 20  @ AMAX Inc 130,900 237,900 - 45  @ Maxxam Inc 26,700 9,800 + 172  @ Reynolds Metals 150,700 134,800 + 12  @ TOTAL 593,500 620,100 - 4  @ -- OTHER NONFERROUS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 5 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Asarco Inc 50,769 43,423 + 17  @ Brush Wellman Inc 9,000 8,200 + 10  @ Cyprus Minerals 61,700 42,900 + 44  @ Magma Copper Co 13,020 11,745 + 11  @ Phelps Dodge Corp 126,400 92,800 + 36  @ TOTAL 260,889 199,068 + 31  @ -- MINING, DIVERSIFIED  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 2 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Cleveland-Cliffs 17,900 12,700 + 41  @ Freeport McMoRan 30,751 95,146 - 68  @ TOTAL 48,651 107,846 - 55  @ -- PRECIOUS METALS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 4 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ ASA Ltd 10,478 13,007 - 19  @ Battle Mtn Gold 8,142 16,121 - 49  @ Hecla Mining -3,181 3,019 ...  @ Homestake Mining 20,920 19,239 + 9  @ TOTAL 36,359 51,386 - 29  @ LUMBER AND PAPER  @ -- FOREST PRODUCTS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 7 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Boise Cascade 75,260 72,230 + 4  @ Champion Int'l 113,874 112,193 + 1  @ Georgia Pacific 172,000 118,000 + 46  @ Louisiana Pacific 48,400 39,300 + 23  @ Potlatch Corp 25,717 24,538 + 5  @ Weyerhaeuser Co 154,863 150,681 + 3  @ Willamette Indus 47,073 42,318 + 11  @ TOTAL 637,187 559,260 + 14  @ -- PAPER  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 11 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Bowater Inc 37,982 40,802 - 7  @ Consolidated Paper 43,621 39,013 + 12  @ Glatfelter (P H) 24,846 21,002 + 18  @ Great Northern Nk 90,200 85,300 + 6  @ Int'l Paper Co 229,000 188,000 + 22  @ James River Corp 74,282 59,056 + 26  @ Kimberly-Clark 101,300 100,100 + 1  @ Mead Corp 62,200 73,000 - 15  @ Scott Paper Co 71,500 75,300 - 5  @ Union Camp Corp 81,429 74,080 + 10  @ Westvaco Corp 58,165 45,219 + 29  @ TOTAL 874,525 800,872 + 9  @ OTHERS  @ -- CHEMICALS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 24 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Air Products & Ch 53,358 52,288 + 2  @ American Cyanamid 110,400 99,500 + 11  @ Aristech Chemical 18,600 35,300 - 47  @ Betz Labs 14,068 12,042 + 17  @ Cabot Corp 9,560 16,554 - 42  @ Dow Chemical 728,000 624,000 + 17  @ DuPont de Nemours 714,000 639,000 + 12  @ Ethyl Corp 57,565 56,899 + 1  @ Georgia Gulf Corp 49,331 47,526 + 4  @ Goodrich (B F) 52,300 60,400 - 13  @ Grace (W R) & Co 44,069 64,368 - 32  @ Great Lakes Chem 31,231 25,022 + 25  @ Hercules Inc 41,635 47,335 - 12  @ Int'l Min & Chem 41,300 17,300 + 139  @ Lubrizol Corp 26,016 22,306 + 17  @ Monsanto Co 241,000 220,000 + 10  @ Morton International 23,292 26,474 - 12  @ Nalco Chemical 29,668 26,036 + 14  @ Olin Corp 35,000 29,000 + 21  @ Pennwalt Corp 20,669 12,746 + 62  @ Quantum Chemical 175,400 85,100 + 106  @ Rohm & Haas Co 69,300 75,800 - 9  @ Union Carbide 186,000 187,000 - 1  @ Vista Chemical 35,100 27,757 + 26  @ TOTAL 2,806,862 2,509,753 + 12  ---  ENERGY  @ 2ND QTR. 1989 2ND QTR. 1988 % CHG.  @ 4,172,032 5,529,699 25  While petroleum-industry profits were slipping on Exxon's spill, declines in domestic oil and natural-gas exploration activity continued to hamper the recoveries of major oil-service companies and contract drillers.  And although the major oil companies say they don't plan to increase their exploration spending in the U.S. soon, several large service companies have managed to become profitable through consolidations and restructurings.  Contract-drilling companies have cut their losses, but there remains a large oversupply of rigs.  Natural-gas-pipeline companies again reported a wide spectrum of results, littered with special gains and charges.  Enron, which operates the nation's largest natural-gas-pipeline system, said its net fell because of special year-earlier gains.  It registered an increase in pipeline results.  About $33.9 million of Sonat's net came from settling a rate case.  Continuing labor unrest hurt coal-company earnings, and the third-quarter outlook is clouded by lingering effects of lost shipments.  Work stoppages, staged in support of the United Mine Workers' four-month strike against Pittston, shut down most union mines during much of June and July.  Millions of tons of coal shipments were missed by major producers.  @ OIL  @ -- INTEGRATED OILS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 9 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Amoco Corp 497,000 667,000 - 25  @ Atlantic Richfield 467,000 400,000 + 17  @ Chevron Corp 404,000 520,000 - 22  @ Exxon Corp 160,000 1,200,000 - 87  @ Mobil Corp 401,000 519,000 - 23  @ Phillips Petroleum 197,000 170,000 + 16  @ Sun Co 105,000 -201,000 ...  @ Texaco Inc 366,000 464,000 - 21  @ Unocal Corp 120,000 64,000 + 88  @ TOTAL 2,717,000 3,803,000 - 29  @ -- SECONDARY OILS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 14 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Amerada Hess 133,459 -23,460 ...  @ Anadarko Petroleum 5,200 - 2,400 ...  @ Ashland Oil 43,510 56,931 - 24  @ Kerr-McGee Corp 34,704 35,876 - 3  @ Louisiana Land 5,500 -17,200 ...  @ MAPCO Inc 28,361 29,243 - 3  @ Murphy Oil Corp 16,763 9,400 + 78  @ Noble Affiliates 12,276 3,017 + 307  @ Occidental Petrol 80,000 77,000 + 4  @ Oryx Energy 17,000 -273,000 ...  @ Pennzoil 118,045 1,388,701 - 91  @ Quaker State Corp 7,206 2,021 + 257  @ Union Texas Petro 85,900 28,800 + 198  @ USX Corp 250,000 213,000 + 17  @ TOTAL 837,924 1,527,929 - 45  @ -- DRILLERS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 4 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Energy Service 426 -1,077 ...  @ Helmerich & Payne 5,797 5,345 + 8  @ Parker Drilling -5,114 -16,690 ...  @ Rowan Cos -4,607 -16,275 ...  @ TOTAL -3,498 -28,697 ...  @ -- OILFIELD EQUIP/SVCS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 4 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Baker Hughes 16,713 13,498 + 24  @ Dresser Indust 36,700 24,500 + 50  @ Halliburton Co 31,400 24,700 + 27  @ Schlumberger Ltd 126,824 144,035 - 12  @ TOTAL 211,637 206,733 + 2  @ OTHERS  @ -- PIPELINES  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 7 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Burlington Resources 306,200 -98,953 ...  @ Coastal Corp 35,300 30,600 + 15  @ Enron Corp 10,200 31,200 - 67  @ Enserch Corp 4,449 852 + 422  @ Panhandle Eastern -4,049 -1,223 ...  @ Sonat Inc 43,801 21,577 + 103  @ Williams Cos -5,900 -2,200 ...  @ TOTAL 390,001 -18,147 ...  @ -- COAL  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 4 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ NACCO Industries 13,365 16,325 - 18  @ Penn Virginia Corp 1,923 7,810 - 75  @ Pittston Co 4,485 13,734 - 67  @ Westmoreland Coal -805 1,012 ...  @ TOTAL 18,968 38,881 - 51  ---  INDUSTRIAL  @ 2ND QTR. 1989 2ND QTR. 1988 % CHG.  @ 3,972,681 3,495,518 + 14  The rail group's earnings soared, with comparisons being helped by a year-earlier net restructuring charge of $492 million at CSX and a $98.9 million loss from discontinued operations at Burlington Northern.  But operating earnings generally fell because of an industrywide 1% decline in carloadings.  Reduced results from transportation and real-estate operations at Santa Fe Pacific were only somewhat offset by improved performance of its natural-resources group.  Santa Fe's year-earlier results were inflated by profit from discontinued operations.  Norfolk Southern and CSX both benefited from strong export coal business, but the outlook is clouded by the Pittston strike.  The trucking group's earnings rose slightly, as the major less-than-truckload carriers gained market share from marginal competitors.  But Consolidated Freightways' earnings declined because of expenses from its recent acquisition of Emery Air Freight.  Analysts predict rate discounting will cut third-quarter net.  Shipment volume for air-freight couriers rose, but the sector's earnings fell because of declines at Federal Express.  Marine-transportation companies were hurt by lower-than-expected cargo volumes, with American President citing increased costs related to expansion.  Transportation-equipment producers reported higher profits, despite some slowing late in the quarter in the previously extremely strong sales of heavy trucks.  Eaton reported slightly lower operating profit but net rose because of a special item in 1988.  Factory-machinery profits in the second quarter were lowered by production problems at Cincinnati Milacron, which is restructuring its machine-tool operations.  Those problems are expected to affect third-period profit.  Profits of heavy-construction and farm-machinery producers jumped, mainly because of a 51% rise at Deere.  The worst of the farm recession and drought appear to be over, and farmers are buying more tractors.  Farmers still aren't splurging, but Deere has whacked costs enough to be highly profitable at current volume levels.  Caterpillar reported a 3% profit decline despite a 17% sales surge; Steven J. Colbert of Prudential-Bache forecasts an about 20% drop in Caterpillar's second-half profit.  Electronic-component makers had a checkered performance, with giant Westinghouse reporting a 6% profit rise and AMP a 22% decline.  More than half of AMP's drop came from special charges.  The slump in housing starts lingered through May, and the rebound in June wasn't enough to prevent a drop in earnings at some building-materials companies.  Although most are operating at higher plant utilization than a year ago, analysts are cautious.  The reason: June's 7% rise in housing starts is credited to sharply lower interest rates, and the outlook for rates is uncertain.  Net fell at some makers of containers and packaging, largely because of unsuccessful attempts to raise prices for containerboard and other products.  Results were also hurt by unexpected price weakness in the newsprint market and by increases in the cost of wood at some mills.  Federal Paper's profit soared, boosted by productivity gains and cost savings at a mill in Augusta, Ga.  Profits at heavy-construction companies rose slightly overall -- in line with analysts' expectations.  Some analysts expect the segment's profit will be roughly flat in the second half.  For industrial and commercial services, profits generally rose as customers sought temporary workers and certain services in lieu of adding full-time workers to their staffs.  Profits also generally advanced for diversified industrial companies, boosted by stronger pricing.  Earnings were helped by lower tax rates and by engineering and construction contracts for roads and environmental contracts sparked by regulatory requirements.  But short-term prospects for new contracts before the end of 1989 aren't bright.  @ TRANSPORTATION  @ -- RAILROADS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 6 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Burlington North 55,969 -41,005 ...  @ Consolidated Rail 82,000 97,000 - 15  @ CSX Corp 151,000 -160,000 ...  @ Norfolk Southern 173,700 158,200 + 10  @ Santa Fe Pacific 2,700 101,200 - 97  @ Union Pacific 152,100 153,600 - 1  @ TOTAL 617,469 308,995 + 100  @ -- TRUCKING  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 5 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Carolina Freight 2,091 -275 ...  @ Consolidated Frght 8,406 23,680 - 65  @ Hunt (J B) Transp 7,924 8,867 - 11  @ Roadway Services 26,220 15,083 + 74  @ Yellow Freight Sys 18,463 14,024 + 32  @ TOTAL 63,104 61,379 + 3  @ -- AIR-FREIGHT COURIERS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 3 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Air Express Intl 2,483 2,320 + 7  @ Airborne Freight 4,375 1,042 + 320  @ Federal Express 40,973 54,837 - 25  @ TOTAL 47,831 58,199 - 18  @ -- MARINE TRANSPORT  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 2 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Alexander & Bald 21,505 52,170 - 59  @ American President 5,700 14,700 - 61  @ TOTAL 27,205 66,870 - 59  @ EQUIPMENT  @ -- TRANSPORTATION  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 5 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Cummins Engine 23,857 1,736 +1274  @ Eaton Corp 63,400 46,600 + 36  @ Navistar Int'l 35,400 70,000 - 49  @ Paccar Inc 47,477 43,570 + 9  @ Trinity Industries 13,800 5,100 + 171  @ TOTAL 183,934 167,006 + 10  @ -- FACTORY EQUIPMENT  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 4 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Cincinnati Milac 5,238 8,270 - 37  @ Interlake Corp 9,943 10,486 - 5  @ Keystone Int'l 8,132 8,384 - 3  @ Nordson Corp 9,651 8,641 + 12  @ TOTAL 32,964 35,781 - 8  @ -- HEAVY MACHINERY  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 4 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Caterpillar Inc 141,000 145,000 - 3  @ Clark Equipment 17,094 13,072 + 31  @ Deere & Co 130,470 86,432 + 51  @ Harnischfeger Ind 17,345 13,940 + 24  @ TOTAL 305,909 258,444 + 18  @ -- ELECT. COMPONENTS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 7 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ AMP Inc 65,799 84,039 - 22  @ Emerson Electric 153,800 137,200 + 12  @ Grainger (W W) 30,329 29,060 + 4  @ Square D Co 32,197 31,103 + 4  @ Tecumseh Products 25,472 18,076 + 41  @ Thomas & Betts 14,114 16,080 - 12  @ Westinghouse Elec 228,300 215,300 + 6  @ TOTAL 550,011 530,858 + 4  -- HEAVY CONSTRUCTION  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 4 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Foster Wheeler 10,863 7,615 + 43  @ Kasler Corp 28 662 - 96 ...  @ Morrison Knudsen 7,241 -53,288 ...  @ Stone & Webster 6,408 10,571 - 39  @ TOTAL 24,540 -34,440 ...  @ OTHERS  @ -- BUILDING MATERIALS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 8 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Armstrong World 47,900 46,200 + 4  @ CalMat Co 17,111 11,510 + 49  @ Manville Corp 69,399 33,084 + 110  @ Masco Corp 76,800 88,600 - 13  @ Owens-Corning 54,000 52,000 + 4  @ Sherwin-Williams 38,696 36,136 + 7  @ USG Corp 9,411 40,537 - 77  @ Vulcan Materials 43,554 45,985 - 5  @ TOTAL 356,871 354,052 + 1  @ -- CONTAINERS/PKGING  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 5 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Ball Corp 15,000 17,000 - 12  @ Crown Cork & Seal 27,204 27,956 - 3  @ Fed'l Paper Board 51,395 28,847 + 78  @ Sonoco Products 28,555 26,260 + 9  @ Stone Container 63,600 78,100 - 19  @ TOTAL 185,754 178,163 + 4  @ -- INDUST/COMM SERV  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 16 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Comdisco Inc 29,000 21,000 + 38  @ Commerce Clearing 12,888 17,807 - 28  @ Deluxe Corp 34,211 29,759 + 15  @ Donnelley & Sons 50,289 45,495 + 11  @ Dun & Bradstreet 150,416 116,404 + 29  @ Ecolab Inc 11,867 16,174 - 27  @ Equifax Inc 11,997 9,532 + 26  @ Flightsafety Int 16,344 12,654 + 29  @ Harland (John H) 15,012 12,782 + 17  @ Kelly Services 18,105 15,292 + 18  @ Nat'l Education -1,506 7,552 ...  @ Nat'l Service Ind 24,202 22,000 + 10  @ Ryder System Inc 32,475 56,679 - 43  @ Safety-Kleen 10,459 9,007 + 16  @ ServiceMaster L P 18,129 17,005 + 7  @ XTRA Corp 41 4,268 - 99  @ TOTAL 433,929 413,410 + 5  @ -- POLLUTION MANAGEMENT  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 5 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Browning-Ferris 71,170 61,411 + 16  @ Ogden Corp 15,656 14,888 + 5  @ Rollins Environ -33,484 9,455 ...  @ Waste Management 141,914 115,472 + 23  @ Wheelabrator Group 7,100 4,900 + 45  @ TOTAL 202,356 206,126 - 2  @ -- DIVERSIFIED INDUST.  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 19 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Allied Signal 166,000 128,000 + 30  @ Combustion Engine 27,457 15,205 + 81  @ Cooper Industries 71,800 60,400 + 19  @ Crane Co 16,144 20,926 - 23  @ Dexter Corp 12,598 13,252 - 5  @ Dover Corp 42,101 37,905 + 11  @ Engelhard Corp 15,122 14,133 + 7  @ FMC Corp 50,900 37,800 + 35  @ Harsco Corp -14,531 21,525 ...  @ Illinois Tool Wks 44,404 39,326 + 13  @ Ingersoll-Rand 52,400 40,100 + 31  @ Norton Co 30,100 26,600 + 13  @ Penn Central Corp 26,900 23,800 + 13  @ PPG Industries 127,300 133,800 - 5  @ Raychem Corp 12,968 52,798 - 75  @ Stanley Works 30,800 26,100 + 18  @ Tenneco Inc 180,000 154,000 + 17  @ Trinova Corp 23,288 24,366 - 4  @ Tyco Labs Inc 25,053 20,639 + 21  @ TOTAL 940,804 890,675 + 6  ---  CONSUMER, CYCLICAL  @ 2ND QTR. 1989 2ND QTR. 1988 % CHG.  @ 8,326,436 7,699,415 + 8  While auto makers were slipping, another consumer-cyclical industry -- home builders -- was prospering.  Sales surged, buoyed by declining mortgage-interest rates this spring and slight improvements in formerly moribund regional economies.  Once again, sales were strongest in the West, paced by California.  Analysts expect retailers to report mixed results for the fiscal second quarter, which ended in July for most of them.  Apparel chains will do better than most general merchants.  Limited's net, for example, is expected to double.  Sears Roebuck reported a 21% increase for the second calendar quarter; but profit at the company's merchandise group rose only 2.5% after a one-time gain and a change in the way Sears calculates adjustments for the effects of inflation on its inventories.  K mart, meanwhile, is expected to post a 5% decline.  Although K mart's sales improved in July from their sluggish pace earlier in the quarter, Walter Loeb of Morgan Stanley said the chain is operating on a lower profit margin because it cut prices on a number of items earlier this year.  Dayton Hudson and Wal-Mart are expected to report strong gains.  Earnings are also likely to rise at May, Penney, Woolworth and Nordstrom.  Most apparel companies continued to benefit from better retail sales of their goods and from more-conservative manufacturing positions.  Interco posted a loss on weaker footwear sales and higher interest charges.  Hartmarx cited a sluggish performance at its specialty stores and higher interest expense.  Lodging and casino companies reported uneven results.  Hotel units generally reported operating gains, while many casino operators posted moderate increases in operating earnings following a weak first quarter.  Marriott's net income rose 5% despite higher interest costs from its share buy-back program, reflecting gains in its lodging, contract-services and restaurant units.  Holiday Corp. reported improved operating income from both hotels and casinos, despite a sharp drop in net from the year-earlier quarter, which included a $154 million special gain.  Results for recreational-products companies were mixed.  Most entertainment companies reported healthy gains while demand for boats showed continued weakness.  "Movie companies are having a very hot summer and box-office sales have soared to new records," said Harold Vogel, an analyst at Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Hasbro termed the retail toy market "sluggish" but said it is "cautiously optimistic" about the rest of the year.  Polaroid's improved results reflect a sharp cut in the number of employees.  Newspaper publishers continue to be helped by falling newsprint prices, although some still suffer from weak advertising sales.  Broadcasters, on the other hand, still are paying for last year's writers' strike, but they should get a boost later from a big rebound in television-ad sales.  "There was a wide disparity in earnings of newspaper publishers," said Peter Appert, media analyst for C.J. Lawrence, Morgan Grenfell Inc. "Gannett, Knight-Ridder and Washington Post all reported strong operating-income growth, but it was primarily on the benefits of declining newsprint prices, which have declined at least 10% since the end of last year.  Some other companies, including New York Times, had soft earnings because of especially weak advertising markets in their areas."  Knight-Ridder's net was lifted by the sale of a newspaper and five TV stations.  Both Warner Communications and Time -- which is acquiring Warner -- posted gains.  Most airlines reported substantial improvements in second-quarter resultsthe result of higher fares and improved traffic.  Many carriers also benefited from the fallout from the strike at Eastern Airlines.  "It was a terrific quarter," said Jack Hunter, an airline analyst at Howe Barnes Investments, Chicago.  Not for Eastern, or its parent Texas Air.  Even after a $250 million gain on the sale of its East Coast shuttle, Texas Air posted a loss, the legacy of the Eastern strike.  Continental Airlines, another Texas Air unit, posted a modest profit, but not nearly enough to offset the cost of Eastern's strike and subsequent bankruptcy-law filing.  Other carriers reported robust results.  Delta's fiscal fourth-quarter earnings soared 85%.  Most U.S. carriers were able to raise ticket prices despite fare cuts Eastern initiated.  At UAL Corp.'s United Airlines, yield per mile, a measure of what passengers pay to fly, jumped 14%.  USAir Group attributed its higher net primarily to stronger traffic.  @ AUTOS  @ -- MANUFACTURING  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 3 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Chrysler 341,000 320,000 + 7  @ Ford Motor 1,407,100 1,662,800 - 15  @ General Motors 1,454,200 1,506,700 - 3  @ TOTAL 3,202,300 3,489,500 - 8  @ -- PARTS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 8 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Dana Corp 42,900 42,700 0  @ Echlin Inc 13,544 17,901 - 24  @ Genuine Parts 50,008 45,460 + 10  @ Goodyear Tire 27,100 134,900 - 80  @ Johnson Controls 23,500 24,300 - 3  @ Masco Industries 28,480 31,760 - 10  @ Snap-On Tools 27,315 29,149 - 6  @ Timken Co 30,166 17,660 + 71  @ TOTAL 243,013 343,830 - 29  @ HOUSING  @ -- HOME BUILDERS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 3 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Centex Corp 15,265 6,521 + 134  @ Kaufman & Broad Home 19,990 11,496 + 74  @ U S Home Corp 406 1,911 - 79  @ TOTAL 35,661 19,928 + 79  @ -- FURNISHINGS/APPLIANCES  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 5 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Black & Decker -5,200 21,400 ...  @ Leggett & Platt 12,065 10,105 + 19  @ Maytag Corp 28,200 35,800 - 21  @ Shaw Industries 17,234 12,956 + 33  @ Whirlpool Corp 50,400 41,400 + 22  @ TOTAL 102,699 121,661 - 16  @ RETAILING  @ -- APPAREL RETAILERS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 8 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Gap Inc 15,053 4,414 + 241  @ General Cinema 893,871 35,929 +2388  @ Limited Inc 45,189 23,864 + 89  @ Mercantile Stores 27,031 27,749 - 3  @ Nordstrom Inc 22,973 19,205 + 20  @ Petrie Stores Inc 7,211 14,830 - 51  @ TJX Cos 18,529 18,022 + 3  @ U S Shoe Corp 7,693 3,095 + 149  @ TOTAL 1,037,550 147,108 + 605  @ -- BROADLINE RETAILERS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 9 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Carter Hawley Hale -3,235 -4,414 ...  @ Dayton Hudson 40,000 31,000 + 29  @ Dillard Dept Strs 19,582 16,018 + 22  @ K Mart 94,100 120,800 - 22  @ May Dept Stores 63,000 62,000 + 2  @ Penney (J C) 128,000 131,000 - 2  @ Sears Roebuck & Co 391,200 322,200 + 21  @ Wal-Mart Stores 198,289 153,551 + 29  @ Woolworth (F W) 36,000 35,000 + 3  @ TOTAL 966,936 867,155 + 12  @ -- DRUG-BASED RETAILERS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 3 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ McKesson Corp 24,000 23,100 + 4  @ Rite Aid 24,369 23,630 + 3  @ Walgreen 38,502 30,798 + 25  @ TOTAL 86,871 77,528 + 12  @ -- SPECIALTY RETAILERS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 8 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Circuit City 10,735 8,953 + 20  @ Home Depot Inc 25,928 19,245 + 35  @ Josten's Inc 31,138 27,868 + 12  @ Lowes Cos 14,600 15,100 - 3  @ Melville Corp 61,626 60,409 + 2  @ Pep Boys-M M J 7,626 10,032 - 24  @ Price Co 21,000 19,000 + 11  @ Toys R Us 27,149 22,509 + 21  @ TOTAL 199,802 183,116 + 9  @ LODGING AND RECREATION  @ -- LODGING  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 4 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Hilton Hotels 42,000 40,800 + 3  @ Holiday Corp 24,874 99,867 - 75  @ La Quinta Motor Inns 1,745 65 +2585  @ Marriott Corp 67,000 64,000 + 5  @ TOTAL 135,619 204,732 - 34  @ -- RESTAURANTS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 4 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ McDonald's Corp 195,992 177,243 + 11  @ Shoney's Inc 4,532 14,295 - 68  @ TCBY Enterprises 8,923 5,716 + 56  @ Wendy's Int'l 9,624 9,612 0  @ TOTAL 219,071 206,866 + 6  @ -- CASINOS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 3 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Caesars World 17,363 14,684 + 18  @ Circus Circus 19,024 30,034 - 37  @ Showboat 1,713 -2,263 ...  @ TOTAL 38,100 42,455 - 10  @ -- RECREATIONAL PRODS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 9 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Brunswick Corp 20,500 78,900 - 74  @ Carnival Cruise 41,600 52,000 - 20  @ Columbia Pictures 2,003 4,328 - 54  @ Disney (Walt) 193,295 165,039 + 17  @ Eastman Kodak 60,000 390,000 - 85  @ Hasbro Inc 18,155 16,462 + 10  @ MCA Inc 41,972 8,081 + 419  @ Outboard Marine 6,844 28,345 - 76  @ Polaroid 42,700 24,800 + 72  @ TOTAL 427,069 767,955 - 44  @ MEDIA AND ADVERTISING  @ -- MEDIA  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 13 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Belo (A H) 9,654 6,065 + 59  @ Capital Cities/ABC 140,153 113,886 + 23  @ CBS Inc 118,800 128,700 - 8  @ Dow Jones & Co 48,354 49,478 - 2  @ Gannett Co 112,104 97,526 + 15  @ Knight-Ridder 126,853 44,998 + 182  @ LIN Broadcasting 27,559 22,356 + 23  @ McGraw-Hill 50,770 44,826 + 13  @ Multimedia Inc 10,787 8,221 + 31  @ New York Times 41,312 45,073 - 8  @ Times Mirror 85,000 79,000 + 8  @ Tribune Co 69,220 63,614 + 9  @ Washington Post 60,486 49,305 + 23  @ TOTAL 901,052 753,048 + 20  @ -- ADVERTISING  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 3 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Interpublic Group 28,300 24,172 + 17  @ Mickelberry Corp 290 254 + 14  @ Omnicom Group 14,126 12,351 + 14  @ TOTAL 42,716 36,777 + 16  @ OTHERS  @ -- AIRLINES  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 7 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Alaska Air Group 10,539 9,290 + 13  @ AMR Corp 177,900 141,400 + 26  @ Delta Air Lines 190,779 13,277 + 85  @ Southwest Airlines 19,237 15,125 + 27  @ Texas Air Corp -109,300 -255,900 ...  @ UAL Corp 141,063 124,167 + 14  @ USAir Group 100,689 92,487 + 9  @ TOTAL 530,907 229,846 + 131  @ -- TEXTILES/APPAREL  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 9 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Brown Group 7,314 6,212 + 18  @ Hartmarx Corp 3,135 8,310 - 62  @ Interco Inc -31,600 30,689 ...  @ Liz Claiborne 28,790 18,291 + 57  @ Nike Inc 36,458 30,468 + 2  @ Reebok Int'l 40,752 45,421 - 10  @ Russell Corp 9,994 8,472 + 18  @ Springs Industries 16,714 14,889 + 12  @ V F Corp 45,513 45,158 + 1  @ TOTAL 157,070 207,910 - 24  ---  @ CONSUMER, NONCYCLICAL  @ 2ND QTR. 1989 2ND QTR. 1988 % CHG.  @ 6,204,503 5,600,857 + 11  What didn't happen -- another drought -- boosted earnings growth for food companies.  Consumer-food packagers such as Kellogg and pet-food giant Ralston Purina realized significant gross margin gains as good weather kept commodity prices flat.  ConAgra's prepared-foods business achieved a 43% rise in operating earnings on a 15% sales gain.  Gerber benefited from a baby-food sales surge tied to special promotions.  Some food retailers were upbeat, led by a 19% profit gain by industry giant Great Atlantic & Pacific Tea, a 29% jump by Giant Food and a 25% surge by Albertson's.  They credit their increases to store expansions and cost-cutting programs.  Grocery chains that didn't do well in the quarter attributed their problems to extraordinary factors.  American Stores, which saw its quarter's profit fall 20%, said the drop largely resulted from interest expense associated with its 1988 acquisition of Lucky Stores.  Amid a rainier summer, the growth of domestic soft-drink volume slipped a bit, to 3%, but improved pricing helped CocaCola and PepsiCo post earnings gains.  PepsiCo was also aided by higher snack-food and restaurant earnings.  Rising raw-material costs and financing expenses accounted for Coca-Cola Enterprises' profit slide.  Coca-Cola's third-quarter earnings will rise about 17%, estimates First Boston's Martin Romm, while PepsiCo's net, after the dilution effects from acquisitions, will rise about 10%.  Where health-care-service profits improved, the gains reflected the companies' shift into high-growth specialty services and higher prices for general-hospital care.  Continued strong demand for psychiatric services helped Community Psychiatric Centers and National Medical Enterprises.  National Medical's net was hurt by a $49.3 million loss from discontinued operations; profit from continuing operations rose 28%.  American Medical International, which agreed to be acquired last month, had a 37% earnings decline due largely to poor cost controls while management was preoccupied with the sale.  Among medical-supply companies, Becton Dickinson's net was bolstered by a special $44.7 million gain; profit from continuing operations was flat.  Sales and earnings growth of many medical suppliers were hurt by the stronger dollar.  Profit growth at pharmaceutical companies slowed as a result of the stronger U.S. dollar abroad.  Merck said sales growth was reduced by four percentage points -- compared with one point in the previous quarter -- because of adverse foreign-currency translations.  Despite the slowing, profits jumped ahead at those companies with newer drugs selling at premium prices.  Lilly's profit surged on rocketing sales of Prozac, a new anti-depressant.  Schering-Plough, Warner-Lambert and Merck also benefited from higher-priced products.  But Bristol-Myers, Syntex, Upjohn and Pfizer were buffeted by slower sales of important drugs.  Sales were sluggish at some cosmetic companies.  Cost-cutting helped Gillette and Avon.  Gillette blamed its decline on foreign-exchange losses and on higher interest costs related to a stock buy-back.  Diana Temple, analyst at Salomon Brothers, noted that the prestige cosmetics brands have performed stronger than the mass-merchandised brands.  @ FOOD AND DRINK  @ -- FOOD  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 20 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Archer Daniels Mid 116,819 74,749 + 56  @ Borden Inc 83,947 73,717 + 14  @ Campbell Soup 43,500 22,400 + 94  @ Castle & Cooke 35,213 37,637 - 6  @ ConAgra Inc 197,878 154,698 + 28  @ CPC International 83,129 72,002 + 15  @ Dean Foods 22,163 8,327 + 166  @ Flowers Indust 7,573 17,127 - 56  @ General Mills Inc 35,600 54,900 - 35  @ Gerber Products 26,817 18,418 + 46  @ Heinz (H J) 117,201 101,697 + 15  @ Hershey Foods 25,080 28,649 - 12  @ Hormel (George A) 9,834 7,615 + 29  @ Kellogg Co 129,700 112,700 + 15  @ Lance Inc 11,033 10,887 + 1  @ McCormick & Co 8,002 3,603 + 122  @ Ralston Purina 83,800 77,200 + 9  @ Tyson Foods Inc 27,474 21,085 + 30  @ Whitman Corp 27,600 55,800 - 51  @ Wrigley (Wm) Jr 34,127 30,291 + 13  @ TOTAL 1,126,490 983,502 + 15  @ -- FOOD RETAILERS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 10 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Albertson's Inc 44,391 35,443 + 25  @ American Stores 21,515 27,056 - 20  @ Circle K Corp -23,065 14,018 ...  @ Fleming Cos 17,381 13,677 + 27  @ Food Lion 31,972 27,624 + 16  @ Giant Food 26,525 20,518 + 29  @ Great Atl & Pac 45,390 38,047 + 19  @ Kroger Co -2,526 57,065 ...  @ Super Valu Stores 41,060 38,882 + 6  @ Von's Cos -8,800 5,000 ...  @ TOTAL 193,843 277,330 - 30  @ -- BEVERAGES  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 8 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ A&W Brands Inc 1,995 1,409 + 42  @ Anheuser-Busch 233,700 211,500 + 10  @ Brown-Forman 21,255 18,949 + 12  @ Coca-Cola Btlg 1,581 2,784 - 43  @ Coca-Cola Co 345,519 303,058 + 14  @ Coca-Cola Enter 38,822 40,979 - 5  @ Coors (Adolph) 16,871 19,283 - 13  @ PepsiCo Inc 264,900 219,600 + 21  @ TOTAL 924,643 817,562 + 13  @ HEALTH CARE  @ -- HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 4 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ American Med Int 21,087 33,715 - 37  @ Community Psych 23,457 19,731 + 19  @ Humana Inc 72,267 63,820 + 13  @ Nat'l Medical Enter 5,468 20,164 - 73  @ TOTAL 122,279 137,430 - 11  @ -- MEDICAL SUPPLIES  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 5 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Abbott Labs 212,555 185,284 + 15  @ Acuson Corp 9,339 6,447 + 45  @ Bard (C R) Inc 21,800 19,800 + 10  @ Baxter Int'l 104,000 91,000 + 14  @ Becton Dickinson 86,396 42,949 + 101  @ TOTAL 434,090 345,480 + 26  @ -- PHARMACEUTICALS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 13 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ American Home Prod 236,677 215,822 + 10  @ Bausch & Lomb 27,399 23,638 + 16  @ Bristol-Myers 212,510 190,484 + 12  @ Lilly (Eli) & Co 217,100 180,700 + 20  @ Marion Labs 70,470 39,751 + 77  @ Merck & Co 396,600 316,300 + 25  @ Pfizer Inc 135,700 213,100 - 36  @ Rorer Group 12,402 11,354 + 9  @ Schering-Plough 120,500 101,000 + 19  @ Squibb Corp 133,000 114,000 + 17  @ Syntex Corp 74,800 73,600 + 2  @ Upjohn Co 94,583 87,772 + 8  @ Warner-Lambert 112,363 91,627 + 23  @ TOTAL 1,844,104 1,659,148 + 11  @ OTHERS  @ -- COSMETICS/PERSONAL CARE  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 6 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Avon Products 39,500 -82,500 ...  @ Gillette Co 62,500 67,800 - 8  @ Int'l Flavors & F 41,254 38,779 + 6  @ Neutrogena 6,275 5,384 + 17  @ Noxell Corp 11,792 11,363 + 4  @ Tambrands 26,162 24,467 + 7  @ TOTAL 187,483 65,293 + 187  @ -- HOUSEHOLD PRODUCTS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 7 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ American Brands 120,200 154,700 - 22  @ Colgate-Palmolive 73,596 65,501 + 12  @ Johnson & Johnson 297,000 271,000 + 10  @ Philip Morris Cos 745,000 611,000 + 22  @ Rubbermaid Inc 28,210 24,315 + 16  @ Universal Corp 1,805 10,367 - 83  @ UST Inc 49,967 41,782 + 20  @ TOTAL 1,315,778 1,178,665 + 12  @ -- CONSUMER SERVICES  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 4 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Block (H&R) Inc 115,491 106,106 + 9  @ CPI Corp 1,627 3,821 - 57  @ Kinder-Care Inc -71,879 14,124 ...  @ Rollins Inc 10,554 12,396 - 15  @ TOTAL 55,793 136,447 - 59  (For part two of this story see: "Quarterly Review of Corporate Earnings -- Part II" -- WSJ Aug. 7, 1989)  The Senate confirmed President Bush's choice of Janet Steiger to be chairwoman of the Federal Trade Commission.  Ms. Steiger had previously served as chair of the U.S. Postal Rate Commission.  Abbott Laboratories said it received marketing approval from the Food and Drug Administration to market a diagnostic test to detect acquired immune deficiency syndrome, or AIDS, HIV virus antigens.  Charles Weber, a spokesman for the drug company, said Abbott would begin marketing the test immediately.  The company said that the new test is an "enzyme immunoassay" that detects at least one key antigen, or protein, produced by the AIDS virus.  Other tests detect HIV antibodies, which indicate infection with the virus, but an antigen is a part of the virus itself, Abbott said.  THE THRIFT-BAILOUT BILL was sent to Bush, who is expected to sign it as soon as Wednesday.  Congress approved the landmark measure near midnight Friday following a last-minute compromise over how to finance the $166 billion rescue.  The legislation will largely dismantle the thrift industry, while the new financing plan could bring S&L deposit rates down more quickly than expected.  ---  UAL Corp. has received a takeover proposal from investor Marvin Davis for well over $200 a share, or $4.32 billion, according to people familiar with UAL.  The company's board is due to consider the proposal this week.  ---  The jobless rate fell to 5.2% in July from 5.3% the previous month, allaying fears of a recession.  There was considerable growth in new jobs, with gains in construction, manufacturing and services.  But the pace remained well below that of a year earlier.  Bond prices plunged and the dollar soared as Friday's employment report prompted speculation that interest rates aren't likely to decline soon.  The Dow Jones industrials finished down 8.16 points, at 2653.45.  ---  Corporate profits rose 4% in the second quarter, less than in previous quarters.  Analysts expect earnings to weaken in the months ahead if the economy continues to slow down.  Canadian company earnings increased 3%, reflecting a slower economy and a stronger currency.  ---  Union workers struck Nynex, Bell Atlantic and Pacific Telesis Group after negotiators couldn't agree on several thorny issues, primarily healthcare and wage packages.  It's unclear how long the strikes will last.  ---  Prime Computer agreed reluctantly to be acquired by friendly suitor J.H. Whitney for $1.13 billion, or about $74 million less than the original offer.  Whitney was unable to get financing for the higher proposal.  ---  TWA Chairman Carl Icahn signaled that a merger of his airline with another carrier may be in the offing.  But Icahn also said TWA was considering "several possible strategies." ---  Major oil-spill legislation appears to be making headway in Congress after a 14-year deadlock.  But the liability issue remains a sticking point.  ---  Oxdon Investments asked a Quebec court to block Socanav's rival $1.13 billion offer for Steinberg.  Oxdon said Socanav is acting as a front for a Quebec government agency.  ---  A disaster-relief package for U.S. farmers was approved by Congress.  The plan would provide $897 million to farms suffering crop losses this year from frost, drought and flooding.  ---  A federal judge froze the assets of two firms and three people that the SEC has accused of running an international penny-stock fraud scheme.  ---  A U.S. unit of Ames S.A. was indicted in a probe of possible bid-rigging among auto-parts suppliers.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 169,750,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2653.45, off 8.16; transportation 1250.00, off 16.89; utilities 218.18, off 0.63.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3321.95, off 54.57.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 128.93, off 0.07; spot index 128.19, off 0.10.  Dollar: 139.90 yen, up 2.65; 1.9070 marks, up 0.0344.  General Dynamics Corp. was awarded $93.5 million in contracts for F-16 aircraft support equipment for the Air Force and munitions for the Army.  McDonnell Douglas Corp. received a $32.2 million Navy contract for AV-8B aircraft.  Rockwell International Corp. won a $16.1 million Air Force contract for low-frequency communication equipment for the B-1 bomber.  Arkla Inc., a natural gas utility, said it agreed in principle with the Texas Gas Transmission Corp. unit of Houston-based Transco Energy Co., a natural gas transmission concern, to build a 225-mile pipeline system from the Arkoma Basin near Wilburton, Okla., to Glendale, Ark.  The agreement also calls for Texas Gas to purchase as much as 350 million cubic feet of natural gas a day from Arkla, under a 10-year sales pact.  Divorce Doesn't Keep  People Away From Altar  ONCE BITTEN, not quite as shy: Divorced men and women wed at rates far higher than people who have never been married.  Both marriage and remarriage rates have dropped in recent years, the National Center for Health Statistics reports.  The 1986 figures show that 12 out of every 100 divorced men married again, compared with 20 per 100 in 1970, while the remarriage rate for divorced women was down to 8% in 1986 from over 12% in 1970.  But the marriage rate for divorced women in 1986, the latest year with final figures, was still a third higher than that for never-married women.  Divorced men married almost 2 1/2 times as often as never-married men.  Moreover, most divorced men and women don't remain unwed for very long.  Though the average time between marriages has lengthened somewhat since 1970, half the men remarrying in 1986 did so within just over two years after their divorce, and half the women within 2.4 years.  National Center demographer Barbara Wilson says divorced people also are far more prone to remarry, and to remarry faster, than widows and widowers.  The 1986 rate for divorcees was over 14 times the rate for widows, while the rate for divorced men was 4.4 times that of widowers.  Where You Live Is Clue  To How Healthy You Are  RISKY HEALTH habits vary widely from state to state, the Centers for Disease Control finds.  Health departments in 32 states and the District of Columbia surveyed large samples of adults in 1987.  Almost three out of four New Yorkers confessed to a sedentary life style -- less than 20 minutes of leisure-time physical activity three times a week -- compared with fewer than half the men and women in Montana, Washington or Utah.  Most states were in the 55% to 65% range.  Only 15% of Utahans said they currently smoked, but one out of three Kentuckians did.  In most states, about one-fourth of the adults reported a smoking habit.  Three out of four South Dakotans and two out of three North Dakotans said they never or seldom used seat belts, but fewer than 7% of Hawaiians failed to buckle up.  Risk factors associated with drinking revealed some of the greatest state-to-state differences.  Wisconsinites led the field in what the CDC calls binge drinking (five or more drinks on a single occasion) and "drinking and driving" (driving after having "too much to drink" at least once in the month before the survey).  They also came in second, after New Hampshire, in "heavier drinking," consuming 60 or more drinks a month.  Other heavy drinking states included Minnesota, Montana and the Dakotas -- obviously, those long, cold winters -- but Texans and Hawaiians knocked it back pretty well, too.  CDC officials believe almost all the surveys underestimate actual liquor consumption.  Only three out of 10 New Mexicans ever had a cholesterol check, about half the Maryland rate.  And fewer than three out of 10 New Mexico women over 40 have had mammograms, about half New Hampshire's rate.  Better Benefits Trim  Maternity Leaves  MATERNITY LEAVE benefits help bring women back to work faster after childbirth.  That's the conclusion of Census Bureau demographer Martin O'Connell.  Analyzing work patterns of thousands of women who had their first child between 1961 and 1985, he finds a steady trend to working later during pregnancy and returning to work sooner afterward.  A key factor, he says, is the growing availability of paid leave, seniority protection and other maternity benefits.  Back in the early 1960s, Mr. O'Connell reports, almost two-thirds of pregnant workers quit their jobs; only 16% received paid leave or other benefits, while another 14% got unpaid leave but with job protection.  By the early 1980s, the situation had reversed dramatically: almost half the pregnant workers got maternity benefits, about 20% had unpaid leave, and only 28% quit their jobs.  Moreover, steadily increasing percentages of women enjoyed leave with full pay.  Mr. O'Connell's key finding: In the 1981 to 1985 period, 71% of the women with paid leave or other maternity benefits returned to work within six months of childbirth, compared with 43% of those without benefits.  "This difference remained even after controlling for age, race and other factors influencing their probability of employment," he says.  The trend toward working later in pregnancy and coming back faster produced a consistent drop in time lost to pregnancy.  In the early 1960s, only 7% of women who worked during pregnancy lost less than three months of work; 77% lost a year or more.  Two decades later, one-fourth lost less than three months and only 35% lost a year or more.  Odds and Ends HOUSEHOLDS HEADED by persons under 35 will account for less than 20% of total household income by the year 2000, compared with about 25% in 1985, says the Conference Board's Consumer Research Center. . . .  Retirement brings no great change in alcohol consumption or drinking problems, a Veterans Administration study concludes.  It compared drinking habits of newly retired men with a similar group continuing to work. . . .  Every year, some 300,000 heart-attack victims could safely resume work as much as three weeks earlier than most doctors currently prescribe, researchers from Stanford University and the Kaiser Permanente health plan assert.  Los Angeles investor Alfred Checchi completed the purchase of NWA Inc., parent of Northwest Airlines, for $121 a share, or $3.65 billion.  The takeover offer, considered friendly by the airline's management, won out over competing bids from competitor Pan Am Corp., from Northwest's machinists union and from investor Marvin Davis.  Colorado National Bankshares Inc. said it offered $20 million of 9.5% notes due Aug. 15, 1996, at par.  The banking concern said it will use the proceeds to reduce some of its $65 million outstanding of 11 7/8% notes due Feb. 1, 1993.  Boettcher & Co. was the underwriter.  Unilever, the Anglo-Dutch food and home products conglomerate, said it completed the purchase of Faberge Inc.'s toiletries, cosmetics and fragrances businesses.  Completion of the $1.55 billion purchase brings to an end six months of suspense over the transaction.  Unilever broke off talks with Faberge in April, claiming Faberge's owner, Riklis Family Corp., had proposed "significant changes" in the structure of the sale, which the two sides had agreed to in principle in February.  Last month, however, Unilever and Faberge announced a fresh agreement on the sale of the assets under terms that Unilever described as "in line" with the original accord.  The July producer-price index, due out Friday, is expected to confirm other recent reports of tamer inflation.  The consensus view calls for an increase of 0.1% in July producer prices, according to MMS International Inc., a unit of McGraw Hill Inc., New York.  Softer energy prices are again expected to help take the edge off the index, which dropped 0.1% in June.  The week's otherwise light list of economic indicators includes June consumer credit, due out today, and July retail sales, due out Friday.  Meanwhile, last Friday's stronger-than-expected July employment report helped ease concerns that the slowing economy could stall out in a recession down the road.  But higher hourly-wage levels in the report also raised some concern over inflationary "hot spots" in the wage levels.  James F. Smith, professor of finance at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, dismissed those concerns.  "So there were a few more of the higher-wage jobs (in manufacturing) and more construction jobs.  That isn't indicative of rampant or even creeping inflation," he said.  MMS surveyed economists on producer prices both before and after Friday's employment report with only marginally different results.  The range of estimates on the first survey ran from a decline of 0.2% to an increase of 0.4%.  After the jobs report, the poll ranged from a decline of 0.3% to an increase of 0.3%.  Mr. Smith added that "barring an unprecedented rash of tornadoes in the Midwest, we're going to get just wonderful news from the Agriculture Department over the next three months."  He expects that high crop levels along with lower prices on corn and soybeans will help hold down meat prices, "which are a big part of the consumer price index."  Furthermore, the nation's purchasing managers reported last week that materials prices continued trending downward.  The National Association of Purchasing Management's monthly survey found that 21 items were reported to be lower in price in July while only 10 items were reported to have higher prices.  Robert S. Gay, senior economist at Morgan Stanley & Co., New York, expects the July producer-price index to be unchanged.  He notes that in addition to softer energy prices, core inflation should subside after jumping to 0.7% in June because of one-time price boosts for ships and cigarettes.  Robert H. Chandross, economist at Lloyds Bank, New York, recently raised his estimate on July producer prices -- but not because of the employment report.  Mr. Chandross increased his forecast to 0.4% from 0.1% largely because of higher prices for fruits and vegetables in areas that have had heavy rainfall this summer.  "I think it may hurt because normally you get declining prices for this time of year," says Mr. Chandross.  He added that the higher hourly wages in the recent employment reports should be taken with a grain of salt as the figure "does seem to have a habit of spiking a lot in the first month" of the quarter.  Retail sales, foreshadowed by last week's chain store sales figures, are expected to have increased about 0.5% in July, down from 0.9% the previous month.  Consumer credit is believed to have remained at moderate levels in June, rising by about $3 billion, following a $3.6 billion increase in May.  ---  @ The Economy in Numbers  @ Statistics Released in the Week Ended Aug. 4  @ CHANGE  @ (from prior  @ TOTAL period)  @ Money supply  @ M1 Week ended  @ July 24 (in billions) $776.2 -$1.3  @ M2 Week ended  @ July 24 (in billions) $3,121.2 -$1.5  @ M3 Week ended  @ July 24 (billions) $4,004.3 -$4.6  @ Construction spending  @ June, annual rate  @ (in billions) $414.7 -0.8  @ Manufacturer's orders  @ June (in millions) $234.56 +0.4%  @ Manufacturer's shipments  @ June (in billions) $231.94 -0.5%  @ Unemployment rate  @ July, change in  @ percentage points 5.2% -0.1  @ Employment payroll  @ July (in millions) 108.73 +0.2%  @ Leading indicators  @ June, index 143.5% -0.1%  @ Chain store sales  @ PaineWebber Index  @ July vs. year-ago  @ (in billions) $10.27 +4.1%  @ New homes sold  @ June, annual rate 670,000 +5.5%  @ Purchasing managers'  @ index  @ July 46% -2.8%  @ New jobless claims  @ Week ended July 22 342,000 -3.1%  @ Auto sales  @ End-July, total  @ vs. year-ago 226,698 -6.5%  @ Statistics to Be Released This Week  Consumer credit (Mon.)  June  New jobless claims (Fri.)  Retail sales (Fri.)  July  Money supply (Thurs.)  Producer price index (Fri.)  July  National Mercantile Bancorp said it plans to sell as many as 654,500 of its common shares privately for $11 a share.  It didn't disclose the name of the buyer.  After the sale, expected to take place this month, the independent bank holding company said it will have about 3.3 million shares outstanding.  Proceeds will be used for general purposes.  In national over-the-counter trading Friday, National Mercantile closed at $15.75, up $1.75 a share.  Capital Holding Corp. and Southlife Holding Co. said they agreed on a $10.90-per-share purchase price for Southlife common stock.  The price will consist of $8.80 in Capital Holding common stock and $2.10 in cash.  Capital Holding, an insurer based here, and Southlife agreed to merge on May 22.  Southlife, a Nashville, Tenn., insurer, has 5.6 million common shares outstanding.  Under the acquisition agreement, Capital Holding also is buying Southlife preferred shares at $11 each and acquiring some debt.  The transaction is valued at about $160 million.  Southlife shareholders are expected to vote in early September on the proposal.  Italy's public sector deficit narrowed to a provisional 43.909 trillion lire ($32.49 billion) in the first half of the year from a revised deficit of 51.620 trillion lire in the first six months of 1988, the Treasury announced Friday.  The government deficit for the first half of 1988 was revised downward from an original estimate of 51.782 trillion lire.  The Treasury said that tax revenue amounted to 151.257 trillion lire.  Public sector spending totaled 192.599 trillion lire, while Treasury operations resulted in a loss of 2.567 trillion lire.  The deficit was covered with the issuing of medium- and long-term government securities totaling 27.267 trillion lire, debt issues placed abroad totaling 1.942 trillion lire and other kinds of government debt totaling 14.700 trillion lire.  The following were among Friday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Student Loan Marketing Association -- $70 million of 8 3/4% option principal redemption notes, due Aug. 22, 2000, priced at par.  The issue is non-callable for five years and was priced at a yield spread 80 basis points above the 10-year Treasury note.  The notes are being sold through Morgan Stanley & Co.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. -- $500.1 million of Remic mortgage securities, offered in seven classes by Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  The offering, Series FHLMC 83, is backed by 9.5% Freddie Mac mortgage-backed securities with a gross weighted average coupon rate of 10.20% and weighted average remaining term to maturity of 28.75 years.  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $300 million of mortgage securities, offered in 10 classes by Salomon Brothers Inc., variably priced.  The offering, Series 1989-56, is backed by Fannie Mae 9% mortgage-backed securities, backed by 30-year fixed-rate mortgages, with a weighted average remaining term to maturity of 28.75 years.  Fannie Mae will purchase a portion of the "C" class.  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $300 million of REMIC mortgage securities, offered in 13 classes by Goldman Sachs & Co.  The offering, Series 1898-57, is backed by Fannie Mae 9.5% mortgage-backed securities, which are backed by 30-year fixed rate mortgages.  Fannie Mae says it will purchase a substantial portion of the "A" class.  (The following is a continuation of The Wall Street Journal's quarterly review of corporate earnings for the second quarter of 1989.)  TECHNOLOGY  @ 2ND QTR. 1989 2ND QTR. 1988 % CHG.  @ 4,447,232 5,011,742 - 11  Semiconductor makers face flat growth.  Aggressive price-cutting in commodity chips has sliced profit margins at such companies as Advanced Micro Devices and National Semiconductor, which depend heavily on such standardized chips.  Analysts say a flat third quarter won't affect Intel as much because desktop-computer makers still present strong demand for that company's fastest microprocessors used in high-end models.  National Semiconductor's sale of a unit for a $174.9 million after-tax gain offset a $53.2 million operating loss caused by inventory write-offs and charges to cover the cost of planned plant closings.  Slower growth has hit software vendors.  But varying strength in different markets has created winners and losers.  Novell sees good prospects from the strong demand for connecting computers over networks; Computer Associates has overcome flat growth in the mainframe-computing market by acquiring other software vendors; in the personal-computer market, companies such as Microsoft that have a broad product range are seeing healthy earnings.  For AT&T, Chairman Robert Allen said, "It was an excellent quarter all around."  Operating profit grew 25%, reflecting cost controls, and the operating-profit margin fattened to 13% from 11% a year earlier.  Mary McCaffrey at C.J. Lawrence, Morgan Grenfell sees "continued steady progress from {AT&T's} core businesses."  Joel Gross, analyst at Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette, sees AT&T "making progress" and "doing a lot of the right things."  But he is concerned that if the economy enters a recession, the company could "have some problems."  At General Instrument, results were "on plan."  Sales of coaxial cable continued strong, and the company turned the red ink to black at the wagering operations, which make equipment for race tracks, lotteries and the like.  @ DATA PROCESSING  @ -- COMPUTERS/INFORMATION  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 15 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Amdahl Corp 32,807 52,754 - 38  @ Apple Computer 96,129 91,311 + 5  @ Compaq Computer 83,940 58,621 + 43  @ Control Data -497,300 9,200 ...  @ Cray Research 4,414 19,100 - 77  @ Data General -23,100 600 ...  @ Digital Equipment 313,215 401,013 - 22  @ Int'l Business M 1,340,000 964,000 + 39  @ NCR 110,404 112,439 - 2  @ Prime Computer -18,956 7,222 ...  @ Seagate Technology 24,016 16,519 + 45  @ Tandem Computers 30,759 17,286 + 78  @ Unisys Corp 53,600 162,300 - 67  @ Wang Labs -374,700 13,400 ...  @ Zenith Electronics -13,000 -12,100 ...  @ TOTAL 1,162,228 1,913,665 - 39  @ -- OFFICE EQUIPMENT  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 4 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ AM International 8,117 1,551 + 423  @ Nashua Corp 4,693 9,050 - 48  @ Pitney Bowes 61,769 56,505 + 9  @ Xerox Corp 179,000 167,000 + 7  @ TOTAL 253,579 234,106 + 8  @ -- SEMICONDUCTOR  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 5 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Advanced Micro 12,073 26,088 - 54  @ Analog Devices 10,169 9,513 + 7  @ Applied Materials 13,919 8,745 + 59  @ Intel Corp 99,319 130,730 - 24  @ Nat'l Semiconductor 77,100 22,400 + 244  @ TOTAL 212,580 197,476 + 8  @ -- SOFTWARE/PROCESSING  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 7 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Autodesk Inc 10,800 7,246 + 49  @ Computer Assoc 26,740 16,921 + 58  @ Computer Sciences 13,116 11,692 + 12  @ Lotus Development 10,272 17,306 - 41  @ Microsoft Corp 45,352 30,012 + 51  @ Novell Inc 11,235 8,547 + 31  @ Oracle Systems Corp 33,546 19,083 + 76  @ TOTAL 151,061 110,807 + 36  @ OTHERS  @ -- COMMUNICATIONS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 4 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ American Tel & Tel 699,000 594,000 + 18  @ Communic Satellite 18,300 17,600 + 4  @ General Instrument 32,456 21,364 + 52  @ Motorola Inc 154,000 120,000 + 28  @ TOTAL 903,756 752,964 + 20  @ -- AEROSPACE/DEFENSE  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 13 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Boeing Co 195,000 160,000 + 22  @ E-Systems Inc 19,426 19,216 + 1  @ Gencorp Inc 17,000 21,000 - 19  @ General Dynamics 58,400 46,700 + 25  @ Grumman Corp 19,538 18,766 + 4  @ Lockheed Corp 77,000 106,000 - 27  @ Loral Corp 17,267 19,628 - 12  @ Martin Marietta 86,921 81,425 + 7  @ McDonnell Douglas -48,000 71,000 ...  @ Northrop Corp -78,100 21,900 ...  @ Precision Castparts 7,700 6,800 + 13  @ Sundstrand Corp 37,889 -47,074 ...  @ Thiokol Corp 10,733 11,536 - 7  @ TOTAL 420,774 536,897 - 22  @ -- DIVERSIFIED TECH  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 12 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Corning Inc 69,400 82,000 - 15  @ EG&G Inc 17,459 18,989 - 8  @ Honeywell Inc 74,800 31,600 + 137  @ Litton Indust 44,662 42,038 + 6  @ Minnesota Mng & M 327,000 309,000 + 6  @ Raytheon 133,700 122,300 + 9  @ Rockwell Int'l 178,100 214,700 - 17  @ Tektronix Inc -2,126 -17,070 ...  @ Texas Instruments 106,100 91,800 + 16  @ TRW Inc 70,000 71,000 - 1  @ United Technolog 197,300 196,200 + 1  @ Varian Associates 9,100 11,800 - 23  @ TOTAL 1,225,495 1,174,357 + 4  @ -- INDUSTRIAL TECH  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 5 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Ametek Inc 10,898 4,130 + 164  @ General Signal 18,668 -10,801 ...  @ Intergraph Corp 20,447 23,424 - 13  @ Millipore Corp 13,466 13,131 + 3  @ Pall Corp 13,773 18,974 - 27  @ TOTAL 77,252 48,858 + 58  @ -- MEDICAL/BIO TECH  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 4 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Amgen Inc 835 305 + 174  @ Genentech Inc 9,596 15,474 - 38  @ Medtronic Inc 25,476 23,003 + 11  @ Stryker Corp 4,600 3,830 + 20  @ TOTAL 40,507 42,612 - 5  ---  FINANCIAL SERVICES  @ 2ND QTR. 1989 2ND QTR. 1988 % CHG.  @ 8,187,696 6,753,598 + 21  Bank earnings generally were somewhat disappointing.  Rising interest rates during the second quarter put pressure on net interest margins.  Nonperforming loans continued to rise at many banks as commercial real estate markets continued downward.  Money-center banks also charged off 20% of the loan exposure to Argentina.  Manufacturers Hanover's comparison with the prior year's earnings was distorted by a gain last year on the sale of a finance subsidiary.  Chemical Banking and Bankers Trust both posted record or near-record foreign exchange trading results.  Life-insurance sales bounced back, but the price wars in the commercial property/casualty segment of the industry continued to depress premium revenues and income.  Last year's hefty price increases for group health insurance allowed many companies to catch up with soaring medical costs and contributed to improved results this year.  Aetna's group-health-insurance earnings more than doubled in the second quarter.  But it had losses of $17 million in its auto and homeowners business because of continued high auto-insurance claims and windstorm losses.  Provident Life & Accident's employee-benefits segment posted a profit, vs. a year-earlier loss.  American General's results were aided by an $86 million after-tax gain from the sale of its property/casualty insurance segment.  A $1.5 billion after-tax investment loss depressed Ohio Casualty's net.  The savings-and-loan industry continues to squirm on the interest-rate spike.  The difference between the short-term rates at which thrifts acquire funds and the long-term rates they receive on loans is practically nonexistent, shrinking thrifts' margins and making it harder to resell loans.  The less healthy the thrift, the more striking the impact: CalFed saw its net interest spread droop to 1.78% from a year-earlier 2.58%.  Its profit halved.  GlenFed saw its provision for loan losses increase 145% and suffered a 43% earnings dive.  Meanwhile, Golden West Financial, one of the nation's stronger thrifts, offset rate problems by lending into the furious West Coast real-estate market, boosting loan volume 10% and profit 11%.  But even H.F. Ahmanson, another industry heavyweight that had used loan volume in recent quarters to counter rate pressure, suffered a 19% earnings decline, as loan originations dropped 27% and gains on loan sales dropped 92%.  Securities brokers, the first quarter's worst-performing industry group, staged an unexpected turnaround.  They were aided by a modest rise in stock-and-bond trading activity.  Salomon's quarter was its best ever.  A $38 million jump in brokerage commissions, to $174 million, more than made up for a slippage in investment banking to give PaineWebber its sharply higher results.  Morgan Stanley, while falling, still had its second-best quarter ever.  And although A.G. Edwards's fiscal quarter didn't include June's busier trading, profit soared 314% because of year-earlier litigation expenses.  @ BANKS  @ -- MONEY-CENTER BANKS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 8 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Bankamerica 304,000 162,000 + 88  @ Bankers Trust NY 174,600 174,100 0  @ Chase Manhattan 136,681 224,134 - 39  @ Chemical Banking 128,600 127,700 + 1  @ Citicorp 395,000 359,000 + 10  @ First Chicago 134,400 122,900 + 9  @ Manufacturers H 106,000 403,000 - 74  @ Morgan (J P) Co 206,300 228,700 - 10  @ TOTAL 1,585,581 1,801,534 - 12  @ -- CENTRAL-STATES BANKS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 15 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Ameritrust Corp 30,400 25,200 + 21  @ Banc One Corp 91,327 83,636 + 9  @ Boatmen's Bancsh 33,028 23,740 + 39  @ Comerica Inc 30,281 27,775 + 9  @ Fifth Third Banc 24,809 21,438 + 16  @ First Bank System 53,000 36,500 + 45  @ Huntington Bancsh 24,054 21,339 + 13  @ Manufacturers N 26,828 23,609 + 14  @ Michigan Nat'l 23,042 24,108 - 4  @ National City Corp 65,800 53,800 + 22  @ NBD Bancorp 66,032 55,204 + 20  @ Northern Trust 28,900 22,000 + 31  @ Norwest Corp 58,800 51,300 + 15  @ Society Corp 28,688 24,728 + 16  @ Star Banc Corp 14,051 13,313 + 6  @ TOTAL 599,040 507,690 + 18  @ -- EASTERN BANKS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 17 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Bank of Boston 97,800 76,100 + 29  @ Bank of New Eng 36,500 69,200 - 47  @ Bank of New York 114,344 49,707 + 130  @ BayBanks Inc 18,863 21,960 - 14  @ CoreStates Fin'l 49,592 43,566 + 14  @ First Fidelity 63,229 70,182 - 10  @ Fleet/Norstar Fn 90,153 82,885 + 9  @ Keycorp 33,420 26,023 + 28  @ Mellon Bank Corp 64,000 28,000 + 129  @ Meridian Bancorp 21,907 21,348 + 3  @ Midlantic Corp 61,557 53,744 + 15  @ MNC Financial Inc 50,476 43,010 + 17  @ PNC Financial Corp 125,469 113,697 + 10  @ Republic New York 43,800 43,300 + 1  @ Shawmut Nat'l 66,769 58,850 + 13  @ State Street Boston 24,934 22,753 + 10  @ UJB Financial Corp 30,847 28,567 + 8  @ TOTAL 993,660 852,892 + 17  @ -- SOUTHERN BANKS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 12 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Amsouth Bancorp 21,131 20,410 + 4  @ Barnett Banks Inc 64,300 56,400 + 14  @ Citizens & South 58,564 49,953 + 17  @ Crestar Financial 25,400 21,800 + 17  @ Dominion Bankshrs 23,186 20,913 + 11  @ First Union Corp 73,697 75,804 - 3  @ First Wachovia 67,900 59,400 + 14  @ NCNB Corp 91,536 59,267 + 54  @ Signet Banking Corp 31,399 37,552 - 16  @ Southeast Banking 32,269 22,421 + 44  @ Sovran Financial 65,483 58,037 + 13  @ Suntrust Banks 85,900 76,400 + 12  @ TOTAL 640,765 558,357 + 15  @ -- WESTERN BANKS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 7 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Bancorp Hawaii 19,624 15,394 + 27  @ First Interstate 103,136 97,238 + 6  @ Security Pacific 184,500 154,300 + 20  @ U S Bancorp 38,431 29,137 + 32  @ United Banks Colo 4,000 2,500 + 60  @ Wells Fargo Co 147,400 124,400 + 18  @ Zions Bancorp 4,153 -382 ...  @ TOTAL 501,244 422,587 + 19  @ INSURANCE  @ -- FULL LINE  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 6 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Aetna Life & Cas 169,600 136,100 + 25  @ American General 189,991 118,695 + 60  @ CIGNA Corp 144,000 138,800 + 4  @ Kemper Corp 121,655 51,893 + 134  @ Lincoln National 55,844 60,318 - 7  @ Travelers Corp 114,000 -346,000 ...  @ TOTAL 795,090 159,806 + 398  @ -- LIFE  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 7 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ American National 26,188 28,141 - 7  @ Broad Inc 9,150 1,525 + 500  @ Capital Holding 78,098 37,100 + 111  @ Provident Life & A 35,058 13,461 + 160  @ Torchmark Corp 53,500 43,500 + 23  @ UNUM Corp 39,500 31,700 + 25  @ USLife Corp 23,457 21,034 + 12  @ TOTAL 264,951 176,461 + 50  @ -- PROPERTY/CASUALTY  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 11 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ American Int'l 352,150 311,317 + 13  @ Chubb Corp 107,100 83,000 + 29  @ Cincinnati Fin'l 29,400 36,000 - 18  @ Fireman's Fund 45,096 50,958 - 12  @ General Re Corp 143,900 81,100 + 77  @ Loew's Corp 329,048 251,937 + 31  @ Ohio Casualty Corp 36,149 41,425 - 13  @ Progressive Cp Ohio 31,500 23,600 + 33  @ Safeco Corp 73,668 63,686 + 16  @ St Paul Cos 102,600 76,217 + 35  @ USF & G 822 67,713 - 99  @ TOTAL 1,251,433 1,086,953 + 15  @ OTHERS  @ -- SAVINGS & LOANS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 6 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Ahmanson (H F) 39,692 48,835 - 19  @ CalFed Inc 19,100 38,300 - 50  @ Glenfed Inc 29,249 51,471 - 43  @ Golden West Fin'l 40,236 36,354 + 11  @ Great Western Fin 51,854 64,728 - 20  @ Meritor Savings -21,176 -79,440 ...  @ TOTAL 158,955 160,248 - 1  @ -- REAL ESTATE INVEST  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 2 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ First Union R E 5,172 5,434 - 5  @ Newhall Land & Farm 3,077 9,133 - 66  @ TOTAL 8,249 14,567 - 43  @ -- DIV FINANCIAL SERV  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 9 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Alexander & Alex 25,300 20,100 + 26  @ American Express 316,100 272,000 + 16  @ Beneficial Corp 30,600 27,400 + 12  @ Dreyfus Corp 20,546 24,540 - 16  @ Fed'l Nat'l Mortg 193,000 120,700 + 60  @ Household Int'l 55,800 62,500 - 11  @ Marsh McLennan 77,300 77,000 0  @ Primerica Corp 63,400 31,900 + 99  @ Transamerica Corp 91,255 80,524 + 13  @ TOTAL 873,301 716,664 + 22  @ -- SECURITIES  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 7 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Bear Stearns Cos 47,574 20,794 + 129  @ Edwards (A G) Inc 14,519 3,507 + 314  @ Merrill Lynch Co 70,195 53,472 + 31  @ Morgan Stanley Gr 112,130 135,290 - 17  @ PaineWebber Group 15,089 159 +9390  @ Quick & Reilly 2,920 2,617 + 12  @ Salomon Inc 253,000 80,000 + 216  @ TOTAL 515,427 295,839 + 74  ---  UTILITIES  @ 2ND QTR. 1989 2ND QTR. 1988 % CHG.  @ 5,776,087 5,751,736 0  Results were all over the board for telephone companies.  Profits slipped at some because of year-ago gains and higher interest expenses.  However, overall usage continued to grow.  MCI saw profit more than double from its long-distance services; the company also displayed strong operating-margin growth.  United Telecom had gains in all its communications businesses, but benefited primarily from "strengthening fundamentals and profitability" at US Sprint.  Electric utilities generally posted moderate second-quarter gains thanks to continued economic growth, which fueled commercial and industrial power sales.  Although the weather wasn't as hot this year as a year earlier, the millions of air conditioners that were purchased last summer helped utilities avoid a weather-related downturn this year.  This year's results also look good compared with last year because the industry wasn't hit with a round of rate cuts ordered by state-utility regulators, something that had plagued power companies during the previous couple of years.  @ -- TELEPHONE  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 16 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Alltel Corp 37,626 39,302 - 4  @ Ameritech 316,600 351,500 - 10  @ Bell Atlantic Corp 360,800 344,100 + 5  @ BellSouth Corp 418,100 395,700 + 6  @ Centel Corp 7,983 29,967 - 73  @ Cincinnati Bell 24,011 23,357 + 3  @ Contel Corp 67,000 105,000 - 36  @ GTE Corp 328,764 299,449 + 10  @ MCI Communicat 150,000 62,000 + 142  @ Metro Mobile CTS -11,002 -10,916 ...  @ NYNEX Corp 279,000 322,800 - 14  @ Pacific Telesis Grp 325,000 321,000 + 1  @ Southern N E Tel 63,900 39,300 + 63  @ Southwestern Bell 261,500 212,900 + 23  @ U S West Inc 258,600 336,300 - 23  @ United Telecom 90,500 41,000 + 121  @ TOTAL 2,978,382 2,912,759 + 2  @ -- ELECTRIC  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 59 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Allegheny Power 42,541 37,719 + 13  @ American Elec Pwr 129,288 118,785 + 9  @ Atlantic Energy 16,200 11,100 + 46  @ Baltimore G & E 43,952 43,335 + 1  @ Carolina Pwr & Lt 72,645 63,917 + 14  @ Centerior Energy 77,807 57,565 + 35  @ Central & So West 70,000 80,000 - 13  @ Central Ill P S 19,762 17,867 + 11  @ Cincinnati G & E 46,979 46,359 + 1  @ CMS Energy 63,261 52,644 + 20  @ Commonwealth Ed 152,613 97,134 + 57  @ Consolidated Ed 65,650 83,979 - 22  @ Delmarva P & L 14,257 14,964 - 5  @ Detroit Edison 96,133 73,445 + 31  @ Dominion Resource 51,500 71,400 - 28  @ DPL Inc 29,176 32,906 - 11  @ Duke Power 127,270 95,777 + 33  @ Duquesne Light 23,975 24,434 - 2  @ Florida Progress 45,300 41,600 + 9  @ FPL Group Inc 111,077 95,455 + 16  @ General Public Ut 53,419 55,676 - 4  @ Gulf States Utilities 3,137 30,082 - 90  @ Idaho Power Co 20,169 5,805 + 247  @ Illinois Power -1,238 25,363 ...  @ Ipalco Enterp 16,803 21,577 - 22  @ Kansas City P & L 21,617 31,827 - 32  @ Kansas Gas & El 16,421 12,363 + 33  @ Kentucky Util 14,593 14,989 - 3  @ Long Island Ltg -215,314 63,739 ...  @ Louisville G & E 18,027 16,483 + 9  @ Montana Power Co 7,700 6,101 + 26  @ New England El Sy 21,961 -158,498 ...  @ New York St E & G 39,652 48,078 - 18  @ Niagara Mohawk Pwr 34,147 46,823 - 27  @ NIPSCO Indust 17,801 13,543 + 31  @ Northeast Utilities 37,007 42,834 - 14  @ Northern States Pwr 36,900 44,000 - 16  @ Ohio Edison 82,669 72,094 + 15  @ Oklahoma Gas & El 26,956 30,740 - 12  @ PacifiCorp 98,700 89,800 + 10  @ Pennsylvania P & L 64,720 68,421 - 5  @ Philadelphia Elec 108,945 110,064 - 1  @ Pinnacle West Cap -11,283 43,579 ...  @ Portland General 327 4,828 - 93  @ Potomac Electric 38,836 39,530 - 2  @ PSI Holdings Inc 36,576 30,191 + 21  @ Public Service Colo 39,478 29,434 + 34  @ Public Service Ent 113,662 107,296 + 6  @ Puget Sound P & L 25,571 24,347 + 5  @ San Diego G & E 43,234 39,857 + 8  @ SCANA Corp 21,004 17,371 + 21  @ SCECorp 141,004 146,533 - 4  @ Southern Co 187,419 162,004 + 16  @ Southwestern P S 29,508 21,111 + 40  @ TECO Energy 34,900 31,700 + 10  @ Tucson Elec Power 20,929 29,867 - 30  @ Union Electric 65,571 74,798 - 12  @ Washington Water 16,732 15,628 + 7  @ Wisconsin Energy 35,422 41,997 - 16  @ TOTAL 2,663,068 2,712,360 - 2  @ -- GAS  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 7 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ Consolidated N G 10,482 13,851 - 24  @ Equitable Resourc 4,470 3,149 + 42  @ Nicor Inc 15,200 11,500 + 32  @ Oneok Inc 8,411 6,551 + 28  @ Pacific Enterprise 53,000 48,000 + 10  @ Peoples Energy 11,517 9,940 + 16  @ Questar Corp 4,708 5,750 - 18  @ TOTAL 107,788 98,741 + 9  @ -- WATER  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 5 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ American Water Wks 15,941 14,517 + 10  @ California Water 3,935 3,892 + 1  @ Consumers Water 1,992 2,420 - 18  @ Hydraulic Co 1,690 2,180 - 22  @ United Water Res 3,291 4,867 - 32  @ TOTAL 26,849 27,876 - 4  ---  @ CONGLOMERATES  @ 2ND QTR. 1989 2ND QTR. 1988 % CHG.  @ 1,423,348 1,285,725 + 11  GE continued to ring up the profits, and its 12.1% operating-profit margin in the second period was the highest for any quarter in its history.  Textron's net again was flat, "and it looks like it will continue that way for the rest of the year," said Sidney J. Heller, analyst at Shearson.  The latest period included a special loss from an arbitration ruling.  Greyhound's four segments -- consumer products; services including restaurants and cruise-line businesses; transportation manufacturing; and financial services -- "continued to perform on or above plan," the company said.  @ CONGLOMERATES  @ 2nd Qtr. 2nd Qtr. %  @ 6 Firms 1989 1988 Chg  @ General Electric 972,000 835,000 + 16  @ Greyhound Corp 35,648 30,925 + 15  @ ITT Corp 244,000 228,000 + 7  @ Paramount Communic 65,600 55,500 + 18  @ Teledyne Inc 46,800 67,400 - 31  @ Textron Inc 59,300 68,900 - 14  @ TOTAL 1,423,348 1,285,725 + 11  (For part one of this story see: "Quarterly Review of Corporate Profits -- Part I" -- WSJ Aug. 7, 1989) ---  @ How Profits and Stock Prices Fared  @ in the Year Ended June 30  The graphs and tables depict the monthly closes for the nine basic sectors of the DJ Equity Market Index with June 30, 1988 = 100.  @ Basic Materials  @ EARNINGS: +7%  @ STOCKS: +4.4%  @ Energy  @ EARNINGS: -25%  @ STOCKS: +13.8%  @ Industrial  @ EARNINGS: +14%  @ STOCKS: +7.7%  @ Consumer Products, Cyclical  @ EARNINGS: +8%  @ STOCKS: +19.9%  @ Consumer Products, Noncyclical  @ EARNINGS: +11%  @ STOCKS: 36.3%  @ Technology  @ EARNINGS: -11%  @ STOCKS: -2.5%  @ Financial Services  @ EARNINGS: +21%  @ STOCKS: +21.4%  @ Utilities  @ EARNINGS: 0%  @ STOCKS: +20.6%  @ Conglomerates  @ EARNINGS: +11%  @ STOCKS: +17.4%  ---  @ How Industry Results Stack Up  Percentage change in total industry net income, second quarter 1989 vs. second quarter 1988; includes only those groups with net income in both quarters  @ Apparel Retailers 605%  @ Ins/Full line 398%  @ Cosmetics & Personal Care 187%  @ Airlines 131%  @ Railroads 100%  @ Builders 79%  @ Securities Brokers 74%  @ Industrial Technology 58%  @ Ins/Life 50%  @ Software & Processing 36%  @ Other non-ferrous 31%  @ Medical Supplies 26%  @ Diversified Fin'l 22%  @ Communications 20%  @ Media 20%  @ Banks/Western 19%  @ Banks/Central States 18%  @ Heavy Machinery 18%  @ Banks/Eastern 17%  @ Advertising 16%  @ Banks/Southern 15%  @ Food 15%  @ Ins/Property & Casualty 15%  @ Forest Products 14%  @ Beverages 13%  @ Broadline Retailers 12%  @ Chemicals 12%  @ Drug-Based Retailers 12%  @ Household Products 12%  @ Conglomerates 11%  @ Pharmaceuticals 11%  @ Transportation Eqpt 10%  @ Gas 9%  @ Paper Products 9%  @ Specialty Retailers 9%  @ Office Equipment 8%  @ Semiconductor 8%  @ Diversified Industrial 6%  @ Restaurants 6%  @ Indus & Comm'l Serv 5%  @ Containers & Packaging 4%  @ Diversified Technology 4%  @ Electrical Components 4%  @ Trucking 3%  @ Oilfield Equipment 2%  @ Telephone 2%  @ Building Materials 1%  @ Savings & Loans -1%  @ Electric -2%  @ Pollution Waste Manage -2%  @ Aluminum -4%  @ Water -4%  @ Medical Bio Technology -5%  @ Autos/Manufacturing -8%  @ Factory Eqpt -8%  @ Casinos -10%  @ Health-Care Providers -11%  @ Banks/Money Center -12%  @ Furnishings & Appliances -16%  @ Steel -17%  @ Air-Freight Couriers -18%  @ Aerospace & Defense -22%  @ Textiles & Apparel -24%  @ Autos/Parts -29%  @ Oil/Integrated Majors -29%  @ Precious Metals -29%  @ Food Retailers -30%  @ Lodging -34%  @ Computers & Information -39%  @ Real-Estate Investment -43%  @ Recreational Products -44%  @ Oil/Secondary Firms -45%  @ Coal -51%  @ Diversified Mining -55%  @ Consumer Services -59%  @ Marine Transportation -59%  Investment scams using religious affiliations to fleece the faithful are surging.  More than 15,000 Americans lost a total of $450 million in the past five years in bogus money-making schemes promoted by religious charlatans, according to a report to be released today by the North American Securities Administrators Association and the Council of Better Business Bureaus.  "Religiously oriented swindles are one of today's hottest tickets for investment con artists," said John C. Baldwin, president of the securities administrators' group and director of the Utah Division of Securities.  There has been an "alarming increase" in complaints about self-proclaimed "born-again" financial planners, con artists claiming to be endorsed by local and national church officials, and givers of "divinely inspired" investment advice, he said.  Victims of the scams include worshipers of all persuasions.  Lutheran ministers, members of Baptist, Jewish, Mormon and Greek Orthodox congregations, as well as black churchgoers and Hispanic Catholic parishioners, have all fallen prey.  In one example cited in the report, more than 600 investors in 20 states entrusted $10 million to a former Sunday school teacher at a large Baptist church in Los Angeles.  The report said the man, Roy L. Comstock, who is serving a four-year prison sentence for securities law violations, promised a "no-risk" 36% annual return on U.S. Treasury bill investments.  Instead, millions of investor dollars were diverted into a phony "suitcase bank" in the Marshall Islands as part of a scheme in which the initial investors were paid off with money raised from new investors, the report said.  It added that investigators found that many of the victims were fundamentalist Christians who believed they were dealing "with a man blessed by God with extraordinary business abilities."  William McDonald, director of securities enforcement for the California Department of Corporations, said in an interview that the tightly knit structure of many religious groups is a perfect environment for con artists.  The con artist joins a church or temple and "establishes a position of trust" that leads members to drop their normal skepticism.  Sometimes, Mr. McDonald said, the con artist recruits an "opinion leader" in the group and gives that person shares or commissions to persuade others to invest.  Even when the fraud is discovered, he said, many members of the group refuse to believe it.  Another factor contributing to the vulnerability of religious groups is the growing number of religiously oriented publications, radio stations and cable-TV outlets, said Mr. Baldwin of the securities administrators' association.  These specialized media make it easy for con artists to target the faithful, he said.  The report mentions a Washington state promoter who sold $56 million of real estate securities by advertising on Christian radio stations.  When the promoter's company collapsed, the report said, 7,000 investors were left holding $50 million in defaulted notes.  In another case cited in the report, nearly 200 investors gave an estimated $18 million to an Alabama church treasurer who promised to pool the funds in stock-market investments with returns of 8% to 30% a month.  "It was sort of comforting to see a Bible verse printed at the end of the monthly statements," said an investor quoted in the report.  Carl Salle, securities investigator for the Alabama Securities Commission, said the former church treasurer, Stephen Streit, is now serving two consecutive 10-year prison sentences.  Mr. Streit generated phony monthly statements on his home computer showing spectacular returns for investors, Mr. Salle said.  But he placed the real money in certificates of deposit and bought a new home, cars and jewelry and traveled extensively, Mr. Salle said.  Altogether, the new report cites about a dozen scams from as many states.  But state securities regulators said they think these are only the tip of the iceberg.  Separately, the Idaho Department of Finance recently filed a civil lawsuit against Lawrence W. McGary and his Shama Resources Limited Partnership in Sun Valley, Idaho, charging fraud and misrepresentation in the sale of $4 million of partnership interests.  State securities regulators said Mr. McGary sold partnership interests and promissory notes to members of a fundamentalist church to which he belonged.  Mr. McGary's prospectus describing the partnership's gold-mining and oil-and-gas drilling plans is filled with Biblical quotations and references to divine inspiration.  "As we acquired this block, we believe we were led by the Holy Spirit," it said of one piece of property.  Referring to an oil-and-gas plan, the prospectus said, "God is leading us to move ahead in this very area when no one else is interested."  In February, Mr. McGary and Shama filed for protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of federal bankruptcy law.  "If God told him where to drill, God must be either wrong or bankrupt," said Wayne Klein, chief of the Idaho finance department's securities bureau.  C.P. Hoover, a 60-year-old Challis, Idaho, geologist, who said he loaned $250,000 to the partnership, said in an interview he became involved in the partnership because of Mr. McGary's church membership.  "He was a Christian businessman," Mr. Hoover said.  Blair Clark, an attorney for Mr. McGary, said he had no comment on the Idaho finance department's charges because the litigation is pending, and "it's in a settlement posture."  Securities regulators recommend that members of religious communities take steps to protect themselves from investment swindles.  Among the precautions they suggest:  -- Be wary of investments that seem closely tied to a particular religious belief.  It makes little sense that an investment opportunity would be available only to members of a specific church or faith.  "If you are approached by a self-proclaimed 'Christian' financial planner, hold him or her to the same standards you would apply to anyone offering investment advice," said Mr. Baldwin of the North American Securities Administrators Association.  -- Be cautious if the promoter of an investment opportunity tries to capitalize on connections or a leadership position within a religious group.  -- Be on your guard for a new member of your church who springs up out of nowhere with a "sure-fire" investment scheme.  -- Look closely at investments promoted by fellow church members.  "One of the con artist's most persuasive tools will be the testimony of your friends and fellow believers," said Scott Stapf, director of investor education for the securities administrators' association.  -- Ignore claims that religiously based investments are unregulated.  "Virtually all investment opportunities, including church bonds, come under the scope of state and federal securities or commodities laws," said Mr. Stapf.  Grocers may have been more frightened than consumers by last spring's Alar apple scare.  Moreover, while children were seen as facing the greatest cancer risk from Alar, a chemical preservative, buying data indicates that older people without children at home were more influenced by concerns than any other consumer group.  Researchers who studied the data -- which is to be released this week -- say it may point to a numbness within the buying public over food-safety matters.  "With so many claims, so many sources and so much coverage of such issues in the media, the public may well be reaching the 'cry wolf' stage," said Edd Buckley, vice president of Perifax Reports, which tracked buyers' reaction to the scare.  Perifax, which is based here, regularly monitors sales of produce and other commodities for agribusiness.  Following a Feb. 26 report on the "60 Minutes" television show that Alar might pose a health threat, Perifax surveyed more than 4,000 consumers nationwide on how the news altered their buying habits.  The company uses a pool of respondents screened for demographic differences.  It concluded that nearly 45 million households bought apples at least once during the month following the televised report.  Normally, between 45 million and 50 million households buy apples at least once a month, Perifax said.  Most of those who refrained from purchases in March were individuals without children at home, Perifax found.  It said the greatest number of those not buying lived in the southern U.S. and had annual incomes under $20,000.  According to the findings, apple sales temporarily plummeted in March not so much because consumers feared eating the fruit, but because many grocers removed it from their shelves, perhaps from liability concerns.  "We think businessmen were more impressionable than the customer," Mr. Buckley said.  "The chains withdrew the product or stopped advertising it.  We think grocers might have overreacted {to the Alar story.} They may have had a kneejerk reaction."  Nevertheless, for the apple industry the Alar scare became a real calamity.  "All told, we're estimating that the loss is well over $100 million.  That's based on apples that should have sold but remained in warehouses," said a spokeswoman for the International Apple Institute, McLean, Va.  The Perifax data didn't include apple purchases by schools, nursing homes and other institutions.  School districts in New York, Chicago, Los Angeles and several other cities temporarily halted apple purchases for school cafeterias during the height of the Alar scare.  The thrift-rescue bill, passed by Congress Friday night and to be signed by President Bush as soon as Wednesday, is far more than a costly bailout measure.  "The financial-services industry has been changed forever," states Kenneth Guenther, the executive vice president of the Independent Bankers Association of America.  The legislation, agrees Dennis Jacobe, the director of research for the U.S. League of Savings Institutions, "will bring the most dramatic change since the 1930s.  There is no doubt about it."  The huge cost is shockingly clear: Regulators will spend at least $166 billion to close or sell hundreds of insolvent savings institutions over the next decade.  What is less obvious is the way the legislation will largely dismantle the $1.2 trillion thrift industry, not just by speeding the disappearance of about 750 dead or dying S&Ls, but also by freeing commercial banks, for the first time, to buy healthy thrifts.  In addition, it will permit healthy savings institutions choosing to remain independent to convert themselves into banks.  However, the legislation will severely damage about 1,500 marginally profitable thrifts, which can't readily afford some of its financial penalties and restrictions nor the fiercer competition for market share.  In the next several years, experts estimate, 1,000 to 2,000 thrift institutions will sell out or fail, and the industry's assets will shrink by as much as $250 billion.  Other big losers will include depositors and mortgage borrowers who won't find the many bargains once offered by desperate thrift lenders.  The real-estate industry, already battered by the deflation of the 1980s, will feel continuing downward pressure on prices as regulators unload tens of billions of dollars worth of repossessed real estate.  Another possible victim is the thrift-rescue effort itself.  As the industry shrinks, the deposit-insurance funds will receive less and less premium money and may be less able to cope with accelerating losses at some thrifts.  The big winners will be the commercial banks and money-market funds, which will get a flood of savings diverted from the shrinking thrift industry, and the shareholders of many healthy S&Ls, who are expected to receive premiums of 100% or more on their shares, above current market prices, from acquirers.  Even if not sold, many of the top 750 S&Ls will probably reap a profit bonanza from a marked drop in their cost of funds as the irksome competition from insolvent thrifts wanes.  "There is a massive restructuring to take place under this law," says Sen. Donald Riegle, the Michigan Democrat who, as chairman of the Senate Banking Committee, helped steer the bill to adoption.  The sweeping and sometimes harsh nature of many of the thrift legislation's provisions surprised the financial community.  The 1,000-page law is loaded with dozens of changes so extreme that they once would have outraged the industry and provoked warfare among lobbyists on Capitol Hill.  But in one fell swoop, banks were authorized not only to buy thrifts immediately but to meld them into their branch networks if they so desire.  S&Ls are required to have tangible capital -- the excess of real assets over liabilities -- equal to 1.5% of their assets immediately and reach 3% by the end of 1994; a total of 672 thrifts don't meet the 1.5% standard now, and more than 300 more currently don't meet the 1994 standard.  The premiums paid by banks into their federal deposit-insurance fund will be almost doubled, to $1.50 for every $1,000 of deposits, but the thrifts' premiums will rise to $2.30 next year and could ultimately reach $3.25.  Under the new law, they must keep nearly 70% of their assets in mortgage-related investments, compared with almost-unlimited investment powers for many thrifts previously, and separate capital requirements will make it difficult for them to continue direct investment in real estate and other high-risk endeavors.  They can convert to a less-restrictive bank charter but won't be able to escape the higher insurance premiums for at least five years.  Their $1.8 billion of retained earnings in the Federal Home Loan Banks, which they own, was expropriated; so was much of the $1.2 billion of dividends paid them out of the FHLBs' annual earnings.  The funds will repay borrowings that finance the closing of insolvent thrifts and also subsidize low-income housing.  For the weaker S&Ls, the thrift bill is in many ways a legislated replay of the Depression, which wiped out 10,000 mostly tiny banks and sparked an era of strict regulation of depository institutions.  The bill reintroduces strict regulation of S&Ls and is expected to encourage or finance the demise of hundreds of thrifts, which generally are much larger than the Depression's victims.  Among the first to go will be the 250 insolvent thrifts held in the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp.'s conservatorship program, whose operating losses are growing the fastest.  Since President Bush unveiled the bill in February and the FDIC took charge of the insolvent S&Ls, its greatest disappointment has been its inability to bring down the high interest rates those institutions pay.  The "Texas premium" -- industry jargon for the premium interest rates that insolvent S&Ls generally pay to attract deposits, to the detriment of solvent institutions -- has risen to more than one percentage point in the past year.  "We're going to be looking first at institutions that have a high cost of funding," apart from loan write-offs, says Roger Watson, the FDIC's research director.  Based on that, thrifts likely to be sold or merged in the first wave include Southwest Savings, a Dallas thrift that was supposedly rescued in a regulatory merger last year but is currently running net interest losses at a rate of $227 million a year, according to an analysis by Veribanc Inc., a Woburn, Mass., bank research firm.  Southwest Savings isn't officially in the conservatorship program because of its previous "rescue."  Other big bleeders include University Savings, of Houston; San Jacinto Savings of Bellaire, Texas, and Commonwealth Savings, of Houston.  Most of the S&Ls in the program either made bad real-estate investments or were dragged down by the energy-belt depression.  The next most vulnerable are the 300 or so insolvent S&Ls not yet in conservatorship.  Some also made reckless or ill-fated real-estate bets, but many are refugees from the interest-rate squeeze of the early 1980s, when inflation drove their deposit costs far above their investment yields.  Some of the biggest were created by regulatory mergers, in which the regulators allowed them to count the unrecognized losses in their loan portfolios as "good will."  This often-fictional capital, which the government relied on as a tool to keep ailing thrifts from collapsing, has been disallowed by the new legislation, which requires that good will to be stricken from the books over a five-year period.  The impact of all this is clearly illustrated at Empire of America, a Buffalo, N.Y., thrift with $11.6 billion of assets, including $750 million of regulatory good will.  Empire was created out of the merger of 13 insolvent S&Ls.  Its liabilities exceed its real assets by about $600 million, but it has been able to claim solvency by reporting the $750 million of good will as capital.  Partly because this capital doesn't generate any earnings, Empire was inundated by red ink.  Trying to restructure, it is seeking $900 million from regulators plus $720 million of debt and equity to be raised by Drexel Burnham Lambert.  "We think we have a proposal that is less expensive than any alternative," says Paul Willax, Empire's chairman.  If the FDIC doesn't go along, Mr. Willax says, a sale of Empire by the FDIC to an outside acquirer would be more expensive.  And he estimates that a straight liquidation of Empire would cost $1.5 billion.  These two groups of thrifts will just about exhaust the $50 billion to be raised through bond offerings under the legislation.  In addition, the bill provides about $40 billion, to be raised through higher deposit-insurance premiums, the sale of repossessed real estate and other means, that will be used to pay the continuing costs of closing 223 thrifts in 1988.  The FDIC, through a new entity called the Resolution Trust Corp., will generally use the $50 billion for cash infusions that will bring the insolvent S&Ls' tangible capital up to about zero.  Then, the regulators will hunt for investors willing to provide enough additional capital to meet the new regulatory requirements.  Such deals won't halt or even reduce the losses being incurred by the insolvent institutions, as is commonly believed; they will simply pay the already-incurred costs.  In contrast to 1988, investors aren't likely to be offered "yield-maintenance" agreements, under which they were guaranteed a high return for keeping bad assets on the books as long as 10 years, the FDIC says.  Nor will they be given the lucrative tax breaks handed out last year; Congress, in a fit of outrage, banned them.  "It's going to be pretty much cash only," the FDIC's Mr. Watson says.  But the FDIC will still probably have to protect investors against any as-yet-unrecognized losses in the insolvent thrifts' loan portfolios or other assets, as the FSLIC did.  If the restructured S&Ls still lose money despite the FDIC's assistance, the investors will lose their investment and the agency will have to take the institutions over again, infusing more cash.  It isn't clear how much corporate investors will be enticed by the less lucrative terms.  If the FDIC succeeds, it could indicate that the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corp. may have acted hastily last year in giving investors tax breaks and yield-maintenance agreements.  Publicly offered limited partnerships giving individual investors the chance to get in on the action have been formed by or sold through Salomon Bros., Shearson Lehman Hutton, Oppenheimer & Co. and Merrill Lynch.  The American First fund, sold through Shearson, last year acquired Eureka Federal, a $1.7 billion institution in San Carlos, Calif., in a largely cash deal.  Oppenheimer has a small $30 million fund to look at small assisted deals.  "There is an almost limitless amount of interest," asserts Gerard Smith, an official of the Salomon fund.  A further $24 billion is supposed to be raised though the higher premiums and other means after the third year of the legislation's passage, through the 10th year, to handle additional insolvencies.  However, the bill may actually hasten those future collapses.  The 1,500 S&Ls with marginal or average earnings will have a hard time paying the extra deposit-insurance premiums while simultaneously suffering the expropriation of most of their FHLB dividends.  Such dividends accounted for a third of the solvent thrifts' $3.5 billion of net income last year.  At the same time, some institutions can't meet the new capital requirements and aren't strong enough to attract outside capital.  Without adequate capital, they won't be allowed to "grow" profits by adding assets.  Only now are once-sleepy mutual S&Ls across the country awakening to the challenge of raising capital to levels that will satisfy the regulators.  Ronald Riggins, a Washington S&L consultant, says his small business has increased by 50% in the past month.  He is conducting presentations for mutual S&Ls that must convert to stock institutions to raise capital.  "Our clients are stunned as we go through the evaluation of the capital requirements, and what it means to them," he says.  Many weak, undercapitalized S&Ls won't be able to sell stock or find merger partners, and their only recourse will be to shrink.  Money-losing CenTrust Bank, of Miami, agreed last month to sell 63 branches with $2.4 billion of deposits to Great Western Bank, of Beverly Hills, Calif., for $150 million.  The proceeds will be used to bolster CenTrust's tangible capital from a negative $42 million to a positive $79 million.  Homestead Savings, a San Francisco lender, has sold $2 billion of assets, mostly mortgage-backed securities, since the start of the year.  The move caused a $14 million loss but raised tangible capital to 2.35%.  "Shrinkage will be the mode for a number of institutions," says John Atherton, the chief executive of City Federal Savings, of Bedminster, N.J.  The unprofitable thrift has tangible capital equal to less than 1% of assets.  It plans to reduce its assets by nearly $1.5 billion in the second half, mostly by selling mortgage-backed securities.  The recent drop in long-term rates has increased the value of such securities by about $100 million for each $1 billion held, a godsend to ailing S&Ls.  Many industry officials question the long-term viability of the shrinkage strategy, however.  They say weak S&Ls would tend to sell their best assets and keep the worst, because selling bad assets would force them to recognize losses that they can't bear.  CenTrust, for instance, is selling a branch system that generated low-cost funds, and must now depend largely on the volatile high-cost money markets to finance its assets.  "Congress has developed a very hostile environment for a very significant portion of the industry," says Mr. Willax, Empire's chairman.  "It's going to cost the taxpayers a lot of money."  Adds Herbert Sandler, the chairman of Golden West Financial Corp., a big California thrift holding company: "The very large taking from the FHLBs, and the very large insurance premium, defeat the ability of middling institutions to build up capital."  But Mr. Sandler's main problem is likely to be fending off unwanted suitors.  His thrift unit, World Savings, is among the top 25% of the industry that has been able to generate robust profits, mostly by keeping costs low and dominating healthy mortgage markets.  Such thrifts can afford to lose their FHLB dividends and pay higher insurance premiums.  Commercial banks are eager to acquire such S&Ls, and even mediocre earners that have large branch networks with low-cost retail deposits, because it is the opportunity of a lifetime to buy market share cheaply.  Here's why:  Banks have to pay the equivalent of eight to 20 cents for each dollar of deposits when they buy individual bank branches, an expensive way to acquire market share.  But thrift stocks are cheap -- often 50% below the price/earnings multiple of bank stocks.  So, banks could acquire S&Ls for the equivalent of 4.5 cents per dollar of deposit, a price that would still be 60% to 100% above many thrifts' current stock prices, according to an analysis by Keefe, Bruyette & Woods Inc., a New York securities firm.  For instance, GlenFed Inc., the giant California thrift-holding company, is currently selling at $20.75 a share.  A price equal to 4.5% of its deposits would be $36.50 a share, or 76% above the current price.  Shareholders of TCF Financial, which has one out of every four Minnesotan adults for customers, would receive a 60% premium if an acquirer offered 4.5% of deposits.  "It just doesn't cost that much to take down one of these thrifts," says Donald Crowley, a Keefe analyst.  Indeed, the seven biggest candidates on Keefe's list, with assets totaling $105 billion, could be acquired for a 100% premium and the price still would be a relatively modest $4.4 billion.  The market value of a single strong bank, Security Pacific Corp. of Los Angeles, is $5.8 billion.  That's powerful arithmetic, compounded by the fact that the banks can probably eliminate the differential that even healthy thrifts, compared with banks, have been paying on deposits.  The biggest S&Ls now pay about 85 basis points (a basis point is one-hundreth of a percentage point) more on six-month certificates than the biggest banks do, according to a survey by Sheshunoff & Co., a research firm in Austin, Texas.  Since even highly profitable S&Ls' net income is 75 to 100 basis points or so as a percentage of assets, that much of a differential severely damages earnings.  If acquiring banks eliminate the differential, as expected, the target thrifts' core earnings could jump 50% or more.  So, commercial banks are out hunting.  Wells Fargo & Co., which has been trying to expand into the Southern California market, is believed to be interested in both GlenFed and Great American First, which have big shares there.  Before the moratorium on thrift conversions two years ago, Comerica Inc., a Michigan bank, had bought a $200 million Grand Rapids, Mich., thrift and had converted it to a bank.  Now, Comerica is looking for more.  "A savings and loan is an interesting vehicle to get you into a market," says J. Michael Fulton, the bank's senior vice president for corporate development.  Comerica's trust operations in Florida, for example, may make that state a logical target, he adds.  "We've hired our advisers, we have candidates' names, and we're making calls," he says.  But the banks in certain markets will have to move fast or be prepared to make hostile bids.  Big thrifts are thinking about merging with each other within their states, increasing earnings by paring overlapping operations.  GlenFed, for instance, recently held merger talks with another Los Angeles giant, CalFed Inc., but the two couldn't agree on terms.  They may try again.  Moreover, the healthy thrifts think that they can signficantly reduce the deposit differential without being acquired by banks, thus boosting their earnings and stocks.  Some deem their prospects so good that their shareholders would be better off spurning a bank's offer.  Mr. Sandler, for instance, says his big California thrift isn't for sale.  So does William Cooper, TCF's chief executive.  "In my humble opinion, we can do better over a period of time on our own," Mr. Cooper says.  Healthy S&Ls can't lose, concludes Alex Sheshunoff, who heads Sheshunoff & Co.  "The legislation is very positive for healthy thrifts in three major ways," he says.  "It brings stability and respectability back to the industry, it improves earnings because rational competitors will be paying rational deposit rates and, most importantly, it will end up maximizing shareholder value as a result of healthy banks buying healthy thrifts."  ---  @ Some Large Potential Acquisition Candidates  @ MARKET  @ ASSETS VALUE  @ NAME (millions)* (millions)**  @ CalFed, Los Angeles $28,346 $621  @ GlenFed, Glendale, Calif. 25,626 611  @ Great American, San Diego 16,497 254  @ Coast, Los Angeles 12,829 231  @ First Fed, Detroit 11,942 175  @ TCF Financial, Minneapolis 5,319 113  @ SFFED, San Francisco 4,494 147  @ *As of June 30, 1989  @ **Based on Friday's closing prices  @ Source: Keefe, Bruyette & Woods, Inc., New York  @ ---  @ Insolvent S&Ls Most Likely to Lead Liquidation March  @ ANNUAL  @ OP. LOSS  @ NAME (millions)*  @ Southwest, Dallas $227.2  @ University, Houston 140.8  @ San Jacinto, Bellair, Texas 128.0  @ Commonwealth, Houston 100.2  @ Gill Savings, Hondo, Texas 92.4  @ Western, Phoenix 79.5  @ American Fed, Dallas 66.0  @ Bright Blanc, Dallas 65.8  @ Sandia, Albuquerque 60.3  @ Security, Phoenix 59.8  @ *Annualized first quarter net interest loss, before loan losses or non-interest expense.  @ Source: Veribanc, Inc., Woburn, Mass.  ---  @ Weak Giants  @ The bill's 1994 tangible capital requirement of 3% of assets poses trouble for even giant thrifts.  Of the largest U.S. thrifts, these 15 currently have the greatest tangible capital shortfalls, measured as a percentage of assets.  @ TANG.  @ CAP.  @ SHORT- SHORT- RETURN  @ FALL FALL ON  @ ASSETS FROM 3% AS % OF ASSETS  @NAME CITY STATE (millions)*** (millions) ASSETS 1988  @Empire of America FSB  @ Buffalo NY $11,551 $-891 -8.22 -0.59  @Talman Home FS&LA  @ Chicago IL 6,189 -412 -7.32 0.42  @Western S&LA*  @ Phoenix AZ 5,655 -385 -6.84 -2.42  @Atlantic Financial Federal  @ Bala Cynwyd PA 6,320 -387 -6.50 -0.47  @Merabank, A FSB  @ Phoenix AZ 6,962 -341 -5.16 -1.91  @Southwest SA**  @ Dallas TX 6,422 -313 -4.90 -1.65  @Anchor Savings Bank, FSB  @ Northport NY 8,579 -293 -3.64 -0.07  @Gibraltar Savings*  @ Beverly Hills CA 12,133 -431 -3.56 -0.48  @Commercial FS&LA  @ Omaha NE 6,343 -220 -3.56 -0.10  @Centrust Savings Bank  @ Miami FL 10,177 -324 -3.31 0.16  @First FS&LA of Rochester  @ Rochester NY 5,605 -170 -3.10 0.31  @Sunbelt Savings FSB**  @ Dallas TX 9,507 -288 -3.04 0.06  @City FSB  @ Bedminster NJ 10,438 -228 -2.24 -0.11  @New West FS&LA**  @ Stockton CA 22,024 -461 -2.09 0.00  @Carteret Savings Bank, FA  @ Newark NJ 6,827 -131 -1.97 -0.17  @ *In FDIC conservatorship program. **Under regulatory supervision. ***As of March 31,1989.  Source: Sheshuoff & Co., Austin, Texas  The activists fighting abortion form one of the broadest political coalitions in modern American history -- and one of the most strained.  Here is how lunch goes in the storefront office of the Kentucky Right-to-Life Association:  Michael Logsdon, a nurse's assistant, talks about how his peace-oriented innercity church is working against U.S. military involvement in Central America, while Frank Simon, an allergist, argues for military aid to the Contras in Nicaragua, so they "can defend themselves and push Communists into the sea."  Diane Monahan, a physical therapist, declares that eliminating the death penalty is a logical extension of the "pro-life" movement, while James Howland, a church janitor and lay minister, argues that murderers forfeit their own right to life.  And Kaye Myers, a bank auditor, challenges the view of Cecilia Lawrence, who has 15 children, that men should work and married women should stay home with the children.  "The man is the warrior and provider," says Mrs. Lawrence.  Rejoins Ms. Myers, who has two children: "I haven't needed to be defended recently from anything outside the cave."  Like millions across the country, these activists who gathered in Louisville the other day for pizza and salad, have come together on a single issue.  But often the people fighting abortion fight themselves.  "There's a good reason these people don't take a position on much but abortion," says Glen Halva-Neubauer, a political scientist at Furman University in Greenville, S.C., who specializes in the politics of abortion.  "They don't agree on anything else."  The unusual coalition began to form 16 years ago, when the Supreme Court's decision in Roe vs.  Wade recognized a right to abortion.  Since the current court this summer opened the way for states to restrict abortion, the anti-abortion movement has been pressing lawmakers in statehouses across the nation to enact laws that discourage or prohibit the deliberate termination of pregnancies.  But it is becoming increasingly clear that the movement isn't monolithic and that it defies easy stereotyping.  "The opposition tries to portray us as conservatives who belong to the National Rifle Association, want the death penalty, want to keep women down and pray all the time," says Anna Sullivan, president of the Rhode Island Right-to-Life Committee.  Her own view, however, is that "it's the most unusual group of allies imaginable."  This is a movement whose elements include civic leaders and people who bomb abortion clinics.  There are Catholics and evangelical Protestants.  There are pacifists and people who want military action against communism.  Some anti-abortionists are as passionate about protecting animal rights as they are about protecting the unborn.  "This is exemplary of single-issue politics," says Faye Ginsburg, a New York University anthropologist who has studied organized opponents of abortion.  "These groups don't want to publicly renounce each other because they need each other's help.  But there is enormous uneasiness within this coalition."  Right now, the movement is trying to play down internal disagreement and to mobilize forces for state legislative battles in the fall and for critical gubernatorial elections next year.  "We have differences -- real differences," says Court Wiedenmayer, chapter development director for the National Right to Life Committee in California.  "But we put them aside.  We agree on protecting life -- and that life is the most important issue."  A consequence of the strains: The anti-abortion movement has little chance of becoming a broader political force.  "This is not a normal political movement, and it can survive only as long as the issue is alive," says Thomas Mann, the director of governmental studies at the Brookings Institution in Washington.  "There is nothing to hold them together once the issue is taken off the agenda.  When it is, the movement will wither and die."  Both houses of the Kentucky legislature, which is to meet in Frankfort in January, are considered to be in the anti-abortion camp, and Democratic Gov. Wallace Wilkinson says he supports new, restrictive legislation.  But even as they gird themselves for these battles, the people around the lunch table in a Louisville neighborhood called St. Matthews -- like other activists across the country -- aren't at all comfortable with some of the things their own allies believe.  "There are people I had a revulsion to," says Paulette Joyer, a Minneapolis lawyer prominent in the Feminists for Life group.  "But for my own mental health, I had to train myself to concentrate on this issue, not on others that we had so many disagreements over."  Some Protestant fundamentalists, for example, are troubled that groups such as Operation Rescue, which blockades abortion clinics, make a street brawl of a dispute over morality.  Feminists find that their other views almost always clash with those of conservatives.  And New Right advocates who support a defense buildup and an activist foreign policy are uncomfortable with the pacifists.  "I'm almost always working with people I disagree with," says John Cavanaugh O'Keefe, a Laytonsville, Md., pacifist who edits a newsletter about Third World children and who says he sees a connection between abortion and violence.  He acknowledges that at first he resisted the movement because, as he puts it, "I was too much of a snob to associate with right-wing, up-tight reactionaries."  "My concern is that some of the pacifists are into this movement to co-opt it," says Howard Deaver, an insurance claims manager from Omaha and a lifetime member of the National Rifle Association who says that a few years ago he became outraged at what he considers the taking of innocent life.  "They're more interested in disarming the U.S. and providing a safe place for world socialism and saving the whales.  I object to drawing a parallel between saving babies and protecting animals."  Although liberal abortion laws date to the 1960s, anti-abortion activists operated in relative obscurity until the Supreme Court, by identifying a right to abortion in Roe vs.  Wade, transformed an interest group into a movement.  "Without that rallying point, they'd never be where they are now," says Doug Bandow, a senior fellow at the Cato Institute, a libertarian think tank in Washington.  "The court created the pro-life movement as we know it."  Opponents of abortion provided critical support to Ronald Reagan in his campaign for the GOP nomination in 1980.  With his judicial appointments, President Reagan paved the way for this summer's Supreme Court decision giving states room to restrict abortion.  Meanwhile, the movement, with help from the Catholic Church and evangelicals, but predominantly from relentless grass-roots organizing, grew slowly but steadily.  "They've had a fervor they've been able to maintain and even pass to a second generation," says Linda DiVall, a Republican political consultant.  "A lot of splinter coalitions break apart, but they've been able to maintain a fever pitch for 16 years."  Some students of the phenomenon have concluded that members of the anti-abortion coalition share a broad, coherent world view.  "These people believe that . . . the purpose of sexuality is to be procreative," says Kristin Luker, a sociologist at the University of California at Berkeley.  In recent years, however, the strains within the movement have become rather pronounced.  The most overt dispute is less philosophical than tactical.  The ascension of activists who are impatient with the movement's failure to make progress in traditional political forums and who are willing to take their efforts beyond marches and organizing has created enormous tensions.  "People who will not even acknowledge that there's another facet to the pro-life movement, who won't leave room for activism, are wimpy," says Joseph Scheidler, who heads the Pro Life Action League in Chicago and who has been arrested a dozen times.  "No social movement goes anywhere without conflict and confrontation, some sort of 'barricade action' that draws in recruits."  Randall Terry, who heads Operation Rescue, believes the problem with the movement "is that it has tried to be too respectable."  In a telephone interview from the Fulton County Prison (after being arrested in an anti-abortion protest), Mr. Terry argues that the abortion battle "isn't a political debate like an argument over the minimum wage," adding: "It's murder, life and death, broken bodies.  If there's no passion in the people who fight it, how do they expect to convince anyone?"  A frequent object of this derision is the National Right to Life Committee, the moderate, methodical but highly successful group with 50 state affiliates and 3,000 chapters across the country.  "We made a decision to work within the law to change the law," says David O'Steen, the executive director of the group.  "We want to make a difference, not a statement.  We're not into hysteria."  Other disputes go just as deep.  A significant splinter of the movement, for example, believes that the "pro-life ethos" is a "seamless garment," espousing nonviolence rather than peace through strength and opposing the death penalty.  "I argue that the term 'pro-life' is broader than just abortion," says Mr. Logsdon, the Louisville nurse's assistant.  "A lot of pro-life people are peeved about that.  The movement can't be around one issue."  But every time the movement tries to reach much beyond abortion, disputes break out over just what "pro-life" means.  "Pick a subject, any subject," says Ms. Myers, "and we'll disagree -- except on abortion."  The result is that when Ms. Myers, a feminist, sits down with her allies in the abortion fight, she is "sitting at a table next to the people I'd been challenging politically all of my life."  She fumes when she hears Mrs. Lawrence say that the Equal Rights Amendment "stands for destroying the family, the basic structure of society."  And when Albert Arbogast, the former president of the Kentucky Right-to-Life Association, asserts that "the state gets its authority from God to conduct capital punishment," Ms. Myers blurts out: "I'm scared to death of people who say the state acts as God."  But the internal disagreements -- and the arguments at lunch here -- are only part of the agonies of such activists.  Sometimes accommodation, though painful, is necessary.  A longtime supporter of the Rev. Jesse Jackson and political opponent of President Reagan, Ms. Myers felt the strain last November.  But with a choice to make, she voted for George Bush.  "I've become a single-issue voter," she says.  ---  @ The Abortion Fight  @ Milestones in the dispute over abortion:  1967: Colorado passes first law legalizing abortion.  Modeled on a recommendation by the American Law Institute, it permits abortion, with restrictions, in cases where there would be grave impairment to the mother's physical or mental health, severe fetal defects or in cases of rape and incest.  1970: New York legalizes abortion through 24th week of a pregnancy.  1973: Supreme Court, in Roe vs.  Wade, recognizes a right to abortion.  The decision gives impetus to the anti-abortion movement.  1977: Hyde amendment goes into effect, cutting off Medicaid for abortions.  1980: Supreme Court, in Harris vs.  McRae, Upholds Hyde amendment.  1981: Ronald Reagan, with a vigorous anti-abortion position, becomes president.  1982: Anti-abortion constitutional amendment is withdrawn from Senate consideration and legislative attempt to criminalize abortion by statute is defeated in Senate.  1983: Supreme Court, in Akron case, throws out city restrictions on abortion.  But new Justice Sandra Day O'Connor, in a dissent, says that Roe's framework "is on a collision course with itself."  1985: Abortion debate takes on a higher emotional tint with "The Silent Scream," a video showing an abortion.  1988: Confirmation of Anthony Kennedy gives anti-abortion forces hope they have a majority on the Supreme Court.  1989: Supreme Court, in Webster vs.  Reproductive Health Services, permits states to regulate abortion.  Members of the International Longshoremen's Association accepted a new 14-month master contract that essentially extends the terms of the current three-year contract, which expires Sept. 30.  A spokesman for the ILA, which represents about 64,000 dockworkers in ports from Maine to Texas, said the new master contract was "overwhelmingly accepted" in initial returns.  But he said results were still outstanding from some ports.  The contract freezes the basic union wage at $18 an hour until Nov. 30, 1990, but increases some employer pension contributions.  Union leadership had sought to extend current contract terms, rather than to negotiate a new three-year accord, while it studies management demands for sweeping labor concessions.  For example, dockside managers are calling for major reductions in the size of the 20-man work units used to load and unload container ships and in overtime arrangements.  The new contract sets up a 14-member "industry preservation group," including seven representatives each from labor and management, to look for long-term solutions to the industry's problems.  Issues on the local level not covered by the master contract remain to be resolved regarding benefit levels and work practices in each port.  But talks are now getting under way.  Armco Inc. said it eliminated $109 million of tax-exempt bond issues associated with its now joint-ventured Eastern Steel division.  The joint venture -- Armco Steel Co. Limited Partnership -- was formed May 13 when Armco sold a 40% interest in its Eastern Steel division for $350 million to Kawasaki Steel Corp. of Japan.  As part of the agreement, the joint venture agreed to assume the liability for various industrial revenue and pollution control bonds and provide Armco with the funds to pay them off in full or defease them by establishing trust funds to invest, manage and make interest and principal payments to maturity.  Canadian steel ingot production totaled 287,931 metric tons in the week ended July 29, down 3.8% from 299,366 tons a week earlier, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, said.  The week's total was up 8.8% from 264,725 tons a year earlier.  The cumulative total in 1989 was 9,211,417 tons, up 5.4% from 8,742,015 tons a year earlier.  Cooper Industries Inc. said its Cooper Rolls Inc. unit received a contract valued at more than $175 million to supply gas-turbine pump systems to Aramco Services Co. on behalf of Saudi Arabian Oil Co.  Cooper Rolls is a joint venture of Cooper Industries, a manufacturing concern, and Rolls-Royce PLC, of Britain.  Unicorp Canada Corp. and Cara Operations Ltd. said they extended to Aug. 15 the expiration date of their $43-a-share bid for the stock they don't already own of Dunkin' Donuts Inc.  DD Acquisition Corp., a partnership owned by the two companies, said about 25% of Dunkin' Donuts common shares outstanding have been offered, bringing its total holding to a possible 40% of the Randolph, Mass., doughnut-shop franchiser.  The bid had been set to expire next Friday.  Unicorp Canada is an investment holding company, while Cara Operations runs restaurant and fast-food chains.  J.P. Industries Inc. said it has acquired certain assets of R.K. Elliott Group, a maker of engine timing system parts.  Terms weren't disclosed.  J.P. Industries, a maker of vehicle parts, said it purchased for cash assets of R.K. Elliott's D & B division in Canada and Penta Drive Systems unit in Britain.  The manufacturing operations of the two units will be transferred to one of J.P. Industries' existing U.S. facilities, the company said.  Omnicare Inc. directors authorized as much as $5 million for the repurchase of additional common shares from time to time at prevailing market prices.  In the first six months, Omnicare bought back 623,400 shares, or 6.4% of its shares outstanding.  As of June 30, the company had about 9.2 million shares outstanding.  Belgium's unemployment rate rose to 10.2% in July from 9.1% in the previous month, the National Statistics Office said.  The rise, the first in 10 months, reversed the downward trend in Belgium's jobless rate, which has fallen from 11.4% in August 1988.  The statistics office said the rise was seasonal, as a result of temporary layoffs in the holiday month of July, particularly in the construction industry.  In July, the total of unemployed people was 431,933, up 47,915 from 384,018 in June.  Clothestime Inc., a chain of clothing stores, said its sales for the four weeks ended Saturday rose 32% to $16.9 million from $12.8 million a year earlier.  Sales at stores open at least a year rose 33%.  For the first 26 weeks of the fiscal year ending Jan. 31, sales rose 15% to $93.2 million from $81.2 million, the company said.  Pan American World Airways said its July traffic fell 1.5% to 3.12 billion revenue passenger miles from 3.17 billion a year earlier.  One revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger flown one mile.  Load factor, or the percentage of occupied seats, fell to 74% from 75.5% in July 1988.  For the first seven months of the year, traffic at the Pan Am Corp. unit fell 2.9% to 16.31 billion revenue passenger miles from 16.79 billion for the like 1988 period, and the load factor fell to 62.9% from 63.6%.  Imprimis Technology Inc., a unit of Control Data Corp., said it received an order to provide more than $100 million of disk drives to Sun Microsystems Inc. for use in that company's new Sparc and Sun-3 desktop and server products.  Imprimis said the three-year agreement primarily covers Sun's Sabre family of eight-inch disk drives.  Hanover Insurance Co. reported a 38% drop in earnings in the second quarter, partly reflecting continued expenses related to weather-related catastrophes.  The financial service and casualty insurance company said net income in the second quarter fell to $23.7 million, or $1.15 a share, from $38.2 million, or $1.85 cents a share, in the year-earlier period.  The company said weather-related damages, including a Midwest tornado earlier this year, cost the company about $8 million in payouts compared with about $2.4 million in the year-earlier period.  In the first six months, profit dropped 40% to $39.3 million, or $1.91 cents a share, from $64.1 million, or $3.11 cents a share, in the year-earlier period.  The decline, the company said, was also caused by natural disasters.  Ross Stores Inc., an off-price clothing retailer, said its sales for the four weeks ended Saturday increased 18% to $52 million from $44 million a year earlier.  For the six months through Saturday, Ross's sales rose 19% to $331 million from $279 million in the year-ago period.  Ross has 146 stores in operation, compared with 136 a year earlier.  Enron Corp. said its Enron Gas Marketing Inc. unit agreed to supply Consolidated Edison Co. of New York with as much as 30 million cubic feet of natural gas a day as part of a 10-year contract valued at about $200 million.  Enron is a natural gas concern.  Consolidated Edison is an electric, gas and steam utility.  Southwest Airlines Co. said its July traffic jumped 20%, to 857.5 million revenue passenger miles from 710.1 million a year ago.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger flown one mile.  Southwest's load factor, or the percentage of seats filled, rose to 67.1% from 60.3% last year.  Year-to-date traffic surged 32%, to 5.47 billion revenue passenger miles from 4.15 billion last year.  Load factor for the year rose to 64.9% from 55.2% a year ago.  McDonnell Douglas Missile Systems Co., a unit of McDonnell Douglas Corp., won a $48.3 million Navy contract for the production of Harpoon missile-launch systems and equipment.  United Technologies Corp. was given a $31.6 million Navy contract for anti-submarine helicopters.  Hughes Aircraft Co., a unit of General Motors Corp., was issued a $20.4 million Navy contract for ship tactical-display systems and equipment.  Intermark Inc. said its board is considering an exchange offer in which each of the company's preferred shares could be swapped for one common share.  Intermark, a holding company, has 6.4 million shares of common and 2.7 million shares of preferred stock outstanding.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading, Intermark common shares fell 25 cents to $11.625.  The one-for-one swap would give holders of Intermark's preferred stock an opportunity to convert their ownership to "the more liquid and historically higher-valued common stock," the company said.  The preferred stock was distributed three years ago as a dividend to holders of Intermark common.  Brussels, the "capital of Europe," may have the worst airport facilities of any Western European capital.  A businessman arriving at Brussels National Airport for the first time often wonders whether he landed in the right city, says Alan Dean, a tourism promoter in Belgium.  "He will probably believe he's been dropped into Tirana by mistake," Mr. Dean says.  The comparison to the capital of Albania may be a little harsh, but it is hard to find anyone with a kind word for the Brussels airport.  A spokesman for Sabena, the Belgian national airline, acknowledges that the facility "is not a good image for the flag carrier."  An editor of a British travel magazine describes it as "a mess."  A Swissair official calls it "rotten."  And even the director of the Brussels Chamber of Commerce concedes, "We need a lot of improvement as fast as possible."  Known locally as Zaventem, the name of the Flemish suburb in which it is located, the Brussels airport has none of the high-tech eccentricity of Paris's Charles de Gaulle Airport, the good design of Amsterdam's Schiphol Airport or the shopping and entertainment of the Frankfurt airport.  It lacks the marble gleam of the Vienna airport, the comfortable seats of Heathrow or the great views of Zurich.  Yet making greater use of the airport is considered the real objective behind the plan of British Airways and KLM Royal Dutch Airlines to make a 40% investment in Sabena's new air-transport subsidiary, Sabena World Airlines.  Situated smack in the center of Europe's most populous region, Zaventem offers a lot of potential for airlines hoping to fortify their position in Europe in preparation for airline deregulation after 1992.  It has three long runways, comparatively light air traffic and room for expansion.  It also has become a European hub for overnight courier companies.  The biggest drawback is that the place is low on charm.  Inside the terminal, the color scheme is predominantly pea green, dirty gold and brown.  The arrival hall -- a newcomer's first glimpse of Brussels -- has all the atmosphere of a down-at-the-heels provincial railway station.  The airport, designed before airlines started using jet planes, opened for the 1958 World's Fair and was expected to handle 600,000 passengers that year.  Last year, the airport handled more than 7.5 million passengers, and traffic is growing at nearly 9% a year.  Earlier this year, the Belgian pilots' professional association complained in a report that the airport was underequipped compared with others in Europe and would become less and less safe unless the government took drastic action to overhaul it.  So why do British Airways and KLM want to be a bigger part of it?  While negotiations with Sabena continue, they aren't discussing details.  But British Airways certainly is interested in securing new takeoff and landing slots.  Since London's two main airports already are overcrowded, it could be useful for British Airways to funnel some of its connecting traffic through Brussels instead.  Besides, industry analysts say, British Airways wants a toehold on the Continent before competition heats up after 1992.  KLM has said that one of its goals is to regain some of the southern Dutch passengers it now loses to the Belgian airport and Sabena.  And KLM believes Brussels will become more important as an air-traffic center.  At present, the airport's bills are paid by the state-owned airport authority and a group of Belgian banks and insurers that took stakes in the partly privatized airport terminal company.  The state already is investing in technology, installing a radar to monitor aircraft movements on the ground and completing a new air-traffic control center.  The terminal company has made some improvements, too: construction of a new Sheraton Hotel atop a parking garage out front, upgrading of the duty-free offerings inside the transit hall and attraction of a new client, American Airlines.  Early next year, work is to begin on a three-year project to add 33 more gates.  But the next major expansion, which is to overhaul the departure hall and replace the two oldest lines of gates, isn't scheduled to occur until 1998.  Northwest Airlines said its July traffic rose 11% to 4.54 billion revenue passenger miles from 4.1 billion a year earlier.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger flown one mile.  The NWA Inc. unit said its load factor for July, or the percentage of available seats filled, fell to 70.2% from 71.2%.  For the first seven months of 1989, Northwest said it flew 25.77 billion revenue passenger miles, an increase of 13% from 22.81 billion a year earlier.  Load factor fell slightly to 65.5% from 66.2%.  United Airlines said its July traffic rose 3.4% to 6.59 billion revenue passenger miles from about 6.38 billion a year earlier.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger flown one mile.  July's load factor, or the percentage of available seats filled, rose slightly to 72.9% from 72.7% a year earlier.  For the first seven months of 1989, the UAL Corp. unit said it flew 40 billion revenue passenger miles down slightly from 40.2 billion a year earlier.  Load factor was 66.1% compared with 67.9%.  Burma's military junta, in a bid to earn foreign exchange, has decided to promote tourism.  But doing so won't be easy.  Tourism almost disappeared last year, when pro-democracy demonstrations paralyzed the country for months.  In the year ended March 31, only 10,000 tourists visited Burma, down 75% from the prior 12 months, tourism officials say.  Since the junta seized power in September, it has been experimenting with a variety of previously restricted economic activities to garner scarce foreign exchange.  Tourism, which for decades had been tolerated only grudgingly, is now being given high priority, officials say.  "Now we have our own sort of glasnost," says Lt. Col. Thaw-Da Sein, managing director of Burma's Hotels & Tourism Services.  "And we see tourism's potential as a top foreign-exchange earner."  Burmese leaders latched onto tourism after noticing neighboring Thailand's tourism boom.  Last year, the number of tourists visiting Thailand rose 20% from 1987, to about 4.2 million.  An increase of at least 12% is expected this year.  Because 90% of visitors to Burma enter through Bangkok, the Rangoon regime is hoping that Thailand's waves of tourists will mean increasing numbers of travelers into Burma.  By the year ending March 1993, Burma is expecting 150,000 tourists -- more than 2 1/2 times its best-ever year -- and the government is preparing for the surge.  In May, it announced plans to build three five-star hotels, one each in Rangoon, Pagan and Mandalay, sharply increasing the number of the country's hotel rooms.  The government also is building, or planning to build, a half-dozen guest houses during the next three months to increase tourist accommodation.  Also in May, officials began granting tourists 14-day visas, marking the longest stay granted to travelers since Ne Win seized power in 1962.  Nonetheless, many analysts doubt tourism is going to blossom soon.  The infrastructure, from hotels to transport, is decrepit and is likely to remain so because Burma has a $4.2 billion debt and lacks sufficient foreign exchange to improve its facilities.  Many Burmese and foreigners avoid flying on Myanma Airways, formerly Burma Airways, because the country's lack of foreign exchange makes the servicing of aircraft, training of pilots and purchasing of spare parts difficult.  Visitors traveling within Burma are heavily restricted as to where they can go.  Though tourism officials hope to develop new destinations, tourists are currently allowed to visit only a few designated areas, ostensibly because decades-old insurgent wars could threaten travelers' safety.  There is also the problem of what to do in Burma.  Nightclubs have been banned for years, but now there is martial law and a 10 p.m.-to-4 a.m. curfew, too.  As a result, even traditional evening entertainment, such as temple fairs and pwes, or folk operas, has disappeared.  Then, too, since the military's brutal takeover in September, many Burmese are reluctant to talk to foreigners.  If they are seen doing so, they are liable to be questioned by officials about their conversations.  A few years ago, there were even widespread arrests of tour guides.  Perhaps the biggest problem facing tourism is the government's hostile attitude toward foreigners in general.  "Tourism hadn't been given the top priority that it deserves under the previous government," says Lt. Col. Thaw-Da Sein, "because foreigners have always given us lots of trouble."  He cites Britain's colonization of Burma last century, foreign missionaries' work with insurgent ethnic minorities, China's erstwhile support for the outlawed Burmese Communist Party, and foreign broadcasting-service and print-media reports about Burma as examples of antagonistic acts toward the country.  Yet, despite the conditions, the number of tourists visiting Burma had been creeping up in recent years, peaking at about 42,000 in the year ended March 1988.  Then came last year's pro-democracy demonstrations, which brought the country practically to a standstill.  Foreign-exchange earnings from tourism fell to only about $1.4 million in the most-recent fiscal year from about $14 million the year before.  That plunge prompted a quick reassessment of Burma's tourism policies and the subsequent decision "to give tourism the highest priority," says Lt. Col. Thaw-Da Sein.  But the government won't allow individual travelers to visit, unless they arrange a complete tour with Tourist Burma.  "We don't want backpackers here, because we don't want any abuses of foreign exchange," says a Tourist Burma executive.  Skeptics say the government has another motive in trying to discourage individual travelers: It wants to isolate foreigners from Burmese as much as possible.  Still others think that tourism can't grow significantly -- until Burma's political situation becomes clearer.  "If you're going to have tourists coming in" to fill up the planned hotels, says Aung San Suu Kyi, the country's foremost opposition politician, "they must have certain freedom of movement."  That, she asserts, is prohibited.  General Electric Co. PLC of Britain and Siemens AG of West Germany, which have stalked Britain's Plessey Co. for nearly nine months, moved in for what they hope will be the kill.  The two European electronics titans yesterday unveiled a "final" sweetened offer valuing their smaller British rival at #2 billion ($3.29 billion) or 270 pence ($4.45) a share.  Underlining their determination to win, the two partners charged onto London's Stock Exchange yesterday and snapped up 113 million Plessey shares, boosting their joint Plessey stake to 29.99% from 14.3%.  Their revised tender offer, for the Plessey shares they don't already hold, is 20% higher than the original, #1.7 billion or 225 pence-a-share offer, announced last Nov. 16 but repeatedly delayed.  It still failed to satisfy Plessey, which called it "a major price miscalculation" that "shows a total lack of understanding of Plessey and of its immediate and long-term value."  It also disappointed many big Plessey investors, who had been hoping for an extra 10 pence or 15 pence a share.  Nevertheless, the offer appeared likely to prevail.  Plessey's defenses have been worn down by months of costly, bitter takeover war.  "Without any alternative proposals coming forward from Plessey, {the bid} has at least an even chance" of succeeding, said David Rough, United Kingdom equities-portfolio director for Legal & General Assurance, a London-based insurance company that controls a 1.25% Plessey stake.  He added that he hadn't yet decided whether to accept the offer, which he called "marginally low."  Other big Plessey investors contacted yesterday agreed that the bid, though disappointing, will probably succeed.  The Plessey takeover battle has been a war of attrition.  It began in 1985 when GEC, which is unrelated to U.S.-based General Electric Co., tried on its own to gobble up its smaller rival.  British politicians blocked that bid as anti-competitive, but last November GEC brought in reinforcements.  Its Siemens alliance, billed as a key step towards restructuring Europe's weak electronics sector, overcame political objections in London and Brussels.  Wednesday, GEC and Siemens removed the last British government obstacle by clearing their bid plans with the U.K. Ministry of Defense, Plessey's biggest customer.  Complicating the fight is a history of animosity between GEC's Managing Director Lord Weinstock and Plessey Chairman Sir John Clark.  The two strong-willed men are Britain's most powerful electronics executives, and their companies clash repeatedly in rivalry for the country's biggest defense electronics and telecommunications contracts.  Moreover, both men have personal stakes in the outcome: Lord Weinstock assembled GEC over 20 years of merger activity, and Sir John's grandfather founded Plessey.  Partly because of that history, analysts expect Sir John to battle the bid to the bitter end.  Plessey has already tried blocking the takeover with a white knight, a "Pac Man" counter-bid, British court action and political lobbying.  Its next moves, London analysts speculate, may include dragging GEC and Siemens into U.S. courts in an attempt to argue their bid is subject to U.S. securities laws.  Anticipating that, GEC and Siemens yesterday excluded representatives of U.S. news media from a joint news conference here.  That action came despite a recent statement by a U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission official that avoiding U.S. news media doesn't exempt foreign companies from U.S. securities statutes.  GEC and Siemens, in a statement unveiling their new offer, came out swinging at Plessey.  They accused the company of "a lack of coherent strategy."  A string of recent Plessey acquisitions, they charged, had weakened the company's balance sheet.  They criticized Plessey's "recent unimpressive record of earnings per share" and concluded that Plessey needs the deeper pockets and economies of scale it would get as part of GEC and Siemens.  If their bid succeeds, the two partners plan to divide Plessey's big U.K. defense electronics business and to share ownership of its telecommunications-equipment, computer-software and semiconductor businesses.  In late London trading, Plessey shares dropped nine pence apiece to 267 pence, reflecting market disappointment with the bid price.  Stamford Capital Group Inc., a small investment-banking firm led by former Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. officials, said it completed the acquisition of Shearson's Middle Group, a corporate-finance unit based in Philadelphia.  The purchase price wasn't disclosed.  Stamford hired 15 Shearson investment bankers and each firm will receive revenue from certain transactions involving midsized companies.  The new venture will use Shearson to complete public offerings and other capital market transactions that would not be available through Stamford Capital, the firms said.  Do ships need to be equipped with an aircraft-like "black box" to aid investigators after an accident?  Lloyd's Register of Shipping, the ship-classification society based in London, believes they do.  But many shipping lines are resisting the device, which they regard as unnecessary and too costly.  "It's an invention without a need," says Edmund Tornay, vice president, engineering, of Energy Transportation Corp., a closely held New York operator of ships transporting liquefied natural gas.  Lloyd's Register began pitching its voyage-data recorder, which it bills as "the marine black box," more than a year ago.  The society, which also sets standards for the construction of ships, believes the device "fits in perfectly with our role as a safety-oriented organization," says Robert Spencer, Lloyd's senior structural engineer.  So far the device, which is built for Lloyd's by Ship & Marine Data Systems, Devon, England, has found only one buyer: Wescol International Marine Services, a London ship operator.  Later this month Wescol will complete installation of the voyage-data recorder aboard the Gulf Spirit, a container ship sailing between European and U.S. Gulf Coast ports.  The voyage-data recorder measures, collects and stores a wide range of information during a vessel's journey that would be made available for analysis after an accident.  The information, which includes hull stresses, ship motions, weather conditions, course changes and radar readings, is saved for 40 days before the recorder begins to overwrite the oldest data. (Unlike an aircraft's black box, however, the voyage-data recorder doesn't capture the conversations of crew members because the wide distances on board a ship would make that impractical.) The data are stored in a watertight, fire-resistant cylinder, which would float free from a sinking ship.  A radio transmitter fitted into the bright yellow canister helps locate it.  Some shipping executives believe the device comes at a crucial time for the shipping industry, which is reeling from last March's Exxon Valdez disaster, the worst oil spill in U.S. history.  "The black box will be a great tool for improving the safety of vessels," says Arthur McKenzie, director of the Tanker Advisory Center, a tanker information clearinghouse in New York.  "It will provide great factual information of what happened leading up to a disaster."  For example, when a ship breaks in half during a storm "we'll now be able to know if it had structural problems or was being pushed too fast in bad weather by an inexperienced officer," Mr. McKenzie says.  Lloyd's Register officials say the voyage-data recorder will provide insight into what goes wrong aboard ships that sink.  Even when there are survivors, "people in accident situations don't make good witnesses," says Lloyd's Register's Mr. Spencer.  "They are under stress and don't remember very well."  What's more, the voyage-date recorder will provide officers on a ship's bridge with current information about ship motions and hull stresses.  Indeed, Wescol officials say they decided to install the device on the Gulf Spirit because they expect to reap commercial benefits.  "It could lead to changes in ship design and operation that would make them more cost effective," says Michael Steele, Wescol's chief executive.  An official of Chevron Corp.'s shipping division says the company may test a voyage-data recorder within the next 12 to 18 months.  But most ship companies are proving unreceptive, citing the cost of the device, which on Wescol's Gulf Spirit runs about $120,000 for installation of the system's sensors, computer data stations and the recording cylinder.  "It's a considerable expense for little benefit," says George Blake, senior vice president of Martime Overseas Corp., the operating agent for Overseas Shipholding Group Inc., New York.  "In an airplane the reason there's a black box is that you don't always have witnesses or survivors," says Stanley Symon, an executive vice president of Stolt Tankers & Terminals (Holdings) S.A., Greenwich, Conn.  "In shipping that's unusual."  Cunard Line Ltd., operator of the Queen Elizabeth 2 and other passenger ships, also declined to install the device.  "We have our own systems to monitor aspects of performance, and we don't need another one," a Cunard spokesman says.  Lloyd's Register officials say that some ship companies may not be too eager to have a precise record of the events before a ship disaster, for fear that the information may be used against them by investigators and insurance companies.  "Maybe ship masters and chief engineers have the idea it's some kind of electronic spy on board," says Alfred Pagan, Lloyd's Register's chief U.S. representative.  "It can record steering gear maneuvers relative to course and position, and that could be to the owner's advantage or otherwise."  Midland Bank PLC, pushed into a first-half loss by a #846 million ($1.39 billion) loan-loss provision, joined the rest of Britain's big banks in boosting reserves for bad Third World debt.  Midland's unexpectedly large provision for loans to developing countries, booked as an exceptional charge against earnings, resulted in a pretax loss of #531 million in the first six months of this year.  A year ago, Midland recorded a #313 million pretax profit.  It reported a net loss yesterday of #383 million, compared with year-earlier profit of #233 million.  Midland was the last of the United Kingdom's four big commercial banks this week to take such a hit from Third World loans, and its hit was the biggest.  Midland, Barclays Bank PLC, National Westminster Bank PLC and Lloyds Bank PLC charged a total of #1.76 billion ($2.9 billion) against their first-half earnings for loans to such countries as Argentina, Brazil, Mexico and Venezuela.  Combined with past charges, the four banks' provisions for such debt total #6.55 billion, on total of #13.77 billion of these loans outstanding.  London banking sources say pressure for the increase in provisions arose about a month ago, as concern mounted among commercial bankers here and at the Bank of England, which supervises the banks.  In recent months, difficulties in collecting on Third World loans have mounted.  For instance, Venezuela and Argentina have halted interest payments, banking analysts here say.  And many bankers believe U.S. Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady's recently unveiled debt-management plan could have material effects on nonperforming Third World loans.  The British banks' actions could put pressure on the major U.S. banks to raise their own loan-loss provisions, said Robin Monro-Davies, managing director of IBCA Ltd., a London-based bank-rating agency.  Many U.S. banks currently lag the loan-loss provisions of banks in other major industrialized nations.  According to IBCA, many of America's biggest banks currently have reserves ranging from 22% to 26% of the value of their troubled Third World debt portfolios.  The four British banks' provisions are between 47% and 50.4%.  And the levels at major banks in France, West Germany and Switzerland are 50% or more.  In announcing its new provisions yesterday, Midland lashed out at Mr. Brady's debt-management plan.  The Brady Plan, unveiled last March to try to ease the dilemma faced by the economically troubled debtor countries, could result in banks writing down a portion of the debt owed them by developing countries.  Midland officials blamed their increased provisions partly on the plan, saying it makes some debtor countries more reluctant to service their debt.  Excluding its Third World loan problems, Midland's results were in line with expectations.  Income before charges for all bad loans rose 10% to #449 million from #409 million a year ago.  After certain other charges and gains -- but before the exceptional Third World charge -- Midland posted income of #315 million, nearly even #313 million a year ago.  The bank's Midland Montagu investment-banking unit suffered a sharp downturn.  Its profit contribution tumbled to #20 million from #110 million a year earlier.  Midland attributed the drop to reduced profits in capital-market and money-market activities, and to the substantial raising of loss provisions against "a small number of accounts."  CHARTER ONE FINANCIAL Inc., Cleveland, said it got regulatory approval to begin its public offering of 850,000 common shares at $16.875 each.  The shares are being issued in connection with the merger conversions of two thrift institutions into First Federal Savings Bank, a Charter One unit.  The thrifts are Western Reserve Savings Bank of Cleveland and First Federal Savings & Loan Association of Akron.  The public offering will be managed by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets and Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc.  The merger conversions are expected to occur Aug. 10, after which Charter One, a financial concern, will have assets of about $2.1 billion.  GTE Corp., Stamford, Conn., boosted its quarterly dividend 9%, to 73 cents a share from 67 cents.  The dividend is payable Oct. 1 to shares of record Aug. 22.  The telecommunications company said the increase reflects benefits from recent strategic moves as well as "the profitable growth outlook for our major businesses."  Most travelers are leaving home for fun rather than business.  According to a survey by American Express Co. and the Gallup Organization, nearly two-thirds of adults polled in Britain, West Germany, Japan and the U.S. -- the biggest globe-trotting nations -- travel only for pleasure and take one or two trips a year involving paid lodging.  In each country, more adults traveled in the past year than visited a library, attended a sporting event or saw a play or concert.  The Americans had the highest percentage of respondents who took three or more trips in the preceding 12 months, while the Germans showed the highest percentage of people who traveled during that period, including international vacations.  Men travel more than women in the U.S. and Japan, but in that regard the sexes are almost even in Britain and West Germany.  The survey of more than 6,500 adults found that a majority planned at least one trip before Oct. 1.  German and British leisure travelers were far more likely to cross borders, although the vast majority will stay in Western Europe.  Only 13% of the Americans and 6% of the Japanese planned to go abroad.  Almost two-thirds of the Americans planning to leave the country will go to Canada, Mexico or the Caribbean.  Japanese international travelers were split roughly in thirds between North America, Europe and East Asia.  Britons favored Spain as a foreign destination, followed by France, the U.S., Greece and Italy.  Germans pick Spain, then Italy, Austria, France and the U.S.  Among the Japanese, the U.S. was the top overseas spot, with Hawaii accounting for half the rankings.  Most of their other favored spots were in Austral-Asia, with the exception of West Germany and Italy.  After Canada and the Caribbean, Americans liked the U.K., Mexico, West Germany, France and Australia.  Despite their more-distant destinations, 66% of the Japanese polled said they planned to spend just three to six nights abroad on their next pleasure trip.  Among Americans, 62% planned to spend at least seven nights abroad, while 88% of Germans and Britons planned to spend more than a week away.  There were some striking similarities.  More than 75% agreed that they are always thinking of new places to visit and more than 80% said they want to try new and different things.  At least two-thirds felt it important to study the history and culture of the destination.  No more than 10% said they find traveling too stressful, and one in four feared flying.  There were also some cultural differences.  Some 70% of Japanese said they seek rest and relaxation on vacation, compared with 39% of the Germans.  Only 44% of Americans said they wanted to explore places with different languages and cultures, compared with 84% of Germans.  Only 26% of the Japanese were confident in their ability to explore new cities on their own, compared with 70% of the Americans and Britons.  The Germans showed more confidence -- 84% -- and also were least likely to rely on maps and guidebooks.  ---  Two European railways are experimenting with limited competition, and others are expected to try similar plans.  To increase traffic and capture more business from airlines, the German and Austrian railways two months ago began an experiment on their Frankfurt-Vienna Eurocity services.  Across borders on the route, the two companies keep the same staff on board and check passengers only once.  Both are beefing up the small, enroute services.  The idea is to give the traveler a choice of two distinctly different lines on the same route, says the International Union of Railways, even though the ticket price is the same.  Each company offers local cooking and newspapers and serves first-class passengers in their seats.  The Deutsche Bundesbahn accepts credit cards in its restaurant cars and the Austrian railway offers special programs for youngsters.  The group compares the experiment to the service competition among European airlines.  MCDONALD'S Corp., Oak Brook, Ill., said it plans to issue debentures totaling $100 million due Aug. 1, 2019.  Proceeds will be used for general corporate purposes, including capital spending and debt refinancing.  The fast-food firm said the 30-year debentures will pay 8 7/8% interest semiannually and be offered at 98.7% of the principal amount.  Morgan Stanley & Co., Merrill Lynch Capital Markets, J.P. Morgan Securities Inc., PaineWebber Inc. and Salomon Brothers Inc. are the underwriters.  OCCIDENTAL PETROLEUM Corp. said it began a public offering of $300 million of 9.25% senior debentures, due Aug. 1, 2019.  The Los Angeles-based energy company said it will use proceeds principally to repay commercial paper outstanding.  The lead underwriter is Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  The offering brings to more than $1.2 billion the amount of senior debt securities offered under Occidental's $1.5 billion shelf registration with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  MEDICAL DYNAMICS Inc., Englewood, Colo., said it registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission to offer one million units, each consisting of a common share and a stock-purchase warrant.  The company currently has 2,442,000 shares outstanding.  Cohig & Associates Inc. of Denver is the underwriter.  The Dutch chemicals group AKZO N.V. said second-quarter profit rose 12% to 270.6 million guilders ($129 million) from 242.4 million guilders a year earlier as demand for the company's products remained strong.  AKZO forecast full-year profit in 1989 will be "substantially higher" than the 843 million guilders posted for last year.  Previously the company had only forecast earnings would be "high."  Second-quarter sales surged 15% to 4.79 billion guilders from 4.17 billion guilders a year earlier.  Michael Milken, the former chief of Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.'s junk bond operations, is considering adding New York defense attorney Peter E. Fleming Jr. to his defense team, now headed by Arthur L. Liman.  According to individuals familiar with the matter, Mr. Liman, a partner at Paul, Weiss, Rifkind, Wharton & Garrison in New York, has held discussions with Mr. Fleming about joining the defense team as co-counsel in recent weeks.  Mr. Fleming represented Drexel before the securities firm agreed to settle with the government to avoid racketeering charges.  But when Drexel decided to give up its two-year battle and plead guilty to six felony counts, Mr. Fleming, who strongly opposed that settlement, angrily resigned from representing the securities firm.  Defense lawyers said that if Mr. Fleming joins Mr. Milken's defense team, it's more likely that Mr. Milken will stand trial rather than settle his case.  Although he was once a prosecutor, Mr. Fleming is known among defense lawyers for preferring to bring cases to trial.  Mr. Milken was charged in March in a 98-count indictment that included racketeering and fraud charges in connection with allegedly unlawful securities trading.  Although Mr. Milken has often said he is innocent and intends to fight, some lawyers have speculated that Mr. Milken's resolve might have weakened in the wake of the government's sweeping victory this week in the racketeering case against five officials of Princeton/Newport Limited Partnership and a former Drexel trader.  Some of the charges against Mr. Milken involve trading with Princeton/Newport.  Mr. Fleming, a partner at the New York firm of Curtis, Mallet-Prevost, Colt & Mosle, has successfully defended clients ranging from former U.S. Attorney General John Mitchell to Hitachi Ltd.  Messrs.  Fleming and Liman both declined to comment on the matter.  Mr. Milken is facing an expanded indictment that is likely to be returned next month, according to individuals familiar with the government investigation.  His trial is expected to be long and won't begin until next year.  Individuals familiar with Mr. Milken's defense said Mr. Fleming is understood to have discussed with Drexel the possibility of getting a conflict-of-interest waiver to represent Mr. Milken.  Those individuals said they believed Drexel would grant such a waiver if it hasn't already.  Mr. Fleming participated in many Drexel settlement discussions with prosecutors late last year.  But whatever he learned wasn't protected by any secrecy agreement, lawyers say.  Mr. Fleming might be barred from cross examining witnesses at Mr. Milken's trial if those witnesses provided him information during his Drexel defense work.  But Mr. Liman would be allowed to conduct those examinations.  Mr. Milken set up his defense team in 1986 with two high-powered criminal lawyers.  Besides Mr. Liman, Mr. Milken retained Edward Bennett Williams, chairman of Williams & Connolly in Washington, D.C. Mr. Williams died last year.  Mr. Milken is still advised by Williams & Connolly, but that firm is unable to represent him at trial because of a conflict.  Havas S.A., a French media and tourism group, reported a 16% rise in group revenue for the first six months of this year to 8.81 billion francs ($1.40 billion) from 7.62 billion francs a year earlier.  Havas pointed out that the figures don't take into account changes in the group's structure between the two periods.  After taking account of these changes, group revenue showed an increase of 15%, Havas said.  A 37-year-old businessman's fear of flying could be eased only by a cigarette: "Flying makes me nervous, my hands were shaking."  But when he sneaked off to the airplane's bathroom for "three puffs," he set off a smoke alarm.  Like a schoolboy, he was led back to his seat.  There's no sign of relief ahead for smokers like that man, and he may even find it getting worse.  The most powerful group on his side -- the Tobacco Institute -- has caved in, at least partly: On Wednesday, a spokeswoman confirmed that the tobacco-industry organization is telling lawmakers that it won't oppose legislation that would permanently extend the smoking ban on domestic flights of two hours or less.  The Tobacco Institute spokeswoman declined to comment on why the industry won't fight the short-flight ban.  But observers see the move as an effort to head off demands by anti-smoking groups and many lawmakers to expand the ban to include flights of any and all lengths.  The Tobacco Institute is "in the business of making political compromises to save cigarette sales," asserts Ahron Leichtman, president of Citizens Against Tobacco Smoke, which is shooting for a total smoking ban on all flights.  Congress currently is considering renewal of the two-hour flight law, which is due to expire next April.  The House, in fact, voted Wednesday to permanently extend it.  The Senate subcommittee on transportation, meanwhile, has proposed a wider bill that would prohibit smoking on all domestic and international flights.  This battle to expand the no-smoking ban to all flights will continue when the Senate takes up the issue after its vacation.  The current smoking ban covers 80% of all domestic flights and 63% of all airline passengers.  The 1986 Surgeon General's report on the effects of involuntary smoking is the capstone for the argument to not only continue, but broaden the current ban.  The report concluded that passive smoking does lead to disease, including lung cancer, in healthy nonsmokers.  "We have taken a major step to protect our nation's health by restricting tobacco use in . . . the airline cabin," says Rep. Dick Durbin (D., Ill.), a co-author of the current smoking ban.  "It would be foolish to retreat from that historic decision."  The tobacco industry, while ready to compromise on short flights, continues to oppose a smoking ban on all flights.  "Legislating a smoking ban aboard commercial airliners would provide little more than an illusionary quick fix for complex airline cabin environmental concerns," says Charles Whitley, a Tobacco Institute spokesman.  The institute argues that poor ventilation in aircrafts is the real issue.  It says that eliminating tobacco smoke would still leave a host of other harmful chemicals in the air, including cyanide, arsenic, formaldehyde, methane and ammonia.  The industry group, which was taken by surprise when the ban was imposed last year, this time has initiated a grass-roots campaign to unite smokers on the issue.  It also has increased Capitol Hill lobbying efforts.  Additional leverage is the $123,400 that the institute spent last year for honoraria, ranking them as the top giver of any interest group.  The institute paid speaking fees to 85 House members and eight senators, according to Common Cause, the self-styled citizens lobby.  Advocates for the smoking ban contend that most of the flying public wants the ban.  The American Association for Respiratory Care surveyed 27,677 people in 66 domestic airports and found the following: 84% approve of the current ban; 58% of smokers and 93% of nonsmokers approve of the ban; 52% of smokers and 91% of nonsmokers favor a permanent ban.  Smokers made up 25% of those polled.  Still pending is a Transportation Department study of the health effects of cigarette smoke in airplane cabins.  The department isn't taking a stance on legislation until the study is finished, expected early next year.  A federal appeals court ruled that a law firm's client records can be searched in a criminal investigation of the firm despite the protections usually provided by the attorney-client privilege.  With the increase in white-collar and financial crime cases during the past decade, the use of search warrants on law offices is on the rise.  While still relatively rare, such forays into law firms trouble many attorneys who worry clients' rights are evaporating.  "There is growing concern about compromising the attorney-client privilege through search warrants over the past eight to 10 years," says Harvey Silverglate, co-chairman of the Massachusetts Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers.  "A search warrant is a very blunt instrument."  The ruling was on a case in 1985, when federal agents executed a search warrant on the law offices of Console, Marmero, Livolsi, Wood & Curcio in Berlin, N.J., seizing some 420 files related to personal-injury cases.  The targets of the case weren't the clients but the lawyers themselves.  U.S. District Court Judge Joseph H. Rodriguez originally ruled that the search warrant was too broad and ordered that the records be returned to the firm.  That decision was overruled by the Third U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals in Philadelphia.  The appeals panel based its ruling on the "crime-fraud exception" to the attorney-client privilege.  The long-standing exception eliminates the privilege when an attorney is involved in the crime.  To limit the erosion of the attorney-client privilege, the appeals panel said the district judge should consider excluding any records that may not be pertinent to the government's investigation.  "The attorney-client privilege belongs solely to the client," says Marion Percell, an assistant U.S. attorney who handled the government's appeal.  "While the privilege is very valuable, it isn't reasonable to use it to protect an attorney who is perpetrating a crime or a fraud."  Two of the firm's lawyers, along with a physician and other individuals, were indicted in April by a federal grand jury in Newark, N.J., on charges of conspiracy, racketeering and mail fraud.  Philip J. Livolsi and Edward C. Curcio were accused of scheming to inflate their clients' medical injuries and treatment to defraud insurance companies.  They have pleaded innocent to the charges.  Michael R. Perle, an attorney for the law firm, said, "It's kind of a mixed decision, but we're gratified that the process we felt should be in place {to review the records} will be followed."  Under growing pressure from its bankers, J.H. Whitney & Co. said it would seek to lower its bid for long-besieged Prime Computer Inc.  Don F. Ackerman, a Whitney general partner, said that "although we are willing to continue to seek financing at the $21.50 level, we believe, based on our efforts to date, that such financing will probably not be available" from current sources.  Whitney agreed to acquire the Natick, Mass., computer maker in a cash and securities bid valued at about $1.2 billion.  The New York venture capital company extended to Tuesday its offer for Prime's 49.5 million outstanding shares.  The bid, which Whitney had made subject to securing financing, had been scheduled to expire today.  Whitney also said that 24.7 million Prime shares, or about half the stock outstanding, had been tendered as of Wednesday.  In its statement, Whitney said it intended to negotiate with Prime a lower price for the offer, citing its uncertain financing.  Prime declined to comment.  Last week, MAI Basic Four Inc., a Tustin, Calif., computer maker, dropped its 10-month effort to buy Prime and said it would instead seek to acquire only Prime's minicomputer business, for $525 million.  It has also launched a proxy fight to unseat Prime's board.  Citing the company's weak performance as a result of fighting off MAI, Jay Stevens, an analyst with Dean Witter Reynolds Inc., said: "Prime's only chance for survival is to remain intact, probably under Whitney."  Analysts have said that Prime without its minicomputer business would have a weak balance sheet and be saddled with debt from its $435 million buy-out of Computervision Corp. last year.  Computervision brought Prime a leading position in the $4.4 billion market for computer-aided design systems.  But Prime needs the cash flow generated by the minicomputer business, analysts said.  In the latest quarter, Prime had a loss of $19 million on sales of $382 million.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Prime shares closed at $16.625, down 50 cents.  The Bermuda Supreme Court fined National Iranian Oil Co. $25,000 after an official of the country's oil concern threatened to kill an Iranian lawyer.  The lawyer, Sayed Amin, had agreed to testify against National Iranian Oil in a lawsuit against Ashland Oil Inc.  The court also ordered the Iranians to pay Ashland's court costs and granted an injunction barring Iranian officials from harassing its witnesses.  Iran sued the Ashland, Ky., oil refiner and marketer in both Bermuda and Mississippi courts in 1985 for payment on about $282 million of crude oil purchased from National Iranian Oil in 1979.  Ashland then sued the Iranians, contending the country breached its contract by changing the price and quantity of the crude.  Ashland asked the Bermuda court to grant the injunction to protect Mr. Amin, who had agreed to testify as an expert witness against Iran.  National Iranian Oil attorneys couldn't be reached to comment.  The court's order says that S.M. Hosseini, deputy director of International Affairs for National Iranian Oil, told Mr. Amin in June that "Moslem Iranians who helped foreign companies such as Ashland in litigation against Iranian government entities would be killed."  A trial date of Sept. 11 has been set in the Jackson, Miss., court.  No date has been set for the Bermuda trial.  The British government said it agreed to increase the limit on foreign shareholdings in the United Kingdom military aircraft company British Aerospace PLC to 29.5% from the current 15%.  And Britain confirmed its earlier decision to raise the limit on foreign shareholdings in jet-engine manufacturer Rolls-Royce PLC by a similar amount.  The move followed pressure from the European Community Commission, which argued that the government-imposed limit on foreign shareholdings breached provisions in the EC's Treaty of Rome outlawing restrictions on foreign investment except in cases of national security.  The EC Commission last month reached a compromise with Britain to allow the 29.5% limit on foreign shareholdings in Rolls-Royce, although commissioners said they continued to believe the limit is against EC rules.  The commission said at the time that it was dealing with the British Aerospace separately, but British government sources had indicated the Rolls-Royce limit would apply to British Aerospace.  The most famous story about yellow journalism is an anecdote about William Randolph Hearst and the turmoil in Cuba that led to the Spanish-American War at the end of the last century.  Orson Welles told it best, in "Citizen Kane."  As publisher of the sensationalist New York Journal, so the tale goes, Hearst sent correspondents to Cuba in the winter of 1896-97.  When the reporters complained they could find no war and asked to come home, Hearst ordered them to stay.  "You furnish the pictures, and I'll furnish the war," he cabled back.  Few people realize, however, that the anecdote was not originally intended to malign Hearst.  Rather, it was first told in a spirit of approbation by correspondent James Creelman, who added, "If the war against Spain is justified in the eyes of history, then yellow journalism deserves its place among the most useful instrumentalities of civilization."  The larger story that produced this ambiguous anecdote is a major part of Joyce Milton's engaging account, "The Yellow Kids: Foreign Correspondents in the Heyday of Yellow Journalism" (Harper & Row, 412 pages, $22.95).  The conflict in Cuba turned the island into a battleground in the circulation war fought by the Journal and its popular competitors, particularly Joseph Pulitzer's New York World.  The novelist Stephen Crane, who covered the Cuban conflict for both the Journal and the World, was repeatedly dunned by his editors for sensational copy: "We were urged . . . to remember that the American people were a collection of super-nervous idiots who would immediately have convulsions if we did not throw them some news -- any news."  Plenty of reporters were more than willing to oblige.  Sitting in the outdoor cafe of Havana's luxurious Inglaterra Hotel (where the steaks "were as tender as Delmonico ever served") they concocted fantasy military campaigns and invented such choice nonsense as insurgent divisions composed entirely of beautiful Amazons.  One reporter who actually ventured into the field was the World's Sylvester "Harry" Scovel, Cuban nationalist sympathizer and secret agent.  To get the real story in Cuba, Scovel crawled through jungles, slept in swamps, had a price put on his head by Spanish authorities and was once reported hanged.  He also gained notoriety for throwing a punch at the commanding general of the American forces on the island in full view of 1,600 troops.  In the years before war broke out between Spain and the U.S., conservative, non-yellow papers were not inclined to challenge Spanish press restrictions.  It was because of Scovel and others like him, Ms. Milton argues, that yellow journals such as the World, for all their shrill excesses, were the source of most serious news about Cuba.  At the same time, the papers shaped the cliche image of the foreign correspondent as a young, flamboyant, brilliantly unorthodox daredevil.  Scovel, for one, became a Cuban folk legend and one of America's first media stars.  Reporting would never again be "considered a grubby, dead-end job, suitable mainly for self-educated boys from poor families, black sheep and alcoholics," writes Ms. Milton.  Crane, for example, was already famous as the author of "The Red Badge of Courage" when the Journal hired him to chronicle New York's slum life with its opium dens, streetwalkers and con artists.  His lover was Cora Taylor, who had run a brothel in Jacksonville, Fla., called the Hotel de Dream before joining the Journal as one of the nation's first female foreign correspondents.  Crane and Scovel became fast friends in Cuba.  Scovel's wife, Frances, later wrote, "I don't think they had a moral between them, but they did have ethics, and traditions of honesty and bravery."  The same might be said of a considerable number of their colleagues.  With their irreverent, bumptious reporting and idiosyncratic personal lives, the reporters reminded people of a cartoon character by Richard Outcault, a snaggletoothed ragamuffin known as the Yellow Kid from the color of his shapeless, ankle-length gown.  The Kid first entertained the World's working-class readers by lampooning the pretensions of the bourgeoisie.  Readers loved him, writes Ms. Milton, "for the manic gleam in his eye and the sense that wherever he appeared, mayhem could be expected to erupt at any moment."  By the end of 1896, "yellow journalism" -- also called "yellow kid journalism" -- was a part of common language.  The yellow press at first treated the Cuban insurrection as a form of entertainment, and there is much that is entertaining in Ms. Milton's account.  Her material is rich in eccentric characters and pointed anecdotes, all handled with much humor.  At the same time, she seldom loses sight of the tragedy of the conflict or its significant implications for the U.S. or of the general feel of life in a "go-ahead" nation on the brink of becoming a world power.  "The Yellow Kids" starts with the dedication of the Statue of Liberty and ends with Teddy Roosevelt in Cuba leading the Rough Riders' charge up San Juan Hill -- most of them on foot and puffing all the way up.  ---  Mr. Coates works at Dow Jones News Service in New York.  Shin-Etsu Handotai Co., a leading Japanese maker of silicon wafers, said it will start production in Britain, probably in early 1991.  Company officials said their wholly owned subsidiary, S.E.H. Europe Ltd., will build a plant in Livingston, Scotland, at a cost of 4.5 billion yen ($33 million) and make about 2.4 million wafers a year for use in making 1-megabit Dynamic Random Access Memory and other chips.  Shin-Etsu Handotai is the first Japanese wafer manufacturer to move to Europe.  So shocking was Manhattan's secret shame that travel agents and tourist brochures ignored it entirely.  Not even among themselves, when the children were asleep, would New Yorkers whisper about it.  Now it can be revealed.  In a borough whose Yellow Pages boast 23 singing-telegram companies, seven billiard parlors and two stores specializing in occult supplies, there wasn't a single outdoor miniature-golf course.  Yesterday, this pitiful state of affairs came to an end with the opening of a 10-hole course in Central Park.  Deprived of the game for decades, Manhattanites can finally play it within their precincts.  They don't even have to get in shape; miniature golf has been called the feeblest outdoor activity this side of waiting for a bus.  A national revival of miniature golf has helped restore New York to the mainstream.  Although no trade organization tracks the miniature-golf industry, Maria Reidelbach, a historian of the sport and co-author of the seminal work, "Miniature Golf," estimates there are 1,000 to 1,500 courses in the U.S., and the number is growing.  She believes miniature golf is coming back because baby boomers nostalgic for fads of the '50s are also looking for wholesome places to take their kids.  Like most miniature-golf courses, the one in Central Park is, in industry argot, "themed."  The theme here is New York architecture, featuring stationary models of landmarks such as the Brooklyn Bridge, the World Trade Center and the Bronx Zoo.  Early players found the course more challenging than it looked but lamented the absence of such traditional hazards as revolving windmills and swinging barn doors.  It costs $4 an adult and $2 a child to play the course.  It doesn't require much ingenuity or even cash to create a miniature-golf course.  For $5,400 you can buy a pre-fabricated, no-frills 18-holer.  But experts differ on how difficult the courses should be and how big a part chance should play.  The Putt-Putt Golf Courses of America, with more than 325 locations, has largely eliminated windmills and barn doors because the management felt such obstacles introduced too much luck into the game.  Putt-Putt emphasizes skill in golf partly because it sponsors four professional tournaments a year, awarding some $250,000 in prize money.  Even without windmills, Putt-Putt's franchisees can choose from among 110 different copyrighted holes.  Bob Livingston, owner of the Salute to the USA Miniature Golf Course in Weirs Beach, N.H., says the worst holes are ones where the ball can bounce back toward the golfer after being hit.  Mr. Livingston took a jackhammer to one of his holes that was too tough for children.  But he says there are still about five holes on his course that have people "going bald."  Experts agree that good miniature-golf courses are colorful, well-lit and, especially, clean.  It doesn't hurt if they're sprinkled with giant statues, waterfalls or castles.  The best ones give away little pencils with the course names printed on them, says Ms. Reidelbach  At the Central Park course, financed by Donald Trump, players are asked to return their pencils at the end of the game.  "That's why I'll never be as rich as Donald Trump," says Peter Boynton, part owner of a new 18-hole miniature-golf course in Nantucket, Mass., where pencils are included in the admission price.  Even the most elaborate of today's miniature-golf courses are pale imitations of the ones that existed in the sport's halcyon days of the late 1920s and '30s.  Back then, a golfer might have had to putt over a roulette wheel or past a live bear trained to snatch golf balls.  The game was invented in 1926 by Frieda Carter, part owner of a Tennessee resort called the Fairyland Inn, and patented as "Tom Thumb Golf" in 1929.  By 1930, there were between 25,000 and 50,000 miniature-golf courses in the U.S.  Four million Americans played every day.  Courses lay atop New York skyscrapers, in hotel ballrooms, in a state prison and on the grounds of a state hospital for the insane.  A California woman sued her local zoning board for permission to install a course in a graveyard on her land, incorporating the tombstones as hazards.  The miniature-golf fad inspired a song, "I've Gone Goofy Over Miniature Golf"; a magazine, Miniature Golf Management; and textbooks, "How to Play Miniature Golf" and "Miniature Golf: A Treatise on the Subject."  The fad passed almost as quickly as it had arrived.  Miniature golf was seen by some as a corrupting influence on youth.  There were allegations that organized crime had infiltrated the business.  The courses, some of which stayed open as late as 4 a.m. as well as on Sundays, made enemies of their neighbors.  Though the game had a renaissance in the 1950s, it never regained the popularity of its golden age.  Today, according to Donna Lloyd, spokeswoman for Putt-Putt, there is a renewed interest in miniature-golf courses as investments.  People with vacant property and a little cash look at the business and think it's going to be a cinch, she says.  After the initial capital outlay, expenses seem minimal.  "It's an easy business to run, you pass out the same ball and club all the time, there's no inventory," says Joe Rogari, marketing director for MiniGolf Inc. of Jessup, Pa.  "You can get an excellent return on a $12,000 investment."  But Ms. Lloyd says it is harder than it looks to turn a profit.  Owners often underestimate the number of staffers they will need to maintain their course, and many make the mistake of building a course too close to an existing course.  Back at Central Park, Mr. Trump's partners and creators of the course, Alex Goldstein and Sanford Berger, both 27 years old, of Gotham Golf Inc., plan to add another nine holes next summer.  Mr. Goldstein says he believes miniature golf is coming back because real golf is becoming more popular, but many people can't afford the clubs and greens fees.  "And we have the monopoly on outdoor miniature golf in New York," Mr. Goldstein gloats.  To real golfers, the miniature variety is a blight on the sport's good name.  "Golf is an upper-class sport; miniature golf is considered a lower-class, tacky thing," says Ms. Reidelbach.  Michael Moss, a trader at the American Stock Exchange and a five-handicap golfer, says miniature golf is little more than a way for a guy to sneak up behind his date and give her an intimate demonstration of putting.  "It's just an excuse to get your hands on your girl," Mr. Moss carps.  France's financial markets watchdog, the Commission des Operations de Bourse, said it is investigating suspected irregularities in the trading of Eurotunnel shares last month.  A commission spokeswoman said the investigation, which began last Friday, was prompted by unusually large trading volume in the days immediately prior to an announcement by the consortium that it needed more cash to cover cost overruns in its project to build a rail link under the English Channel.  The commission noted that trading volume in Eurotunnel shares started building up on July 18, with daily volume rising to a peak of 3.5 million shares on July 21.  At the same time, the price of Eurotunnel shares fell steeply on the both the Paris and London stock exchanges, where they are traded.  In Paris, the share price declined steadily from 115.50 francs ($18.38) on July 17 to 113.90 francs on July 18 and to 112.50 francs on July 19, before dropping to 107.10 francs on July 20 and 102.90 francs on July 21.  Eurotunnel shares were trading at 92.60 francs yesterday, down 1.10 francs.  On the afternoon of July 21, after a bimonthly board meeting, Eurotunnel disclosed that the design, manufacture and supply of the Channel Tunnel shuttle trains, initially expected to cost about #250 million ($414.38 million), would be "substantially higher" than had been foreseen.  On July 26, Eurotunnel announced orders valued at about #600 million for the shuttle trains.  Eurotunnel also disclosed on July 21 that it had started discussing with its agent banks the best way of obtaining additional financing.  According to some reports, the consortium may require new loans of between #500 million and #1 billion.  It has ruled out any plans to raise more money on the stock market through a rights issue, however.  The commission official said a report based on the investigations will be submitted to its supervisory board, which will decide if further action is required.  She said it is too early to say how long the investigation will take and declined to say whether the commission is coordinating its efforts with Britain's Securities and Investments Board.  William James, Falconbridge Ltd.'s feisty chairman, president and chief executive officer, is accustomed to pulling rabbits out of a hat.  So, when the gravelly voiced Mr. James dropped by early Wednesday at the office of his old pal and former boss, Noranda Inc.'s Chairman and Chief Executive Alfred Powis, with news that Falconbridge had agreed to a proposed $2.42 billion takeover by Amax Inc., Noranda executives claim they weren't totally surprised.  "Bill and I worked together like brothers for seven years, and you get to know a guy pretty well," said Mr. James's former associate, Adam Zimmerman, who is now Noranda's vice chairman.  "What I learned about Bill is that he's very unpredictable, and he's a fighter."  If successful, the friendly Amax deal would free Falconbridge from the unwanted embrace of Noranda, a Bronfman-family controlled resource giant that in the past year has acquired -- without paying any premium -- about 24.9% of Falconbridge's stock outstanding, leading most observers to conclude Noranda had control of Falconbridge virtually locked up.  The Amax takeover would also be the latest in a string of comeback victories for Mr. James, whose irreverence belies a combativeness and keenness that have won praise from analysts and foes.  "What he has done with Amax is the best thing he could for the Falconbridge shareholders.  It looks like a pretty good defensive move, and he has made everybody wealthy in the process, except Amax," said analyst Rick Cohen, of Toronto's BBN James Capel Inc.  Mr. James, who turned 60 years old in February, cemented his reputation as a corporate turnaround artist in the early 1980s.  After vacating an executive vice president's post at Noranda to take the top job at Falconbridge, he helped steer the big mining company -- at that time almost strictly a nickel producer -- back from the brink of financial ruin.  Six quarters after being named Falconbridge's chairman and president in April 1982, Mr. James returned the money-losing company to profitability, despite depressed metal prices and an economic recession.  He did it by slashing 25% of Falconbridge's work force at its big Sudbury, Ontario, nickel mining operations, and about 40% of the head office staff here.  Mr. James didn't entirely spare himself, abandoning a big corner office for a more modest one.  His earthy, wise-cracking style helped him win over even toughened miners.  "He's not afraid to get dirty.  He'll go underground," a union official once said.  "If there were 40 guys here that wanted to hang him from the rafters, he could talk to them for 15 minutes and they'd all be clapping him on the back.  We call him Jesse James, the famous outlaw."  In 1985, Mr. James set his sights on Canada Development Corp.'s Kidd Creek copper, zinc and silver producing unit, which Noranda had long been interested in acquiring.  The 615 million Canadian dollar (US$523 million) acquisition of Kidd Creek saddled Falconbridge with debt, and for a while, it looked as if stubbornly low base metals prices would prevent Kidd Creek from paying off.  But it has paid off.  With the upturn in base metals prices that began last year, Kidd Creek has become a major profit generator, accounting for 44% of Falconbridge's 1988 operating profit of C$506.2 million.  Falconbridge's 1988 net income of C$341.1 million, or C$4.57 a share, was a record.  Noranda was paying close attention.  After Falconbridge once again loaded its balance sheet with debt last year by buying back a big block of shares from Placer Dome Inc., Noranda figured Falconbridge was ripe for the picking.  Noranda began a creeping takeover effort for control of Falconbridge by periodically acquiring its shares in the open market, building its stake to the current 24.9%.  All the while, Noranda's Mr. Powis made it clear that Noranda's main interest was Kidd Creek.  "I've never made any secret of the fact that we've lusted after Kidd Creek ever since it was discovered in the 1960s," he said recently.  The verbal jousting between Mr. James and his former boss, Mr. Powis, whose offices are just five floors apart in a downtown Toronto office tower, has in recent months become one of corporate Canada's most-publicized sideshows.  At Noranda's recent annual meeting, Mr. Powis told shareholders that Noranda misses Mr. James so much "that the moment we could afford it, we bought a piece of him back."  Added Mr. Powis, "Bill is surprisingly unimpressed with the compliment."  Mr. James, an independent-minded engineer by training who one former associate said can't "live within a corporate culture unless it's one he created himself," had been doing much less talking than Mr. Powis of late -- until Wednesday, that is, when he announced the surprise C$36.125-a-share offer by Amax, which is run by another old friend, Allen Born.  "Alf was a little bit surprised" at the bid, said Mr. James, offering a slightly different version than Mr. Powis of his Wednesday morning chat at the Noranda executive's office.  "But he liked the price," he said, with a laugh.  Mr. Powis said Noranda would pocket a C$221 million profit by tendering to Amax's bid.  Not everyone is happy with the Amax bid, however.  Some Falconbridge executives think they've been sold out, said a former associate of Mr. James.  "It was Bill who saved Falconbridge in the early 1980s.  Now I think he's going to be around to bury the company," said the associate.  "With Amax buying the whole company, they're not going to rent you out a room and let you stay.  You'll have to sell the house and get out."  Farmers spent $118.4 billion in 1988 on animals, feed, labor, machinery and other items needed to raise crops and livestock, the Agriculture Department said.  The 1988 figure represented a 7.5% increase over the $110.1 billion spent in 1987, the department added.  Still, last year's total falls short of the record $131.8 billion farmers spent in 1981, just before the financial crunch that stalled expansion in the nation's agricultural sector.  Annual spending by farmers reached its nadir this decade in 1986, $106 billion, when many sharply cut back capital investments during a time of plummeting land values and rising debt burdens.  In 1988, average expenditures per farm was $54,956, an increase of $4,165 from 1987.  The top 16.8% of farms, those with annual sales of $250,000 or more, accounted for more than 68% of the total expenditures.  Feed was the largest single cost item last year at $17.9 billion, accounting for 15.1% of total costs.  The previous year, feed cost $14.9 billion and accounted for 13.5% of expenses, the highest single expense item that year as well.  Avon Products Inc., to no one's surprise, rejected investor Irwin Jacobs's $2.85 billion bid for the company, but it agreed to meet with him soon.  Despite the assertion by its board that shareholders would be best served by the New York-based cosmetics giant's remaining independent, James E. Preston, Avon's chairman and chief executive officer, agreed to discuss Avon's business plans with Mr. Jacobs -- "but not to negotiate the sale of the company."  Mr. Jacobs, who is offering $41 a share for Avon common stock as part of his all-cash bid, said in an interview that Avon's response was "better than what I assumed it was going to be.  I'm very pleased" by what he characterized as Mr. Preston's extension of an olive branch.  "I don't expect any miracles," the Minneapolis investor said of the meeting, which will probably be held in New York next week.  "I look forward to meeting with him rather than with investment bankers and lawyers and everybody else.  I look at it as a very friendly opportunity for both of us."  Mr. Jacobs declined to disclose what he intended to tell Avon's chairman.  Meanwhile, Mr. Jacobs offered to enter into a "standstill agreement" should a deal be struck only to have his financing fall through.  Mr. Jacobs has retained Citicorp to line up $3.6 billion in bank financing.  Such agreements amount to a promise of "I'll leave you alone," a Wall Street lawyer said.  By signing one, a bidder agrees not to buy more stock, engage in a proxy fight or take other actions that might be seen as threatening a company, the lawyer said.  Mr. Jacobs's partnership with Amway Corp. holds 10.1% of Avon's 54.9 million shares of common stock.  Avon stock fell yesterday as investors discounted Mr. Jacobs's chances.  It closed at $35.875, down 62.5 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  "The $41 offer isn't significantly different from the previous offer of $39," said Jeffrey Ashenberg, an analyst with Dean Witter Reynolds Inc.  In May Amway withdrew a $39-a-share bid.  The analyst suggested that the investor may simply want to keep Avon in play, hoping for another buyer.  "The ball is back in Mr. Jacobs's court," Deepak Raj, a Merrill Lynch & Co. analyst.  Mr. Raj, who calculates Avon's takeover value at between $45 and $50, said the company's restructuring effort "has begun to show progress."  Asked his reaction to the market's lukewarm response to his bid, Mr. Jacobs said, "If the market surpassed my number, I have no opportunity, but I'm personally not affected what the market's doing.  It's my money."  U.S. Forest Service officials warned yesterday that the current fire season in the West could be as bad as last year's, which was the worst in almost 80 years.  So far this year, more than 39,400 fires have been reported burning 1.38 million acres.  That compares with almost 61,200 fires covering 2.37 million acres through the same time period last year.  "Throughout the Western states, the fire season is continuing to get worse," Allan West, a Forest Service deputy chief, said at a news conference.  "Long-range weather forecasts indicate continuing severe fire conditions, leaving this fire season with the potential to be as severe as last year's."  West said the extreme-to-severe fire conditions in 14 Western states coupled with the long-term weather forecasts prompted the Forest Service's concerns.  Since Sunday alone, West said 66 major wildfires in Idaho, Oregon, California, Washington and Montana have swept over 220,000 acres, destroying about 60 structures and forcing hundreds of people to evacuate.  It was sort of like getting a love letter from a hated enemy.  Connecticut Bank & Trust wooed Joseph Caldrello, professing its desire for him as a customer.  "This is your opportunity to benefit from an extraordinary offer CBT has for you, a homeowner with an admirable credit history," gushed a letter from the bank's president, David B. Payne.  "Applying is easy.  Simply call TOLL FREE 1-800-CBT-LEND."  But the Hartford, Conn., bank, a unit of Bank of New England Corp., already does business with Mr. Caldrello -- and has been trying to end the anything-but-loving relationship.  The letter arrived at Mr. Caldrello's home on the day the bank threatened to repossess the inventory of one of his automobile dealerships, which he says has been doing business with the bank for 27 years.  A heated court fight has made headlines in local newspapers for weeks.  In fact, Connecticut Bank has "a substantial number of liens" on his home, a bank attorney concedes, and wants to claim $2 million of Porsches and Jaguars at his dealership in Groton, Conn.  "It's been a long and troubled relationship," attorney Ross Fingold says.  Richard deNoia, a bank vice president, calls the letter "a pretty standard marketing technique" that used a mailing list purchased from a credit bureau.  "It was just an invitation to apply," he says.  "But I guess if I had written the thing, I might have worded it differently."  Mr. Caldrello, who concedes he has credit problems, alleges in his lawsuit that the bank has been loose with credit, and he's claiming $200 million in damages.  Carelessness with credit "pervades CBT's general lending policies," he says, citing the letter as an example.  He says the bank "is trying to shift the blame for its irresponsible credit policies" to him and other car dealers who are bank customers.  Connecticut Bank denies the allegations and says Mr. Caldrello has been in default on his credit agreements for three years.  Mr. Caldrello, in turn, calls the bank's statements "an outright lie."  With the jobs of 400 employees at stake, Mr. Caldrello enlisted the help of Connecticut Democrats Sen. Christopher Dodd and Rep. Sam Gejdenson, whose aides helped get a 90-day extension from the bank to allow Mr. Caldrello to find alternate financing for his business.  Money manager Forstmann-Leff Associates, attempting to sever a three-year-old alliance, is seeking to buy back a 50% interest in the firm held by Guinness Peat Group PLC of Britain.  Forstmann-Leff said Guinness Peat has given preliminary approval to the buy-back proposal.  Final word on the transaction is expected within a month.  Pending that approval, Forstmann-Leff declined to disclose the amount of its offer for the 50% stake, which Guinness acquired three years ago for $90 million.  If Forstmann-Leff's bid succeeds, it will mark an unusual reversal in a wave it helped to start: foreign companies purchasing all or part of U.S. financial-services firms.  That trend is expected to continue, but the Forstmann-Leff experience indicates that the marriages aren't always blissful.  "We'd like to own ourselves back," said William F. Harnisch, president of Forstmann-Leff and one of five senior managers who sold the half-interest in 1986.  "The original {Guinness Peat} people we signed on with are gone," he said, "and a lot of the synergies we expected never developed."  After the 1986 sales agreement with Forstmann-Leff, control of Guinness Peat was acquired by Equiticorp International PLC, a New Zealand financial-services group.  Since then, Equiticorp International's finances have collapsed and its creditor banks have sought buyers for the Guinness Peat operations.  Mr. Harnisch said the turmoil hasn't affected the day-to-day operations of Forstmann-Leff, which currently manages $4 billion in client assets.  But he said there were indirect consequences.  In particular, a flow of foreign money that Forstmann-Leff expected to receive through Guinness Peat never materialized.  Going into the pact with Guinness Peat, "we thought we would have access to international monies coming to the U.S.," Mr. Harnisch said.  Since that hasn't happened, he said, "From our standpoint and from our clients' standpoint, we would prefer to be on our own again."  Several deals involving big money-management firms have surfaced in recent weeks as Japan's Nikko Securities Co. agreed to pay $125 million for a 50% interest in Wells Fargo & Co.'s investment advisory unit, and Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. said it would sell most of its Lehman Management Co. unit to a group including Lehman's management for about $100 million.  David N. Dreman, head of Dreman Value Management Inc., this week began informing clients that he planned to sell control of firm to a group led by leveraged buy-out firm Lodestar Group for $96 million.  Industry observers called the price very attractive for a money-management firm, amounting to more than four times its annual revenue.  Dreman Value has about $4.4 billion under management.  The transaction calls for Mr. Dreman and Dreman Value employees to keep a 25% stake in the firm and receive an additional 13% of its earnings for up to seven years.  The share of earnings going to the firm's personnel other than Mr. Dreman could be further increased as an incentive.  Key managers also will be given five-year contracts to keep them with the firm.  Lodestar President Ken Miller, former co-head of mergers and acquisitions of Merrill Lynch & Co., said the firm decided to enter the money-management business several months ago.  He said he expected to see more LBOs of money managers, but noted that "you have to believe in cash flow-based financing because there aren't any assets here to speak of."  Leonard M. Harlan, principal in the LBO firm of Castle Harlan Inc. that led a $300 million buy-out last year of Delaware Management Co., said money-management firms are well-suited to LBO transactions.  "It's a business that doesn't require any R&D, so all the cash that comes from operations is available to service debt," he said.  He also noted that in the Delaware Management transaction, which was the first of its kind, the LBO format boosted motivation within the firm by giving stakes to key personnel, many for the first time.  "Thirty-four members of management were made stockholders, and, boy, does that turn on the juices," he said.  Mr. Dreman said retaining control of his firm was central to his decision to sell.  "They are really going to let us run our show the way we've always run it," Mr. Dreman said of Lodestar yesterday.  Regarding the reaction of the firm's 300 clients, Mr. Dreman said, "We've gotten an almost an completely favorable response."  William F. Quinn, president of AMR Corp.'s investment arm with $125 million invested with Dreman Value, said several of the money managers he uses have been acquired with mixed results.  "Some continue just as before and produce good returns; others have become complacent," he said.  "Our practice has been to give people at least a year to prove themselves."  Other Dreman clients also said they would wait and watch Dreman Value's performance.  "It raises a flag, but I'm not sure it's red," said Terry Hanley, director of the Wyoming state retirement system with $60 million invested with Mr. Dreman.  De la Rue Co. won shareholder approval for the sale of its Crosfield printing equipment division to Du Pont Co., Wilmington, Del., and Fuji Photo Film Co., Tokyo, despite a campaign against the sale by companies controlled by British publisher Robert Maxwell.  Holders of 63.4 million of the specialty printing concern's shares, or 45% of the total issued share capital, voted for the #235 million ($389 million) sale at a special meeting.  Only 33.7 million shares, or 24%, were voted against.  Nearly all those represented the nearly 22% stake held by Maxwell-controlled companies.  Scitex Corp., an Israeli-based company chaired by Mr. Maxwell, said it was prepared to offer as much as #265 million for the division.  But De la Rue's chairman, Peter Orchard, said the company believes a Scitex bid might face regulatory obstacles in Britain and the U.S.  A Scitex spokesman said the company "will now consider what further action, if any, it can take to pursue its interest in Crosfield."  After the shareholders' approval, the sale to the U.S. chemical concern and the Japanese photographic and information products company now awaits only regulatory clearance, De la Rue said.  It's hardly news that the airwaves will be filled with footballs for six months beginning this weekend, and while the games will vary in terms of quality and suspense it's safe to say that as a group they'll be about ordinary, and subject to the usual vicissitudes.  Such are the ways of sport.  You drama fans out there won't be neglected, however.  On eight consecutive Sunday nights beginning Sept. 10, NFL Films will produce, and the ESPN cable-television network will air, "The Dream Season," matching "classic" teams from the National Football League's past.  "Dream Season" won't be some kind of old-timers' league, so one needn't fear for the now-brittle bones of the likes of Johnny Unitas and Ray Nitschke.  It'll be the "real" 1985 Chicago Bears against the "real" 1977 Dallas Cowboys, among others, in the only way possible: film clip vs. film clip.  Folks may disagree over whether the best clips win, but they surely will see a succession of thrillers.  NFL Films is the outfit that makes every pro football bash seem as weighty in retrospect as the battle for Stalingrad, so the stakes of the series will be properly grandiose: the selection of the all-time-best NFL team.  Twenty championship teams from the past four decades were picked for the tournament by NFL coaches and executives, and arranged into four divisions.  In addition to six televised "regular season" games, NFL Films has run computer simulations for an entire schedule, and highlights of other games will be shown during halftime of the game-of-the-week.  The four division winners will "meet" on Oct. 22, and those winners will play in the -- what else? -- "Dream Bowl" the following week.  There's been talk that USA Today will run weekly standings and statistics and, as befits Pete Rose's favorite newspaper, point spreads on coming contests.  Don't laugh.  Somebody'll bet.  Steve Sabol, NFL Films president, says the computer stuff already has been completed, and that he and a half-dozen others in the company know the tourney's outcome.  He says each has been issued a cyanide capsule and instructed to swallow it if caught and tortured for information.  Just choking.  The engaging Mr. Sabol does not joke about why his firm, an arm of the NFL, is putting together the series.  "Our job is to perpetuate the legends of pro football, and what better way to do it than to bring back to life the great old teams?" says he in his suburban Philadelphia office.  "Besides, we've got this wonderful film library, and this is a terrific way to use it."  NFL Films indeed has a wonderful library here, rack upon rack of canisters filling a room that measures 40 by 80 feet, and 22 feet high.  It has filmed every league game since 1964, and has obtained footage of many previous contests as well.  Most of the pre-1960 film is black and white, not up to current snuff, and therein lies a rub for "Dream Season."  Although four pre-'60 squads are in the tourney (the '51 Rams, '53 Lions, '55 Browns and '59 Colts), games involving them will be shown only in highlight form.  Mr. Sabol affirms, albeit silently, that none will be around for the playoffs.  Other obstacles stood in the way of using film to pit teams of different eras.  Uniforms and playing fields changed, and so did coaches' garbs.  For instance, John Madden, coach of the '76 Oakland Raiders, which appears in two of the six fully televised games (the '85 Bears do, too, and for the same reason: viewer popularity), wore a dark blue shirt on the sidelines of some games, and a striped white shirt for others.  "When we showed sideline shots of John, we could only use games when he wore the same-colored shirt," notes Mr. Sabol.  "That cut our options."  But the sheer volume of film on hand, plus the availability of electronic wizardry, has enabled NFL Films to put together a series that's better than passable.  I watched all or part of the first three weeks' games -- the '77 Cowboys vs. '85 Bears; '84 49ers vs. '66 Packers; and '76 Raiders vs. '69 Chiefs -- and each time had the feeling that what I saw could have been real.  The games were true-to-life in the sense that their ratio of hype to action was about two to one for the 90- or 75-minute broadcasts.  There were pre-game interviews with coaches and players made unusual only by the fact that the contests they were previewing would exist just on celluloid, halftime highlight shows and the usual telecaster blather.  A lot of the game shots showed teams or players standing alone -- on the sidelines, in huddles, lining up for plays -- and thus required no special ingenuity.  "Dream Season" games consist of about 30 complete plays (actual NFL games have about 120) and others in montage.  Mostly, the producers used footage from games in which a featured team played its opponent's counterpart during its championship season, but clips from other contests also were included.  The results aren't seamless.  The Cowboys-Bears "dream" game, for instance, consisted of many shots from the 1977 match between the teams, which Dallas won, 37-7, and an '85 tilt in which Chicago prevailed, 44-0.  Thus, you see '77 Bears Jim Osborne and Tom Hicks, and '85 Cowboy Everson Walls, making tackles.  In some plays, the Bears' No. 55 is Otis Wilson of the '85 team, in others he's Doug Buffone of the '77 gang.  Wilson is black, Buffone is white.  In other plays -- the important ones, says Mr. Sabol -- NFL Films went to some trouble to achieve authenticity.  The '85 Bears' William Perry sacks a quarterback wearing No. 12.  It wasn't Roger Staubach of the '77 Cowboys, who wore that number (of course), but Danny White of the '85 Dallas team, whose No. 11 was changed by some kind of magic to a 12.  "The authenticity of our games is in their rhythm and 'feel,' not in individual details," asserts Mr. Sabol.  "I think we succeed there."  As I said before, I agree.  And if anyone wants to bet on the Cowboys-Bears game, gimme a call.  Long-Term Credit Bank of Japan Ltd. plans to establish a joint investment advisory company in the U.S., financial sources said.  They said the bank will join with Miller, Anderson & Sherrerd, a Philadelphia investment advisory company, in setting up the new company.  Long-Term Credit Bank is reportedly hoping to create the venture next month in Philadelphia, as soon as the bank obtains approval from the U.S. Federal Reserve.  The new company, to be capitalized at $1 million, will be 60%-owned by the Japanese bank and 40% by Miller Anderson, the sources said.  Among other things, it will invest assets on behalf of Japanese companies and institutional investors.  For Long-Term Credit Bank, which acquired an 18.3% stake in the U.S. company last year, the link means closer working relations in the business.  The venture is expected to enable the Japanese bank to acquire the investment skills of Miller Anderson, while it will help the U.S. concern to establish closer business relations with Japanese investors and help prepare for a possible advance into the Japanese market.  More than 700 Canadian natural-gas producers vote today in an election that could determine the fate of about $1.9 billion of pipeline projects planned to supply the U.S. Northeast.  The gas producers will mail ballots to two Calgary-based gas marketing concerns, Pan-Alberta Gas Ltd. and Western Gas Marketing Ltd., voting to accept or reject eleven contracts to supply utilities and independent power producers in the Northeast with as much as 489.5 million cubic feet of gas daily.  About 189.8 million cubic feet of the gas is meant to supply the $354 million Champlain natural gas pipeline, planned to supply natural gas to New England.  The balance of the gas is for Connecticut-based Iroquois Gas Transmission System, a $524 million project to ship gas to utilities and power generators in New York and Connecticut.  In addition, TransCanada PipeLines Ltd., Toronto, plans to spend $1.02 billion to expand its system to transport the gas to the U.S. border.  The vote is being held as producers demand better terms than they had received in the past and it is linked to a market of which producers have very high expectations, analysts say.  "This is going to be a very, very close-run thing," said Dwight Curly, president of Burlington, Vt.-based Champlain Pipeline Operating Co."If producers reject these contracts . . . we're looking at significant delays or even the abandonment of the project," he said.  Champlain proposes to ship as much as 321.5 million cubic feet a day to New England, beginning in 1991.  An additional 499 million cubic feet of gas daily would reach the Northeast via Iroquois.  Alberta producers have already rejected three contracts, negotiated by Pan-Alberta Gas, to ship gas on the Champlain system.  All three have been sent back for a second vote, with pricing provisions of two sweetened.  Iroquois officials are "cautiously optimistic," about today's vote on Western Gas Marketing's contract to supply a consortium of Northeast utilities with as much as 275 million cubic feet of gas daily via the Iroquois pipeline.  "But there is still a lot of concern among producers as to whether this is the right market to serve, and there does still seem to exist a debate whether we need one or two pipelines to serve it," said Bob Reid, president of Iroquois.  Wooing producers, Iroquois hosted a gathering at a Rocky Mountains resort and discussed U.S. natural gas markets by telephone with U.S. congressional leaders.  Not to be outdone, Champlain drew 70 producers to a seminar featuring a satellite appearance by Massachussets Governor Michael Dukakis.  The day ended with a dinner "symbolic of this natural partnership: prime Alberta beef and fresh New England lobster."  Roger Berliner, a Washington-based gas market analyst and publisher of Crossborder Report, an industry newsletter, warned that the rejection of a contract shouldn't be interpreted as a rejection of the Northeast market.  A rejection is just a sign that "the contracts aren't good enough," he said.  Producers may feel prices are too low or object to future price increases linked to lowpriced alternative fuels like coal, he added.  Two of the three previously-rejected Pan-Alberta contracts link the price of gas to coal as well as oil and other gas supplies.  The Philadelphia Museum of Art has one of the country's best collections of modern French art.  And this summer is a perfect time to go see it, for it has been substantially enriched by two high-quality temporary exhibitions connected with Mr. and Mrs. Walter H. Annenberg.  The first of these is a loan exhibition of impressionist and post-impressionist paintings from the Annenbergs' collection itself; the second is a show of two Cezanne sketchbooks that the Annenbergs recently gave to the museum.  The paintings collection includes works by most of the major impressionist and post-impressionist artists, including Degas, Manet, Monet, Renoir, Seurat, Gauguin, van Gogh and Cezanne.  Many of the pictures are of very fine quality and some are among the real masterpieces of the period.  The taste behind this collection is, however, a very particular one.  Although impressionist painting is frequently associated with ingratiating images of lyrical sweetness, the Annenberg collection is marked by a certain austerity of taste.  Some of the best pictures here are among the toughest or most untypical by the artists who painted them.  Monet's "The Bench" (1873) is both eccentric and tough, surprisingly dramatic and tense.  A woman seated on a garden bench looks out at us, confused, it seems, by something.  Just behind her, a man in a top hat leans insinuatingly forward, his left hand casually breaching the fencelike back of the bench.  Standing at the far end of the garden, a woman with a parasol seems to observe the encounter unnoticed.  Monet has bathed the scene in brilliant sunlight accented with bright red geraniums, giving it the full, ripe open-air impressionist feel -- at first glance.  Yet the more you look at the picture, the more disturbing it becomes, and the more the idyllic setting seems to act as a foil for the mysterious and unsettling human drama that is being acted out in it.  While the other five Monets lack this edge, they are all beautifully painted, especially the exquisite "Camille Monet in the Garden at Argenteuil" (1876), with its remarkably rendered warm sun and cool shadows.  The Annenberg Renoirs are less exciting.  The large "Daughters of Catulle Mendes" (1888), a portrait of young girls around a piano, is unevenly painted -- the wooden floor looks as if it is made of bird feathers -- and somewhat mawkish.  The little "Nini in the Garden" (1875-76), though pretty, is slight, and suffers a bit from the proximity of the strong Monets.  Manet's "Madame Manet at Bellevue" (1880), an enigmatic portrait in which the sitter's hat covers her eyes, is a remarkable exercise in bravura brushwork.  Among the three pictures by Degas, "At the Milliner's" (1881) is particularly haunting.  And of the four fine Gauguins, it is the haunting double portrait of a gaunt Polynesian mother and her subdued but sensual grown daughter that stops you in your tracks.  The single most spectacular painting in the collection is probably van Gogh's "Woman Rocking a Cradle" (1889), one of five versions that the artist did of the same theme, and arguably the most powerful of them.  In all of these paintings, Augustine Roulin, the wife of the only close friend van Gogh made in Arles, sits in front of floral wallpaper, holding a rope that's meant to rock a cradle.  Although we do not see the cradle, the umbilical rope and the intense pattern of lush blooms almost assail the eye with their forceful and rhythmic message of motherhood and fertility.  The colors in this painting, especially the blazing contrasts of reds and greens, reinforce its remarkable intensity. (Upstairs, in the museum's permanent collection, is a companion piece, van Gogh's predominantly yellow portrait of Mrs. Roulin with the baby.)  The other van Goghs in the collection are also very strong.  These include two powerfully agitated renderings of olive groves, a spectacularly ethereal depiction of a vase of white roses, and a relatively early (circa 1886) flower painting, awkward but intense, that shows van Gogh just as he was developing his mature style.  To my mind, however, the most absorbing body of work here is by Cezanne.  The Cezannes run in date from the striking early portrait of the artist's uncle Dominique as a Dominican monk, painted around 1866, to a handful of powerful late works.  The level of quality -- with the exception of a dreary watercolor of Mont Sainte-Victoire that hardly looks like it was done by Cezanne -- is also exceptional.  These include a panoramic late oil of Mont Sainte-Victoire (that holds up well even to Cezanne's celebrated rendering of the same subject, which is in the museum's own collection), an astonishingly lush and translucent watercolor of a still life with a watermelon and pomegranates, and an austerely geometrical depiction of a seated peasant.  But even more impressive than these, I think, is the extraordinary landscape painting called "The House with Cracked Walls" (1892-94).  In this picture of a decaying house perched on an outcropping of rock, Cezanne has created a rich metaphor for the passage of time.  The intricate geometry of the rocks seems to evoke the geological history of the very earth the house stands on.  Particularly remarkable is the way the large cracks in the house are echoed by the tree trunks that stand next to it, drawing an exact parallel between the forces of growth and decay.  The two Cezanne sketchbooks show the artist in a more informal light, of course, but this is a wonderful opportunity to see his restless hand and mind at work.  Now he takes a pencil and makes a small sketch of a pair of scissors; now he captures his son asleep.  There are also studies for painting compositions, sketches done from paintings and sculptures in the Louvre, and some unusual Paris cityscapes.  There is hardly a single sheet here, no matter how slight, that is not a pleasure to look at.  Both exhibitions are accompanied by informative, well-illustrated catalogs and both close Sept. 17.  After that, the paintings will be returned to the Annenbergs until next summer, when they will be on view at the National Gallery of Art in Washington, D.C. Plans have also been made for subsequent showings at the Los Angeles County Museum and the Metropolitan Museum of Art in New York.  This is a major collection, which, it is rumored, will eventually be given to a major museum -- and a number of museums will no doubt be making a strong case for it in the months to come.  In this exhibition, the Philadelphia Museum has made its own case very well.  A three-year study by federal regulators verifies what many investors have already found out the hard way: Buying publicly traded funds when they are first offered can be a bad deal.  Separately, the Securities and Exchange Commission issued a proposed rule calling for increased disclosure of the risks of these so-called closed-end funds.  The study, by the SEC's office of economic analysis, shows that shares of closed-end funds perform much more poorly than those of other initial share offerings.  The study tracked 64 funds launched from 1985 to 1987.  Closed-end funds have been one of the hottest areas of the fund business since the October 1987 stock-market crash.  These funds issue a fixed number of shares that trade publicly -- often at a discount to the value of their holdings.  This contrasts with open-end mutual funds, which issue and redeem shares on demand at prices based strictly on their portfolio value.  The study shows closed-end funds on average plunged 15.1% during their first 120 trading days, after subtracting the return for the overall market.  U.S. stock funds plummeted on average 23.2% during that period; foreign stock funds fell 17.7% and bond funds slipped 6.2%, the study said.  One reason for the drop: Part of the initial price isn't invested at all, but instead goes to the fund's underwriters for helping bring it to market.  This fee amounts to about 7%, meaning that $930 of a $1,000 initial offering price is actually invested.  Another problem: Many funds fall to a discount after briefly trading above their net asset value, as underwriters often act to prop up the price initially.  After 24 weeks, domestic stock funds traded on average at a 10% discount, while foreign stock funds fell to an average discount of 11.4%, the study says.  Bond funds on average traded at their portfolio value, according to the study.  The SEC also released for public comment proposed rules that require closed-end funds to disclose the name of the portfolio manager and issue a fee table spelling out expenses.  The comments, which are requested by Oct. 20, also would demand more extensive disclosure of the risks of closed-end funds.  Voicemail International Inc. said it received an order, worth potentially $15 million, to supply Italy's national telephone company with Voicemail's telephone answering and data retrieval systems.  The company said it expected to install 30 such systems over the next two years for the concern, known as Societa Italian per l'Esercizio delle Telecomunicazioni P.A.  A group led by Arthur M. Goldberg made a tender offer of $32 a share, or $154.3 million, for all of the stock the group doesn't own in Di Giorgio Corp., the San Francisco food distributor that has spurned Mr. Goldberg's previous overtures.  Mr. Goldberg, who currently holds about 14% of Di Giorgio, said he plans to try to sell all of the company's operations except its White Rose food division, a wholesale food distributor that serves the New York metropolitan area.  Di Giorgio also has a building-products division.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Di Giorgio jumped $3.25 a share to $34.  Mr. Goldberg also said in a Securities and Exchange Commission filing that he is considering eliminating Di Giorgio's San Francisco headquarters and reassigning "various management functions."  Di Giorgio said its board will meet to consider the offer within two weeks and will advise shareholders on whether to accept the bid by Aug. 16.  In June, Di Giorgio rejected Mr. Goldberg's informal proposal to acquire it for $30 a share.  At the time, the company said it told Mr. Goldberg in a letter that it had "no interest" in his proposal and that its board decided its prospects were brighter as an independent concern.  "I think they've got some very good management in place" at White Rose, Mr. Goldberg said in an interview.  "Maybe under a different umbrella, {White Rose} may be able to do some things," he said.  White Rose is "a premier business and a great name . . . and I would hope the people running {White Rose} would stay on and work," Mr. Goldberg said.  Mr. Goldberg said he didn't seek to simply buy White Rose from Di Giorgio because he didn't think the company would be receptive to such a transaction and because it wouldn't benefit shareholders.  By any measure, this should have been a bad summer for Black, Manafort, Stone & Kelly.  Paul Manafort, a partner in the politically potent lobbying firm, was grilled by the congressional panel investigating the scandal at the Department of Housing and Urban Development.  Lawmakers expressed outrage that Mr. Manafort collected a $326,000 consulting fee for getting HUD to ram through a New Jersey project that local authorities called "a horrible waste of taxpayers' money."  Mr. Manafort was forced to concede publicly that he had engaged in political "influence-peddling."  That would have been bad enough.  Then, on three different occasions, Black Manafort had to amend Mr. Manafort's testimony, raising serious doubts about his credibility and revealing that the firm's involvement in HUD projects was much deeper than Mr. Manafort and his partners had initially described.  Despite these admissions, Black Manafort was back on Capitol Hill just two weeks after Mr. Manafort's appearance before Congress, this time to register to lobby for a slew of new clients.  Few, if any, of the firm's high-powered business and political clients seem concerned that the firm may be tainted by the HUD scandal:  -- Not New Jersey casino operators.  "I don't give a damn," says Tom Carver, a spokesman for the Casino Association of New Jersey.  "Their ability to head us in the right direction in Washington is what I care about."  -- Not Bethlehem Steel Corp.  "We have not noticed any problem," says Henry von Spreckelsen, a spokesman for the company.  "The relationship is as strong as ever."  The steel giant is one of several Fortune 500 companies that have retained the firm since the early 1980s. -- Not political candidate Angela Bay Buchanan, who is using Roger Stone, Mr. Manafort's partner, as chief adviser to her campaign for state treasurer of California.  Ms. Buchanan has "full confidence" in Mr. Stone's "integrity and political abilities," her press secretary says.  Also silent on Black Manafort's conduct are President Bush and HUD Secretary Jack Kemp, both of whom received campaign advice from members of the firm.  "What you have here is an administration that is not dealing with sanctions of any kind," complains David Cohen of the Advocacy Institute, which trains public-interest groups how to lobby.  "The clients are just reflecting those standards.  "Jack Kemp and the president should say we don't want people like that doing business with the government," Mr. Cohen adds.  "Black Manafort should be run out of town.  When there are no examples, there are no deterrents.  That's why Black Manafort will continue to make millions."  The firm's involvement in the HUD scandal goes deeper than simple influence-peddling.  Black Manafort is also in trouble over conflicts in Mr. Manafort's testimony.  When he appeared before the House subcommittee investigating the scandal, Mr. Manafort said his firm had lobbied for only two clients involved in HUD projects.  Then, after news reports linked him to another HUD project in Georgia, Mr. Manafort sent the panel a 13-page letter amending his testimony and listing four more clients with HUD-related work.  But that listing omitted a Waterbury, Conn., project for which Mr. Manafort received $47,000.  When the New York Times reported this additional fee, Black Manafort quickly wrote Rep. Tom Lantos, a California Democrat who is chairman of the subcommittee, to request additional time to comb its financial records.  In late July, yet another letter was dispatched listing nine clients for whom Black Manafort had handled HUD-related projects.  But even this most recent listing leaves out salient details, such as a $240,000 consulting fee from a Florida university for which Black Manafort helped win $4.1 million from HUD for a shelter for the elderly homeless.  Rep. Lantos has called back Mr. Manafort to testify again next month.  Charles Black, the master GOP political strategist who is the firm's leader, defends his firm's conduct.  He says Mr. Manafort's only sin is having played the lobbying game by the rules established during the Reagan administration, rules he says he doesn't necessarily condone.  "The worst you can say about us is that it's a bad system and that we participated in it," Mr. Black offers.  "We have a long enough track record that they {clients} know we play by the rules."  To be sure, there has been some fallout.  After Mr. Manafort testified, Mr. Stone was forced to resign from the campaign of Rep. Jim Courter, the New Jersey GOP gubernatorial candidate.  Mr. Stone continues to be an issue in the campaign.  "We still refer to him in the present tense," says Jon Shure, the press secretary for Rep. James Florio, the Democratic gubernatorial candidate.  That's because Mr. Stone, since his resignation, has circulated to journalists here news stories damaging to Mr. Florio.  The firm's campaign work is thought to be most vulnerable to damage from HUD scandal fallout.  "Candidates have to think about what baggage their consultants bring with them," says Larry Sabato, a government professor at the University of Virginia.  But even here, there's been little slippage.  Mr. Black says his firm has already signed on to handle the re-election campaigns next year of Republican Sens.  Phil Gramm of Texas and Jesse Helms of North Carolina, and expects many more retainers.  Although the Courter campaign is the only business the firm has actually lost since the HUD scandal broke, one lobbying client is closely monitoring the unfolding HUD scandal.  "We're watching to see how it plays out," says Peter Connell of Aetna Life & Casualty Co., which retained Black Manafort as one of its lobbyists 18 months ago.  "Right now it does not cause us any discomfort" with the firm.  Black Manafort is unusual in that it handles both lobbying and political consulting work.  The campaign work is handled by a separate entity, Campaign Consultants Inc., that is separate only on paper.  Mr. Black, Mr. Manafort and Mr. Stone virtually grew up together in conservative GOP politics and worked on the presidential campaigns of Ronald Reagan.  After Mr. Reagan's election in 1980, the young operatives, all then in their 30s, quickly launched their lobbying business and earned reputations as the GOP's hottest influence-peddlers.  In the mid-1980s, Lee Atwater, now Republican national chairman, joined Black Manafort's campaign arm, and the lobbying operation went bipartisan, bringing in Peter Kelly, the Democrats' national finance chairman, and James Healey, a top aide to House Ways and Means Committee Chairman Dan Rostenkowski, an Illinois Democrat.  Thirty-odd lobbying clients now pay the firm minimum annual retainers of $250,000 or more.  The fact that Mr. Manafort was able to pull political strings at HUD isn't any surprise to political insiders here who have watched Black Manafort capitalize on its connections in the White House and on Capitol Hill.  Indeed, as Mr. Manafort was dealing with the HUD scandal, Mr. Black was busy as point man for Bethlehem Steel's lobbying effort to preserve voluntary-restraint agreements on steel imports.  "He was our eyes and ears into the White House," says a Democratic consultant who worked with Mr. Black on the effort.  "At first we were concerned his access might be damaged by the HUD story," this consultant says.  "It obviously had no impact."  In a perverse way, all the publicity from the HUD scandal may actually have strengthened Black Manafort.  "At one level, it {the HUD scandal} may have attracted business," says Howard Marlowe, president of the American League of Lobbyists.  "It's given Black Manafort tremendous publicity.  The message may be that they are playing the game and that they are doing that effectively."  Whittaker Corp., a defense electronics and chemical concern, said it agreed in principle to sell its Ram Chemicals division to Indianapolis-based Lilly Industrial Coatings Inc. for about $16.5 million.  Ram, Gardena, Calif., makes and sells gel coats, coatings, mold release agents and pigment dispersions.  Whittaker said the sale is part of its recapitalization and divestiture plan and is expected to close in September.  Whittaker is selling some chemical operations and technology units to pay debt incurred under the plan, which shareholders approved in June.  This retailer said it offered for sale $200 million in notes due Aug. 1, 1996.  Dean Witter Reynolds Inc., Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Morgan Stanley & Co. are handling the sale.  Proceeds will be added to Sears's general funds to reduce its short-term borrowings.  Proceeds also may be used eventually to buy back common shares, the company said.  Sears has approved the buy-back of as many as 40 million of its common shares outstanding.  As of June 30, Sears had 345.8 million shares outstanding.  The notes will bear interest at 8.55%, payable Feb. 1 and Aug. 1 of each year, beginning Feb. 1, 1990.  Societe Nationale Elf Aquitaine said it received about 7.6 million, or 96%, of Pennwalt Corp.'s shares outstanding in a $132-a-share, or $1.05 billion, tender offer.  Closing of the offer, which expired yesterday, follows Aquitaine's agreement with the Federal Trade Commission to resolve antitrust concerns.  Pennwalt is a Philadelphia chemical company.  Acquitaine, an oil and chemical concern, is based in Paris.  One indicator of entrepreneurship is pointing way up: Demand for the Small Business Administration's loan-guarantee program is outstripping the funding for it.  The program is expected to reach $2.6 billion this fiscal year, up about 8% from last year and up a whopping 70% from 1982, when the nation was in a deep recession and the Reagan administration was trying to kill the entire SBA.  The agency and Congress are scrambling, and sometimes squabbling, over ways to find more funds.  But lenders and experts in Washington predict that even efforts to raise the program to $2.9 billion next year still would fall far short of loan demand, which is expected to go as high as $3.5 billion or more.  Behind the soaring demand are people such as Edward Rossi of Morgan Hill, Calif.  The 32-year-old entrepreneur found banks closed to him a year or so ago when he wanted to start his California Kitchen Cabinet Door Co.  He ended up at First Capitol Corp., seeking -- and getting -- a $300,000 loan with an SBA guarantee.  "I was shocked at how smoothly it went," says Mr. Rossi, who had expected lots of red tape.  He says he paid off the loan within seven months and his 70-employee company now has $7 million in annual sales.  Under the program, the SBA encourages financial institutions to make small-business loans by guaranteeing 75% to 85% of the loan's principal amount.  The loans are supposed to go to businesses unable to obtain private loans.  "No lender would even listen to me; in fact they sneered," says Ron Shirley, who got an SBA loan in 1981 to start what has become a successful Pontiac, Buick and GMC dealership in Stillwater, Okla.  During the early Reagan years, former budget director David Stockman tried to abolish the SBA, arguing that only about 1% of all small businesses ever used the agency's programs.  While demand for guaranteed loans declined in the early '80s from the Carter-administration years, the SBA survived.  And loan demand has been rising since 1982.  Ironically, the loan-guarantee program now is short of money partly because lenders are confident that the Bush administration will keep the SBA.  In addition, Congress increased the loan limit to $750,000 from $500,000.  And under a new program, companies engaged in foreign trade can borrow as much as $1.25 million with a government guarantee.  Because of the program's growing popularity, the SBA ran out of funding last December, forcing the agency to temporarily close its loan-guarantee window.  In March, the agency transferred $200 million to the program from other, under-used loan funds.  The trick now is to find more funds for the fiscal year beginning Oct. 1 without violating government-wide budget restraints.  To be able to back $2.9 billion in loans, administration officials have proposed adding about $500 million in guarantees by taking funds from other SBA programs, such as direct loans for veterans and the disabled.  They argue that direct-loan recipients could then get guaranteed loans.  "We believe we get better use of our funds with the guarantee program," says Edwin Holloway, who recently retired as the SBA's associate administrator for finance and investment.  "On the great majority of them, we never lay out any money."  According to the SBA, the net loss rate, or the amount written off as a percentage of loans outstanding, is 3.7% for guaranteed loans.  That is lower than the 5.3% rate for direct SBA loans though it's higher than about a 1.27% rate on private loans.  But lawmakers argue that dropping direct loans wouldn't save much money and that disadvantaged entrepreneurs would have a hard time competing for the guaranteed loans.  "People are waiting in line for those loans.  A handicapped person can't roll his wheelchair into a bank and get much respect," says an aide to the Senate Small Business Committee. (The SBA also makes direct loans to victims of natural disasters, both businesses and homeowners, under a separate program that's not likely to be cut.)  There is, however, wide support in Congress for increased funding.  "I'm fairly confident that the Senate will provide $2.9 billion for the loan program," says Sen. Dale Bumpers, (D.  Ark.), chairman of the Senate Small Business Committee.  "If the demand for loans exceeds this figure, we may have to pursue additional funding" later, he says.  The House so far has proposed a loan-guarantee budget of only $2.4 billion, but backers are pressing for more.  "Haven't we already gone overboard in SBA budget cuts?"  Rep. John LaFalce, chairman of the House Small Business Committee, said at a recent hearing on the problem.  Over the long term, he suggests establishing a special secondary market to link institutional investors with small-business borrowers in a way that wouldn't require full-fledged government guarantees.  Currently, lenders sell about half of all SBA-guaranteed loans to institutional investors in the secondary market.  Rep. LaFalce plans to introduce a bill that would create a federally chartered entity, independent of the government, to deal in small-business loans.  "Over the short term, we'll have to scratch wherever we can," says Rep. LaFalce in his pleas for more funding.  "It'll be difficult, if not impossible, to meet the current demand."  As the euphoria of the latest Mexican debt agreement with its creditor banks fades, analysts are beginning to conclude that many institutions will, in fact, choose to make new loans rather than take capital losses on their outstanding credits.  Months of discussions about the need for debt relief seem little more than an intellectual exercise since Mexico's total indebtedness, domestic as well as foreign, probably will be higher at year end than it was at the beginning of 1989.  That would be the end of the basic assumption of the plan named after U.S. Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady.  The Brady Plan held that once Mexico's external cash-flow obligations were reduced, the country's decimated socialist economy would somewhat recover from seven years of negative growth and hyperinflation.  Of course, many small and medium-sized regional banks quietly have sold their portions of Mexican loans on the secondary market, or have written them off against current earnings.  But for larger, money-center banks, low earnings and poor rates of internal capital generation have precluded aggressive steps to purge their balance sheets of bad loans to Mexico, Argentina and other troubled countries around the world.  Several of the largest U.S. banks are caught in a vicious end game, and must either make further loans to Mexico or realize enormous capital losses.  American commentators on the less-developed countries debt situation have complained that the lack of "sanctions" to force all banks to provide Mexico and other countries with an actual reduction of outstanding principal is a major flaw in the so-called Brady Plan.  But if they followed the Mexican financial press, they would understand what the U.S. Treasury and State departments both already know: What Mexico needs immediately is billions in new cash, not a reduction in interest payments.  For months, El Norte, Mexico's leading independent newspaper, has printed accounts of the growing domestic debt -- such as the government's attempts to borrow directly from private companies by paying annual interest rates as high as 75%.  Turnover statistics published weekly in most Mexican papers confirm that more than three-quarters of the volume on the Mexico City stock market consists of government debt obligations.  In a May 30 Wall Street Journal interview, Citicorp Chairman John Reed infuriated Mexican officials by stating that the Mexican government is "drowning" in a rising sea of short-term domestic debt, with which they are funding both internal deficits and hard-currency liabilities.  Luis Pazos, the noted Mexican economics writer and frequent critic of President Carlos Salinas de Gortari, estimates that nearly all of the available liquidity in the country has been absorbed by government borrowings.  When asked about the significance of this mounting debt, Mexican officials calmly state that it is "no problem" and that Mexico can deal with it once agreement has been reached on foreign debt.  Yet when pressed as to whether the "solution" to a $50 billion outstanding debt principal that will double in less than six months includes a major devaluation of the peso from its controlled level of 2,400 per dollar, the inevitable reply is "no"; Mexico does not want to give up "the fight against inflation."  There are several inconsistencies in the reasoning of Mexican officials, both in the economic plans presented to the International Monetary Fund and in debt negotiations with American banks.  Foremost among them is the assertion that Mexico currently has inflation under control and is ready to resume robust economic growth once the debt reduction is in place.  According to statistics published by the Bank of Mexico, inflation in Mexico has fallen to 18.4% on an annualized basis.  If this statement is to be taken at face value, however, how does one explain the payment of 30% to 40% real rates of return to domestic and foreign holders of Mexico's domestic debt?  If the inflation numbers are valid and, more important, the current dollar-peso exchange rate is realistic, surely Mexican government paper is one of the greatest investment opportunities available in the world.  Either Mexican government inflation statistics are understated substantially, or future expectations of inflation in Mexico are forcing the government to pay investors a huge premium for short-term funds (there is already talk of the government offering two-week certificates of deposit instead of the 28-day paper).  In either case, the government clearly has not convinced domestic creditors that Mexico's fiscal situation is under control.  Since the debt agreement, Mexico has been boasting of a "sharp decline" in domestic interest rates from a high of 60% in mid-July to "only" 35%.  One official from the Mexican Finance Ministry recently told a group in Washington that this illustrated "new confidence" in Mexico's economic program.  But in a financial market manipulated by government-owned banks, this is hardly a newsworthy event.  Another puzzling statement by Mexican representatives regarding inflation is that debt-for-equity swaps, used so successfully by Mexico in the past to reduce hard-currency debt, no longer are possible because they are "inflationary."  The strong reluctance expressed by Mexican officials to continue with debt-for-equity swaps speaks volumes about the real level of inflation in Mexico.  If there is little liquidity left in the country, debt-swap transactions indeed would be inflationary -- and perhaps not even possible.  Moreover, the appeal of new cash from overseas -- whether from loans or outright sales of state-owned assets -- becomes apparent.  The U.S., acting through the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, reportedly has loaned the government of Mexico at least $2 billion, according to official sources.  A Fed loan to Mexico last August of $1 billion was repaid in full; the new "bridge facility" announced by Mr. Brady in Paris, however, may not be repaid without further "medium-term" loans from U.S. banks.  Requests for "restructuring" loans already have been made by Mexican negotiators who allude to the need for further assistance if the economy fails to respond to the debt-reduction agreement.  What all of this means is that Mexico, far from moving to reduce its overall debt burden, instead seems likely to be seeking substantial new hard-currency loans in coming months.  Thus, a political accommodation engineered by the U.S. Treasury will, ultimately, be funded by U.S. banks and taxpayers.  With Mexico's total internal and external debt burden at roughly $150 billion, and domestic debt growing by literally billions a month, bankers in New York may well wonder when and how the "debt-reduction" process actually will start.  Mr. Brady, for his part, might be well advised to start considering how to present this latest Mexico bailout to increasingly irritated members of the U.S. Congress and the American public.  ---  Mr. Whalen is senior vice president responsible for trade and finance at Wires Ltd., a Washington-based international consulting firm.  The Blunder Years  How the years  Can do us in:  Wrinkling cheek lines,  Sagging chin.  But I would never  Turn back the clock  To adolescence  And heavy rock.  Better, I say,  Decline that prime  Than go through youth  For one more time]  -- Robert Gordon.  ---  Brave Front  They say women are smarter than men,  (Presumably a sexist crack),  But have you ever seen a man wearing  A shirt buttoned in the back?  -- Bud Stiller.  ---  Dial and Error  I remember more phone numbers  Than anyone else by far,  But I never can remember  Whose numbers they are.  -- Mimi Kay.  The felony indictments at Chicago's big futures exchanges cast a pall over the smaller trading pits here.  But some New York futures traders say size is on their side -- at least when it comes to trading abuses.  Trading on New York's five futures exchanges was subdued.  "We're concerned because we know {abuses} go on in all the pits," said a former Chicago Mercantile Exchange trader who does business at the New York Futures Exchange.  He asked not to be identified.  But other traders here remain unfazed.  They argue that any trading abuses in New York are minimized because of thinner volume when compared with Chicago's teeming trading pits.  "Because we're smaller, we're much more visible to each other," said A. George Gero, a vice president at Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.  As for widespread abuses of the kind alleged in Chicago, he said: "We wouldn't tolerate it."  Still, federal investigators swooped down on New York's major commodity exchanges in May, seizing records and issuing subpoenas to as many as 50 futures traders as part of a probe of possible criminal and civil violations.  The probe, which is much smaller in scope than the separate Chicago undercover investigation, focuses on several alleged trading abuses, according to people familiar with the federal inquiry here.  These include prearranged trading; getting an unfair advantage by trading ahead of customer orders; and so-called wash sales -- trades, often prearranged, in which contracts are bought and sold in identical amounts as part of various schemes, particularly to avoid taxes.  But charges haven't been brought against any New York futures traders.  Indeed, some exchange officials have noted, with some glee, that investigators from the Commodity Futures Trading Commission have had to comb through mountains of old trading records -- poorly alphabetized -- in the bowels of the exchanges at the World Trade Center here.  XTRA Corp. reported sharply lower net income of $41,000 for its third quarter ended June 30.  There were no per-share earnings posted because of preferred dividend requirements.  In the year-earlier period, the transportation-leasing services concern had net of $4.3 million, or 49 cents a share.  Revenue in the third quarter rose 5% to $56.6 million from $54.1 million.  For the quarter, the company cited a significant drop in the percentage of equipment leased in its rail-intermodal product lines and a significantly higher, effective tax rate.  That rate was 98%, compared with 39% last year, the company said.  The rail-intermodal line, which consists of piggyback trailers, domestic containers and chassis, represents about 60% of the company's business.  For the nine months, the company reported net of $8.5 million, or 78 cents a share, compared with net of $16.6 million, or $1.86 a share, for the year-earlier period.  Revenue for the nine months rose 5% to $174.1 million from $165.4 million last year.  Gatx Corp. said it launched a $160 million public offering of 3.2 million shares of preferred stock at $50 a share.  The $3.875 cumulative convertible stock will be handled by Morgan Stanley & Co., which has an option to buy as many as 480,000 additional shares.  The preferred shares are convertible to common stock at a rate of 0.5747 shares of common stock for each preferred share, a conversion price of $87 a share.  Net proceeds from the sale will be used to redeem the $75.9 million outstanding principal on the company's 11.5% subordinated notes due in 1996.  Other proceeds may be used for acquisition of Associated Unit Cos., a Florida corporation with interests in distribution and warehousing services, and related real estate.  Other proceeds may go to pay other long-term debt or for general corporate purposes.  Gatx has interests in rail leasing, maintenance and management; capital goods leasing; financing, financial services and real estate; and bulk liquid terminals storage and pipelines.  Spy, the hip Manhattan humor magazine, is trying to pass itself off as staid Cliffs Notes Inc., publisher of earnest study guides, a federal judge has determined.  The judge ordered a preliminary injunction banning the distribution of Spy's parody of Cliffs Notes, on the ground that the parody might be mistaken for the real thing.  Judge Shirley Wohl Kram said consumers looking for Cliffs Notes, which provide synopses and interpretations of famous works of literature, might be misled into buying Spy Notes, the parody.  If that happens, the judge said in her order, "consumers will be dissatisfied and attribute such dissatisfaction to Cliffs."  Bantam Doubleday Dell Publishing Group Inc., publisher of Spy's parody, said it will file an appeal today.  It also will file a motion for a stay of Judge Kram's injunction.  Doubleday said the judge's order marked the first time a U.S. court has blocked publication of a literary parody.  The book, written by the editors of Spy magazine, was slated to go on sale next month.  "If this ruling is upheld, it will deal a significant blow to free speech . . . and will endanger the viability of parody as a literary form," said Nancy Evans, president of the Doubleday publishing division.  Editors at Spy said it is unlikely the parody would be confused with Cliffs Notes.  The parody, which has a cover resembling that used by Cliffs Notes, parodies several novels from the 1980s "bratpack" of young authors, said Kurt Andersen, co-editor of the magazine.  "A parody has to look like the thing that's being parodied," Mr. Andersen said.  But, he added, Spy took extra steps to make the parody distinguishable from Cliffs Notes.  For instance, he says, "'Spy Notes' has the words 'a satire' printed nine times on the cover in bright pink letters."  Nonetheless, William M. Hart, attorney for Cliffs Notes, said the parody's imitation of Cliffs Notes' trademark design would have caused public confusion.  Cliffs Notes, based in Lincoln, Neb., has used its cover design since 1958.  The Spy Notes cover features Cliff Notes' distinctive yellow and black stripes, type style and a picture in the lower right corner.  On Spy Notes, however, the picture is of a city, rather than a mountain.  The parody also includes the Novel-O-Matic, a slide rule-like device that Mr. Andersen says readers can use to create their own hip, 1980s urban novels by matching up themes and characters.  Mr. Andersen added, "'Spy Notes' clearly is humorous.  It's like nothing that Cliffs Notes would do."  The Nasdaq Composite Index set a new closing high, rising 2.85 points to end at 456.93.  A rebound in technology stocks and further gains in some big bank issues helped the composite pass its previous peak of 455.26, set Aug. 26, 1987.  Several other over-the-counter market barometers closed in record territory.  The Financial Index, which advanced to 452.38, the Transportation Index, which closed at 453.95, the Insurance Index, which finished at 530.41, and the Utility Index, which ended the day at 709.94, all set new highs.  Not to be outdone, the Nasdaq 100 Index of the biggest non-financial issues rose 3.44 to a record 429.12, eclipsing the old mark of 427.62 set Oct. 2, 1987.  The surge came as the big technology issues "exploded," according to James Tarantino, head of OTC trading at Hambrecht & Quist, San Francisco.  The OTC technology group has been battered in recent weeks as investors have sold computer-related stocks because of disappointing quarterly earnings reports and talk of slowing industry demand.  Favorable reports from securities analysts caused some investors to embrace the stocks anew, Mr. Tarantino said.  He said a number of investors who had sold technology stocks short got squeezed as share prices rose, and some of them covered their positions, aiding the run up.  Short sellers, betting that a stock's price will fall, borrow shares and immediately sell them.  They expect to profit by replacing the borrowed shares later at lower prices.  But if prices begin to rise rather than fall, short sellers may decide to cut their losses by buying shares -- a practice known as "covering a short."  In the technology sector, Intel jumped 1 1/4 to 31 on 2.4 million shares, Apple Computer rose 3/4 to 41 1/4 on 1.5 million shares, Sun Microsystems gained 3/4 to 14 3/8 on 1.2 million shares, and Valid Logic advanced 1/8 to 5 3/4 on about a million shares.  Class A shares of Tele-Communications added 1/2 to 36 1/8 on 1.4 million shares.  MCI Communications, on volume of 1.4 million shares, improved 1/8 to 38 1/2.  Oracle Systems, which was added to the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index, jumped 1 to 16 3/8 on 4.2 million shares.  Mr. Tarantino said program traders were big buyers of the stock.  Program trading is the rapid, computer-guided buying and selling of large blocks of stocks, generally based on changes in price relationships between the stocks and stock-index futures.  The Financial Index's gain reflects the benefits that falling interest rates have brought to the OTC market's big banking issues.  The group's strength helped prop up the OTC market on days when the technology issues were faltering.  Henry C. Dickson, an analyst at McDonald & Co., Cleveland, said several Michigan banks were strong because of several analysts' favorable comments.  A Prescott Ball & Turben analyst, who raised his recommendation on Michigan National to "buy" from "accumulate," told Dow Jones Professional Investor Report that an article in American Banker about the outlook for banks in the state might also be helping the stocks.  Michigan National rose 1 1/2 to 54 1/2 on 127,000 shares.  Manufacturers National gained 7/8 to 53 5/8 on 32,000 shares.  First of America Bank hit a 52-week high, rising 3/4 to 50 1/4.  Burnup & Sims, a provider of telephone and cable-television services, rose 5/8 to 22 1/2 on 967,000 shares, more than 10 times its daily average turnover.  Traders couldn't explain the increased activity.  PCS, which had been rising on speculation that someone would bid for McKesson's 86.2% stake, eased 1/4 to 17 1/2.  A Drexel Burnham analyst said the stock might be too high at current levels to attract a buyer.  Investment in money market mutual funds soared $4.24 billion to another new high in the week ended Wednesday.  Assets of the 467 funds tracked by the Investment Company Institute rose to $337.03 billion.  The Washington-based trade group noted that the bulk of the increase this week was in institutional-type funds, but assets of funds purchased by individuals also rose.  "Assets of money market funds kept surging even after their yields continued to drop," said Jacob Dreyer, vice president and chief economist of the Institute.  Separately, Donoghue's Money Fund Report, a newsletter, reported earlier this week that the average yield on a seven-day fund fell to 8.84%, from 8.97% the week before.  Yields have fallen since the reporting week of May 16, when the average yield was 9.58%.  But returns on "direct money market instruments," such as Treasury bills and commercial paper, have slipped more than funds, Mr. Dreyer noted.  That trend drove institutions into funds.  And declines in intermediate bond yields may "have prompted individual investors to reallocate some of their funds toward money market funds," he said.  The 141 institutional funds, the institute said, added $2.71 billion to bring the total assets in that category to $87.5 billion.  The 231 general purpose funds increased $361.5 million to $106.32 billion, while 95 broker-dealer funds increased $1.18 billion to $143.21 billion.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it lowered its ratings on the Tucson, Ariz., utility's first-mortgage bonds and secured pollution-control bonds to Baa-2 from A-3, its unsecured pollution-control bonds to Baa-3 from Baa-1, and its preferred stock to Baa-3 from Baa-1.  The downgrades affect about $450 million of debt.  The rating agency said it took the actions because of the utility's sharply lower second-quarter earnings and its announcement that it expects to continue to operate at a loss unless several regulatory matters are resolved.  The ratings remain under review for possible further downgrade, Moody's said.  The nation's big retailers posted mixed sales gains in July, with stores primarily offering apparel merchandise outperforming those with inventories containing more durable goods.  The July results, which averaged about a 5% gain from the year earlier, only modestly outpaced general inflation, and were in line with analyst expectations.  But the sales increase came off relatively weak 1988 results and indicate a generally lackluster retailing environment likely to continue for the rest of 1989, analysts said.  In general, department and specialty stores fared better, because of some shift away from bigger ticket purchases such as automobiles to apparel lines.  Mass merchandisers reported smaller gains because of their durable-goods orientation.  Those retailers with stronger inventory and financial controls in place found their profit margins benefited.  "Sales were mixed, but generally only modest, and reflective of the general weakening conditions of the overall economy," said Jeffrey Feiner, an analyst at Merrill Lynch & Co. "Apparel sales were favorable against a weak performance in 1988.  By contrast, big-ticket durable sales this year were quite soft, reflecting both high interest rates and the fact that demand has already been satisfied for many of these items."  "The real reason for the strength was that last year was quite soft rather than a reacceleration within the consumer sector," said Jeffrey Edelman, an analyst at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  "You really can't point at any new fashion direction, but people needed to refurbish their wardrobes, so apparel sales went up," said Stacy Ruchlamer, an analyst with Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  "We should have a respectable fall selling season based on the fact that women didn't do much buying last fall.  They'll need some new items."  PaineWebber Inc.'s index of 20 companies' sales at stores open at least a year rose 4.1% from a year earlier.  The increase for the first seven months of the year was 5.1%.  Drexel's index of 40 companies with stores open at least a year showed a 4.4% gain in general merchandise stores and a 7% gain in stores selling specialty apparel and shoes.  Compared with June, Drexel's index of specialty stores selling appliances and other durable goods showed increased strength, rising 3.2%.  "The general merchandise index dropped to 4.4% in July from 4.6% in June -- basically because of a 2.4% comparable-store sales decline at Sears," said Drexel's Mr. Edelman.  "Most other companies in the general merchandise index recorded an increase in comparable-store sales."  Some retailers primarily dependent on apparel showed excellent gains.  Gap Inc., based in San Bruno, Calif., reported an 8% same-store July sales increase from a year earlier against a 1% increase in 1988.  Year-to-date comparable same-store sales were up 16% compared with a 5% gain in the first half of 1988.  "We're providing fresh merchandise throughout the season, and the fact that it constantly changes keeps people coming back," said a company spokesman, adding: "The Gap stores division is demonstrating strength in those numbers.  The Banana Republic stores still aren't performing the way we would like, but they will have new merchandise for fall that will be different from what they've had during the summer.  It's being repositioned."  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Gap shares closed at $46.625, off 37.5 cents.  Meanwhile, at Chicago-based Sears Roebuck & Co., the nation's biggest retailer, same-store sales decreased 2.4% for July.  For the first 26 weeks, however, comparable-store sales increased 4.2%.  Michael Bozic, chairman and chief executive officer, said results were hurt by soft sales of durables and strong comparable-store increases a year earlier.  "They are seeing weakness with appliances, air conditioners, washers and dryers," said Robert Buchanan, an analyst with A. G. Edwards & Sons Inc. in St. Louis.  "The big picture at Sears is that the company probably can't compete effectively in women's apparel, footwear, cosmetics, and perhaps children's.  Until they get out of some of those areas, and redouble in areas where they can compete, like appliances, it will be tough going for them.  July sales were below plan."  At K mart Corp., the nation's second-largest retailer, July sales were up 6.4% from the year earlier; for the 26-week period sales gained 4.2%.  "The improved tone to our business in June continued in July," said Joseph E. Antonini, K mart chairman and chief executive officer.  Mr. Buchanan of A.G. Edwards agreed, noting that K mart was on plan for July.  "Their sales volume on the everyday low price items is good, but that pricing strategy will put pressure on second-quarter earnings.  I expect a decline from 8l cents a share to 75 cents a share."  At Dallas-based J.C. Penney Co., which has increased its dependence on fashion merchandise, same-store sales rose 9.7% against a 2.5% decrease a year ago.  William R. Howell, chairman, said the strongest gains resulted from children's merchandise, but noted that all apparel lines had substantial increases.  Among department stores, same-store sales at Los Angeles-based Carter Hawley Hale Stores Inc. rose 4% for the month and 6% for the 26 weeks.  "Sales during July were satisfactory, with the best gains coming in the women's apparel area," said Philip M. Hawley, chairman and chief executive officer.  At Minneapolis-based Dayton Hudson Corp., same-store sales rose 6.9% for July and 5.9% for the 26 weeks.  "The month's sales growth was led by soft lines," said Kenneth A. Macke, chairman and chief executive officer.  "We expect to report strong second-quarter earnings later this month."  As of July 31, Dayton Hudson operated 675 stores in 38 states.  ---  @ RETAIL SALES ROUNDUP  @ Four-week July period  @ a-'89 sales '88 sales %  @ millions millions b-change  @c-Sears .............. 2,099.8 2,110.0 - 0.5  @K mart ............... 1,981.3 1,862.6 + 6.4  @Wal-Mart ............. 1,983.0 1,594.0 + 24.0  @J.C.  Penney .......... 932.0 832.0 + 12.0  @Dayton Hudson ........ 896.0 775.0 + 15.6  @d-May Dept.  Stores ... 557.3 515.5 + 8.1  @e-Melville Corp....... 510.9 474.0 + 7.8  @Montgomery Ward ...... 332.6 330.9 + 0.5  @g-Ames Dept.  Stores .. 342.0 160.0 +113.8  @F.W.  Woolworth ....... 339.0 309.0 + 9.7  @f-Limited ............ 292.5 260.2 + 12.0  @Carter Hawley Hale ... 180.7 172.3 + 4.9  @Mercantile Stores .... 144.3 138.3 + 4.4  @TJX Cos. ............. 132.6 113.4 + 12.0  @Gap Inc. ............. 85.0 72.0 + 18.0  @ First 26 weeks of fiscal year  @ a-'89 sales 88 sales %  @ millions millions b-change  @c-Sears ............... 13,724.7 12,937.9 + 6.1  @K mart ................ 12,505.8 12,001.6 + 4.2  @Wal-Mart .............. 11,421.0 9,127.0 + 25.0  @J.C.  Penney ........... 6,309.0 5,966.0 + 5.8  @d-May Dept.  Stores .... 4,028.5 3,418.0 + 17.9  @Dayton Hudson ......... 5,800.0 5,120.0 + 13.3  @e-Melville Corp. ...... 3,714.6 3,338.4 + 11.3  @Carter Hawley Hale .... 1,220.2 1,140.6 + 7.0  @Montgomery Ward ....... 2,163.9 2,044.5 + 5.8  @F.W.  Woolworth ........ 2,255.0 2,085.0 + 18.1  @f-Limited ............. 1,955.0 1,704.0 + 15.0  @g-Ames Dept.  Stores.... 2,327.0 1,045.0 +122.7  @Mercantile Stores ..... 983.6 955.0 + 3.0  @TJX Cos. .............. 966.6 831.8 + 16.2  @Gap Inc. .............. 636.0 506.0 + 26.0  a-Total U.S. store and catalog sales, excluding supermarkets, from continuing operations; b-Based on exact sales. c-Sears sales include its recent acquisitions: Eye Care Centers of America, Pinstripe Petites and Western Auto Supply Co. d-May includes sales of Foley's and Filenes divisions acquired May 1, 1988, and excludes sales by divisions that have been sold or discontinued.  The above sales exclude the results of the discount segment comprised of Caldor and Venture, which are being reported as discontinued operations beginning this month. e-Melville results include sales from the Berman's leather apparel chain acquired in November 1988.  Four-week July 1989 selling period had one less selling day than July 1988.  Seven-month selling period, ended July 29, had two fewer selling days than like period for 1988. f-Limited sold its Lerner Woman division effective April 29, 1989.  Had 1988 results similarly excluded Lerner Woman, sales would have increased 20% for the month ended July 29, 1989, and 19% for the year-to-date period. g-Ames results include Zayre discount store division which was recently sold to Ames.  Nicholas Eberstadt, in his July 18 editorial-page article "No Democratic Trend in East Asia," seems to confuse racism with nationalism, pluralism with democracy, and in the process ends up being unfair to South Korea's government and people.  Was there anything racist in the desire of 19th-century Germans and Italians to form single states of people of German and Italian language and culture?  Is there anything racist in the desire of many South Koreans to see eventually a united Korea, such as existed for many centuries before 1945?  There is undoubtedly a good deal of dangerous ideological nonsense in the Korean student movement with its penchant for violent confrontation, but that doesn't make it racist, no more so than the violence of the student extremists of Germany and Japan made them racist.  Both North Korea and South Korea happen to be unique in being almost without ethnic minorities, and that is not because of Korean racism but because of Korean history.  If South Korea's prosperity causes other peoples to want to immigrate to Korea to work and live, we will see just how exclusive Korea is, but even if it rejects foreign immigrants that would be no reflection on its democracy.  There isn't necessarily any connection between democracy and openness to foreign immigrants.  Did Britain, France and Germany become less democratic because since the 1970s they radically have reduced opportunities for immigration?  Were the U.S. and Australia less democratic when they excluded immigrants of nonwhite races?  Is Japan less democratic because it excludes almost all immigrants?  If there is some problem with South Korean democracy, and there may be, it will have to be argued on other grounds.  Nathan Glazer  Professor of Education and Sociology  Graduate School of Education  Harvard University  Cambridge, Mass.  ---  I can't help feel Mr. Eberstadt's article was overly pessimistic.  Asian political systems undergoing liberalizations should be compared with their past experiences rather than their West European contemporaries.  Also, it should not be surprising that American-style protections of individual rights have not been institutionalized yet in countries with predominantly collectivist cultures.  The most important change that these East Asian nations have been undergoing in recent years is not the implementation of liberal democratic institutions, but rather an increase in government accountability to the people.  Although this does not make them liberal democracies, it is a good start.  Thomas J. Timmons  Research Associate  Asian Studies Center  Heritage Foundation  Washington  While I have no dispute with Lawrence W. Sherman's general alarm about an increased number of bystander homicides in recent years, his July 10 editorial-page article, "The Death of Euclid Lewis," needs more insight into the word "mushroom."  The term does not refer to people who suddenly have "popped up" in the line of gunfire, as Mr. Sherman suggests.  Instead, it implies to those who know the argot that such individuals already have been placed between aggressor and target, before the shooting begins.  The term "mushroom" is derived from the hundreds of mushrooms in the Atari pay video game Centipede.  They are randomly placed between a firing cannon at the bottom and a rolling, twisting Centipede at the top of the screen.  When the player begins to fire at the Centipede, inevitably some of the standing mushrooms get caught in the cross fire and get blown apart by bullets.  But no true malice is intended.  Mushrooms are simply in the way of the moving target.  I first heard the term "mushroom" used to refer to a slain victim of gunfire in Chicago in 1984, when I was working as a cashier at an inner-city video-game parlor.  Two members of the same street gang were in a conversation about an alleged gunfight with a rival group.  The first man spoke of running with a gun, trying to get a clear shot at an enemy, but all he had "cut down," he thought, was a "mushroom."  The second man didn't understand the meaning, until he looked at the lighted screen of the video game they were playing.  They walked out, unsure as to whether the shooting was accident or tragedy.  Before my employment at the video parlor ended that year, I heard the term used by teen-agers in the sense it is known today -- as the unintended victim of cross fire between gangs.  When I asked some of the teens about the origin of the term, most told me about the plight of mushrooms in the Centipede situation, and about the real bullets that they themselves were increasingly exposed to every day.  Adam Nicholas  Philadelphia  Scientists at the National Institutes of Health announced results of a landmark study showing that the antiviral drug AZT can delay the development of AIDS in infected people with very mild symptoms.  The study provides hope for a significant portion of the 900,000 to 1.4 million people in the U.S. believed to be infected by the virus that causes acquired immune deficiency syndrome.  So far, the disease itself has stricken more than 100,000 Americans, with more than half of them dying.  "For the first time, a study has clearly shown the benefits of early intervention," said Anthony S. Fauci, director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases, a unit of NIH. Delaying or preventing the onset of AIDS in the large mass of people already infected by the virus has been a major thrust of the U.S. AIDS-research effort.  The study involved 713 patients, all of whom were infected with the virus and had mild symptoms such as rash, diarrhea or oral thrush -- a fungal infection of the mouth.  All volunteers had moderately suppressed immune-system cells, known as T4 cells, numbering in the range of 200 to 800.  Normal levels of T4 cells can vary widely, but are usually thought to lie between 500 and 1,200.  Half the group received AZT on a schedule of 200 milligrams every four hours, while the other half received a placebo, or dummy pill, for purposes of comparison.  Volunteers were under treatment between three months and 20 months.  A total of 50 patients went on to develop AIDS or advanced AIDS-related complex (ARC) during the study, 36 from the placebo group and 14 from the AZT group.  Benefits of treatment were concentrated among those patients with between 200 and 500 T4 cells.  Researchers said that all patients on placebo now will be switched to AZT, which is made by the U.S. unit of Wellcome PLC of London.  In another finding of major importance, only 5% of the AZT-treated group suffered serious side effects such as anemia.  That compares with 30% to 40% of AIDS patients who sustain severe side effects from the drug.  This suggests that AZT's toxic effects on the bone marrow may pose less of a problem to people in earlier stages.  "It's one of the most hopeful signs we've seen that you can actually slow the virus down," said Jerome Groopman, a Harvard University researcher who ran a segment of the 29-center study.  "I'm very excited about these results," Dr. Fauci said.  "I hope this will be an extra incentive for people to be tested, counseled and seek medical care."  Dr. Fauci estimates that 95,000 to 210,000 of the U.S. infected population fall under the test's definition of those who can benefit from early treatment.  "And many of them don't even know they are infected," he added.  The study, begun two years ago in August 1987, is one of several to test the crucial hypothesis that the damage by the AIDS virus can be stopped or slowed even after it gains a foothold in the human immune system.  Another critical study, now nearing completion, tests AZT in infected people without any symptoms.  The test just concluded, focusing on those with early infection and mild symptoms, was coordinated by Margaret Fischl at the University of Miami.  The study was officially halted Wednesday after a Data and Safety Monitoring Board broke the code and reviewed trial data.  Based upon the wide disparity in the fate of the two patient groups, the trial was then halted, and researchers instructed to give all patients AZT.  "These results are highly statistically significant," said Samuel Broder, director of the National Cancer Institute, whose laboratory originally demonstrated AZT's effectiveness against the AIDS virus, and worked with Wellcome to develop it.  He commended both Dr. Fauci's group and the Food and Drug Administration for "a spectacular job.  They kept this study alive, they stuck to their guns."  The study advances the hope, once held only by an optimistic few, that AIDS infection may ultimately be managed like many other chronic but treatable diseases.  "I look forward to the day when {AIDS} infection will be like high blood pressure.  You diagnose it, treat it and you prevent bad things from happening," Dr. Broder said.  Patient advocacy groups also were cheered by the results.  "I'm excited," said Jim Eigo, a member of the AIDS Coalition to Unleash Power.  He pronounced the low rate of side effects especially encouraging in such a potent antiviral drug.  However, AZT's high price -- about $8,000 a year -- will complicate any large-scale effort to test and treat masses of infected people.  Federal officials demurred on that question for now.  Still others withhold final judgment on a preventive role for AZT until results of another study are in.  "This is an important step, but we're anxiously awaiting results of the study in infected people who don't as yet have any symptoms," said a spokesman for the American Foundation for AIDS Research.  In Washington, D.C., Health and Human Services Secretary Louis Sullivan summed up the view of many when he declared, "We are on the threshold of a time when biomedical research will enable many infected individuals to live longer, more comfortable lives."  In London, Wellcome officials declined to speculate about the commercial implications of the study's encouraging results.  Analysts expect that Wellcome now will seek FDA clearance for wider use of its drug.  David MacCallum, an analyst for Hambrecht & Quist Inc., predicted that AZT "will be cleared for use in pre-AIDS {patients}.  That obviously enlarges the patient population by a factor of three or maybe four times."  Prospects for AZT becoming a $1 billion powerhouse have slipped recently, largely because there hadn't been any clear signs that the drug could help the large population of healthy people who are infected by the AIDS virus but have yet to develop AIDS.  The latest findings suggest progress toward being able to treat these still-healthy people as well.  The development could help reverse the decline in Wellcome's share price, battered by reports last week that the drug DDI showed promising results in patients with AIDS. Wellcome shares traded late yesterday on London's Stock Exchange at 447 pence ($7.40), off five pence, prior to the NIH announcement.  Its share price has fallen 23 pence in the past week.  DDI, developed by the National Cancer Institute and licensed to U.S. drug concern Bristol-Myers Co., is seen as a potential boon to the 40% to 80% of AIDS patients who can't tolerate AZT.  "I think the benefits of this {new AZT study} will outweigh the imminent competition from DDI," Mr. MacCallum said.  After reading your July 7 editorial "The Asbestos Fiasco," I am perplexed by your strange conclusion that the EPA or perhaps the government is somehow to blame for the enormous costs involved in removing asbestos from our schools.  This is tantamount to shooting the messenger because he brings bad news.  After more than a decade of litigation involving personal injury from asbestos inhalation and after years of building owners' litigation for asbestos abatement costs, there is only one conclusion as to who is responsible.  The manufacturers and sellers of asbestos-containing products were fully aware of the hazards, yet they continued to sell them for use in schools and other public buildings without any warning whatsoever.  The mere fact that those same manufacturers now may have to pay the cleanup costs is not a fiasco, it is justice]  Marc P. Weingarten  Philadelphia  After years of operating under the weight of heavy investment programs, Spain's electricity industry faces new problems as it tries to keep up with demand.  Although profits are rising as demand for electricity surges in Spain's buoyant economy, rising interest rates and the effects of an unusually dry winter are troublesome.  Spain's electric utilities have been among the prime victims of the government's tight monetary policies.  Although they are doing "reasonably well" in economic terms, says Judith Beresford, an analyst at James Capel & Co. in London, "they are heavily debt laden, which makes them extremely sensitive to rising interest rates."  As a result, an industry which was formerly one of the mainstays of the Madrid stock exchange is at a crossroads.  Although rising demand offers new opportunities for expansion and profits, the utilities' recovery remains fragile.  Of Spain's six big electric utilities, some are doing better than others.  Iberduero S.A., because of its low cost structure, and Cia.  Sevillana de Electricidad S.A., because of low debts and rising demand in southern Spain, are both expected to outperform the sector's average.  Union Electrica-Fenosa S.A. and Fuerzas Electricas de Cataluna S.A., the smallest of the six, are still struggling to recover from the industry's crisis of over-investment in nuclear production in the 1970s.  But all six companies have been affected by a slump in investor interest.  From 34% of trading volume in 1985 and a weighting of 25% in the stock exchange index, electricals now account for only 12% of trading volume and 14% of the index.  The sector's problems are multiple.  Rising interest rates, in addition to pushing up the cost of the companies' debt, have prompted many investors to switch from electrical shares to fixed-rate securities.  On foreign capital markets, too, Spanish electricity firms have been hit by the government's imposition earlier this year of a 30% reserve requirement on foreign currency borrowings.  Aimed at curbing the inflow into Spain of foreign currency, this restriction has hindered efforts to renegotiate part of the utilities' foreign debt.  Spanish electricity firms still indirectly have to bear the brunt of the cost of supporting Spain's loss-making coal industry.  Under a government-sponsored pricing plan, private utilities are obliged to buy electricity at government-fixed prices from state-controlled Empresa Nacional de Electricidad S.A., or Endesa.  In addition, low rainfall last winter has hit hydroelectricity producers, forcing them to turn to increased use of coal and costly imported oil to produce electricity.  Iberduero, which depends on hydroelectric power for 60% of its output, has been particularly hard hit.  According to Alberto Fernandez, an economist at Union Electrica S.A., or UNESA, the association of Spanish electricity producers, lack of rain is expected to cost the sector about 40 billion pesetas ($345 million) in lost earnings this year.  "The sector thought it would be able to reduce its debt by 190 billion pesetas this year," Mr. Fernandez adds.  But because of the lack of rain and high interest rates, "it's unlikely to come close to that amount," he says.  Now, as rising demand for electricity puts new pressures on the utilities, some analysts fear that the industry's problems could turn into a vicious circle.  Demand is growing at an annual rate of 5%, compared with initial government projections of 3.3% for 1989.  If demand continues to rise rapidly, present production capacity will be insufficient by 1995, which means the companies will need to launch new investment programs by 1992.  That, however, could force them even further into debt, unless a government-sponsored pricing framework introduced in December 1987 proves more successful at boosting income than many analysts expect.  I find it interesting that you fault steel voluntary restraint agreements when steel prices increase (editorial, July 19), but fail to credit the program when prices decline.  How about some consistency here?  Domestic steel prices actually dropped during the first two years of the VRA program and today are only about 4% higher than in 1984 when VRAs were initiated.  Furthermore, contrary to your assertion, no one who follows the issue believes VRAs will persuade other countries to end their unfair trading practices: Only an international agreement on steel trade can achieve that goal.  Rather, the purpose of the program is to limit the flow of unfairly traded steel entering the U.S. market and the injurious effects those practices have on the domestic steel industry, its workers and American steel-using manufacturers.  More than 400 American steel users -- including Chrysler, Conrail, Maytag and Mack Trucks -- support VRA extension.  They know firsthand how VRAs have provided our country with a reliable supply of high-quality steel at a good price.  VRAs should be extended for five years.  Until an international pact on steel trade is accomplished, there's no alternative.  Milton Deaner  President  American Iron and Steel Institute  Washington  Your July 18 article "Group of Educators Backs Tuition-Prepayment Plan" inaccurately characterizes investment in the Michigan Education Trust as a "guarantee" of payment of tuition when the child attends college in the future.  It is a fact that Gov. James J. Blanchard has marketed this program as such a guarantee.  However, the contract with the state agency clearly states that if the fund's assets are, at any time, insufficient to fulfill the promise to pay full tuition for participants, the only obligation of the agency is to provide a pro rata distribution of the remaining assets of the fund.  The MET is not backed by the "full faith and credit" of the state of Michigan.  Tens of thousands of parents and grandparents in Michigan have accepted this "guarantee" in return for their investment.  I hope, for the sake of the children involved, that their expectations are fulfilled.  Those of us who are concerned about the MET's ability to live up to its promises have invested elsewhere.  Gregory Howat  Rochester Hills, Mich.  The economic outlook dimmed further as the government reported that its chief economic forecasting index fell in June for the fourth time in five months.  The drop in the Commerce Department's index of leading indicators was small, only 0.1%, but weakness was widespread.  Seven of the 11 measures in the composite index registered negative signals, including unemployment claims, building permits and factory orders for consumer goods.  The report left in question the fate of the economy after an unprecedented 6 1/2 years of peacetime expansion.  Some economists said the index's decline indicated the economy is in the beginning stages of a recession.  But others said the decline was merely additional evidence of slower economic growth.  "I think it's saying we're probably entering a mild recession right now," said Bruce Steinberg, senior economist at Merrill Lynch Economics in New York.  But David Lereah, chief economist at Sovran Bank in Richmond, Va., said, "I think it's premature to say it's pointing to a recession, but it's definitely saying the U.S. is entering a period of sluggish activity."  Mr. Lereah added, "We've had a sluggish several months, and it points to sluggish activity in the next several months."  The Bush administration, which is counting on the economy to grow to generate enough tax revenue to meet federal budget-deficit reduction targets, also contended that a recession is unlikely.  "We don't see any signs of recession at this point," said Marlin Fitzwater, the chief White House spokesman.  He added, however: "It's a clear indication that the economy is slowing. . . .  It seems clear that growth in '89 will be less than it was in '87 and '88, and the economy is softer in the last half than it was in the first half."  In a separate report, the Labor Department said that productivity of U.S. workers outside the farm sector increased slightly in the second quarter of this year after declining sharply in the first quarter.  Nonfarm productivity grew at an annual rate of 0.2% in the second quarter after plunging 1.3% in the first.  The report also offered evidence that inflationary pressures are ebbing, although they are still considerable.  Unit labor costs rose at an annual rate of 5.2% in the second quarter, trailing the 6.2% annual rate in the first.  Weak productivity -- the output per hour of workers -- hinders economic growth, although it doesn't necessarily signal recession.  The index of leading indicators is intended to foretell economic activity for the ensuing six to nine months.  Traditionally, analysts have regarded three consecutive monthly drops as a signal of a recession; the index has avoided such a sign so far this year, with a 0.6% rise in April between falls in February and March and May and June.  The index is also known to be wrong at times.  It fell every month from September 1987 through January 1988, but the economy continued to grow -- and economic growth went on to accelerate in 1988 to its fastest pace in four years.  But the economy has been increasingly lethargic this year, the result of the Federal Reserve's efforts between March 1988 and March 1989 to push up interest rates in order to slow the economy and reduce inflationary pressures.  Late this spring, with evidence that the economy was slackening, the central bank began to relax its policies, allowing a key interest rate to decline.  As a result, interest rates across the economy have edged down.  Some economists said the leading indicators report shows the Fed should ease credit further.  "It is time for the Fed to renounce its policy of restraining economic growth," said Lawrence A. Hunter, deputy chief economist at the U.S. Chamber of Commerce.  Falling raw materials prices, a sign of lagging demand, pulled the index down the most.  Also contributing to the decline were: a shrinking workweek, increased claims for unemployment benefits, falling orders for manufactured consumer goods, declining building permits and a drop in unfilled orders for durable goods.  The index was kept from declining further by stock prices, which have climbed close to the peak they'd registered before the stock market crashed in 1987.  "The stock market is supposed to be a pretty good leading indicator of the economy," noted Edward Yardeni, chief economist at Prudential-Bache Securities in New York.  "It keeps going up here in the midst of all this hard landing talk."  A growth in the money supply, a gain in an index of consumer expectations, and a rise in orders for business plant and equipment also pulled the index up.  The productivity report contained a historical footnote.  Labor Department revisions for the past several years show that worker productivity rose an average of 1.8% a year in 1986, 1987 and 1988, rather than the 1.4% calculated in previous reports.  That is close to the 1.9% average since the late 1940s.  Many economists had lamented that productivity in the late 1980s was far below historic averages.  Here are the net contributions of the components of the Commerce Department's index of leading indicators.  @ June May  @ 1989 1989  @ Workweek ............................. - .07 - .22  @ Unemployment claims .................. - .14 - .12  @ Orders for consumer goods ............ - .06 - .12  @ Slower deliveries .................... - .08 - .17  @ Plant and equipment orders ........... .02 - .13  @ Building permits ..................... - .08 .03  @ Inventories .......................... - .03 - .13  @ Materials prices ..................... - .28 - .28  @ Stock prices ......................... .17 .21  @ Money supply ......................... .13 - .27  @ Credit ............................... .14 - .23  The seasonally adjusted index numbers (1967=100) for June, and the change from May, are:  @ Index of leading indicators .......... 143.5 - 0.1  @ Index of coincident indicators ....... 132.9 - 0.1  @ Index of lagging indicators .......... 122.2 0.4  The ratio of coincident to lagging indicators was 1.09, unchanged from the previous month.  A shocking scene took place in Congress late one night this June: Lawmakers voted overwhelmingly to eliminate favors for special interests.  "Lightning struck," marvels James Butera, a thrift-institution lobbyist who witnessed the startling event.  By 412 to 7, House members struck down special breaks for Chemical Banking Corp.; First Interstate Bancorp; Sears, Roebuck & Co.; Great Western Financial Corp.; Merrill Lynch & Co.; Paine Webber Group and others that had been larded into the huge savings and loan bailout bill.  Lightning is striking more and more in Congress these days.  Lawmakers are voting against powerful, monied interests -- at least on high-profile issues ranging from the S&L crisis to Medicare reform.  An outbreak of statesmanship?  Hardly.  It's an outbreak of fear: Amid the recent Washington scandals, even the appearance of being in the pocket of rich contributors and powerful interests can be political poison.  "In the new climate, there is a countervailing power against special interests," says Rep. Charles Schumer, a New York Democrat.  "People are worried that their hometown newspapers and TV stations will start writing about how they're voting."  But the fundamental forces at work haven't changed.  As long as the current campaign-finance system rewards incumbents who amass huge treasuries to frighten off challengers and allows corporate-sponsored political-action committees to give lawmakers as much as $2,000 for doing nothing more than showing up at a reception, special-interest lobbyists will be able to win friends and influence people in Congress.  "When the spotlight of attention moves on, the special-interest groups and special-interest money does not," says Fred Wertheimer, the president of Common Cause, the citizens lobby.  "That's when the improper and damaging impact of the present buddy system on Capitol Hill really comes into play."  Even as this wind of reform seems to be blowing across the Hill, business as usual can be found in some shielded corners.  Meeting in closed sessions, for instance, the House Ways and Means Committee, whose members attract special-interest campaign money as if it were directed by some force of nature, has been busily searching for ways to continue a wide range of expiring tax breaks for high-tech companies, real-estate developers and bond underwriters.  But, for now anyway, propriety is in and impropriety is out -- in reaction to public cynicism toward government that has been growing for some time.  In 1964, 64% of voters questioned by the University of Michigan's National Election Studies believed that government is "run for the benefit of all," while only 29% said it is "pretty much run by a few big interests looking out for themselves."  Last year, 24 years and innumerable Washington scandals later, the same survey group found the proportion reversed: 63% believed America is run by a government of the few and for the few, while 31% thought it is run for the greater good.  Events this year are hardly likely to regenerate confidence: House Speaker James Wright resigned after being charged with a host of ethical violations, and now an influence-peddling scandal at the Department of Housing and Urban Development is unfolding.  In reaction, many in Congress are adopting pro-ethics stances that would make Caesar's wife look like a trollop.  In June, about 200 House Democrats and aides were briefed by party lawyers on current do's and dont's.  GOP Rep. John Duncan of Tennessee went so far as to report on his financial-disclosure report that his 19-year-old daughter earned $1,500 working part time for a Knoxville dress shop.  "I have no control over her money at all," he wrote, ascribing the notification to "an abundance of caution."  And to the chagrin of congressional staffers, there is even talk of banning them from accepting lunches and other favors from lobbyists.  The key to many stands against special interests is public scrutiny: The brighter the spotlight focused on an issue, the less likely are special interests to prevail.  Money still talks, it seems, but few want to be seen paying attention.  "What used to be clubby, behind-the-scenes has now begun to see the light of day, and it's become much more difficult to do," says Steven Stockmeyer, a Washington lobbyist and spokesman for the National Association of Business Political Action Committees.  As a result, even some time-honored, back room legislative traditions are under fierce attack.  The Senate, for instance, just last week passed a measure that would bar recipients of federal grants, contracts or loans from using that money to pay people to lobby either Congress or the executive branch.  The measure, which is supported by an unlikely coalition of House Majority Leader Richard Gephardt and White House Budget Director Richard Darman, would also require the recipients to disclose the lobbyists and consultants they do hire.  Senate Appropriations Committee Chairman Robert Byrd, a West Virginia Democrat who wrote the legislation, says he was responding to both the HUD scandal and news reports that Cassidy & Associates, a well-connected Washington lobbying firm, has solicited university clients -- including one in his home state -- and won large federal grants for them from the appropriations committees.  In a marvelous mix of metaphors, Sen. Byrd declares: "I don't want our Appropriations Committee to look like a cesspool. . . .  The system needs a shot of castor oil."  Sen. Lloyd Bentsen, the Senate Finance Committee chairman, has ended the practice of using indirect language to hide beneficiaries of special tax-law breaks -- in the Senate, at least.  No longer will General Motors, for instance, be described as "an automobile manufacturer that was incorporated in Delaware on Oct. 13, 1916."  Henceforth, all such deals will have to be generic, and senators sponsoring them must list all those who would benefit.  "It's a matter of fairness and equity," the Texas Democrat says.  "The fellow in the boondocks without an expensive Washington lawyer should have the same opportunity as the fellow with expensive counsel," adds Mr. Bentsen, who once set up a short-lived breakfast club for lobbyists making $10,000 campaign donations.  Bipartisan groups in both the House and Senate are working on revamping campaign-finance and personal-ethics laws.  House Republican leaders are considering a plan to require that at least half of a candidate's contributions come from constituents, a move that would erode the influence of special-interest donations.  Even President Bush is finding it politically advantageous to call for elimination of campaign-donation committees.  "Today's special-interest political-action committees and their $160 million war chests overshadow the great parties of Thomas Jefferson and Abraham Lincoln," he said in a speech.  Terror about being tainted is changing the way lawmakers deal with lobbyists.  S&L lobbyists, accustomed to cozy relations with lawmakers that some blame for the current S&L crisis, are suffering from the current backlash.  Despite surging contributions from industry-sponsored PACs and their trade associations to members of the House and Senate -- up 42% from the 1984 elections to $1.85 million in the 1987-88 election cycle -- lobbyists found most lawmakers skittish to their pleas on the pending $166 billion bailout bill.  Kenneth Guenther, a Washington bank lobbyist, recalls being told by one lawmaker: "This is not the time for you guys to lobby us on this point or that point."  Adds Mr. Butera, the lobbyist, accustomed to seeing the S&Ls get their way: "I've never seen a bill like this one."  "Business-as-usual created the problem," says Rep. Jim Leach, the Iowa Republican who offered the motion to strip the bill of the special provisions.  "It shouldn't further the problem."  If the S&L lobby is having problems, the well-heeled American Medical Association is ready to have a coronary.  The AMA shells out millions of dollars in political contributions in every election.  The physicians' lobby makes lots of House calls, giving to 95% of all House members since 1983 and directing much of its largess to Ways and Means Committee members.  In a show of ingratitude, the panel recently infuriated the AMA by voting to limit total Medicare payments to doctors, a policy called "expenditure targets."  The top four Ways and Means recipients of the AMA's donations since 1983, and two others among the top 10, voted against the association's position.  The AMA's money may have hurt rather than helped it.  "A lot of people are concerned that you will appear bought, and there is a tendency to go the other way," Rep. Rod Chandler says.  The Washington Republican, second among Ways and Means members in AMA contributions since 1983 with $22,352, nonetheless voted for the Medicare-payment limit.  In addition, the AMA wounded itself with newspaper advertisements showing a glum-looking elderly woman under the headline: "How Do You Tell Someone on Medicare She's an 'Expenditure Target'?"  The ad so outraged administration officials that they sent White House lobbyists with copies of it to campaign against the group's position.  Special interests have been through valleys before.  Spurred on by muckraking indictments of social conditions and the crusading leadership of President Theodore Roosevelt during the Progressive era of the early 1900s, Congress enacted legislation regulating such powerful forces as the meat packers.  That was followed by the rise in the power of business groups in the years leading up to the Depression.  There also have been spasms of personal-ethics reforms in Congress -- followed by Abscam, Koreagate and the Wright affair.  The current press scrutiny of lawmakers' behavior will probably wane, and Congress could go back to its old ways.  "Most issues in Congress normally aren't carefully monitored," Common Cause's Mr. Wertheimer says.  "In those cases, the power and influence of special-interest groups is vastly increased."  Oddly enough, the new ethical environment could prove to be a boon for one special interest-lawyers.  Armed with newspaper clippings detailing possible ethics violations by lawmakers, Arnold & Porter, a high-powered Washington law firm, solicits corporate customers for "political audits" to "ensure that our clients' Washington activities are fully and comfortably within the requirements of the law."  Voting by the International Longshoremen's Association is going heavily in favor of a national contract extension covering members from Maine to Texas, the union said.  "I'm very happy.  I think we needed some time to discuss the issues," said John Bowers, president of the union representing 65,000 members.  Voting from the north Atlantic region was complete, said union spokesman Jim McNamara.  Members in New York, New Jersey, Connecticut, Massachusetts, Pennsylvania, Hampton Roads, Va., and Baltimore voted 4,644 in favor, 823 against.  Members in Florida and North and South Carolina voted 1,594 in favor and 326 against, McNamara said.  However, votes from Texas, Mississippi, Louisiana and Alabama were missing, primarily because Hurricane Chantal hit those areas and voting temporarily was called off.  "It's pretty safe to say that the contract extension will be ratified," McNamara said."The trend is it is passing overwhelmingly, that longshoremen were accepting it by a big margin."  The spokesman said the vote "signals there is stability in the industry" because there could have been serious problems if the extension of the master contract was not granted.  It is possible, McNamara said, that shippers could have diverted cargoes to Canada and cut out American dock workers.  Also, the possibility of a nationwide strike is eliminated until the pact expires Nov. 30, 1990.  The extension about to be ratified comes from a master contract that was to expire Sept. 30.  Now individual ports must conduct negotiations with the unions for local contracts on issues germane to each area, such as working conditions and work rules on the handling of traditional cargo.  McNamara said one of the most pressing issues is an industry attempt to eliminate the guaranteed pay for union members when work is insufficient to maintain certain predetermined pay levels.  He said in New York 6,000 longshoremen are registered for the guaranteed 19,000 hours of work.  In Baltimore and other areas, productivity gains and stagnant business have produced less work for longshoremen.  "It's not going to be easy," McNamara said.  A spokesman for the New York Shipping Association did not immediately return a telephone call seeking comment.  McNamara noted, though, that stability is maintained once again because if Boston workers, for instance, can't agree on a contract, New York members would not be joining them in a strike.  Boston held its first meeting Wednesday.  Baltimore is to have its first meeting Aug. 15, McNamara said.  New York had a session Wednesday and will meet again next Wednesday.  Wages, hours, benefit contributions and automation rules were decided in the master contract, which extends most of the provisions of the current contract.  The new contract does, however, increase by 45 cents an hour the employer contributions to fringe benefits plans.  It also calls for the establishment of a joint labor-management committee to examine fundamental challenges facing the industry.  From the deceptively secure perch of his office, Lewis Ranieri peers out at a treacherous financial jungle teeming with the walking dead of this city's devastated savings and loan industry.  They are known as zombies -- brain-dead thrift institutions kept in motion by federal regulators.  Bled dry by years of avarice, incompetence, fraud and a plummeting economy, the zombies have long since run out of the life-sustaining capital.  But until the federal government can gear up its huge S&L-rescue plan -- which could take months -- and provide enough money to give the zombies a decent burial, they will continue to roam through the jungle.  They will continue to bid ferociously for the consumer deposits that keep them going.  And they will continue to make life a living hell for Lew Ranieri.  The hefty, gregarious New Yorker heads a group that in December acquired United Savings of Texas as part of the much-maligned Southwest Plan to consolidate the region's failed thrift institutions.  As incoming chairman and chief executive officer of a mangled institution in a devastated economy, he knew that he would need all his New York street smarts to survive.  But he didn't know that Houston was about to become one of the toughest banking environments in the country.  He didn't know that the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp., which insures bank deposits, would storm into the jungle and make things even tougher.  And, he says, "I didn't realize that when we bought into this Southwest Plan, we were also volunteering for an emotional roller coaster."  By now, the downward spiral of Texas S&Ls is well documented: They were pushed into an abyss by collapsing oil prices, grossly overbuilt real-estate markets, plummeting property values, defaulted loans, foreclosures and heavy losses.  The Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corp., the S&L-deposit insurer with just $10 billion to plug a hole at least 10 times larger and growing, responded last year by peddling packages of insolvent institutions that were sweetened with liberal tax breaks and subsidies.  Despite growing criticism of regulatory largess, the Southwest Plan returned a semblance of sanity to the marketplace.  It brought in some fresh capital, such as the $200 million Mr. Ranieri and his investors injected into United.  It reduced the so-called Texas premium, which financial institutions in the state had to pay to overcome public skepticism and attract deposits.  As 1988 ended, it had repackaged and sold most insolvent Dallas-area institutions, ending in that market the cutthroat competition for deposits.  But in Houston, the zombies still roamed, desperately seeking liquidity at any cost.  "They're savaging the earnings of the healthy institutions," Mr. Ranieri complained at a recent industry conference.  He added that the zombies would raise the eventual cost of reconstructing the industry.  They were only one of his problems.  In buying United after failed runs at other Southwest Plan packages, Mr. Ranieri settled for what is, by most accounts, the leanest deal the FSLIC negotiated.  The subsidized yield that he got on United's real-estate portfolio averaged 2.2% above the cost of funds; the FSLIC gave some other buyers as much as 2.6% or 2.7%.  His protection from losses on much of that portfolio was guaranteed by the FSLIC for only one year; the agency shielded other buyers for as long as a decade.  And the company through which Mr. Ranieri and his partners bought United, Hyperion Partners Ltd., was so new -- and therefore without earnings -- that it couldn't take advantage of the lavish tax benefits being handed out like candy to others.  There also was an internal mess.  In a cannibalistic effort to raise cash, the previous management had sold branch offices with such abandon as to slash United's network of more than 100 offices to just 19.  In the process, United had quit the potentially lucrative Dallas-Fort Worth market and left only solitary outposts in Austin and San Antonio.  The cutbacks, paradoxically, crimped the institution's ability to round up deposits.  Although it hadn't made a mortgage loan in almost three years, United Savings owned a hodgepodge of money-losing assets, including acres of foreclosed real estate, a huge junk-bond portfolio and two South American companies whose businesses no one in the organization could even describe.  Its $5 billion portfolio was "80% baloney," Mr. Ranieri marvels.  "It was as if they wanted to have one of everything."  Because the FSLIC had tossed out virtually all of United's top management, the new owners had the dual burden of developing new leadership while untangling United's assets and liabilities.  Meanwhile, the FSLIC had imposed such burdensome reporting requirements -- one recent report fills 12 feet of shelf space -- that employees were slaving 70 to 80 hours a week in a desperate effort to meet both business and regulatory obligations.  Nevertheless, all that didn't worry Mr. Ranieri, a Wall Street wizard who had invented mortgage-backed securities during his highflying days at Salomon Bros.  If he didn't have enough branches to increase deposits, he would buy more.  New management could be trained.  The reporting requirements would become less onerous with time and standardization.  And Mr. Ranieri had an aggressive game plan that included new investment vehicles and fresh approaches to underwriting home loans -- loans in which United would share equity, for example.  Enter the FDIC. Subjected to a drumroll of criticism of the FSLIC, the incoming Bush administration shoved it aside, suspended the Southwest Plan and sent in the FDIC.  More than 60 Texas thrift institutions got FDIC conservators, watchdogs who didn't have receivership powers but nevertheless were supposed to stanch the bleeding until Congress acted on President Bush's $164 billion rescue package.  But there was no magic wand to change the hard reality: To continue operating, Houston's zombie thrifts had to find cash.  And the quickest, surest way of getting that cash was to jack up interest rates.  In mid-1988, before most of the Southwest Plan deals were completed, Texas thrift institutions were paying, on average, a full percentage point above the national average; by year end, the difference had all but disappeared.  But in February, the premium bounced back to roughly half a percentage point.  Most of the nation's highest rates on jumbo certificates of deposit are being offered by Texas thrift institutions.  With the combined woes of banks and thrift institutions in the region straining resources, the FDIC also found itself short of experienced personnel.  In some cases, says a Hyperion partner, conservators who hadn't overseen an institution larger than $200 million were thrown into $2 billion institutions, "so of course they couldn't control the situation."  The manager assigned to one Houston S&L, a former claims adjuster, gleefully proclaimed on his first day that deposits were up sharply.  Small wonder, Mr. Ranieri snorts.  The insolvent institution had just raised its rates a full percentage point -- sucking deposits out of other institutions and increasing its own losses to boot.  Rates continued to soar.  "It was like a gasoline war," says James N. Jackson, United's executive vice president for retail banking and funding.  Some days, he says, interest rates were bumped up every few hours, a quarter of a percentage point at a clip.  Moreover, the insolvent institutions weren't shy about trumpeting their aggressive pricing.  "Under the government's program as administered by the FDIC," a University Savings newspaper ad boasted, "our services include some of the highest CD rates available."  An FDIC spokesman regrets the ad but not the action.  "I wish they wouldn't say that," he said recently, before the FDIC placed University in receivership (which involves an actual takeover).  "But we can't change the facts, the financial facts of life.  We'll continue to pay whatever we have to pay to keep those institutions operating."  Most zombies had few alternatives.  The Federal Reserve, one possible source of funds, was no more eager to lend to them than commercial lenders were; only a handful of FDIC-administered institutions have been allowed to belly up to its window.  And the FDIC wouldn't dip into its own funds, which are provided by member banks, not taxpayers or S&Ls.  "Until monies are given to implement a solution, there's very little that can be done," admitted Frank Norris, the FDIC conservator at Commonwealth Federal Savings Association before it, too, tumbled into receivership.  The zombies' solvent competitors could either raise rates or see cash reserves and deposit bases erode.  First Gibraltar Savings, the only other large Houston institution to be recapitalized last year, decided that its rich FSLIC deal, including an estimated $900 million in tax credits, would allow it to hold the line on rates paid on deposits.  But after $600 million of deposits drained away, Gerald Ford, its chief executive, decided early this year to "become competitive again."  Mr. Ranieri, on the other hand, decided "to hunker down under the table and wait for the cavalry."  The policy, to which he is still adhering, is costly.  As United stuck to its game plan, often offering a full percentage point less than the zombies, its deposits ran off like rain down a gutter.  Almost half of United's jumbo CDs have vanished since the year began.  So-called hot money, controlled by brokers who keep shifting the pot to find the highest rates, shriveled from $1.2 billion at year-end 1988 to about $730 million today.  At a recent lunch with depositors, Mr. Ranieri was asked why anyone should bank with United when an FDIC-administered institution down the street was offering significantly higher interest rates.  "I was sitting there like a dummy," he recalls.  "What was I going to say?  There's a cancer in the system."  Meanwhile, Mr. Ranieri scrambled deftly to keep funds flowing in.  Thanks to its recapitalization, United could borrow needed cash instead of chasing the zombies' rates.  It also could attract short-term cash on the repo market, in which financial institutions sell securities or loans with an agreement to buy them back.  Even that was touch-and-go for a while, he says, as cash-hungry institutions poured into the market and strained its capacity.  In addition, Mr. Ranieri astutely hedged against rising interest rates, which otherwise would have eaten into United's margins.  With the deposit side of the balance sheet hemorrhaging, Mr. Ranieri also had to shrink the asset side.  He sold whatever he could to stay liquid.  United slashed its junk-bond holdings to $215 million from $670 million.  It also unloaded almost all its $2.4 billion portfolio of mortgage-backed securities at a time when that market had all but dried up.  Within months, its total assets plummeted to $3.7 billion from $5 billion, far from the orderly, value-maximizing disposition of assets that Mr. Ranieri had planned.  Without pressure from the zombies, he acknowledges, "we never would have shrunk that radically."  The bobbing and weaving paid off in a deceptively strong first quarter; earnings topped $36 million.  But the FSLIC got more than half of that, under incentive and equity-sharing provisions in the purchase agreement.  Core earnings -- net interest income plus fees minus operating expenses -- were a mere $1.6 million.  United expects another profit in the second quarter.  Now, as though caught in the passing eye of a hurricane, the Houston S&L jungle is momentarily quiet.  Interest rates have declined in recent weeks, although rates here remain among the nation's highest.  United's first-quarter profit has created an aura of stability; thrift-industry officials say they have retained 85% of core deposits and, lately, are luring more new deposits than they are losing.  United's management also is being stabilized.  Decision making, once restricted to a few wheeler-dealers, has been spread among a dozen or more executives who debate rates, asset mix and investment policy.  Kenneth H. Thorn was appointed the president and chief operating officer; he was the consumer banking whiz dispatched by Chemical Banking Corp. to create new retail products for its Texas Commerce Bancshares unit.  Yet many pitfalls remain.  Although the Houston economy is rebounding, its real-estate market is still mainly the domain of bargain hunters.  "We've had buyers coming in here, offering 50 cents on the dollar and being insulted when we wouldn't take it," laments Raymond L. Chilton, senior vice president for commercial real estate.  He says United completed only two property sales in the first six months of 1989.  Although hopes run high that Congress will soon approve the Bush package, the elaborate regulatory structure it envisions would take months to build and months more to deal with all the brain-dead thrift institutions.  Meanwhile, the threat posed by any resurgence in interest rates lingers.  Congressmen periodically threaten to scrap the Southwest Plan deals.  And Mr. Ranieri needs to rebuild his branch network, generate new deposits and unload property quickly; he hasn't much government aid cushioning him.  Mr. Ranieri's jungle, in other words, remains an unsettling place.  At his desk one recent day, he reaches into a drawer and pulls out a bottle of Maalox.  "See," he says with a rueful chuckle, "what Texas has done to me?"  As a farmer who uses futures to hedge against his crop, David Neisler could star in the Chicago Board of Trade's promotional film on how the futures markets work.  But there would be just one problem: the government claims Mr. Neisler was ripped off in the exchange's soybean pit where 19 traders were indicted Wednesday.  The experience of the El Paso, Ill., farmer and other alleged victims points up a basic truth of commodity trading: it is almost impossible for even experienced investors to find out if they're being cheated hundreds of miles away by traders shouting at each other in a crowded pit.  It is a dilemma highlighted by the indictments Wednesday of 46 traders at the Board of Trade and the Chicago Mercantile Exchange.  Although the indictments identify only a handful of the alleged individual victims, they reel off hundreds of order numbers of specific trades in which the government alleges outside customers were cheated.  They also raise many questions yet to be fully answered, such as what, if anything, brokerage firms would do to make customers whole, and whether customers themselves could take any useful action.  Mr. Neisler, 40, has used the futures markets for almost as long as the 20 years he has farmed soybeans, corn and hogs in El Paso, a town of 2,800 people, 30 miles east of Peoria.  Asked if he knew much about commodities, he chuckles, pauses, and says: "I thought I did."  But Mr. Neisler has found that farming 1,500 acres and raising 10,000 hogs doesn't make him an expert on fraud in the commodity business.  He was surprised when a Federal Bureau of Investigation agent called him the other day to tell him he'd been cheated.  And like others, he wonders, what, if anything, he can do about it.  Charles Plocar Jr. also was surprised by the revelation that he may have been cheated, but for a different reason.  The Sarasota, Fla., financial adviser was certain any funny business had to have happened in the Merc's Japanese yen pit.  "That's where I've really been burned," says Mr. Plocar, who trades frequently for his investment purposes.  But, as it turned out, Mr. Plocar, 48, was allegedly defrauded in the futures pit he regards as most reliable: the Board of Trade's Treasury Bond pit.  Mr. Plocar said he doesn't recall feeling cheated on any T-bond trades, though he regularly got his orders filled at the more expensive end of the trading range.  "The FBI guy said, 'don't you understand, every time that happens, he's scalping a tick off of you.'"  Mr. Plocar was one of many customers of Lind-Waldock & Co. whom the government alleges was defrauded by T-bond pit broker Howard J. Goberstein, who was indicted Wednesday on charges of racketeering, mail fraud, and commodities law violations.  Mr. Goberstein, 33, says through his lawyer Royal Martin that he is innocent and will contest the charges.  Most customers mentioned in the indictments had no idea they'd been allegedly defrauded, and that may explain why, in the government's view, futures pit corruption has gone on unchecked for so long.  Only by putting undercover agents in the pits to see stealing occur, and then tracing the trades back through brokerage houses to the customers, could wide-scale cheating be proven, prosecutors believe.  "I was totally in the dark," said Claude Tardiff, a Lowell, Mass., accountant who trades futures regularly.  He first heard about the alleged fraud against him in the T-bond pit from reporters who got his name out of Mr. Goberstein's indictment; neither the FBI nor Lind-Waldock called him.  Mr. Tardiff's trade was a five-contract T-bond purchase last November.  "It may have cost me a few (extra) bucks, but nothing major," he said.  "I wouldn't say anything unless the price was way off."  It may take other individuals longer to find out about alleged cheating.  One of the victims of alleged cheating in the Merc's Swiss franc pit was said to be the Corinth Fund LP, of Prairie Village, Kan.  Records of the National Futures Association identify Corinth as a commodity pool, a sort of mutual fund for commodity investors.  But John Middleton, president of a firm that the National Futures Association says runs the Corinth Fund, declined to comment.  "I don't know anything about it at this point," he said.  He refused to give the value of the fund or the number of investors in it.  Because they can have many investors, the cheating of Corinth or other commodity pools, if it occurred, would greatly multiply the number of victims in the scandal.  For people like Mr. Plocar, the Florida financial adviser, many questions remain.  If he was cheated on one trade last November, what about the scores of others he makes each year and doesn't question?  And, if the government proves its case against the indicted trader, can Mr. Plocar get some money back?  David Bortman, a Chicago attorney who specializes in cases involving commodities and securities fraud, said the scandal raises some tricky issues.  A practical one is whether a trader convicted under the racketeering law would have any money left when the government got through with him.  A legal issue is whether brokerage firms could be held responsible for any cheating by independent brokers, who are not on their payroll.  Mr. Bortman said aggrieved customers would probably have a clearer shot at a trader who pleaded guilty to cheating them or who was convicted of such crimes.  The exchanges say customers can also file a complaint with them, the Commodity Futures Trading Commission in Washington, or the National Futures Association, the industry's self-regulatory group in Chicago.  Meanwhile, the firms that processed orders that the government alleges were illegally filled sit nervously on the sidelines.  Consider Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., which claims the title of world's biggest commodity brokerage firm.  According to the indictment of three traders in the Swiss franc pit, independent broker Robert D. Mosky executed more than two dozen trades that cheated Shearson customers.  Jack H. Lehman III, Shearson's director of commodities, said he hadn't seen the indictment yet.  But he added: "I would say that if the government proves this is the case, it certainly is a concern and I would hope we could help these customers recover money that would properly be theirs."  Mr. Lehman said he didn't know if his firm would come up with any money on its own for the customers if they were indeed cheated.  He added that his firm tries to pick its independent brokers carefully, but that it can be difficult for brokerage firms to detect abuses by independent brokers.  "Heck, why couldn't the exchanges know what was going on?" he asks.  "They had the obligation of surveillance" of traders.  Mr. Mosky, who was charged Wednesday with racketeering conspiracy, 26 counts of mail and wire fraud and 37 counts of violating the Commodities Exchange Act, couldn't be reached for comment.  The exchanges have asked brokers who were indicted not to handle customer orders and to trade only for themselves.  William O'Donnell, president of Lind-Waldock, said in an interview that customers who believe they were cheated in Treasury bond futures trades with his firm should call and it will investigate.  Mr. O'Donnell said that Mr. Goberstein, the indicted Treasury bond trader, filled orders for Lind-Waldock on and off for two years, ending last February when the firm first learned he was under suspicion by the government.  "We knew there was a problem at that point."  Mr. O'Donnell said none of the other 45 traders indicted thus far are major Lind-Waldock brokers, and that if one of the firm's regular brokers becomes a target, the firm would take its business elsewhere.  "I would pull the deck," he said, referring to the broker's stack of orders.  A spokesman for Shearson Lehman, meanwhile, said the firm "couldn't determine" the last time it used Mr. Mosky to fill trades in the Swiss franc pit.  When Rep. Ed Jenkins (D., Ga.) walked out of a House Democratic Caucus meeting this week, he smiled and told reporters, "I have them now."  The genial Georgian meant he still had the votes to cut the capital gains tax, which is another way of saying he's about to save his fellow Democrats from themselves.  The fight over capital gains is being minimized by Beltway sophisticates, but as a matter of both raw politics and economic policy it's the most important debate of the summer, if not the year.  Let us count the dividends:  First, this is supply-side paradise: Tax cuts for the masses (middle-class and "rich") will raise revenues to pay for tax cuts for the poor.  All attention has focused on capital gains, but the same proposals would expand the earned-income and child-care tax credits.  Everyone will have more reason to save and invest, while tens of thousands of the working poor will vanish from the tax rolls -- a triumph of incentive economics.  Second, this is a victory for conservative, especially Southern, Democrats.  This matters more than fulfilling a George Bush campaign promise.  In the Wright-Coelho heyday, boll-weevils were beaten into submission by the House liberal majority; now they're throwing off their chains.  Five of Mr. Jenkins's six Ways and Means Committee apostates are Southerners, who were stiffed in the recent House leadership races.  By this week, Speaker Tom Foley (D., Wash.) was telling the caucus that capital gains is no longer the party "litmus test" it was a week ago.  Translation: We don't have the votes.  By some party counts, as many as 50 House Democrats would jump ship with Mr. Jenkins.  Dan Rostenkowski (D., Ill.), the Ways and Means realist, has resorted to floating a "compromise" to allow indexing of gains for inflation, plus big exclusions in future years.  Rosty's plan is faulty -- hurting older Americans because it'd apply only to assets bought after July 31 of this year -- but it's just the opening bid.  The Senate, always receptive to capital gains cuts, will be only too happy to see and raise.  Third, the capital gains revolt is a rebuke to the new conventional wisdom that the path to Democratic ascendancy lies in class warfare.  Its leading proponent is Majority Leader Richard Gephardt (D., Mo.), the former St. Louis ward-heeler who whooped up "economic populism" in the Iowa primaries.  Mr. Gephardt, supported by House liberals, really believes Michael Dukakis would be president today if he'd struck the high notes of class envy earlier.  He believes Democrats must favor trade protectionism, or what he'd prefer to call "economic nationalism."  His strategy also requires denouncing Republican ideas as sops to "the rich."  This once worked well for Democrats, of course, so long as Republicans played only balance-the-budget politics.  Democrats spent and spent, while Republicans promised tax cuts sometime in the future, but only after the budget was balanced.  But the 1978 Steiger-Jenkins capital-gains amendment, followed by the 1981 Kemp-Roth tax cuts and the 1986 tax reform, turned this world on its head.  Republicans snatched the populist agenda by cutting taxes first; Democrats chose to become the welfare state's tax collectors.  Mr. Jenkins understands that any new Democratic "populism" can never have broad appeal until the tax issue is muted.  Beryl Anthony (D., Ark.), one of the Ways and Means rebels, has said he won't go near a tax increase unless he first sees the same promise in a signed piece of paper from George Bush.  "We shouldn't abandon the tax issue, as we're prone to do," explains Mr. Jenkins.  "It places us always on the defensive, and you can't be there and win."  In his country-lawyer drawl, Mr. Jenkins calls his rebels "John F. Kennedy Democrats."  He reels off the "Democratic" cuts in capital gains taxes: JFK's, in 1961; his own amendment with Republican Bill Steiger in 1978; the Brodhead Amendment in 1981; and support by the Democratic House for retaining a lower capital gains rate as part of tax reform in 1986 (which was killed by the Republican Senate).  Democratic Rep. Andrew Jacobs, the Indiana iconoclast, but hardly a supplysider -- he refers to the "Laughable Curve" -- explains his support for Mr. Jenkins this way: "When I was in the Young Democrats, I remember making a talk that FDR was wealthy, and John F. Kennedy was wealthy, but the test of being a Democrat is not how much you object to others becoming wealthy. . . .  I don't think stirring up class envy is productive."  With the issue dragging past the August doldrums, George Bush has a chance to solidify a Jenkins-Bush victory.  He can hit the road on behalf of capital gains, sharing the podium with Aunt Ethel who sold her AT&T shares after 30 years, the drug-store owner who just retired, the Iowa farmer who wants to sell and move to Florida, and others among "the rich" who'd benefit from a capital-gains cut.  In the longer run, too, Republicans might start thinking about the next tax to cut.  One candidate is the social security tax, a regressive tax on work that will rise again next January.  As for Democrats, they could do the same.  They could also thank Ed Jenkins for reminding them that Democrats once led Republicans in supporting tax cuts and economic growth.  Thursday, August 3, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 8 15/16% high, 8 7/8% low, 8 7/8% near closing bid, 8 15/16% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.45% 30 to 44 days; 8.325% 45 to 59 days; 8.225% 60 to 89 days; 8% 90 to 119 days; 7.875% 120 to 149 days; 7.75% 150 to 179 days; 7.375% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.55% 30 days; 8.375% 60 days; 8.25% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.15% one month; 8.08% two months; 8.02% three months; 7.94% six months; 7.84% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.45% one month; 8.25% three months; 8.15% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.45% 30 days; 8.22% 60 days; 8.08% 90 days; 7.93% 120 days; 7.85% 150 days; 7.75% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 11/16% to 8 9/16% one month; 8 9/16% to 8 7/16% two months; 8 1/2% to 8 3/8% three months; 8 3/8% to 8 1/4% four months; 8 3/8% to 8 1/4% five months; 8 3/8% to 8 1/4% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 11/16% one month; 8 7/16% three months; 8 5/16% six months; 8 1/4% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, July 31, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.65% 13 weeks; 7.35% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 9.71%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.625%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 9.63%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.50%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.88%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  As Federal Express Corp. prepares to complete its $880 million acquisition of Tiger International Corp. Monday, many Federal pilots are angry about the way the merger is being handled.  The conflict is over Federal's plan to integrate Tiger's pilots into Federal's all-important pilot-seniority list, instead of adding the new aviators to the bottom of the roster.  The issue has so infuriated some Federal pilots that at least one lawsuit has been filed, and many Federal pilots are talking about unionizing -- a move Federal's chairman, Frederick H. Smith, fiercely opposes.  The stakes of the pilot-management dispute are high.  The seniority list determines pilots' work schedules, the type of airplanes they can fly, their pay and even their career options.  The pilots, of course, help determine the success or failure of Federal Express.  "It's basically grow-up time for people at Federal Express who've long called Fred Smith 'father,'" says Michael Cosner, a DC-10 captain who has been with Federal for 16 years.  "We're not talking about the old Federal Express.  This is the new Federal Express."  A spokesman for Federal Express declined to comment on the dispute.  In March, however, Mr. Smith made clear that he doesn't welcome unions at Federal Express.  Asked about the fact that Tiger's pilots are members of the Air Line Pilots Association, Mr. Smith said: "I don't intend to recognize any unions at Federal Express."  The pilots may make that difficult.  After the merger, Tiger's unions are expected to be decertified because Federal's 50,000 nonunion workers far outnumber Tiger's 6,500 employees.  But each company has roughly the same number of pilots -- Tiger has 1,000 aviators, Federal 1,100 -- so a unionization vote by pilots only could be close.  And now, an increasing number of Federal Express pilots say they are receptive to the idea of a union.  "If a union vote were held tomorrow," said Richard Sowers, a Federal pilot with five year's seniority, "85% to 90% of the pilots would vote union."  Last month, Mr. Sowers filed suit against Federal Express in federal district court in Reno, Nev., claiming the company's promise to integrate Tiger's pilots in Federal Express's seniority list violates his employment contract.  According to the suit, provisions of the contract, embodied in a document called the Flight Crewmembers' Handbook, expressly guarantee that any pilots acquired in a merger will be added to the bottom of Federal Express's seniority list.  Just days after Mr. Sowers filed that suit, according to other Federal Express pilots and a second suit filed by Mr. Sowers, the company revised the Flight Crewmembers' Handbook to allow it to integrate the new Tiger pilots into the Federal list.  The second suit charges that Federal made those revisions improperly because the pilots refused to participate in formulating the changes in a manner set out in the pilots' handbook.  Federal Express declined to comment on the charges.  The Federal Express spokesman also wouldn't say whether the company views the Flight Crewmembers' Handbook as part of pilots' employment contracts.  Several Federal Express pilots said they expect the company -- stung by the internal criticism and skittish about driving pilots to unionize -- will maintain two separate seniority lists for a while.  Eventually, Tiger pilots can insist on arbitration if they're unsatisfied with a company-drawn list.  In any case, several Federal pilots said the issue may have already badly eroded the loyalty of Federal's pilot force.  The non-unionized crews have been widely credited with helping make the overnight carrier a success by flying through hoops to deliver the goods on time.  The conflict also has the potential of creating dangerous tension among colleagues.  On a recent stop in Sacramento, Calif., Mr. Cosner, the DC-10 captain, chatted with a Tiger crew on the tarmac, but no one dared broach the seniority issue, he said.  "I may be flying with those guys some day," he said.  "That's the last thing you want is animosity in the cockpit."  The Justice Department said it is investigating allegations that six major oil companies illegally conspired to lower the price of crude oil produced on land owned by the state of California to avoid paying state royalties and federal windfall-profits taxes.  A lawyer for the state estimated that claims against the companies for unpaid federal taxes ultimately could amount to "billions of dollars."  The windfall-profits tax was imposed beginning in 1980, when the elimination of price controls led to sharp increases in the price of domestic oil.  The tax was repealed in 1988.  In addition to the companies' potential tax liability, the Justice Department could seek "hundreds of millions of dollars" in penalties for alleged antitrust violations, the lawyer said.  James Rill, the department's antitrust chief, said: "I can confirm that the Antitrust Division is looking at crude-oil pricing in the state of California."  He added that federal prosecutors also are monitoring two pending lawsuits brought jointly by the state of California and the city of Long Beach charging the oil companies with illegal conspiracies.  Mr. Rill declined to identify the companies the Justice Department is investigating or to elaborate further.  The defendants in the pending lawsuits are Chevron Corp., Texaco Inc., Unocal Corp., Mobil Corp., Royal Dutch/Shell Group's Shell Oil Co. unit and Exxon Corp.  The companies have denied any wrongdoing.  In April, a federal appeals court in San Francisco rejected a lower-court finding that the companies acted independently in setting prices and that their actions were protected in any event by federal price regulations.  According to the appeals court, "the city {of Long Beach} presented sufficient evidence" of an antitrust conspiracy to warrant that a trial proceed.  Federal prosecutors have begun to review documentary evidence against the six companies gathered by the state of California and the city of Long Beach, the lawyer for the state said.  The launching of the Justice Department investigation was first reported yesterday by the Washington Post.  The pending suits allege that the six oil companies conspired to pay artificially low prices to the state for oil produced from state-owned tidelands between 1971 and 1977 and from 1980 to 1985.  The two suits seek combined damages of more than $800 million.  That amount would be tripled if the plaintiffs' antitrust allegations are proven.  XPLOR Corp.'s board has authorized the company to buy another 10% of its stock, increasing the total authorized purchases to as much as 20% of Xplor's shares.  A previous edition misstated the amount authorized.  (See: "Xplor Corp. Repurchase Plan" -- WSJ Aug. 2, 1989)  As the Pete Rose soap opera continues to grab headlines, attention has focused on a letter written by baseball commissioner A. Bartlett Giamatti on behalf of Ron Peters, the man who claims to have been Mr. Rose's bookie.  It was addressed to U.S. District Court Chief Judge Carl B. Rubin just before he was to sentence Mr. Peters on drug and tax charges.  In the letter Mr. Giamatti asserted that Mr. Peters gave "significant and truthful cooperation" to the special counsel investigating Mr. Rose's alleged involvement in gambling.  Mr. Giamatti concluded that Mr. Peters had been "candid, forthright, and truthful."  Mr. Giamatti's letter was made public at a hearing before Judge Norbert Nadel, and it became the key piece of evidence in the judge's determination that Mr. Rose could not get an impartial hearing in front of the commissioner of baseball.  But there are larger issues involved in this affair.  Consider, for instance, why the letter was written in the first place.  Obviously, it was felt that Judge Rubin might give Mr. Peters a lighter sentence because he had helped with the Rose investigation.  It is common for convicted criminals to get reduced sentences if they provide information that leads to the arrest of other criminals.  This is done because we believe that the public has an interest in keeping them off the streets.  But Mr. Rose has not been the subject of a criminal investigation.  Mr. Giamattai's letter implies that there is a similar public interest in the preservation of the baseball's integrity.  Is this assumption really valid?  Consider the worst possible scenario.  What if, not only Pete Rose, but a number of other prominent figures in baseball were found to be betting on the game?  Further, let us assume investigators discovered that, because of this betting, many games were being fixed.  Would the consequences for the public really be that disastrous?  Attendance might drop, and fans might stop watching baseball on TV. (This is by no means a certainty.  Look at the popularity of the World Wrestling Federation.)  But even if individual franchises, or for that matter, all of the professional leagues were to fold, would the losses to society be any greater than if any other business went bankrupt?  It is hard to get up much sympathy for the highly paid athletes who would be forced to find another line of work.  Presumably, games could not be fixed without players being involved.  Thus, they wouldn't exactly be innocent bystanders.  There would be some unjust suffering, of course.  The people who usher fans to their seats, and sell them peanuts would lose their jobs.  But this happens whenever anyone goes out of business.  This doesn't mean baseball should not police itself.  But it should not get the public to do that job for it.  Helping baseball clean up its act should not be considered an act of community service; and criminals should not expect less strict treatment from the legal system because they helped profit-seeking professional sports organizations enforce their own rules.  ---  Mr. Krossel is a writer in Toronto.  HOSTAGE DANGERS are worsened by Lebanon's growing disintegration.  The further collapse of any order there will make it even harder for Bush to counter hostage-takers, regardless of how the current crisis plays out.  The chaos in Lebanon is a perfect atmosphere for terrorists, State Department experts say.  "Until the Lebanese can get on the road to recovery," one official says, "this anarchy and madness will continue to go on."  The Arab League gives up a push to end the fighting between Christians and Moslems in Lebanon.  Iraq sends arms to Christian troops, who then battle Syrian forces and their Lebanese allies.  Khomeini's death may mean Iran has even less control over Shiite terrorists in Lebanon.  This internal jockeying could give captors more reason to keep or harm their hostages.  Some Mideast analysts even suspect pro-Syrian terrorists announced the killing of Higgins to signal that Syria won't be boxed out of the Lebanon picture.  INTELLIGENCE FAILURES in the Middle East produce political finger pointing.  Conservatives argue that the post-Vietnam cutbacks at the CIA, especially manpower reductions in the Carter years, are the root cause of today's problems.  More reliance was placed on electronic surveillance, which is largely useless in Lebanon.  Also, anti-terrorist activities, including assassinations, were restricted.  But some Democrats pin much of the blame on the Reagan administration.  Despite adding almost 2,000 people to spy programs, director Casey never built back Mideast operations after the 1983 devastation of the U.S. embassy in Beirut.  Critics say he became too enamored with Ollie North-type escapades and relied too much for intelligence help on the Israelis, who had their own agenda.  FED CAUTION on the economy generates nagging recession worries.  Bent on reducing inflation, the Fed wants 18 more months of slow economic growth.  Short-term interest rates, though declining, remain above year-ago levels.  Fed watcher Eric Heinemann says the dip reflects weaker credit demand rather than any Fed moves.  Prudential Insurance economist Michael Keran, mentioned for a Fed seat, puts recession odds this year at 50-50.  Maryland Sen. Sarbanes warns Greenspan that the economy is entering "a rather precarious period."  Tennessee Sen. Sasser lectures the Fed chief that "the economic indicators are not good."  Bush-administration officials are silent in public, but they privately fret about the Fed's tight-fistedness.  Pittsburgh economist Stuart Hoffman derides the "Goldilocks scenario" -- an economy that is not too hot, not too cold, but just right.  TERRORIST THREATS are emphasized by top White House and Pentagon officials to push for congressional support for costly weapons.  Even before the hostage crisis, Quayle and Cheney argued that the B-2 bomber, SDI and other multibillion-dollar weapons are needed to combat threats from Libya, North Korea and the Middle East.  NO-WIN SUMMIT?  This weekend's meeting of Central American presidents could put U.S. officials in an awkward position.  If a plan is devised to dismantle the Contras before Nicaragua's promised 1990 election, the administration must either side with the Contras and alienate congressional Democrats or support the plan and anger conservatives.  WRIGHT RETURNS to Congress often enough that the former House speaker is dubbed "the Phantom of the Capitol."  He still uses his former congressional office, which soon will be occupied by a Texas Republican.  Wright, who resigned under ethics charges in June, already has a half-dozen speaking engagements at $10,000 each.  TRIVIA QUIZ: Which state hasn't elected a Democratic senator since 1932, the longest such interval in history?  Kansas, according to trivia questions in the soon-to-be-released Almanac of American Politics 1990.  And the city with the largest percentage of VCRs -- 74% -- isn't Washington, but Bend, Ore.  FOLEY FACES a turning point as tough issues loom for the House speaker.  His low-key style heals wounds left after Wright's departure under an ethics cloud.  "It's the soft sell with logic," Illinois Rep. Rostenkowski says.  But Foley's leadership will be tested in fighting for clean-air legislation and against Bush's push for a capital-gains tax cut as well as a move to repeal the catastrophic-illness insurance law.  Members of both parties praise Foley, but some fellow Democrats worry that his consensus style may not be tough enough.  They wonder how well he would rebound from a defeat.  Concern about Foley's style may reflect the increased decision-making it requires of colleagues.  "He's forcing the members to have a little spine," California Rep. Miller says.  Foley also must fulfill his own promised agenda, which includes ethics reform and campaign-finance revision.  MINOR MEMOS: Commerce chief Mosbacher, who often meets with foreign delegations, diplomatically replaces a cushion on his office couch that has the message, "Happiness is being an American," with one that reads, "Free Trade Avenue is a two-way street.". . .  Sen. Dole quips that "there are more presidential nominees lined up for congressional approvals than there are people waiting for hamburgers in Moscow." . . .  Georgia Rep. Ray protests proposed House spending of $700,000 to buy one million calendars for members to give away.  A top executive of American Express Co. submitted his resignation as a result of the company's campaign to discredit international banker Edmond Safra.  Harry L. Freeman, executive vice president of corporate affairs and communications, accepted "executive responsibility" for the campaign in a letter to American Express Chairman James Robinson III made public by the company.  In the letter, Mr. Freeman said he will retire from the company at Mr. Robinson's pleasure but no later than the end of the year.  Mr. Freeman, 57 years old, is a top aide of Mr. Robinson's and a close personal friend.  Although his primary responsibilities involved government and public relations, Mr. Freeman consulted regularly with Mr. Robinson about many aspects of American Express's business, according to company insiders.  It wasn't immediately clear whether Mr. Freeman was directly involved in the company's effort to discredit Mr. Safra.  American Express previously declined to say whether any senior officials were aware of the campaign, although Mr. Robinson has denied having prior knowledge of it.  An American Express official wouldn't say whether employees working for Mr. Freeman had any direct involvement in the campaign against Mr. Safra.  "We have an internal review under way," said the spokesman.  "Anything I might say might be prejudicial."  As previously reported, an investigation conducted for Mr. Safra by New York attorney Stanley Arkin determined that American Express representatives apparently influenced the publication of news articles linking Mr. Safra to money-laundering activities.  The company has publicly apologized to Mr. Safra and agreed to make $8 million in contributions to charities chosen by him.  Mr. Freeman didn't make himself available for comment.  Mr. Robinson couldn't be reached for comment.  The company also made public a letter to employees in which Mr. Robinson said he was accepting Mr. Freeman's resignation with regret.  In his letter, Mr. Freeman told Mr. Robinson: "In what I believe to be in the best interests of the company, and its orderly review of the events relating to Mr. Safra and his banks, I think it best that I advise you of my decision to retire from American Express."  Mr. Freeman went on to state that he believes the company's review of the episode will conclude he performed his duties honestly.  He added, however, that "a well-intentioned effort for which I had executive responsibility went awry.  Mistakes were made on my watch, and accordingly I believe my decision to retire, while painful, is appropriate."  "This is a very sad event because Harry is a world-class professional in his area.  He's in a class by himself as a public affairs guy," said Kenneth Roman, chairman of Ogilvy Group Inc., American Express's major advertising agency.  Mr. Roman also serves on a U.S. trade representative advisory committee with Mr. Freeman.  "It's hard to speculate on what happened," Mr. Roman added.  "He has excellent judgment and high intergrity.  He makes things happen.  But you can't make everything happen perfectly."  Mr. Freeman has been at American Express since 1977, when he joined as vice president, government affairs.  A Harvard-trained lawyer, his previous jobs included stints at the Overseas Private Investment Corp. and the Agency for International Development.  Mr. Safra, who is based in Geneva, Switzerland, sold one of his former banking companies, Trade Development Bank, to American Express in 1983.  Although he was expected to stay, he resigned the following year.  Today, he competes directly with American Express for wealthy, private banking customers.  His holdings include a controlling interest in Republic New York Corp., parent of Republic National Bank of New York. 